Arkansas, session 2025, HB1508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Repeal of Arkansas Code, Title 19 —
Exceptions.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, Arkansas
Code, Title 19, is repealed.
(b) The following portions of Arkansas Code, Title 19, are not
repealed:
(1) Section 19-4-803, resulting from Initiated Acts 2000, No. 1,
§ 19, and concerning exemptions from the laws regarding the expenditure of
cash funds;
(2) The Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-12-101 et seq.,
resulting from Initiated Acts 2000, No. 1, §§ 1-18;
*JLL144*
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) The Appendix to Arkansas Code, Title 19; and
(4) Sections for which repeal is prohibited under Section 373 of
this act.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Following its implementation in 1987, the Arkansas Code has
not undergone any recodification that is customary for statutory codes of its
type;
(2) The Arkansas Code Revision Commission asked staff of the
Bureau of Legislative Research to assemble a nonsubstantive, technical
recodification of Arkansas Code, Title 19, that contained technical changes
to the language of Title 19 and transferred certain material from Title 19 to
more appropriate titles of the Arkansas Code;
(3) The commission also asked the bureau to form a working group
of various state agencies, constitutional officers, and the Arkansas Bar
Association to review the proposed draft recodification of Title 19 for the
purposes of:
(A) Ensuring that only technical changes were made as part
of the recodification; and
(B) Obtaining input on the proposed draft from state
agencies, constitutional officers, and the Arkansas Bar Association;
(4) The working group reviewed the proposed draft recodification
from October 2023 until August 2024, recommended multiple technical revisions
to the draft recodification, and referred the revised draft to the commission
for its consideration; and
(5) At its October 2024 meeting, the commission approved the
draft recodification and requested that it be prepared for consideration by
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act shall make
only technical, not substantive, changes to the Arkansas Code of 1987.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-4-803, resulting from Initiated Acts
2000, No. 1, § 19, is amended to read as follows:
19-4-803. Exemptions.
(a) The following are exempt from this subchapter:
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Funds required by the terms of a bond indenture to be held
by paying agents for the payment of interest and principal on such bonds;
(2) Petty cash funds held by the various state agencies;
(3) Memorials, endowments, bequests, gifts, and donations made
to any state agency other than for normal operation of the agency;
(4) Canteen funds of state agencies other than institutions of
higher education, wherein the profits earned are used for the benefit of the
people served by that agency through the purchase of services or goods other
than normal salary or maintenance expenses of the agency;
(5) The Benefit Fund of the Division of Workforce Services;
(6) The Revenue Bond Guaranty Reserve Account of the Arkansas
Economic Development Council;
(7) The Illegal Drug Purchase Account and the Confidential
Accounts of the Division of Arkansas State Police;
(8) Patient funds, when the institution is acting in a trust
capacity or when the funds are utilized for patient activities other than
normal agency-provided services;
(9) The State Treasury Money Management Trust; and
(10) Any other funds determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State or the General Assembly, to be held in trust and on deposit in a
financial institution other than the State Treasury.
(b) The Division of Correction Plasma Center [abolished] is exempt
from provisions of this subchapter.
(c) The Arkansas Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool, created under
the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, § 23-79-501 et seq., and its
board of directors, and the Arkansas Property and Casualty Insurance Guaranty
Fund and its advisory association, referenced under the Arkansas Property and
Casualty Insurance Guaranty Act, § 23-90-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Life
and Health Insurance Guaranty Association and its board of directors,
referenced under the Arkansas Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association
Act, § 23-96-101 et seq., are hereby exempt from the provisions of this
subchapter.
(d) The Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund administered by the State
Board of Finance shall be exempt from the provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §§ 19-12-101 — 19-12-118, resulting from
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Initiated Acts 2000, No. 1, §§ 1-18, are amended to read as follows:
19-90-101. Title.
This chapter may be referred to and cited as the “Tobacco Settlement
Proceeds Act”.

19-90-102. Definitions.
(a) The following terms, as used in this chapter, shall have the
meanings set forth in this section:
(1) “Act” shall mean this Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Funds Act
of 2000.
(2) “ADFA” shall mean the Arkansas Development Finance
Authority.
(3) “Arkansas Biosciences Institute” shall mean the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute created by § 19-90-115.
(4) “Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account” shall mean
the account by that name created pursuant to § 19-90-111 to be funded from
the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and used by the Arkansas Biosciences
Institute for the purposes set forth in this chapter.
(5) “Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund” shall mean that public
trust for the benefit of the citizens of the State of Arkansas created and
established pursuant to § 19-90-107.
(6) “Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission” shall mean the
entity that administers the programs established pursuant to this chapter,
also known as “ATSC”, which is described and established in § 19-90-117.
(7) “Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund” shall mean the
fund by that name created pursuant to § 19-90-108(f) to be used by the
Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission for the purposes set forth in § 19-90-
117.
(8) “Bonds” shall mean any and all bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness issued by ADFA as Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds
pursuant to the terms of this chapter.
(9) “Capital Improvement Projects” shall mean the acquisition,
construction and equipping of land, buildings, and appurtenant facilities,
including but not limited to parking and landscaping, all intended for the
provision of health care services, health education, or health-related
research; provided that each such Capital Improvement Project must be either
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
set forth in this chapter or subsequently designated by the General Assembly
pursuant to legislation.
(10) “Debt Service Requirements” shall mean all amounts required
to be paid in connection with the repayment of Bonds issued pursuant to this
chapter, including, but not limited to, the principal of and interest on the
Bonds, amounts reasonably required for a debt service reserve, amounts
reasonably required to provide debt service coverage, trustee's and paying
agent fees, and, to the extent reasonably necessary, capitalized interest on
the Bonds.
(11) “Initial MSA Disbursement” shall mean the first
disbursement from the MSA Escrow to the State, consisting of Arkansas' share
of payments from Participating Manufacturers due under the Master Settlement
Agreement and designated as the 1998 First Payment, the 2000 Initial Payment,
and the 2000 Annual Payment, which amounts, along with any accumulated
interest, represent all money due to the State and attributable to payments
prior to January 1, 2001.
(12) “Master Settlement Agreement” or “MSA” shall mean that
certain Master Settlement Agreement between certain states (the “Settling
States”) and certain tobacco manufacturers (the “Participating
Manufacturers”), pursuant to which the Participating Manufacturers have
agreed to make certain payments to each of the Settling States.
(13) “Medicaid Expansion Program Account” shall mean the account
by that name created pursuant to § 19-90-112 to be funded from the Tobacco
Settlement Program Fund and used by the Department of Human Services for the
purposes set forth in this chapter.
(14) “MSA Disbursements” shall mean all amounts disbursed from
the MSA Escrow pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement to the State of
Arkansas.
(15) “MSA Disbursement Date” shall mean any date on which MSA
Disbursements are made to the State of Arkansas pursuant to the Master
Settlement Agreement at the request of the State.
(16) “MSA Escrow” shall mean those escrow accounts established
to hold the State of Arkansas's share of the Tobacco Settlement proceeds
prior to disbursement to the State pursuant to the Master Settlement
Agreement.
(17) “MSA Escrow Agent” shall mean that agent appointed pursuant
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to the Escrow Agreement entered into between the Settling States and the
Participating Manufacturers pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement.
(18) “Participating Manufacturers” shall mean those entities
defined as Participating Manufacturers by the terms of the Master Settlement
Agreement.
(19) “Prevention and Cessation Program Account” shall mean the
account by that name created pursuant to § 19-90-109 to be funded from the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and used for the purposes set forth in this
chapter.
(20) “Program Accounts” shall mean, collectively, the Prevention
and Cessation Program Account, the Targeted State Needs Program Account, the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account, and the Medicaid Expansion
Program Account.
(21) “State Board of Finance” shall mean the entity created
pursuant to § 19-3-501, as amended.
(22) “Targeted State Needs Programs Account” shall mean the
account by that name created pursuant to § 19-90-110 to be funded from the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and used for the purposes set forth in this
chapter.
(23) “Tobacco Settlement” shall mean the State of Arkansas's
share of funds to be distributed pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement
between the Settling States and the Participating Manufacturers.
(24) “Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund” shall mean the Fund
established as a cash fund outside of the State Treasury pursuant to § 19-90-
104, into which all MSA Disbursements shall be deposited on each MSA
Disbursement Date.
(25) “Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund” shall mean the Fund
established as a cash fund outside of the State Treasury pursuant to § 19-90-
105.
(26) “Tobacco Settlement Program Fund” or “Program Fund” shall
mean the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund established pursuant to § 19-90-108,
which shall be used to hold and distribute funds to the various Program
Accounts created by this chapter.
(27) “Trust indenture” or “indenture” shall mean any trust
indenture, ADFA resolution, or other similar document under which Tobacco
Settlement Revenue Bonds are to be issued and secured.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-90-103. Grant of authority to State Board of Finance.
The State Board of Finance is hereby authorized and directed to perform
the following duties with respect to the Tobacco Settlement:
(a) The State Board of Finance is authorized and directed on behalf of
the State of Arkansas to receive all authorized disbursements from the MSA
Escrow. The Initial MSA Disbursement and each subsequent MSA Disbursement
shall be immediately deposited into the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund,
and distributed from there as prescribed in this chapter. The Office of the
Attorney General is directed to take all action necessary to inform the MSA
Escrow Agent that the State Board of Finance is authorized to receive such
disbursements on behalf of the State.
(b) The State Board of Finance shall manage and invest all amounts
held in the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund, the Tobacco Settlement Debt
Service Fund, the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund, the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund, the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund, and the
Program Accounts, and shall have full power to invest and reinvest the moneys
in such funds and accounts and to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or
dispose of any of the investments so made as well as the proceeds of the
investments and moneys, pursuant to the following standards:
(1) with respect to amounts in the Arkansas Healthy Century
Trust Fund, all investments shall be pursuant to and in compliance with the
prudent investor and other applicable standards set forth in §§ 24-3-408
[repealed], 24-3-414 [repealed], 24-3-415 [repealed], and 24-3-417 — 24-3-425
[repealed], and § 19-3-318;
(2) with respect to amounts in the Tobacco Settlement Debt
Service Fund, all investments shall be pursuant to and in compliance with the
prudent investor and other applicable standards set forth in §§ 24-3-408
[repealed], 24-3-414 [repealed], 24-3-415 [repealed], and 24-3-417 — 24-3-425
[repealed], and § 19-3-318; provided further that the types and manner of
such investments may be further limited as set forth in § 19-90-105; and
(3) with respect to amounts held in the Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund, the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, each of the Program
Accounts, and the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund, all
investments shall be of the type described in § 19-3-310 and shall be made
with depositories designated pursuant to § 19-3-307; or such investment shall
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
be in certificates of deposit, in securities as outlined in § 23-47-401
without limitation or as approved in the State Board of Finance investment
policy. The State Board of Finance shall insure that such investments shall
mature or be redeemable at the times needed for disbursements from such funds
and accounts pursuant to this chapter.
(c) The State Board of Finance is authorized to employ such
professionals as it deems necessary and desirable to assist it in properly
managing and investing the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund, pursuant to
the standards set forth in § 24-3-425 [repealed].
(d) The State Board of Finance is authorized to use investment
earnings from the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund to compensate the
professionals retained under subsection (d), and to pay the reasonable costs
and expenses of the State Board of Finance in administering the funds and
accounts created under this chapter and performing all other duties ascribed
to it hereunder.
(e) On the last day of each month, the State Board of Finance shall
provide the Department of Finance and Administration, Office of Accounting
with the current balances in the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund, the
Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund, the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, the
Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund, the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement
Commission Fund, and each Program Account.
(f) The State Board of Finance is authorized and directed to perform
all other tasks that may be assigned to the State Board of Finance pursuant
to this chapter.

19-90-104. Creation and administration of Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund.
(a) There is hereby created and established a fund, held separate and
apart from the State Treasury, to be known as the “Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund”, which fund shall be administered by the State Board of
Finance.
(b) All moneys received as part of the Tobacco Settlement are hereby
designated cash funds pursuant to § 19-40-103, restricted in their use and to
be used solely as provided in this chapter. All MSA Disbursements shall be
initially deposited into the credit of the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding
Fund, when and as received. Any and all MSA Disbursements received prior to
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the effective date of this Act shall be immediately transferred to the
Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund upon this chapter becoming effective.
The Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund is intended as a cash fund, not
subject to appropriation, and, to the extent practical, amounts in the
Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund shall be immediately distributed to the
other Funds and Accounts described in this chapter.
(c) The Initial MSA Disbursement shall be distributed from the Tobacco
Settlement Cash Holding Fund to the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund as an
initial endowment pursuant to § 19-90-107.
(d) After the Initial MSA Disbursement has been transferred as set
forth in subsection (c) of this section, the State Board of Finance,
beginning with MSA Disbursements for years 2001 and thereafter, shall receive
all amounts due to the State from the MSA Escrow. In calendar year 2001,
there shall first be deposited into the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund
from the MSA Disbursements attributable to calendar year 2001, the amount
necessary to bring the principal amount of the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust
Fund to one-hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). The remainder of any MSA
Disbursements attributable to calendar year 2001 shall be deposited into the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and distributed pursuant to § 19-90-108.
Beginning in 2002, and for each annual MSA Disbursement thereafter, all MSA
Disbursements shall be immediately deposited into the Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund and then distributed, as soon as practical after receipt, as
follows:
(1) The first five million dollars ($5,000,000) received as an
MSA Disbursement in each calendar year beginning in 2002 shall be transferred
from the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund to the Tobacco Settlement Debt
Service Fund; and
(2) After the transfer described in § 19-90-104(d)(1), the
amounts remaining in the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund shall be
transferred to the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund.
(e) While it is intended that the State Board of Finance will transfer
funds from the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund immediately upon receipt,
to the extent that any amounts must be held pending the transfers described
in § 19-90-104(c) and (d), the State Board of Finance is authorized to invest
such amounts in suitable investments maturing not later than when the moneys
are expected to be transferred, provided that such investments are made in
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
compliance with § 19-90-103(c).

19-90-105. Creation and administration of Tobacco Settlement Debt
Service Fund.
(a) There is hereby created and established a fund, designated as a
cash fund and held separate and apart from the State Treasury, to be known as
the “Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund”, which Fund shall be administered
by the State Board of Finance. All moneys deposited into the Tobacco
Settlement Debt Service Fund are hereby designated cash funds pursuant to §
19-40-103, restricted in their use and to be used solely as provided in this
chapter.
(b) There shall be transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund, the amount set
forth for such transfer in § 19-90-104(d). All amounts received into the
Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund shall be held until needed to make
payments on Debt Service Requirements. The State Board of Finance is
authorized to invest any amounts held in the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service
Fund in suitable investments maturing not later than when the moneys are
needed to pay Debt Service Requirements, provided that such investments
comply with § 19-90-103(c), and further provided that the investment of such
moneys may be further limited by the provisions of any trust indenture
pursuant to which Bonds are issued or any related non-arbitrage certificate
or tax regulatory agreement.
(c) Amounts held in the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund shall be
transferred to funds and accounts established and held by the trustee for the
Bonds at such times and in such manner as may be specified in the trust
indenture securing the Bonds. If so required by any trust indenture pursuant
to which Bonds have been issued, amounts deposited into the Tobacco
Settlement Debt Service Fund may be immediately deposited into funds or
accounts established by such trust indenture and held by the trustee for the
Bonds. The State Board of Finance is authorized to execute any consent,
pledge, or other document, reasonably required pursuant to a trust indenture
to affirm the pledge of amounts held in the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service
Fund to secure Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds.
(d) On December 15 of each calendar year, any amounts held in the
Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund, to the extent such amounts are not
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
needed to pay Debt Service Requirements prior to the following April 15,
shall be transferred to the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund. At such time
as there are no longer any Bonds outstanding, and all Debt Service
Requirements and other contractual obligations have been paid in full,
amounts remaining in the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund shall be
transferred to the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund.

19-90-106. Issuance of tobacco settlement revenue bonds by Arkansas
Development Finance Authority.
(a) The Arkansas Development Finance Authority (“ADFA”) is hereby
directed and authorized to issue Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds, the
proceeds of which are to be used for financing the Capital Improvement
Projects described in § 19-90-106(b). The Bonds may be issued in series from
time to time, and shall be special obligations only of ADFA, secured solely
by the revenue sources set forth in this section.
(b) The Capital Improvement Projects to be financed shall be:
(1) University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, Biosciences
Research Building; provided, however, that no more than two million, two
hundred thousand dollars ($2,200,000) of the annual transfer to the Tobacco
Settlement Debt Service Fund shall be allocated in any one year to pay Debt
Service Requirements for this project, and provided further that no more than
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in principal amount of Tobacco
Settlement Revenue Bonds may be issued for this project;
(2) Arkansas State University Biosciences Research Building;
provided, however, that no more than one million, eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000) of the annual transfer to the Tobacco Settlement Debt
Service Fund shall be allocated in any one year to pay Debt Service
Requirements for this project, and provided further that no more than twenty
million dollars ($20,000,000) in principal amount of Tobacco Settlement
Revenue Bonds may be issued for this project;
(3) College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences; provided, however, that no more than one million dollars
($1,000,000) of the annual transfer to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service
Fund shall be allocated in any one year to pay Debt Service Requirements for
this project, and provided further that no more than fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000) in principal amount of Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds may be
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
issued for this project; and
(4) Only such other capital improvement projects related to the
provision of health care services, health education, or health-related
research as designated by legislation enacted by the General Assembly;
provided that the deposits to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund are
adequate to pay Debt Service Requirements for such additional projects.
(c) Prior to issuance of any series of Bonds authorized herein, ADFA
shall adopt a resolution authorizing the issuance of such series of Bonds.
Each such resolution shall contain such terms, covenants, conditions, as
deemed desirable and consistent with this chapter together with provisions of
the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Act, § 15-5-101 et seq., § 15-5-
201 et seq., and § 15-5-301 et seq., including without limitation, those
pertaining to the establishment and maintenance of funds and accounts,
deposit and investment of Bond proceeds and the rights and obligations of
ADFA and the registered owners of the Bonds. In authorizing, issuing, selling
the Bonds and in the investment of all funds held under the resolution or
indenture securing such Bonds, ADFA shall have the powers and be governed by
the provisions of §§ 15-5-309 and 15-5-310.
(d) The Bonds shall be special obligations of ADFA, secured and
payable from deposits made into the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund
created pursuant to this chapter. In pledging revenues to secure the Bonds,
the provisions of § 15-5-313 shall apply.
(e) If so determined by ADFA, the Bonds may additionally be secured by
a lien on or security interest in facilities financed by the Bonds, by a lien
or pledge of loans made by ADFA to the user of such facilities, and any
collateral security received by ADFA, including, without limitation, ADFA's
interest in and any revenue derived from any loan agreements. It shall not be
necessary to the perfection of the lien and pledge for such purposes that the
trustee in connection with such bond issue or the holders of the Bonds take
possession of the loans, mortgages and collateral security.
(f) It shall be plainly stated on the face of each Bond that it has
been issued under this chapter, and the Arkansas Development Finance
Authority Act, § 15-5-101 et seq., § 15-5-201 et seq., and § 15-5-301 et
seq., that the Bonds shall be obligations only of ADFA secured as specified
herein and that, in no event, shall the bonds constitute an indebtedness of
the State of Arkansas or an indebtedness for which the faith and credit of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the State of Arkansas or any of its revenues are pledged or an indebtedness
secured by lien, or security interest in any property of the State.
(g) The Bonds may be issued in one or more series, as determined by
ADFA. Additional Bonds may be issued in one or more series to fund additional
Capital Improvement Projects subsequently designated pursuant to § 19-90-
106(b)(4), so long as ADFA determines that revenues transferred to the
Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund, in combination with other revenues
available to secure the Bonds pursuant to § 19-90-106(e); will be sufficient
to meet all Debt Service Requirements on such additional Bonds and any other
Bonds then outstanding.
(h) Any funds remaining and available to ADFA or the trustees under
any indenture or resolution authorized herein after the retirement of all
Bonds outstanding under such indenture or resolution, and the satisfaction of
all contractual obligations related thereto and all current expenses of ADFA
related thereto, shall be transferred to the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust
Fund.
(i) ADFA may issue Bonds for the purpose of refunding Bonds previously
issued pursuant to this chapter, and in doing so shall be governed by the
provisions of § 15-5-314.
(j) All Bonds issued under this chapter, and interest thereon, shall
be exempt from all taxes of the State of Arkansas, including income,
inheritance, and property taxes. The Bonds shall be eligible to secure
deposits of all public funds, and shall be legal for investment of municipal,
county, bank, fiduciary, insurance company and trust funds.
(k) The State of Arkansas does hereby pledge to and agree with the
holders of any Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds issued pursuant to this
chapter that the State shall not (1) limit or alter the distribution of the
Tobacco Settlement moneys to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund if such
action would materially impair the rights of the holders of the Bonds, (2)
amend or modify the Master Settlement Agreement in any way if such action
would materially impair the rights of the holders of the Bonds, (3) limit or
alter the rights vested in ADFA to fulfill the terms of any agreements made
with the holders of the Bonds, or (4) in any way impair the rights and
remedies of the holders of the Bonds, unless and until all Bonds issued
pursuant to this chapter, together with interest on the Bonds, and all costs
and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the holders of the Bonds, have been paid, fully met, and discharged. ADFA is
authorized to include this pledge and agreement in any agreement with the
holders of the Bonds.

19-90-107. Creation and administration of Arkansas Healthy Century
Trust Fund.
(a) There is hereby created and established on the books of the
Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, a trust fund, to be created as a public trust for the benefit of the
State of Arkansas, to be known as the “Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund”,
which Trust Fund shall be administered by the State Board of Finance. Such
fund shall be restricted in its use and is to be used solely as provided in
this chapter.
(b) The Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund shall be a perpetual
trust, the beneficiary of which shall be the State of Arkansas and the
programs of the State of Arkansas enumerated in this section. The State Board
of Finance, as it may from time to time be comprised, is hereby appointed as
trustee of the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund. Such trust shall be
revocable, and subject to amendment.
(c) The Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund shall be administered in
accordance with the provisions of this section, which shall, for all
purposes, be deemed to be the governing document of the public trust.
(d) The Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund shall be funded in an
initial principal amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) as
provided in § 19-90-104. All earnings on investments of amounts in the
Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund, to the extent not used for the purposes
enumerated in subsection (e) of this section, shall be redeposited into the
Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund, it being the intent of this chapter that
the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund shall grow in principal amount until
needed for programs and purposes to benefit the State of Arkansas.
(e) The Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund shall be held in trust and
used for the following purposes, and no other purposes:
(1) investment earnings on the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust
Fund may be used for:
(A) the payment of expenses related to the
responsibilities of the State Board of Finance as set forth in § 19-90-103;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and
(B) such programs, and other projects related to
healthcare services, health education, and health-related research as shall,
from time to time, be designated in legislation adopted by the General
Assembly;
(2) the principal amounts in the Arkansas Healthy Century Trust
Fund may be used for such programs, and other projects related to healthcare
services, health education, and health-related research as shall, from time
to time, be designated in legislation adopted by the General Assembly, it
being the intent of this chapter that the principal amount of the Arkansas
Healthy Century Trust Fund should not be appropriated without amendment of
this public trust; and
(3) notwithstanding subdivisions (e)(1) and (2) of this section,
investment earnings and principal amounts from the Arkansas Healthy Century
Trust Fund may be transferred as designated in legislation adopted by the
General Assembly.
(f) It is intended that the beneficiaries of the Arkansas Healthy
Century Trust Fund be the State of Arkansas and its programs, and other
projects related to healthcare services, health education, and health-related
research, as such are now in existence or as such may be created in the
future.
(g) The State Board of Finance, as trustee of the Arkansas Healthy
Century Trust Fund, is authorized to invest all amounts held in the Arkansas
Healthy Century Trust Fund in investments pursuant to and in compliance with
§ 19-90-103(c).

19-90-108. Creation and administration of the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund.
(a) There is hereby created and established on the books of the
Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State a trust fund to be known as the “Tobacco Settlement Program Fund”,
which fund shall be administered by the State Board of Finance. All moneys
deposited into the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund are hereby restricted in
their use and to be used solely as provided in this chapter. All expenditures
and obligations that are payable from the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and
from each of the program accounts shall be subject to the same fiscal
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
control, accounting, budgetary, and purchasing laws as are expenditures and
obligations payable from other State Treasury funds, except as specified
otherwise in this chapter. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may require
additional controls, procedures, and reporting requirements that he or she
determines are necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.
(b) There shall be transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund to the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund the amounts set forth for
such transfer as provided in § 19-90-104.
(c) Amounts deposited into the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall,
prior to the distribution to the program accounts set forth in § 19-90-
108(d)(1), be held and invested in investments pursuant to and in compliance
with § 19-90-103(c); provided, that all such investments must mature or be
redeemable without penalty on or prior to the next-succeeding June 30.
(d)(1) On each July 1, the amounts deposited into the Tobacco
Settlement Program Fund, excluding investment earnings, shall be transferred
to the various program accounts as follows:
(A) Fifteen and eight-tenths percent (15.8%) of amounts in
the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the Targeted
State Needs Program Account;
(B) Twenty-two and eight-tenths percent (22.8%) of amounts
in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute Program Account; and
(C) Thirty-four and two-tenths percent (34.2%) of amounts
in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the Medicaid
Expansion Program Account.
(2)(A) The Prevention and Cessation Program Account may receive
loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in amounts determined by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that shall not exceed twenty-seven and two-
tenths percent (27.2%) of the amounts estimated to be received in the Tobacco
Settlement Program Fund during the current fiscal year. This estimate shall
not include moneys returned to the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(B) The loans shall be repaid from twenty-seven and two-
tenths percent (27.2%) of amounts received in the Tobacco Settlement Program
Fund during the fiscal year in which the loans are made. The loans shall be
repaid before the end of the fiscal year. After the loans have been repaid,
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Prevention and Cessation Program Account shall be transferred the
difference between twenty-seven and two-tenths percent (27.2%) of amounts
received in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund during the fiscal year in
which the loans are made and the amount of the loans.
(e)(1) All moneys distributed to the program accounts set forth in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section and remaining at the end of each fiscal
biennium shall be transferred to the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund by the
board. The amounts will be held in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund and
then redeposited on July 1 as follows:
(A) Twenty-three and one-tenth percent (23.1%) of amounts
in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the Targeted
State Needs Program Account;
(B) Thirty-three and three-tenths percent (33.3%) of
amounts in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account; and
(C) Forty-three and six-tenths percent (43.6%) of amounts
in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be transferred to the Medicaid
Expansion Program Account.
(2) However, if the director of any agency receiving funds from
the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund determines that there is a need to retain
a portion of the amounts transferred under this section, the director may
submit a request and written justification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State. Upon determination by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that
sufficient justification exists, and after certification by the Arkansas
Tobacco Settlement Commission that the program has met the criteria
established in § 19-90-118, such amounts requested shall remain in the
account at the end of a biennium, there to be used for the purposes
established by this chapter; provided, that the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall seek the review of the Legislative Council prior to approval of
any such request.
(f) The board shall invest all moneys held in the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund and in each of the program accounts. All investment earnings on
such funds and accounts shall be transferred on each July 1 to a fund hereby
established and as a trust fund on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and designated as
the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund. Such fund is to be a trust
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund and administered by the board. All moneys deposited into the Arkansas
Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund are hereby restricted in their use and to
be used solely as provided in this chapter. Amounts held in the Arkansas
Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund shall be used to pay the costs and
expenses of the commission, including the monitoring and evaluation program
established pursuant to § 19-90-118, and to provide grants as authorized in §
19-90-117.

19-90-109. Creation of Prevention and Cessation Program Account.
(a) There is hereby created a trust fund on the books of the Treasurer
of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
within the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund maintained by the State Board of
Finance, an account to be known as the “Prevention and Cessation Program
Account”. The account shall be used by the Department of Health for such
purposes and in such amounts as may be appropriated in law.
(b) All moneys deposited into the account except for investment
earnings shall be used for the purposes set forth in § 19-90-113 or such
other purposes as may be appropriated in law.
(c) Moneys remaining in the account at the end of each fiscal year
shall be carried forward and used for the purposes provided by law.

19-90-110. Creation of the Targeted State Needs Program Account.
(a) There is hereby created a trust fund on the books of the Treasurer
of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
within the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund maintained by the State Board of
Finance, an account to be known as the “Targeted State Needs Program
Account”. Such account shall be used for such purposes and in such amounts as
may be appropriated by law.
(b) On each July 1, there shall be transferred from the fund to the
account the amount specified in § 19-90-108(d)(1)(A).
(c) All moneys deposited into the account except for investment
earnings shall be used for the purposes set forth in § 19-90-114, or such
other purposes as may be appropriated in law. Of the amounts deposited into
the account, the following proportions shall be used to fund the programs
established in § 19-90-114:
(1) College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Medical Sciences — thirty-three per cent (33%);
(2) Area Health Education Center located in Helena — twenty-two
per cent (22%);
(3) Donald W. Reynolds Center on Aging of the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences — twenty-two per cent (22%); and
(4) Minority Health Initiative, administered by the Arkansas
Minority Health Commission — twenty-three per cent (23%).
(d) Moneys remaining in the account at the end of the first fiscal
year of a biennium shall be carried forward and used for the purposes
provided by law. Such amounts that remain at the end of a biennium shall be
transferred to the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund pursuant to § 19-90-
108(e).

19-90-111. Creation of Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account.
(a) There is hereby created a trust fund on the books of the Treasurer
of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
within the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund maintained by the State Board of
Finance, an account to be known as the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program
Account. Such account shall be used by the Arkansas Biosciences Institute and
its members for such purposes and in such amounts as may be appropriated in
law.
(b) On each July 1, there shall be transferred from the fund to the
account the amount specified in § 19-90-108(d)(1)(B).
(c) All moneys deposited into the account except for investment
earnings shall be used for the purposes set forth in § 19-90-115 or such
other purposes as may be appropriated in law.
(d) Moneys remaining in the account at the end of the first fiscal
year of a biennium shall be carried forward and used for the purposes
provided by law. Such amounts that remain at the end of a biennium shall be
transferred to the fund pursuant to § 19-90-108(e).

19-90-112. Creation of Medicaid Expansion Program Account.
(a) There is hereby created a trust fund on the books of the Treasurer
of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
within the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund maintained by the State Board of
Finance, an account to be known as the “Medicaid Expansion Program Account”.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Such account shall be used by the Department of Human Services for such
purposes and in such amounts as may be appropriated in law. These funds shall
not be used to replace or supplant other funds available in the Department of
Human Services Grants Fund Account. The funds appropriated for this program
shall not be expended, except in conformity with federal and state laws, and
then only after the department obtains the necessary approvals from the
federal Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.
(b) On each July 1, there shall be transferred from the fund to the
account the amount specified in § 19-90-108(d)(1)(C).
(c) All moneys deposited into the account except for investment
earnings shall be used for the purposes set forth in § 19-90-116, or such
other purposes as may be appropriated in law.
(d) Moneys remaining in the account at the end of the first fiscal
year of a biennium shall be carried forward and used for the purposes
provided by law. Such amounts that remain at the end of a biennium shall be
transferred to the fund pursuant to § 19-90-108(e).
(e)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish separate
paying accounts for the Medicaid Expansion Program to be used exclusively to
draw down federal funds associated with the federal share of expenditures and
for the state share of expenditures transferred from the Medicaid Expansion
Program Account or for any other appropriate state matching funds.
(2) The Medicaid Expansion Program, established by Initiated Act
1 of 2000 and enacted in the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-90-101 et
seq., is a separate and distinct component of the Arkansas Medicaid Program,
administered by the Department of Human Services and established under § 19-
90-116(b)(1).

19-90-113. Establishment and administration of prevention and
cessation programs.
(a) It is the intent of this chapter that the Department of Health
should establish the Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Program described in
this section, and to administer such programs in accordance with law. The
program described in this section shall be administered pursuant to a
strategic plan encompassing the elements of a mission statement, defined
program(s), and program goals with measurable objectives and strategies to be
implemented over a specific timeframe. Evaluation of each program shall
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
include performance based measures for accountability which will measure
specific health related results.
(b) The Department of Health shall be responsible for developing,
integrating, and monitoring tobacco prevention and cessation programs funded
under this chapter and shall provide administrative oversight and management,
including, but not limited to implementing performance based measures. The
Department of Health shall have authority to award grants and allocate money
appropriated to implement the tobacco prevention and cessation program
mandated under this chapter. The Department of Health may contract with those
entities necessary to fully implement the tobacco prevention and cessation
initiatives mandated under this chapter. Within thirty (30) days of receipt
of moneys into the Prevention and Cessation Program Account, fifteen percent
(15%) of those moneys shall be deposited into a special account within the
prevention and cessation account at the Department of Health to be expended
for tobacco prevention and cessation in minority communities as directed by
the Secretary of the Department of Health in consultation with the Chancellor
of the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, the President of the Arkansas
Medical, Dental, and Pharmaceutical Association, Inc., and the League of
United Latin American Citizens.
(c) The Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Program shall be comprised of
components approved by the State Board of Health. The program components
selected by the board shall include:
(1) community prevention programs that reduce youth tobacco use;
(2) local school programs for education and prevention in grades
kindergarten through twelve (K-12) that should include school nurses, where
appropriate;
(3) enforcement of youth tobacco control laws;
(4) state-wide programs with youth involvement to increase local
coalition activities;
(5) tobacco cessation programs;
(6) tobacco-related disease prevention programs;
(7) a comprehensive public awareness and health promotion
campaign;
(8) grants and contracts funded pursuant to this chapter for
monitoring and evaluation, as well as data gathering; and
(9) other programs as deemed necessary by the board.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d) There is hereby created an Advisory Committee to the State Board
of Health, to be known as the “Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Advisory
Committee”. It shall be the duty and responsibility of the Committee to
advise and assist the board in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
The Advisory Committee's authority shall be limited to an advisory function
to the board. The Advisory Committee may, in consultation with the Department
of Health, make recommendations to the board on the strategic plans for the
prevention, cessation, and awareness elements of the comprehensive Tobacco
Prevention and Cessation Program. The Advisory Committee may also make
recommendations to the board on the strategic vision and guiding principles
of the Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Program.
(e) The Advisory Committee shall be governed as follows:
(1) The Advisory Committee shall consist of eighteen (18)
members; one (1) member to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, one (1) member to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and sixteen (16) members to be appointed by the Governor
subject to confirmation by the Senate. The Governor shall consult each of the
following designated groups before making an appointment, and shall consist
of the following: one (1) member appointed to represent the Arkansas Medical
Society, Inc.; one (1) member shall represent the Arkansas Hospital
Association, Inc.; one (1) member shall represent the American Cancer
Society; one (1) member shall represent the American Heart Association; one
(1) member shall represent the American Lung Association; one (1) member
shall represent the Coalition for a Tobacco Free Arkansas; one (1) member
shall represent Arkansans for Drug Free Youth; one (1) member shall represent
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education; one (1) member shall
represent the Arkansas Minority Health Commission; one (1) member shall
represent the Arkansas Center for Health Improvement; one (1) member shall
represent the Arkansas Association of Area Agencies on Aging; one (1) member
shall represent the Arkansas Nurses Association; one (1) member shall
represent the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service; one (1)
member shall represent the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff; one (1)
member shall represent the League of United Latin American Citizens; and one
(1) member shall represent the Arkansas Medical, Dental, and Pharmaceutical
Association, Inc. The Executive Committee of Arkansas Students Working
Against Tobacco shall serve as youth advisors to this Advisory Committee. All
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
members of this committee shall be residents of the State of Arkansas.
(2) The Advisory Committee will initially have four (4) members
who will serve one (1) year terms; four (4) members who will serve two (2)
year terms; five (5) members who will serve three (3) year terms; and five
(5) members who will serve four (4) years. Members of the Advisory Committee
shall draw lots to determine the length of the initial term. Subsequently
appointed members shall be appointed for four (4) year terms and no member
can serve more than two (2) consecutive full four (4) year terms. The terms
shall commence on October 1st of each year.
(3) Members of the Advisory Committee shall not be entitled to
compensation for their services, but may receive expense reimbursement in
accordance with § 25-16-902, to be paid from funds appropriated for this
program to the Department of Health.
(4) Members appointed to the Advisory Committee and the
organizations they represent shall make full disclosure of the member's
participation on the Committee when applying for any grant or contract funded
by this chapter.
(5) All members appointed to the Advisory Committee shall make
full and public disclosure of any past or present association to the tobacco
industry.
(6) The Advisory Committee shall, within ninety (90) days of
appointment, hold a meeting and elect from its membership a chair for a term
set by the Advisory Committee. The Advisory Committee shall adopt bylaws.
(7) The Advisory Committee shall meet at least quarterly,
however, special meetings may be called at any time at the pleasure of the
State Board of Health or pursuant to the bylaws adopted by the Advisory
Committee.
(f) The board is authorized to review the recommendations of the
Advisory Committee. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules, standards and
guidelines as necessary to implement the program in consultation with the
Department of Health.
(g) The Department of Health in implementing this Program shall
establish such performance based accountability procedures and requirements
as are consistent with law.
(h) Each of the programs adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be
subject to the monitoring and evaluation procedures described in § 19-90-118.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-90-114. Establishment and administration of the Targeted State
Needs Programs.
(a) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences is hereby
instructed to establish the Targeted State Needs Programs described in this
section, and to administer such programs in accordance with law.
(b) The targeted state needs programs to be established are as
follows:
(1) College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences;
(2) Area Health Education Center (located in Helena);
(3) Donald W. Reynolds Center on Aging of the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences; and
(4) Minority Health Initiative administered by the Minority
Health Commission.
(c)(1) College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences. The College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences is hereby established as a part of the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the purpose of conducting activities to
improve the health and healthcare of the citizens of Arkansas. These
activities should include, but not be limited to the following functions:
faculty and course offerings in the core areas of public health including
health policy and management, epidemiology, biostatistics, health economics,
maternal and child health, environmental health, and health and services
research; with courses offered both locally and statewide via a variety of
distance learning mechanisms.
(2) It is intended that the College of Public Health of the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences should serve as a resource for
the General Assembly, the Governor, state agencies, and communities. Services
provided by the College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences should include, but not be limited to the following:
consultation and analysis, developing and disseminating programs, obtaining
federal and philanthropic grants, conducting research, and other scholarly
activities in support of improving the health and healthcare of the citizens
of Arkansas.
(d) Area Health Education Center. The first Area Health Education
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Centers were founded in 1973 as the primary educational outreach effort of
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences. It is the intent of this
chapter that the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences establish a new
Area Health Education Center to serve the following counties: Crittenden,
Phillips, Lee, St. Francis, Chicot, Monroe, and Desha. The new Area Health
Education Center shall be operated in the same fashion as other facilities in
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Area Health Education Center
program including training students in the fields of medicine, nursing,
pharmacy and various allied health professions, and offering medical
residents specializing in family practice. The training shall emphasize
primary care, covering general health education and basic medical care for
the whole family. The program shall be headquartered in Helena with offices
in Lake Village and West Memphis.
(e) Donald W. Reynolds Center on Aging of the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences. It is the intent of this chapter that the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences establish, in connection with the Donald W.
Reynolds Center on Aging of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences
and its existing Arkansas Health Education Centers program, healthcare
programs around the state offering interdisciplinary educational programs to
better equip local healthcare professionals in preventive care, early
diagnosis and effective treatment for the elderly population throughout the
state. The satellite centers will provide access to dependable healthcare,
education, resource and support programs for the most rapidly growing segment
of the State's population. Each center's program is to be defined by an
assessment of local needs and priorities in consultation with local
healthcare professionals.
(f) Minority Health Initiative. It is the intent of this chapter that
the Arkansas Minority Health Commission establish and administer the Arkansas
Minority Health Initiative for screening, monitoring, and treating
hypertension, strokes, and other disorders disproportionately critical to
minority groups in Arkansas. The program should be designed:
(1) to increase awareness of hypertension, strokes, and other
disorders disproportionately critical to minorities by utilizing different
approaches that include but are not limited to the following: advertisements,
distribution of educational materials and providing medications for high risk
minority populations;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) to provide screening or access to screening for
hypertension, strokes, and other disorders disproportionately critical to
minorities but will also provide this service to any citizen within the state
regardless of racial/ethnic group;
(3) to develop intervention strategies to decrease hypertension,
strokes and other disorders noted above, as well as associated complications,
including: educational programs, modification of risk factors by smoking
cessation programs, weight loss, promoting healthy lifestyles, and treatment
of hypertension with cost-effective, well-tolerated medications, as well as
case management for patients in these programs; and
(4) to develop and maintain a database that will include:
biographical data, screening data, costs, and outcomes.
(g) The Arkansas Minority Health Commission will receive quarterly
updates on the progress of these programs and make recommendations or changes
as necessary.
(h) The programs described in this section shall be administered
pursuant to a strategic plan encompassing the elements of a mission
statement, defined program(s), and program goals with measurable objectives
and strategies to be implemented over a specific timeframe. Evaluation of
each program shall include performance based measures for accountability
which will measure specific health related results.
(i) Each of the programs adopted pursuant to this section shall be
subject to the monitoring and evaluation procedures described in § 19-90-118.

19-90-115. Establishment and administration of the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute.
(a) It is the intent of this chapter to hereby establish the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute for the educational and research purposes set forth
hereinafter to encourage and foster the conduct of research through the
University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture of the University of
Arkansas, the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, University of
Arkansas at Fayetteville, Arkansas Children's Hospital and Arkansas State
University. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute is part of a broad program to
address health issues with specific emphasis on smoking and the use of
tobacco products. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute is intended to develop
more fully the interdisciplinary opportunities for research primarily in the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
areas set forth hereinafter.
(b) Purposes. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute is established for
the following purposes:
(1) to conduct agricultural research with medical implications;
(2) to conduct bioengineering research focused on the expansion
of genetic knowledge and new potential applications in the agricultural-
medical fields;
(3) to conduct tobacco-related research that focuses on the
identification and applications of behavioral, diagnostic and therapeutic
research addressing the high level of tobacco-related illnesses in the State
of Arkansas;
(4) to conduct nutritional and other research focusing on
prevention or treatment of cancer, congenital or hereditary conditions or
other related conditions; and
(5) to conduct other research identified by the primary
educational and research institutions involved in the Arkansas Biosciences
Institute or as otherwise identified by the Arkansas Biosciences Institute
Board and which is reasonably related, or complementary to, research
identified in subdivisions (b)(1)-(4) of this section.
(c)(1) Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board. There is hereby
established the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board which shall consist of
the following: the President of the University of Arkansas; the President of
Arkansas State University; the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences; the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas at
Fayetteville; the Vice President for Agriculture of the University of
Arkansas; the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission; the
Director of the National Center for Toxicological Research; the President of
Arkansas Children's Hospital; and two (2) individuals possessing recognized
scientific, academic or business qualifications appointed by the Governor.
The two (2) members of the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board who are
appointed by the Governor will serve four-year terms and are limited to
serving two (2) consecutive four-year terms. The terms shall commence on
October 1 of each year. These members appointed by the Governor are not
entitled to compensation for their services, but may receive expense
reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-902, to be paid from funds
appropriated for this program. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board shall
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
establish and appoint the members of an Industry Advisory Committee and a
Science Advisory Committee composed of knowledgeable persons in the fields of
industry and science. These Committees shall serve as resources for the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board in their respective areas and will
provide an avenue of communication to the Arkansas Biosciences Institute
Board on areas of potential research.
(2) The Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board shall establish
rules for governance for Board affairs and shall:
(A) provide overall coordination of the program;
(B) develop procedures for recruitment and supervision of
member institution research review panels, the membership of which shall vary
depending on the subject matter of proposals and review requirements, and
may, in order to avoid conflicts of interest and to ensure access to
qualified reviews, recommend reviewers not only from Arkansas but also from
outside the state;
(C) provide for systematic dissemination of research
results to the public and the healthcare community, including work to produce
public service advertising on screening and research results, and provide for
mechanisms to disseminate the most current research findings in the areas of
cause and prevention, cure diagnosis and treatment of tobacco related
illnesses, in order that these findings may be applied to the planning,
implementation and evaluation of any other research programs of this state;
(D) develop policies and procedures to facilitate the
translation of research results into commercial, alternate technological, and
other applications wherever appropriate and consistent with state and federal
law; and
(E) transmit on or before the end of each calendar year on
an annual basis, a report to the General Assembly and the Governor on grants
made, grants in progress, program accomplishments, and future program
directions. Each report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the
following information:
(i) the number and dollar amounts of internal and
external research grants, including the amount allocated to negotiated
indirect costs;
(ii) the subject of research grants;
(iii) the relationship between federal and state
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
funding for research;
(iv) the relationship between each project and the
overall strategy of the research program;
(v) a summary of research findings, including
discussion of promising new areas; and
(vi) the corporations, institutions, and campuses
receiving grant awards.
(d) Director. The Director of the Arkansas Biosciences Institute shall
be appointed by the President of the University of Arkansas, in consultation
with the President of Arkansas State University, and the President of
Arkansas Children's Hospital, and based upon the advice and recommendation of
the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board. The Director shall be an employee
of the University of Arkansas and shall serve at the pleasure of the
President of the University of Arkansas. The Director shall be responsible
for recommending policies and procedures to the Arkansas Biosciences
Institute Board for its internal operation and shall establish and ensure
methods of communication among the units and divisions of the University of
Arkansas, Arkansas Children's Hospital and Arkansas State University and
their faculty and employees engaged in research under the auspices of the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute. The Director shall undertake such
administrative duties as may be necessary to facilitate conduct of research
under the auspices of the Arkansas Biosciences Institute. The Director shall
perform such other duties as are established by the President of the
University of Arkansas in consultation with the President of Arkansas State
University, the President of Arkansas Children's Hospital and with the input
of the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board.
(e) Conduct of Research. Research performed under the auspices of the
Arkansas Biosciences Institute shall be conducted in accordance with the
policies of the University of Arkansas, Arkansas Children's Hospital, and
Arkansas State University, as applicable. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute
Board and the Director shall facilitate the establishment of centers to focus
on research in agri-medicine, environmental biotechnology, medical genetics,
bio-engineering and industry development. Such centers shall be established
in accordance with procedures adopted by the Arkansas Biosciences Institute
Board, and shall provide for interdisciplinary collaborative efforts with a
specific research and educational objectives.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(f) In determining research projects and areas to be supported from
such appropriated funds, each of the respective institutions shall assure
that adequate opportunities are given to faculty and other researchers to
submit proposals for projects to be supported in whole or in part from such
funds. At least annually the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board shall
review research being conducted under the auspices of the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute and may make recommendations to the President of the
University of Arkansas and the President of Arkansas State University and
President of Arkansas Children's Hospital of ways in which such research
funds may be more efficiently employed or of collaborative efforts which
would maximize the utilization of available funds.
(g) The programs described in this section shall be administered
pursuant to a strategic plan encompassing the elements of a mission
statement, defined program(s), and program goals with measurable objectives
and strategies to be implemented over a specific timeframe. Evaluation of
each program shall include performance based measures for accountability
which will measure specific health related results.
(h) Each of the programs adopted pursuant to this Section shall be
subject to the monitoring and evaluation procedures described in § 19-90-118.

19-90-116. Establishment and administration of Medicaid Expansion
Program.
(a) It is the intent of this chapter that the Department of Human
Services should establish the Medicaid Expansion Program described in this
section, and to administer such program in accordance with law.
(b)(1) The Medicaid Expansion Program shall be a separate and distinct
component of the Arkansas Medicaid Program currently administered by the
Department of Human Services and shall be established as follows:
(A) expanding Medicaid coverage and benefits to pregnant
women;
(B) expanding inpatient and outpatient hospital
reimbursements and benefits to adults aged nineteen (19) to sixty-four (64);
(C) expanding non-institutional coverage and benefits to
adults aged sixty-five (65) and over; and
(D) expanding medical assistance, home and community-based
services, and employment supports for:
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(i) Adults with intellectual and developmental
disabilities who qualify for services; and
(ii) Children with intellectual and developmental
disabilities who qualify for services.
(2) All such expenditures shall be made in conformity with the
Arkansas Medicaid Program as amended and approved by the Centers for Medicare
& Medicaid Services.
(c) The programs defined in this section shall be administered
pursuant to a strategic plan encompassing the elements of a mission
statement, defined program(s), and program goals with measurable objectives
and strategies to be implemented over a specific timeframe. Evaluation of
each program shall include performance-based measures for accountability
which will measure specific health related results.
(d) Each of the programs adopted pursuant to this section shall be
subject to the monitoring and evaluation procedures described in § 19-90-118.

19-90-117. Establishment of the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement
Commission.
(a) There is hereby created and recognized the Arkansas Tobacco
Settlement Commission, which shall be composed of the following:
(1) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
or his or her designee;
(2) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education or
his or her designee;
(3) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education or his
or her designee;
(4) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services or his or
her designee;
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Health or his or her
designee;
(6) A healthcare professional to be selected by the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(7) A healthcare professional to be selected by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives;
(8) A citizen selected by the Governor; and
(9) A citizen selected by the Attorney General.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b)(1) The four (4) members of the commission who are not on the
commission by virtue of being a director of an agency, will serve four-year
terms. The terms shall commence on October 1 of each year. Commission members
are limited to serving two (2) consecutive four-year terms.
(2) Members of the commission shall not be entitled to
compensation for their services, but may receive expense reimbursement in
accordance with § 25-16-902, to be paid from funds appropriated for this
program.
(c) Members appointed to the commission and the organizations they
represent shall make full disclosure of the members' participation on the
commission when applying for any grant or contract funded by this chapter.
(d) All members appointed to the commission shall make full and public
disclosure of any past or present association to the tobacco industry.
(e) The commission shall, within ninety (90) days of appointment, hold
a meeting and elect from its membership a chair for a term set by the
commission. The commission is authorized to adopt bylaws.
(f) The commission shall meet at least quarterly. However, special
meetings of the commission may be called at any time at the pleasure of the
chair or pursuant to the bylaws of the commission.
(g)(1) The commission is authorized to hire an independent third party
with appropriate experience in health, preventive resources, health
statistics, and evaluation expertise to perform monitoring and evaluation of
program expenditures made from the program accounts pursuant to this chapter.
(2)(A) Such monitoring and evaluation shall be performed in
accordance with § 19-90-118, and the third party retained to perform such
services shall prepare a biennial report to be delivered to the General
Assembly and the Secretary of the Department of Health by each August 1
preceding a general session of the General Assembly.
(B) The report shall be accompanied by a recommendation
from the commission as to the continued funding for each program.
(3) The commission shall file a quarterly progress report with
the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(h) The costs and expenses of the monitoring and evaluation program,
as administered by the Department of Health, as well as the salaries, costs,
and expenses of staff shall be paid from the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Commission Fund established pursuant to § 19-90-108.
(i) If the deposits into the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission
Fund exceed the amount necessary to pay the costs and expenses described in
subsection (h) of this section, then the commission is authorized to make
grants as follows:
(1) Those organizations eligible to receive grants are nonprofit
and community-based;
(2) Grant criteria shall be established based upon the following
principles:
(A) All funds should be used to improve and optimize the
health of Arkansans;
(B) Funds should be spent on long-term projects that
improve the health of Arkansans;
(C) Future tobacco-related illness and healthcare costs in
Arkansas should be minimized through this opportunity; and
(D) Funds should be invested in solutions that work
effectively and efficiently in Arkansas; and
(3) Grant awards shall be restricted in amounts up to fifty-
thousand dollars ($50,000) per year for each eligible organization.

19-90-118. Monitoring and evaluation of programs.
(a) The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission is directed to conduct
monitoring and evaluation of the programs established in §§ 19-90-113 — 19-
90-116 to ensure optimal impact on improving the health of Arkansans and
fiscal stewardship of the Tobacco Settlement. The commission shall develop
performance indicators to monitor programmatic functions that are state-
specific and situation-specific and to support performance-based assessment
for governmental accountability. The performance indicators shall reflect
short-term and long-term goals and objectives of each program, be measurable,
and provide guidance for internal programmatic improvement and legislative
funding decisions. The commission is expected to modify these performance
indicators as goals and objectives are met and new inputs to programmatic
outcomes are identified.
(b) All programs funded by the tobacco settlement and established in
§§ 19-90-113 — 19-90-116 shall be monitored and evaluated to justify
continued support based upon the state's performance-based budgeting
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
initiative. These programs shall be administered pursuant to a strategic plan
encompassing the elements of a mission statement, defined programs, program
goals with measurable objectives and strategies to be implemented over a
specific timeframe. Evaluation of each program shall include performance-
based measures for accountability that will measure specific health-related
results. All expenditures that are payable from the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund and from each of the program accounts, therein, shall be subject
to the same fiscal control, accounting, budgetary, and purchasing laws as are
expenditures and obligations payable from State Treasury funds, except as
specified otherwise in this chapter. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
may require additional controls, procedures, and reporting requirements that
he or she determines are necessary in order to carry out the intent of this
chapter.
(c) The commission is directed to establish program goals in
accordance with the following initiation, short-term and long-term
performance indicators for each program to be funded by the tobacco
settlement, which performance indicators shall be subject to modification by
the commission based on specific situations and subsequent developments.
Progress with respect to these performance indicators shall be reported to
the Governor and the General Assembly for future appropriation decisions:
(1) Tobacco prevention and cessation: The goal is to reduce the
initiation of tobacco use and the resulting negative health and economic
impact. The following are anticipated objectives in reaching this overall
goal:
(A) Initiation: The Department of Health is to start the
program within six (6) months of available appropriation and funding;
(B) Short-term: Communities shall establish local tobacco
prevention initiatives;
(C) Long-term: Surveys demonstrate a reduction in numbers
of Arkansans who smoke and/or use tobacco.
(2) Medicaid Expansion: The goal is to expand access to
healthcare through targeted Medicaid expansions, thereby improving the health
of eligible Arkansans:
(A) Initiation: The Department of Human Services is to
start the program initiatives within six (6) months of available
appropriation and funding;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Short-term: The Department of Human Services
demonstrates an increase in the number of new Medicaid eligible persons
participating in the expanded programs.
(C) Long-term: Demonstrate improved health and reduced
long-term health costs of Medicaid eligible persons participating in the
expanded programs;
(3) Research and health education: The goal is to develop new
tobacco-related medical and agricultural research initiatives to improve the
access to new technologies, improve the health of Arkansans, and stabilize
the economic security of Arkansas:
(A) Initiation: The Arkansas Biosciences Institute Board
shall begin operation of the Arkansas Biosciences Institute within twelve
(12) months of available appropriation and funding;
(B) Short-term: The Arkansas Biosciences Institute shall
initiate new research programs for the purpose of conducting, as specified in
§ 19-90-115, agricultural research with medical implications, bioengineering
research, tobacco-related research, nutritional research focusing on cancer
prevention or treatment, and other research approved by the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute Board;
(C) Long-term: The institute's research results should
translate into commercial, alternate technological, and other applications
wherever appropriate in order that the research results may be applied to the
planning, implementation and evaluation of any health related programs in the
state. The Arkansas Biosciences Institute is also to obtain federal and
philanthropic grant funding;
(4) Targeted state needs programs: The goal is to improve the
healthcare systems in Arkansas and the access to healthcare delivery systems,
thereby resolving critical deficiencies that negatively impact the health of
the citizens of the state:
(A) College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences:
(i) Initiation: Increase the number of communities
in which participants receive public health training;
(ii) Short-Term: Obtain federal and philanthropic
grant funding;
(iii) Long-term: Elevate the overall ranking of the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
health status of Arkansas;
(B) Minority Health Initiative:
(i) Initiation: Start the program within twelve (12)
months of available appropriation and funding;
(ii) Short-term: Prioritize the list of health
problems and planned intervention for minority population and increase the
number of Arkansans screened and treated for tobacco-related illnesses;
(iii) Long-term: Reduce death/disability due to
tobacco-related illnesses of Arkansans;
(C) Donald W. Reynolds Center on Aging of the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences:
(i) Initiation: Start the program within twelve (12)
months of available appropriation and funding;
(ii) Short-term: Prioritize the list of health
problems and planned intervention for elderly Arkansans and increase the
number of Arkansans participating in health improvement programs;
(iii) Long-term: Improve health status and decrease
death rates of elderly Arkansans, as well as obtaining federal and
philanthropic grant funding; and
(D) Area Health Education Center:
(i) Initiation: Start the new area health education
center in Helena with DHEC offices in West Memphis and Lake Village within
twelve (12) months of available appropriation and funding;
(ii) Short-term: Increase the number of communities
and clients served through the expanded AHEC/DHEC offices;
(iii) Long-term: Increase the access to a primary
care provider in underserved communities.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 19 is reenacted and recodified to read
as follows:
TITLE 19
PUBLIC FINANCE

SUBTITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS
SUBTITLE 2. REVENUE STABILIZATION LAW
SUBTITLE 3. REVENUE CLASSIFICATION LAW
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SUBTITLE 4. PURCHASING AND CONTRACTS
SUBTITLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

SUBTITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS
CHAPTER 2. STATE REVENUES — RECEIPTS AND EXPENDITURES GENERALLY
CHAPTER 3. STATE TREASURY MANAGEMENT
CHAPTER 4. STATE ACCOUNTING AND BUDGETARY PROCEDURES
CHAPTER 5. DEPOSITORIES FOR PUBLIC FUNDS
CHAPTER 6. PUBLIC OBLIGATIONS
CHAPTER 7. FEDERAL FUNDS
CHAPTERS 8–19. RESERVED

CHAPTER 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Fiscal Duties of Department of Finance and Administration
Subchapter 3. Officers' Surety Bonds
Subchapter 4. Investment of Public Funds
Subchapter 5. State Fiscal Management Responsibility Act

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Fiscal Duties of Department of Finance and Administration

19-1-201. Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-1-202. Secretary.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, of good moral character, and of
demonstrated ability in the field of his or her employment.
(b) Before entering upon his or her duties of employment, the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall take,
subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State an oath or
affirmation to support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas
Constitution and to faithfully discharge the duties of the employment upon
which he or she is about to enter.
(c)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall furnish bond to the state, with a corporate surety thereon, in the
penal sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), conditioned upon the faithful
performance of his or her duties and for the proper accounting for all funds
received and disbursed by him or her.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration is the disbursing agent for the Department of Finance and
Administration but is not required to furnish additional bond as that
disbursing agent, nor shall he or she be required to furnish additional bond
as disbursing agent of other appropriations for which he or she may be
designated disbursing agent under or pursuant to any law of this state unless
so directed by the General Assembly.
(3) If the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration deems it advisable, he or she may require other employees of
his or her office to furnish bond, in the penal sums that he or she requires.
(4)(A) The original of the bond of the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration shall be filed in the office of the
Secretary of State, and an executed counterpart thereof shall be filed in the
office of the Auditor of State.
(B) Any bonds that may be required of employees shall be
filed with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

19-1-203. Deputy director.
The Deputy Director of the Department of Finance and Administration,
acting under the authority granted to him or her by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration, and under the laws relating to
budget and accounting procedure, shall:
(1)(A) Prepare and publish all necessary rules for carrying out
the budget and accounting laws of the state.
(B) The deputy director may require of any state agency
the necessary fiscal information for carrying out such laws;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Acting in behalf of the Governor and the secretary, prepare
the preliminary budget information biennially to be submitted to the
Legislative Council and to the members of the General Assembly for
consideration of the budget requirements of all state agencies; and
(3) Be prepared, when called upon to do so, to appear before the
Legislative Council and committees of the General Assembly for the purpose of
supplying information and reporting upon the financial condition of the state
or any of its agencies.

19-1-204. Personnel.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, all of the
personnel of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be employed
by and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(b) Nothing contained in this subchapter inhibits the rights of any
employees of the department who have gained civil service or merit system
status under any law of this state.

19-1-205. Office.
The Building Authority Division shall assign to the Department of
Finance and Administration and divisions of the department suitable office
space with the necessary conveniences for the transaction of the department's
business and the safekeeping of the department's records.

19-1-206. Seal.
The Governor shall procure an official seal for the Department of
Finance and Administration. Every paper executed by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration or by any other employee of the
department and sealed with its official seal shall be received in evidence in
any court or other tribunal and may be recorded in the same manner and with
like effect as deeds regularly acknowledged.

19-1-207. General accounting system.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(1) Enforce the general accounting and fiscal procedures of the
State of Arkansas that have been placed upon him or her by law;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Exercise supervision over the general accounting system of
the state and of state agencies; and
(3) Maintain in his or her office a system of accounts and
control that will at all times reflect:
(A) The unencumbered balance of all funds and accounts
carried on the books of the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State;
(B) The distribution and allotment of state revenues; and
(C) A detailed record of the receipts and expenditures of
all State Treasury funds.

19-1-208. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may make
reasonable rules not inconsistent with the law that are necessary or
desirable for the orderly discharge of the duties vested in the Department of
Finance and Administration.

19-1-209. Publications required.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall publish and furnish copies to all state agencies of rules that are
issued by him or her, pursuant to law, providing for a general accounting
procedure.
(b) The secretary shall also publish not less often than biennially a
financial report covering the fiscal affairs of the state and state agencies
and shall make the report available to:
(1) Members of the General Assembly;
(2) State agencies; and
(3) Others having an interest in the report.

19-1-210. Recordkeeping.
(a) For the purpose of effectively carrying out the fiscal procedures
provided by law, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may install the recordkeeping and other procedures in his or
her own office and in other state offices and departments that the secretary
deems necessary or advisable.
(b) The secretary may require from any state agency any fiscal
information that will be necessary for providing adequate records in the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
secretary's office and shall prescribe uniform records and forms for all
vouchers and other documents that are to be transmitted to the Department of
Finance and Administration.

19-1-211. Investigations.
(a)(1) In any matter within the jurisdiction of the Department of
Finance and Administration, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may make investigations and may delegate that power to any
division or section head of the department.
(2) For this purpose, the secretary may subpoena witnesses and
require the production of any books, records, papers, or documents that may
be material or relevant as evidence and to administer oaths to and take the
testimony of witnesses.
(b)(1) In case of disobedience to any subpoena or other process, the
secretary may invoke the aid, with the written approval of the Governor, of
the Pulaski County Circuit Court in requiring the testimony of witnesses and
the production of evidence, books, records, papers, or documents.
(2)(A) In case of refusal to obey the subpoena issued to any
person, firm, or corporation, the circuit court shall issue an order calling
the person, firm, or corporation to appear before the secretary or other
employee designated by the secretary and to produce all books and papers so
ordered and give evidence touching the matter in question.
(B) Any failure to obey the order of the circuit court may
be punished by the circuit court as contempt of the circuit court.
(c) A subpoena for a witness may be issued by the secretary or by any
division or section head of the department in whom any such authority may
have been vested by the secretary and shall be served as provided by law for
the service of other subpoenas.
(d)(1)(A) The failure or refusal of any witness to appear or to
produce any books, papers, or documents required by the secretary and to
submit them for inspection or the refusal to answer any relevant question
propounded by the secretary is a violation punishable by a fine of not less
than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(B) Each failure or refusal by any witness to appear or
produce any such books, papers, or documents is a separate offense.
(2) False testimony given in any such inquiry is perjury
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
punishable as provided by law.

19-1-212. Duty to avoid deficit.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(1) Keep advised at all times as to the revenues and other
income available for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of all state
agencies;
(2) Exercise the powers conferred upon him or her by law to see
that the state and all state agencies are maintained on a basis of accounting
recommended by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board for governmental
purposes;
(3) See that no obligation is incurred that is not payable when
the obligation becomes due; and
(4) Exercise his or her powers to see that the funds on hand and
estimated to become available to each state agency are sufficient to maintain
the state and all of its agencies on a sound financial basis without
incurring a deficit.

19-1-213. Leasing of state property.
(a) With approval of the Governor, the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration may lease any state property, real or personal,
that is not needed for public use, if:
(1) The leasing of the property is not prohibited by law; and
(2) The authority to lease the property is not vested in any
other state agency.
(b) The secretary shall not lease any property under this section for
a term exceeding two (2) years.

19-1-214. Federal gifts and surplusage.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subchapter or any other law that
requires advertisement for bids or the soliciting or receiving of competitive
bids, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may enter
into a contract with the United States Government or with an agency of the
United States Government for the purpose of accepting gifts and for the
acquisition of surplus materials or property upon such terms and conditions
as may be agreed upon.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

Subchapter 3 — Officers' Surety Bonds

19-1-301. Exceptions.
All constitutional officers other than the Treasurer of State are
exempt from this subchapter.

19-1-302. Treasurer of State.
(a) The bond for the Treasurer of State is one million dollars
($1,000,000).
(b) The original of the bond required by this section to be filed by
the Treasurer of State shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of
State, and a copy shall be filed with the Auditor of State.

19-1-303. County and municipal officials and employees.
(a)(1) County officials and employees, municipal officials and
employees, and all other officers and employees of a political subdivision of
this state who are required by law to furnish bond and who receive and
disburse cash funds from bank accounts shall obtain a surety bond from a
corporate surety authorized to do business in this state in the minimum
amounts to be computed as follows:
(A) On the first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000),
or any part thereof, of receipts of the office, ten percent (10%) of the
amount;
(B) On the next two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000),
or any part thereof, of receipts of the office, seven and five-tenths percent
(7.5%) of the amount;
(C) On the next two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000),
or any part thereof, of receipts of the office, five percent (5%) of the
amount;
(D) On the next five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000),
or any part thereof, of receipts of the office, two and five-tenths percent
(2.5%) of the amount; and
(E) On all amounts in excess of one million dollars
($1,000,000), one percent (1%).
(2) These amounts shall be based on the total cash receipts of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the office for the preceding calendar or fiscal year. However, the penal
amount of any bond shall not be less than the amount as computed in this
subsection.
(3) The bonds shall be conditioned that the officer or employee
shall faithfully perform the duties of his or her office or employment and
properly account for all cash funds received and disbursed by him or her as
an officer or employee.
(b)(1) County officials and employees, municipal officials and
employees, and all other officers and employees of a political subdivision of
this state who are required by law to furnish bond and who receive or approve
the disbursement of any funds appropriated and disbursed through the State
Treasury shall obtain a bond in the following minimum amounts based on the
disbursements of the agency during the preceding calendar or fiscal year:
(A) On the first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000),
or any part thereof, of disbursements, five percent (5%) of the amount;
(B) On the next four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000),
or any part thereof, of disbursements, two and five-tenths percent (2.5%) of
the amount; and
(C) On all disbursements in excess of five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000), five-tenths percent (0.5%) of the amount.
(2) Subsection (a) of this section applies in determining the
bond requirements of all officers and employees handling both cash funds and
moneys appropriated and disbursed from the State Treasury.
(3) The bond shall be conditioned that the officer or employee
faithfully performs the duties of his or her office or employment and
properly accounts for the disbursement of funds.
(c) The maximum amount of any bond required under subsections (a) and
(b) of this section shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000).
(d)(1) The Legislative Auditor shall inform municipal and county
officials of the requirements set forth in this subchapter regarding the
determination of the amount of bond for the officials.
(2) However, the Legislative Auditor shall not set the bond of
municipal and county officials.
(e)(1) The original of each bond required by this section to be filed
by a county officer or employee shall be filed in the office of the circuit
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
clerk in the county involved.
(2) The original of each bond required by this section to be
filed by municipal officials and employees shall be filed in the office of
the municipal clerk of the municipality involved.

19-1-304. County judges.
(a)(1) The county judge in each county shall furnish bond in an amount
computed in accordance with § 19-1-303(b).
(2) The bond shall be conditioned that the officer faithfully
performs the duties of the office and properly accounts for all funds
disbursed by him or her as county judge.
(b) The original bond shall be filed with the circuit clerk of the
respective county.

19-1-305. State agency employees as disbursing agents.
(a)(1) If the executive head of a state agency designates a full-time
employee to act as his or her agent in the disbursement of funds under his or
her control, the agent shall furnish additional bond to be fixed by the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) The executive head of the state agency shall notify the
secretary and the Auditor of State in writing of the designation and shall
furnish to the secretary and the Auditor of State a sample of the signature
of the agent.
(b) If appropriations are made available to a state agency or to a
nongovernment agency or activity and no disbursing agent is provided for by
law, then the secretary and the Auditor of State shall designate a person to
act as disbursing agent and fix the amount of bond for such purposes.

Subchapter 4 — Investment of Public Funds

19-1-401. “Eligible investment securities” defined.
As used in this subchapter, “eligible investment securities” means:
(1) A direct or guaranteed obligation of the United States that
is backed by the full faith and credit of the United States Government;
(2) A direct obligation of an agency, instrumentality, or
government-sponsored enterprise created by act of the United States Congress
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and authorized to issue securities or evidences of indebtedness, regardless
of whether the securities or evidences of indebtedness are guaranteed for
repayment by the United States Government;
(3) A bond or other debt of the state, a school district, a
county government, a municipal government, or an authority of a governmental
entity that:
(A) Is issued for an essential governmental purpose or is
guaranteed by a state agency; and
(B) Has a debt rating from a nationally recognized credit
rating agency of “A” or better at the time of purchase; and
(4) A bond from the State of Israel that is guaranteed and
backed by the full faith and credit of the government of Israel as the
sovereign debt of the State of Israel.

19-1-402. Provisions supplemental.
This subchapter does not repeal any prior legislation or affect any
statute pertaining to the conversion of funds of public officials and
agencies into investments authorized under this subchapter but is
supplemental to present law and confers additional powers.

19-1-403. Construction.
(a) This subchapter does not affect the power of counties,
municipalities, improvement districts, and other public bodies to make a
deposit of funds in the form of a demand deposit, a savings deposit, or a
time deposit as authorized by law.
(b) The adoption of this subchapter does not affect or impair the
power of counties, municipalities, improvement districts, and other public
bodies to make investments of funds in their possession or under their
control as authorized by other laws.

19-1-404. Investments permitted.
(a)(1) With the approval of the county or municipal depository board,
a treasurer may convert any funds in the treasurer's possession or under the
treasurer's control and not presently needed for other purposes into one (1)
or more of the following investments:
(A) Eligible investment securities having a maturity of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
not longer than five (5) years from the date of acquisition unless, as
documented at the time of acquisition, the investment is to fund or support a
specific purpose and there are no expectations that the investment will be
sold before maturity;
(B) An Arkansas bank certificate of deposit or a
certificate of deposit authorized under § 19-5-111;
(C) An account established by a local government joint
investment trust authorized under the Local Government Joint Investment Trust
Act, § 14-79-101 et seq.; or
(D) An Arkansas financial institution repurchase agreement
for eligible investment securities in which the seller agrees to repurchase
the investment at a price including interest earned during the holding period
as determined by the repurchase agreement.
(2) The following entities may convert funds that are in the
possession of the entity or under the control of the entity and that are not
presently needed for other purposes into an investment listed in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section:
(A) A county board or commission;
(B) A municipal board or commission, including without
limitation a board of trustees of a policemen's pension and relief fund, a
board of trustees of a firemen's relief and pension fund, a waterworks
commission, and a sewer committee; and
(C) A drainage district, levee district, and improvement
district, including without limitation a waterworks district, electric light
district, municipal improvement district, and suburban improvement district.
(3) This subsection does not apply to funds of a school
district.
(b)(1) Unless otherwise provided by a signed written agreement between
the school district or districts and the county treasurer, funds of a school
district shall be invested by the:
(A) School district treasurer when the school district has
a treasurer; or
(B) County treasurer when the school district does not
have a treasurer.
(2) To the extent directed by the board of directors of the
school district, investments shall be in:
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) General obligation bonds of the United States;
(B) Bonds, notes, debentures, or other obligations issued
by an agency of the United States Government;
(C) General obligation bonds of the state; or
(D) Bank certificates of deposit.
(c) A school district may invest moneys held for the repayment of a
federally recognized qualified zone academy bond under 26 U.S.C. § 1397E, as
it existed on January 1, 2005, in a guaranteed investment contract or forward
delivery agreement in which the school district is guaranteed a certain rate
of interest on its investment if the guaranteed investment contract or the
forward delivery agreement is entered into between the school district and
the purchaser of the qualified zone academy bond.
(d) A treasurer or other custodian of public funds who is authorized
to purchase and hold eligible investment securities may use a brokerage
account to acquire, sell, and hold the investment if the investment is
established with a broker-dealer that:
(1) Has offices in the state;
(2) Is registered with the State Securities Department;
(3) Is a member of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority,
Inc.; and
(4) Is a member of the Securities Investor Protection
Corporation.
(e) Unless restrictions are established by the donor, a private
donation to a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an
incorporated town may be invested in accordance with the prudent investor
rule established under § 28-71-105.

19-1-405. Additional authority of certain cities.
(a)(1) A city that has real property assessed valuation in excess of
three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) may invest the city's funds in
securities under § 23-47-401 and according to the investment policy adopted
by the governing body of the city.
(2) The investment policy adopted by the city's governing body
may authorize a maturity term exceeding the term stated in § 19-1-
404(a)(1)(A).
(b)(1) Each investment shall be made with the judgment and care under
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
prevailing circumstances that a person of prudence, discretion, and
intelligence would exercise in the management of the person's own affairs,
not for speculation but for investment, considering the probable safety of
the capital and the probable income to be derived.
(2) Investment of funds shall be governed by the following
investment objectives in order of priority:
(A) Preservation and safety of the principal;
(B) Liquidity; and
(C) Yield.
(c) In determining whether an investment officer has exercised
prudence with respect to an investment decision, the determination shall be
made taking into consideration:
(1) The investment of city funds and funds under the officer's
control and over which the officer had responsibility, rather than a
consideration as to the prudence of a single investment; and
(2) Whether the investment decision is consistent with the
written investment policy of the city.

Subchapter 5 — State Fiscal Management Responsibility Act

19-1-501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Fiscal
Management Responsibility Act”.

19-1-502. Intent and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly has enacted various laws relating to the
receipting, disbursing, depositing, and accounting for public funds, as well
as laws relating to establishing salaries, and the purchasing of commodities
by various state agencies. In addition, the Department of Finance and
Administration or other appropriate agency has issued rules pertaining to the
administration of these various laws.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all state officers
and employees comply with these laws and rules. Presently, most of these laws
and rules do not provide penalty provisions for violations of the laws and
rules.
(c) It is the purpose of this subchapter to provide procedures and
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
civil penalties regarding violations of the fiscal responsibility and
management laws of the state.

19-1-503. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agency” means a state agency, bureau, board, commission,
council, department, institution, or office of the State of Arkansas;
(2) “Executive agencies” means all agencies other than
constitutional, judicial, and legislative officers, agencies, and
departments;
(3) “Fiscal responsibility and management laws” means the
following laws and rules applicable to those laws:
(A) General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-
4-101 et seq.;
(B) State procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title 19,
Subtitle 4;
(C) Attendance and leave laws, § 21-4-101 et seq.;
(D) Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, §§ 19-
4-1601 and 21-5-101;
(E) Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-
201 et seq.;
(F) Higher Education Expenditure Restriction Act, § 6-63-
301 et seq.;
(G) Accounts and Notes Receivable Abatement Act for the
State of Arkansas, § 19-2-301 et seq.;
(H) Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.;
(I) Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.;
(J) Depositories for public funds, § 19-5-101 et seq.;
(K) Public works, § 22-9-101 et seq.; and
(L) State Fiscal Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-501
et seq.;
(4) “Knowingly” means that a person is aware or should have been
aware that his or her conduct will violate the fiscal responsibility and
management laws; and
(5) “Public officer or employee” means an officer or employee of
the State of Arkansas.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-1-504. Existing remedies not impaired.
This subchapter does not limit or diminish any civil rights or
administrative procedures available to any public officer or employee.

19-1-505. Civil procedures apply.
All actions and procedures under this subchapter are civil in nature
and are governed by the appropriate rules and laws regarding civil actions
and remedies.

19-1-506. Investigation of violations.
(a) Upon discovery or notification of an alleged violation of the
fiscal responsibility and management laws, each agency shall investigate the
allegation and take appropriate administrative action.
(b) The director of each agency or, in the case of a constitutional
office, the constitutional officer, is responsible for complying with this
subchapter.

19-1-507. Documentation and notification of violation — Remedial
action.
(a) After completing the investigation, if the agency determines that
there has been a violation of the fiscal responsibility and management laws,
the facts and circumstances relating to a violation and any corrective or
remedial action taken shall be documented and placed in the personnel files
of the public officer or employee involved in the violation.
(b)(1) The agency shall notify the public officer or employee of its
findings and any corrective or remedial action to be taken.
(2) Notification shall be made in a manner ensuring actual
notice to the public officer or employee.
(3) The public officer or employee shall be notified that the
failure to make corrective or remedial action within thirty (30) days after
the date of notification creates the rebuttable presumption that the
violation was committed knowingly.
(c)(1) The public officer or employee violating a fiscal
responsibility and management law shall be given not more than thirty (30)
days after notification to effect corrective or remedial action recommended
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
by the agency.
(2) Failure to make corrective or remedial action within thirty
(30) days after notification creates the rebuttable presumption that the
violation was committed knowingly.

19-1-508. Notification of Department of Finance and Administration —
Review.
(a) Within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the time period
for the public officer or employee to effect corrective or remedial action,
the agency shall transfer to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration a document containing a summary of the violation and any
corrective remedial action taken.
(b)(1) The secretary shall review the summaries of violations
received. The secretary may:
(A) Accept the summary and approve the corrective or
remedial action by the agency;
(B) Request additional information regarding the violation
and corrective or remedial action by the agency; or
(C) Impose additional corrective or remedial action upon
public officers and employees of executive agencies as provided in § 19-1-
509.
(2) Quarterly, the secretary shall submit a summary of all
violations of the fiscal responsibility and management laws, including any
corrective or remedial action by the agency or the secretary, to the Governor
and members of the General Assembly.

19-1-509. Executive agencies.
(a)(1) Before the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may impose additional corrective or remedial action regarding
public officers or employees of executive agencies, the secretary shall
conduct an investigation regarding any violation.
(2) The public officer or employee shall be notified and given
the opportunity for a hearing conducted by the secretary regarding any
violation.
(b) The secretary may impose any one (1) or more of the following as
additional corrective or remedial action:
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Oral or written warnings or reprimands;
(2) Suspension with or without pay for specified periods of
time; or
(3) Termination of employment.

19-1-510. Investigation and suit by Attorney General.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, or the Legislative Council may request
the office of the Attorney General to review information concerning a
violation of the fiscal responsibility and management laws to determine
whether legal action is appropriate.
(b)(1) The Attorney General may file a civil suit in the circuit court
against the public officer or employee violating the fiscal responsibility
and management laws.
(2) Venue shall be:
(A) In the county where the violation occurred; or
(B) If the violation occurred outside the borders of the
state, in Pulaski County.

19-1-511. Civil penalty.
If the public officer or employee is found by the circuit court to have
knowingly violated the fiscal responsibility and management laws, the circuit
court shall impose a civil penalty upon the public officer or employee of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for each violation, and may subject the public officer or employee
to the payment of damages resulting as a direct consequence of any violation.

19-1-512. Recovery of costs.
(a) If the public officer or employee is found by the circuit court to
have knowingly violated the fiscal responsibility and management laws, the
Attorney General may recover costs and attorney's fees associated with the
civil suit from the public officer or employee.
(b) Costs or fees recovered by the Attorney General under this section
shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

CHAPTER 2
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
STATE REVENUES — RECEIPTS AND EXPENDITURES GENERALLY

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Receipts Generally
Subchapter 3. Accounts and Notes Receivable Abatement Act for the State of
Arkansas
Subchapter 4. Expenditures Generally
Subchapter 5. Canceled Checks

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-2-101. Receipts for all funds coming into State Treasury.
(a) The Secretary of State, the Insurance Commissioner, the
Commissioner of State Lands, the Attorney General, the Bank Commissioner, and
the Auditor of State shall issue their receipts respectively for all moneys
coming into the State Treasury through their departments, respectively, on
account of:
(1) Fees of every kind and character;
(2) Sale of books, charters, and articles of incorporation;
(3) Commissions of notaries public, justices of the peace, and
county, city, and town officers, in addition to nomination fees, etc.;
(4) Insurance taxes and fees;
(5) Jitney and chauffeur licenses;
(6) Affidavits of loss, license tags, deeds, patents, field
notes, maps, and charts;
(7) Franchise taxes, back taxes, and sand and gravel taxes;
(8) All matters pertaining to the duties of the Attorney General
when money belonging to the state is to be collected;
(9) Bank examination fees; and
(10) All fees coming through the Bank Commissioner's office.
(b)(1) Each of the departments is authorized to accept personal checks
when tendered in payment of any of the items mentioned in subsection (a) of
this section and issue their receipts, respectively, for them.
(2)(A) The checks shall be endorsed by the heads of the
respective departments to the Treasurer of State and paid into the State
Treasury daily, if anything has been collected, with an itemized statement of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
all items for which payment was made.
(B) An officer endorsing the checks is not personally
liable by reason of the officer's endorsement if the checks are rejected by
the drawee.

19-2-102. Duplicate receipts given by Treasurer of State.
(a) The Treasurer of State shall grant duplicate receipts under the
seal of his or her office for all sums of money that are paid into the State
Treasury.
(b) The person receiving the receipts shall deposit one (1) of the
receipts with the Auditor of State, who shall credit the person accordingly
and charge the Treasurer of State with the amount.

19-2-103. Time for making payments.
(a) All payments for the expenses of the departments of the state
government are due and payable in the normal course of business.
(b) All payments of contingent expenses are due and payable as they
may accrue.

19-2-104. Expenditures, contracts, or obligations in excess of
appropriations prohibited.
(a)(1) An officer, employee, or agent of the State of Arkansas, or any
board of regents or board of trustees, or any other person or authority who
may make expenditures of money appropriated for the different state
institutions or who may direct the expenditure of such money so appropriated
shall not expend or direct the expenditure of moneys or funds in excess of
the amount appropriated and becoming a part of any appropriation by executive
approval for the particular purpose named in the act making the
appropriations.
(2) An officer, employee, agent, person, board, or authority
shall not make any contract that will exceed the amount appropriated and
becoming a part of any appropriation act by executive approval for the
particular purpose named in the act making the appropriation.
(3) An officer, agent, person, board, or authority shall not
incur any obligation for any purpose in excess of the amount appropriated and
becoming a part of any appropriation by executive approval for the particular
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
purpose named in the act making the appropriation, except as provided.
(b) An person violating this section is guilty of a violation and upon
conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor
more than two hundred dollars ($200).

19-2-105. Deficiencies in excess of appropriations unlawful.
(a) It is unlawful for the head or any subordinate in charge of a
state department, board, bureau, or other state-maintained institution to
cause, permit to occur, or allow to exist a deficiency in excess of regular
appropriation made for maintenance of the department, board, bureau, or other
state-maintained institution.
(b) A person violating this section is guilty of an unclassified
misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be:
(1) Fined in any sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500)
or imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days, or both fined and imprisoned;
and
(2) Discharged from office.

Subchapter 2 — Receipts Generally

19-2-201. Acceptance of checks.
The Treasurer of State shall accept checks for the remittance due the
state.

19-2-202. Proceedings on bad checks.
(a) When remittance is made by check to the Treasurer of State and the
check is returned unpaid, the Treasurer of State shall make a duplicate of
the check and carry it as a cash item, delivering the original to the
Attorney General for collection after adding a penalty of twenty-five percent
(25%) to the amount of the check.
(b)(1) The Attorney General shall take such action as deemed proper
for the collection of a rejected check, together with twenty-five percent
(25%) of the face amount of the check as penalty, for the punishment of the
maker of that check under the criminal laws of this state.
(2) The penalty shall be credited to the same fund as was the
original amount of the check delivered to the Attorney General by the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Treasurer of State pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
(c) If for any reason the Attorney General is unable to collect either
the principal or penalty on a rejected check, as contemplated by this
section, then, as soon as that fact is ascertained, the Treasurer of State
shall cancel the receipt for it, taking credit therefor, and notifying the
Auditor of State of the cancellation. The Auditor of State shall likewise
credit the Treasurer of State with it.
(d) A state official issuing a certificate of authority or making book
entries affecting any transaction, payment for which was made with bad
checks, shall cancel them upon receipt of the Attorney General's notice of
inability to collect on such checks as specified in subsection (c) of this
section.

19-2-203. Receipts by Department of Finance and Administration —
Additional penalty.
(a) If a person, firm, corporation, partnership, or business makes
payment to the Department of Finance and Administration for a license or fees
imposed by the laws of this state by means of a check, draft, or order drawn
on a bank, person, firm, or corporation, and the check, draft, or order is
returned by the bank, person, firm, or corporation without having been paid
in full, then the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
may impose a penalty.
(b) The penalty imposed under this section:
(1) Shall be in the amount of either ten percent (10%) of the
face amount of the check, draft, or order or twenty dollars ($20.00),
whichever is greater, against the maker or drawer of the check, draft, or
order; and
(2) Is cumulative to any other penalties provided by law.

19-2-204. Refusal to accept personal checks.
A state agency, board, commission, or institution shall not refuse to
accept personal checks unless the state agency, board, commission, or
institution has filed with the Legislative Council a written statement
justifying the policy of the state agency, board, commission, or institution
to not accept personal checks.

03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Subchapter 3 — Accounts and Notes Receivable Abatement Act

19-2-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Accounts and
Notes Receivable Abatement Act”.

19-2-302. Purpose.
This subchapter establishes procedures for the various state agencies,
authorities, boards, commissions, departments, and institutions of higher
education to charge-off or cancel uncollectible moneys owed to them.

19-2-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abatement” means a complete or partial cancellation of a
tax levied, special assessment, service charge, student loan, note
receivable, or other amounts for which asset recognition criteria have been
met;
(2)(A) “Accounts receivable” means an asset account upon the
books of record reflecting amounts owing on open account from persons or
organizations for taxes levied, special assessments, service charges, goods
and services furnished by a state agency, or other amounts for which asset
recognition criteria have been met.
(B) “Accounts receivable” does not include amounts due
from other state agencies;
(3) “Notes receivable” means an unconditional written promise,
signed by the maker, to pay a certain sum in money on demand or at a fixed or
determinable future time either to the bearer or to the order of a person
designated therein;
(4) “Special assessment” means a compulsory levy made against
certain properties or business entities to defray part or all of the cost of
a specific improvement or service deemed to primarily benefit or regulate
those upon whom the assessment is levied;
(5) “State agency” means a state agency, board, authority,
commission, department, or institution of higher education created by or
receiving an appropriation by the General Assembly; and
(6) “Tax” means a compulsory charge levied by the State of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Arkansas for the purpose of financing services performed for the common
benefit of its citizens.

19-2-304. Recording of amounts due.
Each state agency shall record upon its books of record the amounts due
it for delivery of goods and services, licenses, unpaid taxes, student loans,
special assessments, accounts receivable, and notes receivable that are
recognized by the state agency as due and payable or recognized as current-
year income or as an asset that is due and payable upon a date ascertained.

19-2-305. Referring of outstanding debts for collection.
(a) A state agency shall diligently and actively pursue the collection
of the state agency’s accounts and notes receivable.
(b) Diligently and actively pursuing the collection of these accounts
may include without limitation:
(1) Contacting the debtor by phone or letter within a reasonable
time after an account is deemed delinquent;
(2)(A) Referring an account to a licensed collection agency or
an attorney for collection with a remuneration not exceeding fifty percent
(50%) for accounts of five hundred dollars ($500) or less and not exceeding
thirty-three and one-third percent (33⅓%) for accounts in excess of five
hundred dollars ($500).
(B) If a state agency is unable to procure the services of
a collection agency or attorney for the collection of any account in excess
of five hundred dollars ($500) for a fee of one-third (⅓) of the amount
recovered as authorized in this subsection, the state agency may report this
fact to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee may authorize the state agency to pay a higher fee for
collecting the account, not to exceed fifty percent (50%);
(3) Pursuing setoff of debt against income tax refunds as
allowed by §§ 26-36-301 — 26-36-320; or
(4) Pursuing all other available means of collection if deemed
feasible and economically justifiable by the state agency.

19-2-306. Abatement of debt.
(a) If after the state agency has pursued collection of the debt owed
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the state agency as set out in this subchapter and the debt or partial debt
is decreed to be uncollectible, then the debt shall be referred to the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State for abatement.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall satisfy himself or
herself that all efforts to collect the debt have been fulfilled, and he or
she may then, by written approval, declare the debt or remaining debt
uncollectible and notify the state agency and Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee of abatement of the debt.

19-2-307. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
promulgate rules that are necessary to implement this subchapter.

Subchapter 4 — Expenditures Generally

19-2-401. Emergency expenditures.
(a)(1) In the event of riots, threatened riots, sabotage, public
insurrection, threatened insurrection, storm, flood, famine, or other public
calamity that jeopardizes the public peace, health, and safety of citizens of
Arkansas that calls for immediate action, the Governor is delegated and
authorized by the General Assembly to declare an emergency to exist and to
issue a proclamation declaring an emergency to exist.
(2) Other requests for utilization of this appropriation shall
be submitted for prior review by the Governor to a Governor's Emergency Fund
Review Committee, meeting in committee, composed of the cochairs and co-vice
chairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the cochairs and co-
vice chairs of the Legislative Council.
(b) A proclamation or request, as approved by the Governor or the
Governor's Emergency Fund Review Committee, shall include:
(1) The nature and location of the emergency;
(2) The name of the department or agency that, in the Governor's
opinion, is best able to alleviate or obviate the conditions that have arisen
or are about to arise because of the emergency; and
(3) The amount of funds required for the emergency, with the
amount or so much of the amount that has been set forth in each proclamation
to be extended upon vouchers drawn by the disbursing agent of the department
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
or agency named in the proclamation.
(c) The original of the proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary
of State, and an executed counterpart of it shall be filed with the Auditor
of State, the Treasurer of State, and the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(d)(1) Any expenditures made in accordance with the authorizations
provided for in this section may be reimbursed to the Miscellaneous Revolving
Fund by transfers authorized by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from
funds or fund accounts supporting the benefiting agencies.
(2) However, for Governor's proclamations and emergencies of a
nature in which no specific state agency is the beneficiary, the expenditures
shall be borne by the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund.

Subchapter 5 — Canceled Checks

19-2-501. Purpose.
The State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions have the
responsibility to properly account for all financial transactions. In order
to help fulfill this responsibility, the State of Arkansas and other public
entities are required to maintain books and records of transactions. The
State of Arkansas and its political subdivisions recognize that through the
use of computers and electronic data, banking and the flow of information are
continuing to change. With this change, it is important that the State of
Arkansas and its political subdivisions continue to receive evidentiary
information concerning financial transactions. The purpose of this subchapter
is to permit public entities to accept photographic copies or digital images
of financial transactions and to require financial institutions to furnish
the needed documentation in a readable, meaningful, permanent format.

19-2-502. Definition — Records of transactions with financial
institutions required.
(a) As used in this subchapter, “public entity” means state agencies,
including all constitutional offices and agencies, boards, and commissions,
state institutions of higher education, municipalities, counties, school
districts, education service cooperatives, improvement districts, and other
public officials or public offices.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) A public entity shall maintain records of all transactions with
financial institutions.

19-2-503. Eligibility to accept public funds.
For a financial institution to be eligible to be a depository of public
funds, the financial institution shall furnish the public entity the
documentation required in this subchapter of transactions with or through
that financial institution.

19-2-504. Transaction summaries.
(a) On a monthly basis, a financial institution shall furnish a public
entity with statements summarizing all transactions of the public entity.
(b) Unless the public entity and the financial institution have a
written agreement to receive digital images or copies in compliance with this
subchapter, the financial institution shall return all original canceled
checks to the public entity along with the transaction summary or statement.

19-2-505. Approval by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(a) A financial institution desiring to provide public entities with
images of canceled checks as provided in this subchapter shall provide a
sample of imaged documents in one (1) or more of the following formats to
Arkansas Legislative Audit for review:
(1) Stored on a CD-ROM or similar tangible digital media;
(2) Accessible through the internet; or
(3) On paper.
(b) Upon receipt of imaged documents submitted under subsection (a) of
this section, Arkansas Legislative Audit shall immediately review and notify
the financial institution whether or not the imaged documents are in
compliance with this subchapter.

19-2-506. Digital images or copies of documentation.
(a) After a financial institution has received written notification
from Arkansas Legislative Audit that the submitted samples of its imaged
documents under § 19-2-505 comply with this subchapter and upon agreement
with the public entity, the financial institution may provide the public
entity canceled check images in the format and quality approved by Arkansas
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Legislative Audit.
(b) The canceled check images of financial transactions provided to
the public entity by the financial institution under this subchapter shall be
legible and show both the front and back images of the canceled checks.
(c)(1) If a financial institution provides canceled check images on
tangible digital media under this subchapter, the images shall be provided on
a read-only CD-ROM or other agreed upon digital media that would provide a
permanent and tamper-proof record.
(2)(A) If particular software is needed to view or search the
digital images provided under this subchapter, the financial institution
shall provide the software to the public entity and, upon request, to
Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(B) Software provided under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this
section shall make canceled check images clear and readable.
(3) Before delivery of a CD-ROM or other tangible digital media
to a public entity, a financial institution shall perform random verification
of the legibility of the contents of the data.
(d)(1) If a financial institution provides canceled check images to a
public entity through internet access to online banking documents under this
subchapter, the financial institution may provide Arkansas Legislative Audit
read-only internet access to the public entity's online banking documents.
(2) Read-only internet access granted under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section shall permit viewing and copying of each public entity's bank
statements, canceled check images, deposit slips, and other financial
transaction documentation made available to the public entity.
(3)(A) If particular software is needed to view or search images
made available under this subsection, the financial institution shall provide
the necessary software to the public entity and, upon request, to Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
(B) Software provided under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this
section shall make canceled check images clear and readable.
(4) An online banking document made available to a public entity
under this subsection shall be available for read-only internet access for at
least five (5) years after the document is made available to the public
entity online.
(e) If a financial institution provides canceled check images on paper
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under this subchapter, the images shall be of such clarity and size that the
details may be read without the aid of a magnifying device.
(f)(1) If a financial institution provides canceled check images under
this subchapter, the financial institution shall implement one (1) of the
following procedures to provide verification of the authenticity of the
records retained by the public entity:
(A) A duplicate copy of the check images on paper and
statements mailed to Arkansas Legislative Audit on a monthly basis;
(B) The use of an identifying mark unique to the financial
institution on the paper images of checks sent to the public entity;
(C) The delivery of a duplicate copy of the check images
stored on tangible digital media, conforming to the digital imaging
specifications stated in this subchapter, to Arkansas Legislative Audit on a
monthly basis;
(D) The provision to Arkansas Legislative Audit of read-
only internet access to the public entity's online banking documents in
accordance with the requirements of this subchapter; or
(E) Any other authenticating method approved by Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
(2) A financial institution may elect which of the procedures
listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section it shall implement to provide
authentication of images relating to the accounts of each public entity.
(g) A financial institution shall be able to, and, at the request of
Arkansas Legislative Audit, shall provide duplicate copies of any checks and
statements delivered to a public entity:
(1) With the same clarity and size as the imaged documents
previously delivered; and
(2) In the format requested by Arkansas Legislative Audit if the
format is currently available to the financial institution.

19-2-507. Request of records by Legislative Auditor.
(a) Upon request by the Legislative Auditor, a financial institution
shall provide a copy of a public entity's financial information directly to
Arkansas Legislative Audit staff without delay or approval from the public
entity.
(b) The financial institutions may provide the digital transaction
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
statements and digital canceled check images to Arkansas Legislative Audit in
a media format allowed under this subchapter for public entities or other
media mutually agreed upon by the financial institution and Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
(c)(1) A bank is not liable for making available to Arkansas
Legislative Audit staff any of the information required under this
subchapter.
(2) Any cost associated with providing this information to
Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be borne by the public entity being audited
or investigated.

19-2-508. Effect on other laws.
This subchapter does not change, amend, or repeal any laws or rules
regarding a financial institution's normal obligations and responsibilities
to maintain customer financial records.

CHAPTER 3
STATE TREASURY MANAGEMENT

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Temporary Loans to Local Governments
Subchapter 3. State Treasury Management Law
Subchapter 4. State Treasury Money Management Trust Act
Subchapter 5. State Board of Finance

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Temporary Loans to Local Governments

19-3-201. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly recognizes that legislation considered by the
First Extraordinary Session of the Seventy-First General Assembly may remove
the penalty requirements for failure to pay property taxes by installments
and that this action may result in a reduction of property tax revenues
available to cities, counties, and school districts, thereby imposing a
financial hardship upon the cities, counties, and school districts during
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
portions of their calendar or fiscal year. It is, therefore, the intent of
this subchapter to authorize the State Board of Finance, in the manner
provided in this subchapter, to make temporary loans to cities, counties, and
school districts to assist in maintaining their average cash flow if there is
a material reduction in their cash flow resulting from legislation enacted by
the First Extraordinary Session of the Seventy-First General Assembly.

19-3-202. Procedure for obtaining and repaying loans.
(a)(1) The State Board of Finance may make temporary loans to cities,
counties, and school districts from average daily balances in the State
Treasury available to the board for investment purposes.
(2)(A) For a city, county, or school district to be eligible to
receive temporary loans under this subchapter, the city, county, or school
district shall prepare a schedule from each of the five (5) preceding
calendar or fiscal years.
(B) This schedule shall reflect the average monthly cash
flow derived from property tax sources and the proportion of property taxes
available during each month as they relate to the aggregate amount of
property taxes collected and available to the city, county, or school
district during the calendar or fiscal year, and the city, county, or school
district shall average the monthly cash flow percentages for the five-year
period.
(b)(1) If the board determines that the cash flow of the city, county,
or school district has fallen below the monthly average percentage cash flow
for property taxes available to the city, county, or school district for the
prior five (5) fiscal years and that the current level of cash flow is not
adequate to enable the city, county, or school district to maintain an
adequate level of services, the board may make temporary loans to the city,
county, or school district.
(2) These temporary loans may be in an aggregate amount no
greater than the difference between average monthly percentage cash flow of
the city, county, or school district for the preceding five (5) years for the
period and the actual percentage cash flow in the current tax year computed
on the basis of taxes collected in relation to the estimated tax collections
for the tax year.
(c)(1) All these temporary loans shall be repaid to the board upon
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
their maturity. The maturity of a temporary loan shall not be beyond the
last day of the calendar year in which the loan is made.
(2)(A) If a city, county, or school district fails or refuses to
pay any such temporary loan according to the repayment schedule agreed to by
the board or as set forth in this section, the board shall certify this fact
and the amount of the unpaid temporary loan to the Treasurer of State.
(B) The Treasurer of State shall withhold the amount of
the unpaid temporary loan from the next moneys available for distribution to
the city, county, or school district from state general revenues and shall
transfer the amount from the County Aid Fund, the Municipal Aid Fund, or the
Public School Fund, as the case may be, to the appropriate State Treasury
account or source from which the temporary loan was made.

19-3-203. Rules.
The State Board of Finance may promulgate appropriate rules for the
administration of this subchapter, including the establishment of the
necessary forms and loan instruments to be used in connection with making
loans under this subchapter.

Subchapter 3 — State Treasury Management Law

19-3-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Treasury
Management Law”.

19-3-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Bank” means:
(A) A state bank, a national bank, or an out-of-state
state-chartered bank that has received a certificate of authority under § 23-
48-1001; and
(B) A foreign bank organized under the laws of a territory
of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, or the United States
Virgin Islands if the deposits of the foreign bank are insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(2) “Bank depository” means a bank or savings and loan
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
association that accepts a deposit of funds from the State Treasury;
(3) “Capital base” means the sum of a bank's capital stock,
surplus, and undivided profits, plus any additions and less any subtractions
which the Bank Commissioner may by rule prescribe;
(4) “Cash Account” means the asset account in the State Treasury
consisting of all cash:
(A) In the hands of the Treasurer of State; and
(B) On deposit in the name of the Treasurer of State in a
bank depository;
(5) “Certificate of Deposit Account” means the asset account in
the State Treasury consisting of all, but only, certificates of deposit
acquired by the Treasurer of State through the State Treasury Certificate of
Deposit Investment Program;
(6) “Fund account” means a specifically named liability account
in the State Treasury to which moneys are credited upon receipt and charged
upon withdrawal that:
(A) Is created or authorized by law; and
(B) Reflects the amount of money owed to an agency or
instrumentality of the State of Arkansas;
(7) “Gross treasury fund balances” means the aggregate total
amount of the balances standing to the credit of all funds on the records of
the Treasurer of State;
(8) “Investment depository” means a person or entity that
accepts money or securities from the State Treasury for investment purposes;
(9) “National bank” means a national banking association
organized to carry on the business of banking under Title 12, Chapter 2, of
the United States Code;
(10) “Safekeeping Account” means the account in the State
Treasury administered by the Treasurer of State for the benefit of other
government entities consisting of all securities received by the Treasurer of
State from the administrators of the several state retirement systems and
other trust accounts;
(11) “Savings and loan association” means a corporation carrying
on the business of a savings and loan association or a building and loan
association under a charter issued by this state or any federal savings
association or federal savings bank that is chartered under federal law;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(12) “Securities Account” means the asset account in the State
Treasury consisting of all securities held by the Treasurer of State through
its investment of gross state fund balances;
(13)(A) “Securities broker” means a person or entity that:
(i) Buys or sells an investment for the State
Treasury; or
(ii) Receives any form of compensation or
remuneration in connection with the purchase or sale of an investment of
State Treasury funds.
(B) “Securities broker” includes a stock broker, a
securities broker, an investment adviser, and any other person or entity that
facilitates or helps to facilitate a transaction concerning an investment of
State Treasury funds;
(14) “State bank” means a state bank as defined in § 23-45-102;
(15) “State Treasury” means all moneys, securities, and gross
treasury fund balances administered by the Treasurer of State;
(16) “Trust Deposit Account” means the asset account in the
State Treasury consisting of all, but only, certificates of deposit
administered by the Treasurer of State for the benefit of the several
retirement systems and other trust fund accounts;
(17) “Trust fund account” means a specifically named liability
account designated by law as a trust fund in the State Treasury to which
moneys are credited upon receipt and debited upon withdrawal, representing
the balance owed by the State Treasury to agencies and instrumentalities of
the State of Arkansas; and
(18) “Trust Investment Account” means the asset account in the
State Treasury consisting of all, but only, securities administered by the
Treasurer of State for the benefit of the several retirement systems and
other trust fund accounts.

19-3-303. State Treasury accounts.
The Treasurer of State may create and rename accounts to ensure the
proper accounting and administration of the State Treasury.

19-3-304. Record and report of financial transactions.
(a)(1)(A) The State Board of Finance shall:
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(i) Establish the record-keeping requirements of the
Treasurer of State for the State Treasury; and
(ii) Require that:
(a) The liability accounts of the State
Treasury be recorded in amounts and sufficient detail to allow the
identification of the governmental entity to which funds are owed;
(b) The asset accounts of the State Treasury
be recorded in amounts and sufficient detail to identify the type of assets
owned; and
(c) All accounts of the State Treasury be
recorded using a basis of accounting approved by the board that is consistent
with generally accepted accounting principles.
(B) The record-keeping requirements under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section:
(i) May exceed the requirements of this section; and
(ii) Shall include without limitation records
showing:
(a) The identity of each fund and category of
funds; and
(b) A comparison of:
(1) Liquidity requirements established
by the board and the State Treasury's actual liquidity; and
(2) The target rate of investment return
established by the board and the State Treasury's actual rate of investment
return.
(2)(A) Each fund account shall be listed separately on the
records of the Treasurer of State under its major group heading.
(B) For each fund account, each group, and each major
group, the records shall reflect each day:
(i)(a) Summary financial transactions for the day
and cumulative summary financial transactions for the current fiscal year.
(b) The summaries required by subdivision
(a)(2)(B)(i)(a) of this section shall include:
(1) A statement of:
(A) Direct receipts;
(B) Transfer receipts;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) Disbursements by warrant
redemption; and
(D) Disbursements by transfer; and
(2) The amount of uncollected checks
legally charged off;
(ii) The credit balance at the close of business;
and
(iii) The composition of gross treasury fund
balances.
(3) Additionally, the records shall reflect in summary form the
total principal amount of securities held in trust in the Safekeeping
Account.
(4) The enumeration of requirements in this subsection does not:
(A) Limit the items of summary financial information that
may be included in the records or reports of the Treasurer of State; or
(B) Exclude other primary, subsidiary, or auxiliary
records as may be required by law, kept by the Treasurer of State, or as may
be required of the Treasurer of State by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State in the performance of the duties of the Treasurer of State.
(b)(1) A daily and a monthly report of the information required by
subsection (a) of this section shall be:
(A) Prepared by the Treasurer of State and delivered to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(B) Open to public inspection during normal business
hours.
(2) A report of the information required by subsection (a) of
this section shall be delivered in electronic format annually to the
Legislative Council, Arkansas Legislative Audit, and the Governor on:
(A) January 10 for the six-month period ending the
immediately preceding December 31; and
(B) July 10 for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

19-3-305. Disposition of moneys received by Treasurer of State.
(a)(1) The Treasurer of State shall issue receipts to depositors of
moneys into the State Treasury.
(2) On the day of receipt or as soon as practical, the moneys
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
shall be credited to the appropriate fund as provided by law.
(b)(1) After credit to the appropriate funds, the moneys shall be:
(A) Commingled with all other moneys in the State
Treasury; and
(B) Deposited into bank depositories to the credit of the
account of the Treasurer of State or invested as prescribed in this
subchapter.
(2) This subsection does not prohibit the Treasurer of State
from keeping cash of the State Treasury in the Treasurer of State's office in
reasonable amounts necessary for the transaction of the day-to-day business
of the office with persons and firms other than bank depositories.

19-3-306. Custodian of moneys and securities — Internal controls —
Annual audit.
(a)(1) The Treasurer of State shall:
(A) Be custodian of all moneys, securities, and
certificates of deposit at any time held in the State Treasury; and
(B) Maintain all moneys and securities consistent with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(2) However, control of the disposition of securities is vested
in the respective administrators of the several trust accounts for whom the
securities are held.
(b) To ensure the financial integrity of the State Treasury, the
Treasurer of State shall:
(1) Establish and maintain effective internal controls over
financial reporting and record keeping, including the monitoring of ongoing
activities, and comply with the Arkansas Constitution and applicable laws,
rules, contracts, and agreements;
(2) Establish and maintain effective internal controls to
prevent and detect fraud;
(3) With respect to State Treasury funds or other public funds,
notify Arkansas Legislative Audit of all known fraud or suspected fraud or
all known or suspected illegal acts involving the management or other
employees of the Treasurer of State, the State Board of Finance, a bank
depository, an investment depository, or a securities broker;
(4) Inform Arkansas Legislative Audit and the Chief Fiscal
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Officer of the State of any known material violations of the Arkansas
Constitution or applicable statutes, rules, contracts, or agreements;
(5) Prepare records and reports in accordance with guidelines
and timelines established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to permit
incorporation into the state's financial statements and to permit the audit
of the state's financial statements and the records, reports, and financial
statements of the Treasurer of State in a timely manner; and
(6) Make all financial records and related information available
to Arkansas Legislative Audit, including the identification of significant
personal or financial relationships between a director, officer, or employee
of a bank depository, investment depository, or securities broker and an
officer or employee of the Treasurer of State or board.

19-3-307. Bank depositories generally.
(a) Subject to the conditions and limitations provided in §§ 19-3-308
— 19-3-317, a bank or savings and loan association may be designated as a
bank depository.
(b)(1) A bank or savings and loan association is not required to act
as a bank depository.
(2) However, the acceptance of a deposit of State Treasury funds
requires a bank depository to observe §§ 19-3-308 — 19-3-317.

19-3-308. Deposits in ineligible institutions.
(a) The Treasurer of State shall not deposit State Treasury funds into
an institution that is not eligible to be a bank depository under § 19-3-307
unless deposits in the institution are required to be made by other law or by
resolution of a state board or commission duly adopted pursuant to the
authority and requirement of other law.
(b) The prohibition of subsection (a) of this section does not apply
to funds payable from the State Treasury that are required by paying agents
to meet debt service requirements of bond obligations incurred by law.

19-3-309. Maximum amount of deposits and investments — Protection of
State Treasury funds.
(a) The maximum amount of moneys and securities from the State
Treasury held by a bank depository shall not exceed an amount equal to the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
total amount of the capital base of the bank depository.
(b) An investment depository and a securities broker shall provide the
Treasurer of State and State Board of Finance proof of:
(1) Securities investor protection coverage for each investment
of State Treasury funds; and
(2) Compliance with fidelity bond requirements of the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission.

19-3-310. Types of accounts for deposits.
(a)(1) Funds from the State Treasury deposited into a bank depository
or an investment depository shall be credited to accounts in the name of the
Treasurer of State.
(2) Except as provided in § 19-3-312, the Treasurer of State may
establish accounts as demand deposit accounts, certificates of deposit, or
other accounts.
(b) The certificate of deposit account in a bank depository or an
investment depository shall consist of funds from the State Treasury
deposited under the State Treasury Certificate of Deposit Investment Program
and trust funds deposited for various trust funds.
(c) The demand deposit account in a bank depository or an investment
depository shall consist of:
(1) All federal funds, as described in § 19-7-701 et seq.;
(2) Trust funds to the extent that the trust funds are not
invested in securities and certificates of deposit; and
(3) State funds to the extent that the state funds are not
invested in securities.
(d) Funds from the State Treasury shall not be deposited into a bank
depository or an investment depository except under the terms of a written
agreement entered into between the Treasurer of State and the bank depository
or investment depository that complies with applicable state law and rules
and federal law, rules, and regulations.

19-3-311. Term of deposit — Interest.
(a) At a meeting called and held before the start of the term of a
certificate of deposit, the State Board of Finance shall determine the
interest rate to be paid on certificates of deposit invested through the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State Treasury Certificate of Deposit Investment Program.
(b) The Treasurer of State and each bank depository shall enter into
an agreement establishing the term or renewal term of the certificate of
deposit.
(c)(1) Notice of the date and time of the meeting shall be given by
the Secretary of the State Board of Finance and published in a newspaper of
statewide circulation at least five (5) days but no more than fifteen (15)
days before the meeting.
(2) At the meeting a person desiring to be heard shall be given
the opportunity to express his or her views on any matter under consideration
by the board.
(3) After considering all views expressed and the views of the
board members, the board shall fix the rate of interest to be used by the
Treasurer of State and paid by bank depositories during the next term.

19-3-312. Estimate and investment of funds not needed for immediate
cash requirements.
(a)(1) No less than quarterly, the State Board of Finance in
conjunction with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the
amount of funds from the State Treasury available for deposit by the
Treasurer of State into the State Treasury Certificate of Deposit Investment
Program.
(2) The board shall direct the investment of all moneys that
exceed the cash requirements needed to satisfy outstanding warrants and other
liquid obligations for the succeeding quarter.
(b)(1) At least ten (10) days before making the determination required
by subsection (a) of this section and after reviewing current holdings in the
State Treasury and all available revenue forecasts, appropriations,
expenditure budgets, year-to-date expenditure reports, prior year expenditure
trends, and any other pertinent information, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall advise the board of the estimated amount of cash reserves
expected to be needed by the Treasurer of State to purchase warrants in the
next fiscal quarter.
(2) The board shall direct the Treasurer of State:
(A) To purchase warrants in the next fiscal quarter; and
(B) In the type and amount for deposit and investment of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
all holdings exceeding cash reserves for warrant purposes.
(c) The Treasurer of State, acting ministerially, may do all things
necessary to accomplish the purposes and intent of this section.

19-3-313. Interest income on deposits.
(a) Interest from time to time due by a bank depository on Cash
Account demand deposit accounts and Certificate of Deposit Account
certificates of deposit shall be paid to the Treasurer of State as directed
by the Treasurer of State.
(b) The interest income shall be classified as trust fund income, and
the net amount of the interest income shall be credited to the Securities
Reserve Fund.

19-3-314. List of deposits.
(a)(1) On or before the tenth day following the end of each calendar
quarter, the Treasurer of State shall prepare a list of all bank
depositories.
(2) For each bank depository, the list shall include the amounts
of State Treasury funds on time deposit and on demand deposit on the last day
of business of the calendar quarter.
(b) The list shall be maintained for public inspection at the office
of the Treasurer of State.

19-3-315. Charges on deposits.
(a)(1) The Treasurer of State, acting ministerially, may contract with
a bank depository or investment depository to pay processing fees for
handling funds of the State Treasury if it is deemed to be in the best
interest of the State of Arkansas.
(2) The processing fees shall be paid by state warrant from
appropriations to the Treasurer of State.
(b) Unless authorized by its contract with the Treasurer of State, a
bank depository or investment depository shall not make any charge for
handling funds of the State Treasury.
(c) A bank depository or investment depository shall not use
compensating deposit balances to offset processing fees.
(d) A claim for a charge or processing fee in violation of this
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
section is void.

19-3-316. Discontinuance as bank depository.
(a) A bank depository that refuses to cash upon presentation by the
payee within thirty (30) days of issuance a state warrant of five hundred
dollars ($500) or less drawn upon the State Treasury or a bank check of five
hundred dollars ($500) or less issued by a state agency shall:
(1) Be discontinued immediately as a bank depository; and
(2) For a period of time determined by the State Board of
Finance, be ineligible for reinstatement as a bank depository.
(b) This section does not prevent a bank depository from:
(1) Taking a reasonable time to make proper identification of
the persons and signatures of payees named in warrants or checks; or
(2) Seeking indemnification for losses from cashing warrants or
checks for persons other than the payees named in the warrants or checks.

19-3-317. Effect of proper deposits.
The deposit of State Treasury funds in accordance with §§ 19-3-307 —
19-3-317 relieves the Treasurer of State and the surety on the bond of the
Treasurer of State of liability for the loss of the funds by reason of the
default or insolvency of a bank depository.

19-3-318. Investments in securities and bank certificates of deposit.
(a)(1) Trust fund accounts in the State Treasury may be invested in:
(A) Certificates of deposit of banks and savings and loan
associations; and
(B) Securities eligible under other law.
(2)(A) The administrator of a trust fund account shall review,
from time to time, the flow of moneys through the trust fund account in the
State Treasury to determine the estimated surplus moneys in the trust fund
account that exceed the immediate requirements of the trust fund account.
(B)(i)(a) After taking into consideration the amount of
the estimated surplus moneys under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, the
administrator shall certify to the Treasurer of State the amount of surplus
moneys and the period of time during which the surplus moneys are not
required.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The Treasurer of State shall invest the
amount certified in certificates of deposit issued by eligible banks and
savings and loan associations.
(c) If the Treasurer of State is unable to
place the certified amount in certificates of deposit, then the remainder may
be placed in securities with the administrator's approval.
(ii)(a) Moneys required for a purchase under this
subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall be withdrawn from the Cash Account and paid to
the bank depository issuing the certificate of deposit or the investment
depository selling the securities.
(b)(1) The principal amount of the certificate
of deposit shall be debited to the Trust Deposit Account.
(2) The principal amount of a security
shall be debited to the Trust Investment Account.
(iii) The certificates of deposit shall be secured
by the Treasurer of State in accordance with the collateralization and
investment policies of the State Board of Finance.
(iv)(a) Interest on bank certificates of deposit
shall be paid at competitive rates according to the investment policy
established by the State Board of Finance.
(b) All interest income derived from
certificates of deposit or securities shall be credited as trust fund income
to the trust fund used to purchase a certificate of deposit or security.
(3)(A) The Securities Reserve Fund shall be maintained on demand
deposit in depository banks.
(B) This subsection does not apply to the Securities
Reserve Fund.
(b)(1)(A) The State Board of Finance may direct that a portion of
state funds in the State Treasury be invested in certificates of deposit in
the State Treasury Certificate of Deposit Investment Program as provided in §
19-3-319.
(B) The remaining portion of state funds in the State
Treasury may be invested in:
(i) Certificates of deposit;
(ii) Direct obligations of the United States
Government;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(iii) Obligations of agencies and instrumentalities
created and authorized by act of the United States Congress to issue
securities or evidences of indebtedness, regardless of guarantee of repayment
by the United States Government;
(iv) Obligations in which the principal and interest
are fully guaranteed by:
(a) The United States Government; or
(b) An agency or an instrumentality created by
an act of the United States Congress and authorized by the United States
Congress to issue the guarantee;
(v) Obligations in which the principal and interest
are fully secured, insured, or covered by a commitment or agreement to
purchase the obligation by:
(a) The United States Government; or
(b) An agency or instrumentality created by an
act of the United States Congress and authorized by the United States
Congress to issue the commitment or agreement;
(vi) General obligations of the states of the United
States and of the political subdivisions, municipalities, commonwealths,
territories, or insular possessions of the states of the United States;
(vii) Obligations issued by the State Board of
Education under authority of the Arkansas Constitution or applicable
statutes;
(viii) Warrants of a political subdivision or
municipality of the State of Arkansas having maturities not exceeding one (1)
year;
(ix) Prerefunded municipal bonds, if the principal
and interest of the municipal bonds are fully secured by the principal and
interest of a direct obligation of the United States Government;
(x) The sale of federal funds with a maturity of not
more than one (1) business day;
(xi) Demand, savings, or time deposits or accounts
of a depository institution chartered by the United States, a state of the
United States, or the District of Columbia if funds invested in the demand,
savings, or time deposits or accounts are fully insured by a federal deposit
insurance agency;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(xii) Repurchase agreements that are fully
collateralized by securities stated in subdivisions (b)(1)(B)(ii)-(v) of this
section if the repurchase agreement provides for taking delivery of the
collateral directly or through an authorized custodian;
(xiii) A securities or other interest in an open-end
type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment
Company Act of 1940 and that is defined as a “money market fund” under 17
C.F.R. § 270.2a-7 if:
(a) The portfolio of the investment company or
investment trust is limited principally to United States Government
obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United
States Government obligations; and
(b) The investment company or investment trust
takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized
custodian; or
(xiv) As approved by the guidelines established by
the State Treasury investment policy approved by the State Board of Finance,
a corporate obligation with an investment grade rating of at least BBB, A2,
P2, or an equivalent rating as indicated by at least two (2) nationally
recognized statistical rating organizations.
(2)(A)(i) Moneys required for a purchase under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section shall be withdrawn from the Cash Account and paid to
the seller of the securities.
(ii) The cost of the securities shall be debited to
the Securities Account.
(B) The proceeds of the sale or redemption of securities
withdrawn from the Securities Account shall be debited in the Cash Account in
the State Treasury.
(C)(i) For all purchases, sales, and redemptions of
securities under this subsection, discounts and premiums shall be credited or
charged, as appropriate, to the Securities Reserve Fund.
(ii) Discounts and premiums that are increments and
all interest received on securities held in the Securities Account shall be
classified as trust fund income and credited to the Securities Reserve Fund
by the Treasurer of State.
(3)(A) All purchases and sales of securities by the Treasurer of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State shall be made through securities brokers:
(i) Specifically approved by the State Board of
Finance; or
(ii) Meeting criteria established by the State Board
of Finance.
(B) All purchases and sales of securities by the Treasurer
of State shall be made using a competitive procedure that:
(i) Is approved by the State Board of Finance; and
(ii) Has the goals of:
(a) Obtaining the optimal price and value for
the securities; and
(b) Not showing preference toward any
securities broker.
(C)(i) However, the State Board of Finance may subscribe
for obligations offered by the United States Department of the Treasury.
(ii) An obligation offered by the United States
Department of the Treasury held in the State Treasury may be exchanged for
another obligation offered by the United States Department of the Treasury if
an exchange privilege has been extended by the United States Department of
the Treasury.
(4)(A) All or any part of the bonds of local industrial
development corporations, authorized and issued under the Arkansas Industrial
Development Act, § 15-4-101 et seq., and all or any part of the bonds of
municipalities and counties, authorized and issued under the Municipalities
and Counties Industrial Development Revenue Bond Law, § 14-164-201 et seq.,
at any time held in the Securities Account in the State Treasury, may be sold
at public sale or at private sale as the State Board of Finance shall
determine.
(B) However, in a private sale, the sales price of the
bonds or obligations shall not be less than the amount paid for the bonds or
obligations.
(5) The State Board of Finance shall provide ministerial
authority to the Treasurer of State to take whatever action becomes necessary
in regard to securities held in the Securities Account to provide the
requisite amount of cash necessary in demand deposit accounts to carry out
the business of the state or to correct any miscalculations that have arisen.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(6)(A) A purchase, exchange, or receipt of an obligation by the
State Treasury shall not cancel the obligation purchased, exchanged, or
received.
(B) The obligation shall be held in trust for the use and
benefit of the state fund used to purchase the obligation, subject only to
the right of the State Board of Finance to sell or exchange the obligation if
the best interest of the state is served.
(7)(A) The State Board of Finance shall meet at fiscal quarters
to evaluate, discuss, and review the advice of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State under § 19-3-312 and authorize the deposit and investment of State
Treasury funds to be made during the period before the next meeting of the
State Board of Finance.
(B) The deposit and investment of funds and the purchase
and sale of permissible securities may be made at any time it is advantageous
to the State Treasury by the Treasurer of State under the guidelines in the
State Treasury investment policy established by the State Board of Finance.
(8)(A) In order to increase investment income with minimal risk,
the Treasurer of State may loan securities held in the Securities Account if,
at the time the loan is executed, at least one hundred two percent (102%) of
the full market value of the security loaned is collateralized by cash or
securities guaranteed by the United States Government or an agency of the
United States Government.
(B) At all times during the term of the loan, the
collateral shall equal or exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the full
market value of all securities on loan.
(C) For purposes of this subdivision (b)(8), the full
market value of the collateral shall be determined on a daily basis.
(c)(1) The State Board of Finance may invest federal funds, as
described in § 19-7-701 et seq., the same as state funds that are authorized
by subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The proceeds of investing federal funds shall be used for
the same purpose authorized for other moneys accruing to the benefit of the
Securities Reserve Fund under § 19-3-321.
(d)(1) The State Board of Finance may invest funds deposited into the
State Treasury by state agencies, boards, and commissions that were
previously held as cash funds in a bank depository or investment depository
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to enhance investment opportunities and earnings.
(2) The State Board of Finance may invest interest-bearing funds
the same as state funds under subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The interest earned on investments under this subsection
shall be credited under subdivision (d)(4) of this section to the interest-
bearing fund.
(4) The State Board of Finance shall establish the method of
computing the participants' rate of return and earning to determine the
distribution to each participant.
(5) On the second business day that the State Treasury is open
after the twenty-fifth day of the month, the Treasurer of State shall
transfer to the participants of the fund interest earned on all State
Treasury funds invested as authorized under this section during the preceding
month less the proportionate share of any assessments for the expenses of
administration.

19-3-319. State Treasury Certificate of Deposit Investment Program —
Definitions.
(a) The policy of the State Board of Finance to set aside an amount to
be invested in certificates of deposit that mature no sooner than one hundred
eighty (180) days shall be known as the “State Treasury Certificate of
Deposit Investment Program”.
(b) The following institutions may participate in the program:
(1) National banks that have their principal offices in Arkansas
or are legally operating branches in Arkansas;
(2) Banks chartered in the State of Arkansas;
(3) Banks chartered by other states that are legally operating
branches in Arkansas;
(4) Savings and loan associations or savings banks chartered by
the United States that have their principal offices in Arkansas or are
legally operating branches in Arkansas; and
(5) Savings and loan associations chartered by the State of
Arkansas.
(c)(1) Institutions that have their principal offices in Arkansas
shall designate a representative at the principal office responsible for
transacting business with the Treasurer of State.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Institutions that do not have their principal offices in
Arkansas shall designate a principal branch and a representative at the
principal branch responsible for transacting business with the Treasurer of
State.
(d)(1) Semiannually, or as required by the board, each participating
institution shall compute and report to the Treasurer of State its Arkansas
deposits, Arkansas loans, the loan-to-deposit ratio for Arkansas loans and
Arkansas deposits, and its capital base.
(2) Each participating institution shall report to the board
information required by the board to determine the institution's suitability
as a bank depository.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Arkansas deposits” means deposits received by banks and
credited to accounts whose account holders have Arkansas as their principal
place of business or permanent home addresses; and
(2) “Arkansas loans” means the sum of:
(A) Loans made to individual borrowers residing in the
State of Arkansas;
(B) Loans made to corporations or other legal entities
doing business in Arkansas for which an address within Arkansas is used for
transacting business;
(C) Bonds issued or loans made to the State of Arkansas or
its instrumentalities;
(D) Bonds issued or loans made to political subdivisions
of the State of Arkansas; and
(E) Bonds issued by Arkansas corporations.
(f) The board shall promulgate rules establishing the minimum capital
requirements for a bank depository.
(g) The Treasurer of State shall establish procedures to be reviewed
and approved by the board establishing guidelines for the deposit and
allocation of certificates of deposit among participating institutions.
(h)(1) Interest on funds invested under this section shall be paid by
participating institutions at rates established by the board.
(2) The rates shall not exceed the maximum rate, if any, that
banks are permitted to pay on time certificates of deposit for the same
period of time by regulations of the Federal Reserve System or the Federal
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Deposit Insurance Corporation.
(i)(1) Moneys required for a purchase under this section shall be
gwithdrawn from the Cash Account and paid to the issuer of the certificate of
deposit.
(2) The principal amount of the certificate of deposit shall be
credited to the Certificate of Deposit Account.
(j) The certificates of deposit shall be secured as required by the
board.

19-3-320. Minimum balance to be maintained.
Since it is the intent of the General Assembly that the State Treasury
have sufficient cash available at all times to redeem all state warrants
presented for payment, the State Board of Finance shall immediately sell
securities in the manner prescribed in § 19-3-318(b) when the cash balance
maintained on demand deposit in bank depositories falls below the amount
necessary to meet operating requirements, excluding trust funds.

19-3-321. Securities Reserve Fund.
(a)(1) In addition to the purposes for which the Securities Reserve
Fund may be used under this subchapter, the Securities Reserve Fund shall be
used to absorb any losses in:
(A) Securities held in the Securities Account in the State
Treasury; and
(B) The Treasurer of State's account in bank depositories.
(2)(A) The balance in the Securities Reserve Fund shall always
be available to absorb the losses stated in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section.
(B) However, moneys in the Securities Reserve Fund in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be available at all
times to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State as authorized by § 19-26-203,
there to be used as provided by law.
(b)(1) If a loss is sustained in relation to securities held at any
time in the Securities Account or in the Treasurer of State's account in any
bank depository and the credit balance in the Securities Reserve Fund is
insufficient to absorb the loss, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
transfer moneys from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Securities
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Reserve Fund of an amount that, when added to the credit balance in the
Securities Reserve Fund, equals the amount of the loss.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that a loss shall
not be sustained by an account used to make an investment or deposit.
(c)(1) On a quarterly basis, interest earned on federal funds received
under the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, 31 U.S.C. § 6701 et
seq., shall be transferred at the direction of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State from the Securities Reserve Fund to the federal funds established
for the purpose of holding these moneys in trust.
(2) Interest to be transferred shall be a pro rata share of
total earned interest based on the proportion of the balances of the total
federal funds established for the purpose of holding the State and Local
Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, 31 U.S.C. § 6701 et seq., moneys in trust to
the balances of all investments of the State Treasury.

19-3-322. Servicing state debt — Definition.
(a) Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, the Secretary of
the State Board of Finance shall be disbursing officer of appropriations made
for meeting the debt service requirements of the direct general obligation
bonds of this state at any time outstanding.
(b) As used in this section, “debt service requirements” means the
maturing principal of, interest on, and paying agents' fees in connection
with the payment of the bonds.
(c) The secretary, without fail, shall cause notice of the call to be
published not less than thirty (30) days before the first date upon which
such bonds may be called, with publication to be by one (1) insertion in a
newspaper published in each of the cities of Little Rock, Arkansas; St.
Louis, Missouri; and in a financial newspaper published in the Borough of
Manhattan, City of New York, State of New York.

19-3-323. Purchase of bonds by Treasurer of State.
(a) The Treasurer of State may purchase bonds from the State of Israel
that are guaranteed and backed by the full faith and credit of the government
of Israel as the sovereign debt of the State of Israel.
(b) The moneys that the Treasurer of State may use in the purchase of
any bonds from the State of Israel shall be those funds available for
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
investment under this subchapter.

Subchapter 4 — State Treasury Money Management Trust Act

19-3-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Treasury
Money Management Trust Act”.

19-3-402. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to create the State Treasury Money
Management Trust administered by the Treasurer of State for the deposit of
moneys in order to permit the joint investment of participants' money so as
to enhance investment opportunities and earnings.

19-3-403. Authorized deposits.
An entity listed below may deposit money to the State Treasury Money
Management Trust for the purpose of investment:
(1) State agency's cash funds as defined in § 19-4-801;
(2) Local governments:
(A) Any city, county, school district, or community
college district of this state; and
(B) Any department, instrumentality, or agency of these
entities;
(3) The Treasurer of State may invest in the State Treasury
Money Management Trust to the extent State Treasury funds are not being
utilized for certificates of deposit under the State Treasury Certificate of
Deposit Investment Program or for trust certificates of deposit pursuant to
the State Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-301 et seq.; and
(4) The Auditor of State may invest funds subject to the
unclaimed property provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et
seq., in the State Treasury Money Management Trust.

19-3-404. State Treasury Monty Management Trust provisions.
(a) The investment policy and all other policies, documents, rules,
and procedures established or approved by the State Board of Finance under §
19-3-501 et seq. apply to the administration of this subchapter by the
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Treasurer of State.
(b) The Treasurer of State may invest or deposit funds in the State
Treasury Money Management Trust as authorized in § 19-3-318.
(c)(1) Moneys deposited into the State Treasury Money Management Trust
by participants other than the State Treasury are not and shall not become
part of State Treasury funds.
(2) The State Treasury Money Management Trust shall operate as a
segregated account for custodial, depository, and accounting purposes.
(3)(A) A participant may deposit at will into and, up to the
balance of the participant's account, obtain moneys upon demand from the
State Treasury Money Management Trust.
(B) A demand for funds by a participant under this
subdivision (c)(3) shall be made by notice as prescribed by the board.
(d) Each participant who elects to deposit money into the State
Treasury Money Management Trust shall provide the account information
required by the board, including without limitation the identity of any
person authorized to conduct transactions on behalf of the participant.
(e) Any loss of principal or interest realized as the result of a
participant's demand for withdrawal of funds shall be incurred by the
participant requesting the withdrawal and deducted on the day the withdrawal
is made.
(f)(1) The Treasurer of State may:
(A) Assess reasonable charges against the account of a
participant in the State Treasury Money Management Trust for reimbursement of
administration and operational expenses; and
(B) Charge a reasonable fee for managing the State
Treasury Money Management Trust.
(2) The board shall set any charge or fee imposed under this
subsection.
(3) Charges and fees received under this subsection shall be
deposited into the State Treasury in a fund for the benefit of the Treasurer
of State.
(g) All interest and earnings received on the money of the State
Treasury Money Management Trust shall be credited to the State Treasury Money
Management Trust for distribution to the participants of the State Treasury
Money Management Trust after any charges or fees due under subsection (f) of
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this section are deducted.
(h) After deducting any charges or fees due under subsection (f) of
this section, on the second business day that the State Treasury is open
after the twenty-fifth day of the month, the Treasurer of State shall
distribute the monthly earnings of the State Treasury Money Management Trust
during the preceding month.
(i) The board shall establish the method of computing a participant's
rate of return, earnings, charges, fees, and expenses to determine the
distribution for each participant.
(j) The monthly sum of a participant's daily earnings, after deducting
administrative charges and fees under subsection (f) of this section, shall
be credited to the participant's account and reinvested, unless otherwise
instructed by the participant, on the distribution date stated in subsection
(h) of this section.

19-3-405. Prudent investor rule.
(a) The Treasurer of State shall apply the prudent investor rule while
serving in a fiduciary capacity for State Treasury Money Management Trust
participants.
(b) The prudent investor rule means that in making investments, the
fiduciaries shall exercise the judgment and care under the prevailing
circumstances that an institutional investor of ordinary prudence,
discretion, and intelligence exercises in the management of large investments
entrusted to it, not for speculation but for investment, considering the
permanent disposition of funds, and the probable safety of capital as well as
probable income.

19-3-406. Loan of securities.
(a) In order to increase investment income with minimal risk, the
Treasurer of State may loan securities held under this subchapter, but only
if at the time the loan is executed at least one hundred two percent (102%)
of the full market value of the security loaned is collateralized by cash or
securities guaranteed by the United States Government or an agency of the
United States Government.
(b) At all times during the term of the loan, the collateral shall be
equal to not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of the full market value
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
calculated on the total value of all securities on loan.
(c) For purposes of this section, the value of the collateral shall be
determined on a daily basis.

Subchapter 5 — State Board of Finance

19-3-501. State Board of Finance — Creation — Members.
(a) The State Board of Finance is created.
(b) The board shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The Treasurer of State;
(3) The Auditor of State;
(4) The Bank Commissioner;
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration;
(6) The Securities Commissioner;
(7) One (1) person with knowledge and experience in commercial
banking;
(8) One (1) person who:
(A) Holds or has held a Series 7 licensure as a general
securities representative; and
(B) Has at least five (5) years of experience as a general
securities representative;
(9) One (1) certified public accountant who:
(A) Is licensed in Arkansas; and
(B) Has at least five (5) years of experience as a
certified public accountant;
(10) One (1) member of the general public; and
(11)(A) The Insurance Commissioner.
(B) The Insurance Commissioner shall be a voting member
only for the purpose of voting on health benefit plans.
(c) A board member listed in subdivisions (b)(7)-(10) of this section:
(1) Shall serve a four-year term and may be reappointed, except
that the board member shall serve an initial term of either one (1) year, two
(2) years, three (3) years, or four (4) years as determined by lot in order
to establish staggered terms in which the term of one (1) of the four (4)
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
board members expires each year;
(2) Shall be paid a stipend of one hundred dollars ($100) from
funds appropriated to the Treasurer of State for participation in each board
meeting;
(3) Shall not have a direct financial interest in a transaction
between an investment depository or bank depository and the:
(A) Board; or
(B) Treasurer of State;
(4) Shall not be related within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity to a constitutional officer or a member of the
General Assembly;
(5) Shall abstain from voting on an issue that affects the board
member or the procedures, profits, or funding of a business or organization
of which the board member is a member; and
(6) May be removed for cause by a majority vote of the board.
(d)(1) A member listed in subdivisions (b)(7) and (8) of this section
shall be appointed and may be reappointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate.
(2) A member listed in subdivisions (b)(9) and (10) of this
section shall be appointed and may be reappointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
(e) The Governor shall be Chair of the State Board of Finance, and the
Treasurer of State shall be the secretary, executive officer, and disbursing
agent of the board.

19-3-502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Bank depository”, “investment depository”, “securities
broker”, and “State Treasury” have the meanings provided in § 19-3-302; and
(2)(A) “Direct financial interest” means the direct compensation
or other remuneration to a person or a family member of a person that is
attributable to an investment or a deposit of money or securities from the
State Treasury.
(B) “Direct financial interest” does not include
compensation from the investment or deposit of a person's own money or
securities.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-3-503. Meetings — Quorum — Staff.
(a)(1) Meetings of the State Board of Finance shall be held:
(A) At least quarterly:
(i) Upon the call of the Governor or by any three
(3) or more members; and
(ii) Upon advance notice to each member; and
(B) At a place that is convenient for the board.
(2) The meetings shall be conducted in accordance with the
Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and complete records
of the proceedings shall be kept.
(b)(1) Seven (7) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(2) The affirmative vote of a majority of members present is
required to adopt a motion or resolution.
(c) The staff of an elected or appointed official of the board may
provide any assistance requested by the board.

19-3-504. Powers and duties.
(a) In addition to any other function, power, or duty imposed by law,
the State Board of Finance shall establish, maintain, and enforce all
policies and procedures concerning the management and investment of funds in
the State Treasury and the State Treasury Money Management Trust, including
without limitation:
(1) Record keeping and reporting requirements that reflect:
(A) Daily, monthly, and year-to-date balances of all
funds, accounts, and groups of accounts within the State Treasury; and
(B) The performance of all deposits and investments
compared to the target rate of return established by the board;
(2) A collateralization policy;
(3) Eligibility requirements for a bank depository, an
investment depository, a securities broker, and, before accepting an
application to hire an investment consultant under subsection (c) of this
section, an investment consultant;
(4) An investment policy;
(5) Liquidity requirements for the State Treasury; and
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(6) Qualifications, ethical standards, a conflict of interest
policy, and criminal background check requirements that are no less stringent
than the requirements of § 19-3-505 for all employees of the board or
Treasurer of State who handle State Treasury funds or participate in
decisions concerning the deposit or investment of State Treasury funds.
(b)(1) The board shall select the chief compliance officer within the
Treasurer of State's office based upon nominations received from the
Treasurer of State.
(2) The chief compliance officer shall:
(A) Be employed by the board;
(B) Work with and at the direction of the Treasurer of
State consistent with the policies and directives of the board; and
(C) Serve at the pleasure of the board.
(c) The board may hire an investment consultant to examine the
investment policies and investment practices for the State Treasury and make
recommendations to the board, including without limitation recommendations
concerning:
(1) An appropriate range for asset allocation;
(2) A target rate of return;
(3) The propriety of using money managers and, if desired,
recommendations concerning money managers; and
(4) Adjustments to improve investment policies, investment
allocations, or investment returns.
(d) The positions listed in subsections (b) and (c) of this section
shall be funded by the appropriation for the Treasurer of State.
(e) The board may make, amend, adopt, and enforce rules and policies
to regulate board procedure and execute board functions.
(f) The board shall supervise and administer the State and Public
School Life and Health Insurance Program and carry out the duties set out
under §§ 25-1-404 and 25-1-405.

19-3-505. Employees — Qualifications, ethical standards, and
background checks.
(a) An employee of the State Board of Finance or Treasurer of State
listed in § 19-3-504(b) or § 19-3-504(c) or who handles State Treasury funds
or participates in decisions or making recommendations concerning the deposit
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
or investment of State Treasury funds:
(1) Shall meet minimum standards of expertise and experience
established by the board;
(2) Shall not have a direct financial interest in a bank
depository, investment depository, or securities broker; and
(3) Shall file on or before January 31 with the board for the
preceding calendar year the written statement of financial interest required
by § 21-8-701(d).
(b)(1)(A) The board shall obtain a state and federal criminal
background check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the
Department of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
for:
(i) Each employee listed in § 19-3-504(b) or § 19-
3-504(c); and
(ii) An employee or prospective employee of the
board or Treasurer of State who handles or will handle State Treasury funds
or participates or will participate in making decisions or recommendations
concerning the deposit or investment of State Treasury funds.
(B) The background check shall be obtained on or before:
(i) September 1, 2013, for an existing employee; and
(ii) The start of employment for a prospective
employee.
(2) The state and federal criminal background check shall
conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of
fingerprints.
(3) The employee or prospective employee shall sign a consent to
the release of information for the state and federal criminal background
check.
(4) The Treasurer of State shall be responsible for the payment
of any fee associated with the state and federal criminal background check.
(5) Upon completion of the state and federal criminal background
check, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police
shall forward to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for review by the
board all releasable information obtained concerning the employee or
prospective employee.
(c) The board or Treasurer of State shall not employ an individual who
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
has:
(1) Been convicted of a felony or a gambling offense in a state
or federal court of the United States;
(2) Been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude;
(3) Entered into a plea agreement to avoid felony prosecution;
(4) Been or is currently subject to an administrative order by
the State Bank Department or State Securities Department;
(5) Failed without justification to file the statement of
financial interest required by this section; or
(6) A conflict of interest that violates the board's policy
established under § 19-3-504.

CHAPTER 4
GENERAL ACCOUNTING AND BUDGETARY PROCEDURES LAW

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Duties and Responsibilities Generally
Subchapter 3. Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
Subchapter 4. Auditor of State and Treasurer of State
Subchapter 5. Financial Management System
Subchapter 6. Annual Operations Plans of State Agencies
Subchapter 7. Expenditures Generally
Subchapter 8. Expenditure of Cash Funds
Subchapter 9. Travel Rules
Subchapter 10. Credit Cards
Subchapter 11. Approval of Expenditures
Subchapter 12. Disbursement of Public Funds
Subchapter 13. Monitoring for Deficit Spending
Subchapter 14. Construction of Buildings and Facilities
Subchapter 15. Property and Equipment Inventory
Subchapter 16. Salaries and Payroll Disbursement
Subchapter 17. Reimbursements, Collections, and Refunds
Subchapter 18. Federal Grants and Aids
Subchapter 19. Losses and Recoveries
Subchapter 20. State-Funded Expenses of Constitutional Officers
Subchapter 21. Review of Discretionary Grants
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-4-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “General Accounting
and Budgetary Procedures Law”.

19-4-102. Purpose.
(a)(1) It is the policy of the State of Arkansas to:
(A) Maintain on a sound financial basis the state and all
of its agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and institutions, all
referred to in this chapter as “agencies” unless otherwise necessary;
(B) Provide adequate accounting for all fiscal
transactions; and
(C) Provide for uniformity in budget preparation,
presentation, and execution.
(2) For these purposes, the general provisions of this chapter
are intended to:
(A) Establish uniformity in operating and capital budget
preparation, presentation, and execution by establishing certain duties,
responsibilities, and functions of the executive and legislative branches of
the state government;
(B) Prohibit deficit spending by establishing standards
for the execution of budgets approved by the General Assembly;
(C) Provide methods of internal accounting control by
establishing and supervising the accounting systems of state agencies;
(D) Establish an adequate classification and coding system
for all revenue receipts and disbursements;
(E) Establish methods of voucher examination and approval
for expenditures of funds deposited into the State Treasury and, if
necessary, other depositories;
(F) Establish uniform procedures for the preparation of
disbursing documents;
(G) Establish procedures for forecasting economic
conditions, establish an adequate technique of revenue estimating, and
provide for tax research and a method for standardization of statistics;
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(H) Develop methods for improvement and economy in
organization and administration of agencies;
(I) Authorize the promulgation of reasonable rules not
inconsistent with applicable laws to achieve the purposes and intent of this
chapter; and
(J) Further define the powers and duties of the Secretary
of the Department of Finance and Administration, sometimes referred to as the
“Chief Fiscal Officer of the State”, the Auditor of State, and the Treasurer
of State in connection with general accounting, budgetary, and fiscal
procedures.
(b)(1) It is also the purpose of this chapter to establish a
comprehensive system of state budgeting and financial management that will
further the capacity of the General Assembly to plan and finance the services
which it determines the state should provide for its citizens and which will
further the capacity of the Governor to make budgetary recommendations to the
General Assembly and to execute the laws of this state.
(2) The comprehensive system of state budgeting and financial
management shall include procedures for:
(A) The orderly establishment, continuing review, and
periodic revision of programs, financial goals, and policies of the state;
(B) The development, coordination, and review of long-
range programs and their financing that will implement goals and policies
authorized by the General Assembly and the Governor;
(C) The preparation, analysis, presentation, enactment,
and execution of budgets that authorize specific programs, policies, and
goals and that focus attention on state services and their costs;
(D) The evaluation of alternatives to existing programs,
policies, and goals that would provide more economic, efficient, or effective
state services; and
(E) An evaluation and reporting system which will provide
measurements of the effectiveness of program performance.

19-4-103. Penalty.
With respect to all matters for which penalties have not otherwise been
provided in this act, a person who knowingly violates any of the provisions
of this act is guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined in
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
any amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

19-4-104. Rules.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may make, amend, and enforce
reasonable rules not inconsistent with law that he or she deems necessary and
proper to effectively carry out this chapter and the public policy as set
forth in § 19-4-102.
(b) Rules promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State under
this section shall be published in an administrative procedures manual and
distributed to the various state agencies.

19-4-105. Legislative staff consultation.
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall consult with
the Legislative Auditor and the Assistant Director of the Fiscal Division of
the Bureau of Legislative Research throughout each stage of planning and
implementation for any new statewide accounting system.
(b) The consultation and involvement required under this section is to
ensure that those capabilities to provide the required services to members
and committees of the General Assembly are incorporated into the new
statewide accounting system.

Subchapter 2 — Duties and Responsibilities Generally

19-4-201. Authority of Governor.
(a) The Governor shall direct the execution of the state budget as
approved by the General Assembly.
(b) The Governor or the Governor-elect shall:
(1) Review the budget requests and estimates of resources;
(2) Evaluate long-range programs and consider possible
alternatives to existing state agency programs, policies, and goals; and
(3) Formulate and recommend for consideration by the Legislative
Council and the General Assembly a proposed comprehensive state budget of
programs and proposed financing that shall include all estimated receipts and
expenditures of the state government.
(c)(1) Proposed expenditures shall not exceed estimated available
resources.
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Should the Governor or the Governor-elect propose increased
taxes in order to finance all proposed programs, two (2) sets of budgets
shall be submitted to the Legislative Council and the General Assembly, one
(1) set based on the resources available from the then-existing tax laws and
another showing the additional expenditures proposed to be financed from
recommended tax increases.
(3)(A) Budget requests for administration and operation of the
legislative branch, the judicial branch, the elective constitutional offices,
the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery, and the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission shall be submitted
directly to the Legislative Council without any recommendation by the
Governor.
(B) Each budget request submitted under subdivision
(c)(3)(A) of this section shall:
(i) Include all of the information required for
other public entities under this chapter;
(ii) Be in substantially the same format as budget
requests for other public entities under this chapter; and
(iii) Include a detailed listing of any
unappropriated funds, including without limitation the sources of the funds,
the fund balances, and the expenditures of the funds for the previous fiscal
year.
(d) To carry out this section, the Governor or the Governor-elect
shall:
(1) Provide for hearings, if required, with the administrative
head or any other persons having knowledge thereof, of an agency submitting a
budget request in order for the Governor or the Governor-elect to make his or
her determinations and recommendations; and
(2) Appear or appoint a designated representative to appear
before the General Assembly or any committees or interim committees of the
General Assembly to present the Governor's or the Governor-elect's
recommendations for the forthcoming budgetary period.

19-4-202. Authority of Legislative Council.
(a)(1) At any time they deem it advisable, the cochairs of the
Legislative Council may call into meeting the membership of the Legislative
03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Council for consideration of budget matters.
(2) For preliminary budget studies, the Legislative Council may
call before it the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Director of the
Bureau of Legislative Research, the Legislative Auditor, and a constitutional
officer or administrative head of a state agency for the purpose of making
available to the Legislative Council information the Legislative Council
deems advisable.
(3) The Legislative Council shall have the power to visit and
inspect any agency for the purpose of obtaining first-hand information as to
the condition and needs of the agency and may appoint committees from its
membership for the purpose of reporting upon these findings.
(b)(1) Not later than sixty (60) days before the convening of the
General Assembly, the Legislative Council shall require from the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State the budget estimates and recommendations prepared by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(2) From time to time when called upon by the Legislative
Council, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or his or her representative
shall appear before the Legislative Council or attend meetings of the
Legislative Council when required to do so for the purpose of preparing or
submitting additional information on budget matters.
(c)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and an administrative
head of an agency, when requested to do so, shall lend any reasonable aid,
assistance, or personnel and supply any reports or information when required
to the Governor-elect for the purpose of assisting him or her in the
preparation of his or her budget recommendations to be submitted to the
Legislative Council.
(2) The Legislative Council shall call upon the Governor-elect
or any newly elected constitutional officer, or their designated
representatives, for the purpose of submitting any final recommendations or
modifications of the proposed budget requests.
(d)(1) The Legislative Council, acting upon the facts submitted to it
and from such other studies and hearings as the Legislative Council shall
deem advisable, shall proceed to modify, revise, approve, or disallow the
budget requests.
(2) The Legislative Council shall make its recommendations with
respect to the approved items of the budget and publish them in a report to
100 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
be made available to every member of the General Assembly when it convenes in
regular session.
(3) In recommending the proposed state budget to the General
Assembly, the Legislative Council may recommend the form of the appropriation
bills to be submitted and may draw or cause to be drawn the bills conforming
to these recommendations for presentation to the General Assembly.

19-4-203. Authority of General Assembly.
The General Assembly and the Joint Budget Committee shall:
(1) Consider the current programs and financial plan included in
the budget requests and the proposed resources for financing recommended by
the Governor or the Governor-elect, including proposed goals and policies,
recommended budgets, revenue proposals, and long-range programs;
(2) Adopt or recommend programs and alternatives to the
financial plan recommended by the Governor or the Governor-elect as the
General Assembly deems appropriate;
(3) Adopt or recommend legislation to authorize implementation
of a comprehensive program and financial plan;
(4) Provide for a postaudit of financial transactions, program
performance, and execution of legislative policy decisions;
(5) Provide for hearings, if required, with the administrative
head or any other persons having knowledge thereof of a state agency
submitting a budget request, in order to make determinations and formulate
recommendations;
(6) If found necessary, visit and inspect an agency; and
(7) Propose the form of appropriation bills and write or direct
the writing of appropriation bills.

19-4-204. Recommendations by Governor.
(a)(1) The Governor or the Governor-elect shall formulate the programs
and financial plans to be recommended to the Legislative Council and the
General Assembly after considering the state agency-proposed programs and
financial plans and other programs and alternatives the Governor or the
Governor-elect deems appropriate.
(2) The program and financial plan submitted by the Governor or
the Governor-elect shall include:
101 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) His or her goals and policies;
(B) Recommended plans to implement the goals and policies;
(C) Recommended budgets for each year for which an
appropriation is being requested; and
(D) Recommended revenue measures to finance the budget.
(b) The Governor or the Governor-elect shall present the proposed
comprehensive program and financial plan:
(1) To the Legislative Council for the timely consideration of
the Legislative Council; and
(2)(A) In a message to a joint session of the General Assembly.
(B)(i) The message shall be accompanied by an explanatory
report that summarizes recommended goals, policies, plans, and
appropriations.
(ii) The explanatory report shall be furnished to
each member of the General Assembly and each agency. The report shall contain
the following information:
(a) The coordinated programs, goals, and
objectives that the Governor or Governor-elect recommends to guide the
decisions on program plans and budget appropriations;
(b) The program and budget recommendations of
the Governor or Governor-elect for each year of the succeeding biennium;
(c) A summary of state receipts in the
previous fiscal year, an estimate for the current fiscal year, and an
estimate for each year of the succeeding biennium;
(d) A summary of expenditures during the last fiscal
year, those estimated for the current fiscal year, and those recommended by
the Governor or the Governor-elect for each year for which appropriations are
requested; and
(e) Any additional information that will facilitate
understanding by the General Assembly and the public of the proposed program
and financial plan of the Governor or the Governor-elect.

19-4-205. Legislative review.
The General Assembly, the Legislative Council, and the Joint Budget
Committee shall consider the by the General Assembly and the public of the
Governor or the Governor-elect and determine the comprehensive program and
102 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
financial plan to support the services to be provided the citizens of the
state, while keeping authorized expenditures within the estimated receipts
and other available resources.

19-4-206. Conservation of appropriations in changes of administration.
(a) In those instances in which a constitutional or elective official
of the State of Arkansas is due to retire from office and another
constitutional official is to take his or her place, the appropriations and
funds provided by the General Assembly for the operation of any such office
shall be conserved so as to provide his or her successor in office with a
proportionate amount of available appropriations and funds for the remainder
of the fiscal year during which the change of office takes place.
(b) For the purpose of carrying out this section, it is provided that:
(1)(A) A constitutional official shall not cause, or cause to be
incurred, an obligation or issue a voucher against the appropriations of his
or her agency in excess of a true proportion which his or her time of service
during the fiscal year of retirement bears to the fiscal year.
(B) For the purpose of establishing the time of service of
any such official, the time of retirement shall be construed to be that
established by the Arkansas Constitution and statutes of this state for the
retirement of the constitutional and elective officials of this state;
(2)(A) Within thirty (30) days after each general election, the
Auditor of State shall notify all retiring constitutional officials that they
will be required to file in the office of the Auditor of State a statement,
duly sworn to, setting out:
(i) The total of all vouchers issued against the
appropriations of the agency;
(ii) A list of all outstanding obligations; and
(iii) A detailed list of all proposed expenditures to
be made before the time of retirement.
(B) If the Auditor of State is retiring, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall notify the Auditor of State to file the statement
required of the Auditor of State under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section
with the office of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(3)(A) The Auditor of State shall not issue a warrant in payment
of the voucher of an agency coming under the provisions of this section in
103 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
excess of the proportion provided for in this section. The Auditor of State
shall be liable under his or her official bond for issuing any such warrant
in excess of such a proportion.
(B) However, in cases of calamity or emergency, the
Governor may, by proclamation, authorize an agency to exceed the limitations
of this section. Under such conditions the Auditor of State and the
disbursing officer shall be relieved of any liability under this section if,
in making the proclamation, the Governor states the reasons for the emergency
and the probable amount of the excess obligations that the agency is
authorized to incur.
(c)(1) It is the purpose of this section to provide for the
conservation of appropriations for the normal operations of agencies.
(2) This section is not applicable to appropriations for
improvements or to special appropriations.

Subchapter 3 — Chief Fiscal Officer of the State

19-4-301. Duties and responsibilities generally.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall carry out the following
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Assist the Governor or the Governor-elect in the preparation
of the comprehensive program and financial plan, including the coordination
and analysis of state agency programs, goals, and objectives;
(2) Develop procedures to produce the information needed for
effective policy decision-making by the General Assembly and the Governor or
the Governor-elect;
(3) Assist agencies in developing their statement of goals and
objectives, their preparation of program plans and budget requests, and their
systems of evaluating and reporting of program performance;
(4) Provide the General Assembly or its interim committees with
any information they may request;
(5) Between sessions of the General Assembly, keep the
Legislative Council and any interim committees of the General Assembly that
request this information informed of the actual expenditures of agencies as
compared to their approved budgets and of the actual performance of these
agencies as compared to that predicted in the program budget requests, along
104 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
with the reasons for any deviations that exist; and
(6) Administer his or her responsibilities under the program
budget provisions of this chapter so that the policy decisions and budget
determinations of the General Assembly and the Governor are effectively
implemented.

19-4-302. Budget information forms.
To accomplish his or her duties and responsibilities, the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration, in cooperation with the
Legislative Council, shall design budget information forms so that
comparative data of the last fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the
next biennium are presented so that state agencies can best express budgetary
and program information that will be most useful to the Governor or the
Governor-elect and the General Assembly in order to facilitate program
formulation, execution, and accountability by:
(1) Focusing attention upon the general character and relative
importance of the program to be accomplished or upon the service to be
rendered and what the program or service will cost;
(2) Employing functional classifications, when practical to do
so, in order to present budgets by broad program categories;
(3) Presenting budget requests by organizational units;
(4) Grouping expenditures and budget estimates by major objects
of expenditures;
(5) Stating goals and objectives of agency programs;
(6) Presenting proposed plans to implement the goals and
objectives, including proposed modification of existing program services and
establishment of new program services, and the estimated resources required
to implement the goals and objectives;
(7) Including a report of the receipts during the prior fiscal
year, an estimate of the receipts during the current fiscal year, and an
estimate for each year of the succeeding biennium;
(8) Presenting requested legislation required to implement the
proposed programs and financial plans; and
(9) Supplying any other information necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

105 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-303. Budget estimates.
In cooperation with the Legislative Council, the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(1) Prepare a budget calendar or time schedule so that the
submission and presentation of budget estimates will be accomplished within
the desired time limits; and
(2) Prepare a budget instructional manual to establish
uniformity for presentation of budget estimates by state agencies.

19-4-304. Regular and fiscal session preparations.
(a) Immediately after July 1 of each even-numbered calendar year, or
earlier if determined necessary, the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration shall:
(1) Issue budget information forms, budget estimating
instructions, and a budget calendar that has been approved by the Legislative
Council, plus a budget policy letter from the Governor containing some or all
of the following:
(A) Establishing maximum limitations on expenditures for
the year in which estimates are being requested;
(B) Setting out the policies that will determine the
Governor's priorities in the allocation of available resources;
(C) Outlining the effects of economic changes pertaining
to price levels, population changes, and pending federal legislation; and
(D) Containing a review of current fiscal conditions and a
prognostication of fiscal conditions for the future;
(2)(A) Visit and inspect the properties and facilities of any or
all state agencies and request the administrative head or any employee of the
agency to appear before the secretary to explain any matters concerning the
budgetary and program requirements of the agency.
(B) If an agency fails or refuses to furnish any
information with respect to budget estimates or program formulation, as and
when it shall be requested by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, then the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may prepare and submit his or her own
recommendations as to the budgetary or program requirements of the agency;
(3) Assist agencies in the preparation of their budget
proposals. This assistance may include:
106 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) Technical assistance;
(B) Organization of materials;
(C) Centrally collected accounting, budgeting, personnel,
and purchasing information standards and guidelines;
(D) Population and other required data; and
(E) Any other assistance that will help the agencies
produce the information necessary for efficient agency management and
decision making by the General Assembly and the Governor or the Governor-
elect;
(4)(A) Analyze the budget estimates to evaluate and assess the
priority and accuracy of agency requests in relation to policy and program
objectives and the financial condition of the state and make recommendations
for modifications and revision of the budget request if, in their opinion,
the facts before them would justify such proposed revisions.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State in making
recommended changes shall not alter the original request unless requested to
do so by the administrative head of the agency affected but shall report the
original request, together with his or her own recommendations and the
reasons for his or her recommendations, to the Governor, so that all agency
budget estimates may be made available to the Governor or the Governor-elect,
the Legislative Council, and the General Assembly for their consideration;
(5) Prepare an estimate of the general and special revenues for
the next fiscal year, along with comparative data for the then-current fiscal
year and past fiscal year; and
(6) Submit the budget studies, together with his or her
recommendations, to the Legislative Council and to the Governor or the
Governor-elect for such further recommendations as the Governor or the
Governor-elect may care to make.
(b) The secretary shall submit the annual revenue forecast to the
Legislative Council:
(1) By December 1 of the year preceding a fiscal session that is
held in a year in which the preferential primary election will be held in May
under § 7-7-203;
(2) By February 1 of a year preceding a fiscal session that is
held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in March
under § 7-7-203; and
107 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) No later than sixty (60) days before the start of a regular
session.

19-4-305. Preliminary budget report.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prepare the described
preliminary budget report so that it shall include the following:
(1) The budget requests as submitted by the legislative branch,
the judicial branch, the elective constitutional officers, the Arkansas
Department of Transportation, and the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission;
(2) The budget requests of all other state agencies, as
submitted by each agency, together with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State's analysis of the budget estimates and the executive recommendations;
(3) A recapitulation and summary of all budget information as
required in this subchapter and the recommendations of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State; and
(4) A detailed statement of the revenues and other sources of
income of the state government for the past complete fiscal year, the
estimated revenues of the state under existing laws, and the Governor's
proposals for revisions in any tax laws necessary to balance the budget.

19-4-306. Review and control of budgets.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State:
(1) In cooperation with the Legislative Council, shall devise
the necessary procedures, forms, and timetables to assure the same
comprehensive review of all state agency requests for capital expenditures as
outlined in this subchapter for operating budgets; and
(2) Shall institute the necessary budgetary and accounting
controls over those capital budgets approved by the General Assembly to
assure full compliance with all applicable state laws.

19-4-307. Employment classification information.
(a) At the same time a state agency submits a budget request for
presession budget hearings of the Legislative Council and the Joint Budget
Committee, the agency shall also submit the following information for each
employment classification:
108 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) The total number of persons currently employed;
(2) The number of white male employees;
(3) The number of white female employees;
(4) The total number of Caucasian employees;
(5) The number of black male employees;
(6) The number of black female employees;
(7) The number of other employees who are members of racial
minorities; and
(8) The total number of minorities currently employed.
(b) An agency's budget request shall not be considered by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee in a presession budget hearing
unless the information required by this section is filed along with the
budget request.

Subchapter 4 — Auditor of State and Treasurer of State

19-4-401. Duties generally.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the offices of the
Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State shall continue to perform the
duties imposed by law upon these offices.

19-4-402. Auditor of State as disbursing officer.
The Auditor of State shall act as disbursing officer for the
appropriations made for:
(1) Circuit judges;
(2) Prosecuting attorneys;
(3) Retired circuit and chancery judges; and
(4) The Lieutenant Governor.

19-4-403. Issuance of warrants.
The Auditor of State shall issue his or her warrants in payment of the
vouchers presented to him or her by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
only after the Auditor of State has satisfied himself or herself that this
chapter has been complied with. For this purpose, the Auditor of State may
conduct any further examination and preaudit of the vouchers that he or she
deems necessary. A single warrant may contain payments from multiple
109 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
appropriations, classifications of appropriation, and funds.

19-4-404. Books, forms, and receipts.
(a) To provide for uniformity in fiscal procedure, the Auditor of
State and the Treasurer of State are directed to establish and set up in
their respective books the income, appropriation, disbursement, and fund
accounts that are prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or as
otherwise provided by law.
(b) The forms of all vouchers and other prescribed forms used in
connection with the disbursement of funds in the State Treasury shall be
prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, with the approval of the
Auditor of State, or as otherwise provided by law.
(c) All forms of receipts and other prescribed forms used in
connection with the recording of the receipts of the Treasurer of State shall
be prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, with the approval of
the Treasurer of State, or as otherwise provided by law.

19-4-405. Examination of records.
(a) The Auditor of State shall examine and verify the disbursement and
redemption records of the Treasurer of State daily and compare them with the
records in the Auditor of State's office and with the Auditor of State's
redeemed warrants.
(b) As each redeemed warrant is examined and found to compare with the
disbursement records, it shall be stamped over the signature of the Auditor
of State. The stamp shall contain the words “VOID, STATE AUDITOR”, and shall
be at least one-half inch by one and one-half inches (½″ x 1½″) in size.

19-4-406. Storage of warrants.
(a)(1) The Auditor of State shall place all redeemed warrants in a
secure place or vault in the Auditor of State's office, subject to the
inspection by any interested citizen.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this
section, the Auditor of State shall keep a warrant intact and without further
alteration for a period of one (1) year from the close of the fiscal year in
which the warrant was issued.
(B)(i) If the Auditor of State makes an electronic copy of
110 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the warrant, the original warrant shall be kept for three (3) months.
(ii) The electronic copy of the warrant shall be
maintained for a period of ten (10) years from the close of the fiscal year
in which the warrant was issued.
(b) If the Legislative Auditor or the State Historian requests
retention of an original warrant or the electronic copy of a warrant in
excess of the time periods provided under subsection (a) of this section, the
Auditor of State shall retain the warrant for such period of time as required
by the Legislative Auditor or the State Historian.
(c) If federal law or regulations require the retention of certain
warrants for a period longer than the period prescribed in this section, the
Auditor of State shall retain the warrants for the period prescribed by the
federal law or regulations.

19-4-407. Electronic warrants transfer system.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State, and
the Auditor of State may establish an electronic warrants transfer system
directly into payee's accounts in financial institutions in payment of any
account allowed against the state.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State, and
the Auditor of State, by joint rules, shall establish the standards and
procedures for administering the electronic warrants transfer system, to
include that the electronic warrants transfer is in such a form that a single
instrument serves as electronic warrants transfer.
(c) A single electronic warrants transfer may contain payments to
multiple payees, appropriations, characters, and funds.

19-4-408. Distributions to public school districts.
(a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State,
and the Auditor of State shall establish an electronic warrants transfer
system to distribute certain funds directly to an account in a financial
institution, as designated by the public school district's treasurer.
(2) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
make the determination of the categories of funds to be distributed.
(3)(A) The public school district shall accept distributions by
the electronic warrants transfer system.
111 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B)(i) A public school district with a district treasurer
may choose to have funds first distributed to the county treasurer or
directly to the school district treasurer.
(ii) If a school district with a district treasurer
chooses direct distribution of funds to the school district treasurer, the
State of Arkansas shall forward all state and federal funds for the district
to the district treasurer, whether they are in the form of state warrants or
electronic warrants transfers.
(iii) If a school district uses the county treasurer
as its treasurer, the State of Arkansas shall forward all state and federal
funds for the district to the county treasurer, whether they are in the form
of state warrants or electronic warrants transfers.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State, and
the Auditor of State, by joint rules, shall establish the standards and
procedures for administering the electronic warrants transfer system, to
include that the electronic warrants transfer is in such a form that a single
instrument serves as electronic warrants transfer.
(c) A single electronic warrants transfer may contain payments to
multiple public school districts, appropriations, characters, and funds.

Subchapter 5 — Financial Management System

19-4-501. General requirements.
(a) To provide necessary financial information for the Governor,
members and committees of the General Assembly, and other interested state
agencies, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish a
comprehensive financial management system for appropriated and cash funds of
agencies.
(b) The comprehensive financial management system shall provide for an
adequate control over receipts, expenditures, and balances to the end that
information may always be currently available as to the financial condition
of the state and its various subdivisions. The comprehensive financial
management system shall:
(1) Include a modified accrual system embracing encumbrance
accounting;
(2) Conform with generally accepted governmental accounting
112 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
principles; and
(3) Provide a reporting system whereby actual expenditures are
compared to those predicted in the agency's annual operations plan described
in subchapter 6 of this chapter.
(c) In obtaining any necessary fiscal information, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may make an examination of the books and records of an
agency to determine the financial condition of the agency and to report on
it.

19-4-502. Duties of Chief Fiscal Officer of the State generally.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall:
(1) Review postaudits of state agencies conducted by the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and advise the Governor and the Attorney
General or prosecuting attorney for legal action, if appropriate, of any
improper or illegal practices;
(2) Assist the various agencies in complying with the
recommendations of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee for improving the
accounting systems of the agencies;
(3) Establish a uniform chart of accounts and issue an
accounting procedures manual governing statewide accounting and reporting
policies and procedures;
(4) Prepare analysis and evaluation reports of the financial
management system and fiscal control procedures to determine compliance with
generally accepted governmental accounting principles;
(5) Adapt the financial management system to meet the particular
needs of each agency while maintaining the overall integrity of the financial
management system and comparability of coding and reporting for all agencies
utilizing the financial management system; and
(6) Design accounting and reporting forms for use by agencies in
effecting proper fiscal control procedures.

19-4-503. Deposit of funds into State Treasury.
(a) Upon request of a state agency having funds on deposit in a
depository other than the State Treasury, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State may authorize the agency to deposit the moneys into the State Treasury.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the
113 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
classification of the funds and shall designate or create the State Treasury
fund into which the moneys are to be deposited.
(c) The appropriation acts that appropriated the cash moneys shall be
construed to be in conformity with Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29,
and Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12, for withdrawing moneys from the
State Treasury.
(d) All moneys deposited into the State Treasury under this section
shall be deposited as nonrevenue receipts and shall not be subjected to the
provisions of § 19-21-105 unless the source of the revenue is specifically
classified in § 19-41-201 or § 19-42-201.
(e) If any moneys classified as trust funds under this section earn
interest, then that interest shall be credited to the trust fund.

19-4-504. Requisites of financial management system.
The financial management system shall at all times:
(1) Reflect the unencumbered balances of all State Treasury
funds, fund accounts, and accounts and appropriations payable from the State
Treasury;
(2) Reflect the appropriations and allotments as approved by the
General Assembly;
(3) Reflect the distribution and allocation of the state
revenues under the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., and other
revenue laws of the state; and
(4) Provide a record of the expenditures, disbursements, and
receipts of all state agencies.

19-4-505. State accounting system to conform to generally accepted
accounting principles — Legislative intent.
(a)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the state
accounting system, as authorized in this subchapter, be established in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles as recognized by the
Governmental Accounting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified
Public Accountants, the Financial Accounting Standards Board, and any
successor governing boards.
(2) However, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall consult
the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee before proposing, adopting, or
114 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
recommending compliance with any of the generally accepted accounting
principles that conflict with law.
(b) It is further recognized that the state accounting system should
comply with recognized principles of accounting for and reporting of public
moneys in order to properly and fairly discharge to the taxpayers the state's
responsibility of adequately accounting for the taxpayers' moneys.

19-4-506. Accounting and reporting capabilities.
A governmental accounting system shall make it possible both to:
(1) Present fairly and with full disclosure the financial
position and results of financial operations of the funds and account groups
of the governmental unit in conformity with generally accepted accounting
principles; and
(2) Determine and demonstrate compliance with finance-related
legal and contractual provisions.

19-4-507. Fund accounting systems.
(a) Governmental accounting systems shall be organized and operated on
a fund basis.
(b) As used in this section, "fund" means a fiscal and accounting
entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash and other
financial resources, together with all related liabilities and residual
equities or balances, and changes therein, that are segregated for the
purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in
accordance with special rules, restrictions, or limitations.

19-4-508. Interim and annual financial reports.
(a) Appropriate interim financial statements and reports of financial
position, operating results, and other pertinent information shall be
prepared to facilitate management control of financial operations,
legislative oversight, and when necessary or desired, for external reporting
purposes.
(b) An annual comprehensive financial report covering all funds and
account groups of the governmental unit shall be prepared and published,
including:
(1) Appropriate combined, combining, and individual fund
115 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
statements;
(2) Notes to the financial statements;
(3) Schedules;
(4) Narrative explanations; and
(5) Statistical tables.
(c)(1) General purpose financial statements may be issued separately
from the annual comprehensive financial report.
(2) General purpose financial statements shall include the basic
financial statements and notes to the financial statements that are essential
to fair presentation of financial position and operating results and changes
in financial position of proprietary funds and similar trust funds.

19-4-509. Design of financial management system.
(a)(1) The financial management system shall be designed to record
transactions in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles as
established by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.
(2) The financial management system shall provide a suitable
analysis of the operation, maintenance, and improvement of all state agencies
and their functions.
(3) The financial management system shall furnish a breakdown
and itemization of all financial transactions in accordance with the
appropriations and allotments of the General Assembly, federal grants, and
bank funds of the agencies.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prepare a general
ledger manual covering the system of classifying financial transactions and
shall supply all agencies with a copy of this general ledger manual.

19-4-510. Appropriations code manual.
(a) After the General Assembly has enacted the various appropriation
measures for the support and operation of state government and its agencies,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prepare a complete code manual
setting out all of the appropriations of the General Assembly, the purpose of
the appropriations and the funds, fund accounts, or accounts from which the
appropriations are made and shall classify them in accordance with the titles
and definitions as enumerated in this chapter.
(b) After establishing the appropriation items and classifying them
116 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under this chapter in strict conformity to the intent and purposes of the
appropriation acts and within the limitations of the revenues and funds
available for these purposes, it shall then be unlawful for the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State or a disbursing officer of a state agency to transfer
from an appropriation item, the purpose of which is defined under this
chapter, to any other appropriation item of a different classification and
purpose as defined in this subchapter except when permitted by law.

19-4-511. Classification of appropriations.
(a)(1) For the purpose of establishing the proper accounts, for
budgetary control, for accounting, and for other provisions of this chapter,
the appropriations of the General Assembly shall be classified under one (1)
or more of the classifications prescribed in §§ 19-4-512 — 19-4-516.
(2) The purposes for which these appropriations may be used are
defined as prescribed in §§ 19-4-512 — 19-4-516, but not necessarily limited
to those purposes.
(b) However, the state's financial management system may invoke
additional budget control using features of the state's financial management
system that are in addition to the appropriations of the General Assembly.

19-4-512. Personal services — Definition.
The personal services classification is for regular full-time, part-
time, and extra-help employees, employer matching costs, employer special or
extra compensation, overtime earnings, and other employee benefits that are
legally authorized, and the personal services classification is categorized
in the following subclassifications:
(1) Regular Salaries. This subclassification is applicable to
all salaries and compensation, except as provided in this section, for state
employees when the number of employees and maximum amounts of compensation
are statutorily authorized as provided by Arkansas Constitution, Article 16,
§ 4, regardless of the financial resources compensating such employees within
this subclassification, and regardless of when the method of salary
disbursing of the institutions of higher education involves payment from
state agency bank funds of the institution of higher education, subject to
reimbursement to the institution of higher education for such amounts as are
properly payable from funds in the State Treasury. However, the state's
117 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
financial management system may include in the subclassification of regular
salaries the following:
(A) Extra Salaries. This description includes all special
remuneration received by state employees in addition to regular salary that
is authorized by law. Any state agency that receives an appropriation for
extra salaries may pay eligible employees at the following rates, with the
total additional compensation not to exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000)
per fiscal year:
(i) Physicians who are certified by the American
specialty boards, at a rate of pay not to exceed four thousand five hundred
dollars ($4,500) per fiscal year;
(ii) Physicians who are eligible to be certified by
the American specialty boards, at a rate of pay not to exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500) per fiscal year; and
(iii) Physicians certified in child psychiatry or
forensic psychiatry, an additional two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)
per fiscal year will be allowed;
(B) Special Compensation. This description includes
special remuneration when authorized by law for employee suggestion awards;
and
(C) The payment of extra salaries and special compensation
when authorized by law is in addition to the maximum amounts of compensation
set by law for regular salaries;
(2) Extra Help.
(A) This subclassification shall be used for payment of
all salaries and compensation of part-time or temporary employees, as
authorized by law, who are employed one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours
per fiscal year or less.
(B) This subclassification may be used to pay part-time or
temporary employees who are employed for more than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) hours per fiscal year if specific authorization is provided by law
and if such use is within standards established by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration.
(C) Extra-help funds shall not be used to pay additional
compensation to a full-time state employee.
(D) As used in this section, “state employee” means any
118 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
employee occupying a regular salaried position for a state agency, board,
commission, department, or institution of higher education;
(3) Overtime. This subclassification is applicable for payment
of services performed in excess of normal hours of work during a specific
time when specifically authorized by law; and
(4) Personal Services Matching.
(A) This subclassification represents the state agency's
proportion of the amounts necessary to contribute the state agency's share or
to match the deductions from the salaries of state employees for:
(i) Social Security;
(ii) Retirement;
(iii) Group employee insurance programs;
(iv) Workers' compensation;
(v) Unemployment compensation contributions; and
(vi) A state contribution for state employee
retirees who are eligible to participate in the health and life insurance
programs offered by the state as defined by § 21-5-411 and as authorized by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may make
appropriate reclassifications of the state agency's appropriation for
maintenance and general operation to effect the payment of personal services
matching as described in this subdivision (4).

19-4-513. Maintenance and general operation.
(a) The maintenance and general operation classification covers items
of expense necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the state
agency, authority, board, commission, department, or institution of higher
education, except as otherwise classified in this subchapter.
(b) It is recognized that in those instances in which the maintenance
and general operation line-item classification is not subclassified, the
state agency may expend moneys for operations in compliance with the intent
of this subchapter.
(c) If an appropriation for maintenance and general operation
authorized for a state agency, board, department, or institution of higher
education is restricted in its use by budget classification as set out in
subsection (d) of this section, transfers between such classifications may be
119 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
made subject to the procedures set out as follows:
(1)(A) If the amount of any of the budget classifications of
maintenance and general operation in an agency's appropriation act are found
by the administrative head of the agency to be inadequate, then the agency
head may request, upon forms provided for such a purpose by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, a modification of the amounts of the budget
classification. In that event, the agency head shall set out on the forms the
particular classifications for which he or she is requesting an increase or
decrease, the amounts thereof, and his or her reasons for requesting a
modification of the amounts of the budget classification.
(B) The total amount of the budget shall not exceed either
the amount of the appropriation or the amount of the funds available.
(C)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(C)(ii) of
this section, transfers shall not be made from the capital outlay or data
processing subclassification unless specific authority for those transfers is
provided by law.
(ii) Transfers from capital outlay to data
processing may be made when it is determined by the Division of Information
Systems that data processing services for a state agency can be performed on
a more cost-efficient basis by the division than through the purchase of data
processing equipment by that state agency;
(2)(A) In considering the proposed modification as prepared and
submitted by each state agency, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
make such studies as he or she deems necessary.
(B) If the requested transfer, when added to other
transfers previously approved during the fiscal year for the same
classification with the same appropriation, would result in a deviation of
any kind in the affected classifications of less than five percent (5%) up to
a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) from the
classifications established by law, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall approve the requested transfer if in his or her opinion it is in the
best interest of the state.
(C) If the requested transfer, when added to other
transfers previously approved during the fiscal year for the same
classification within the same appropriation, would result in a deviation of
five percent (5%) or more, or more than two thousand five hundred dollars
120 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
($2,500), the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall submit the request,
along with his or her recommendation, to the Legislative Council for its
advice before approving the request; and
(3) If a state agency expends or obligates any approved budget
in excess of the maximum classification, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall study the reasons for the excess expenditures and shall take
immediate steps to correct the excess spending that he or she deems necessary
after notification of such actions has been sent to the Legislative Council.
(d) Maintenance and general operation may be further categorized into
the following subclassifications and the expenses of each subclassification
shall be used according to the subclassification:
(1) Operating Expenses. This subclassification includes without
limitation expenses associated with the following:
(A) Postage, telephone, and telegraph;
(B) Transportation of commodities or objects;
(C) Printing;
(D) State-owned motor vehicles;
(E) Advertising;
(F) Minor and major repairs;
(G) Maintenance contracts;
(H) Utilities and fuel;
(I) Insurance premiums, surety and performance bonds, and
association dues and memberships;
(J) Contractual services not otherwise classified;
(K) Consumable supplies, materials, and commodities;
(L) Books, publications, and newspapers;
(M) Court costs;
(N) Equipment not capitalized;
(O) Applicable petty cash reimbursements, laundry, and
taxes;
(P) Travel, subsistence, meals, lodging, transportation of
state employees or officials, and nonstate employees traveling on official
business;
(Q)(i) Uniforms the agency requires its employees to wear
as part of the job.
(ii) Clothing items purchased for its employees and
121 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
not required to be worn during working hours, or which are purchased for the
promotion of the agency, shall not be subclassified as an operating expense;
(R) Other items of operating expense that are provided by
the appropriation act or under reasonable rules and procedures issued by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(S) Debt service on equipment or measures required by a
guaranteed energy cost savings contract executed under the Guaranteed Energy
Cost Savings Act, § 19-68-101 et seq., or an energy efficiency project
financed under the State Entity Energy Efficiency Project Bond Act, § 15-5-
1801 et seq.;
(2) Conference and Travel Expenses. This subclassification
includes:
(A) The costs of a state employee attending a conference,
seminar, or training program; and
(B) The costs of a state agency-sponsored or hosted
conference, seminar, or training program when the expenses are not otherwise
classified according to this section;
(3) Professional Fees. This subclassification includes the
expenses for contractual agreements entered into by the state agency with an
individual, partnership, corporation, or anyone other than a state employee
to provide a particular document, report, speech, study, or commodity other
than those contractual agreements that by their nature would be classified
elsewhere in this subchapter;
(4) Capital Outlay. This subclassification includes without
limitation the following expenses:
(A) Purchase of land, buildings, equipment, furniture, and
fixtures; and
(B) Contractual agreements, all of which are to be
capitalized from the maintenance and general operation classification of
appropriation; and
(5) Data Processing. This subclassification includes purchase
of data processing services from the division, or others, and other expenses
that are not necessarily classified elsewhere in this section by virtue of
the appropriation based upon budgets presented for consideration.
(e) Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary,
state-supported colleges and universities may utilize maintenance and
122 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
operation appropriations for the payment of moving expenses of employees,
including new hires.

19-4-514. Grants, assistance, and special aid.
The grants, assistance, and special aid classification is applicable to
all appropriations made by the General Assembly from state, federal, or other
moneys for educational assistance, welfare grants, rehabilitation services,
aid to counties and municipalities, and to all other special appropriations
that have for their purpose the appropriating of state, federal, or other
moneys for public benefits.

19-4-515. Construction and permanent improvements.
(a)(1) The construction and permanent improvements classification is
determined by the language of the appropriation acts that make available
funds for construction and new improvements. For the purpose of classifying
the expenditures under any such appropriation, all the necessary expenses in
connection with the appropriation are part of the construction costs. These
items of expense include without limitation the following:
(A) Advertising for bids;
(B) Architects, engineers, and other professional services
in connection with the proposed projects; and
(C) The payment of estimates on the various contracts in
connection with such construction programs.
(2) All construction and improvements are subject to §§ 19-4-
1401 — 19-4-1411 and to the rules promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State.
(3)(A)(i) A state agency for which appropriations have been made
by the General Assembly for construction or improvements shall not make any
contract or incur any indebtedness payable from the appropriations unless
there are sufficient funds on hand, for the benefit of any agency, to pay for
the proposed obligations under the contracts.
(ii) However, an agency may accept and use grants
and donations and use its unobligated cash income or other funds available to
it for the purpose of supplementing the appropriations for construction
purposes.
(B) The appropriations and funds otherwise provided by the
123 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
General Assembly for personal services, maintenance, and general operation of
an agency shall not be used in connection with any proposed construction
projects for which specific appropriations have been made by the General
Assembly, except for minor repairs and maintenance.
(b) The restrictions of this section do not apply to contracts
approved by the State Highway Commission for construction of roads and
bridges in the highway system.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may reclassify but not
consolidate an agency's appropriation for construction to effect the payment
of construction-related costs in the appropriate classification as described
in this subchapter using the state's financial management system to invoke
budget control.

19-4-516. Special appropriations.
(a)(1) All other appropriations made by the General Assembly that do
not come under any of the classifications referenced in this subchapter are
special appropriations and shall be used only for the specific purposes for
which the appropriations are made.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, an agency receiving a
special appropriation shall not expend funds from any appropriation other
than from the special appropriation for the special purpose covered by the
special appropriation.
(3) The state's financial management system may invoke
additional budget control using features of the financial management system
that are in addition to the appropriations of the General Assembly.
(b) To allow for full disclosure of investment transactions, to make
available special reports on investment transactions, and to isolate
investment expenditures from normal expenditures, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State may establish separate appropriation codes for investments and
transfer to those appropriations from the investment line item as established
in the agency appropriation acts.
(c)(1)(A) An agency may request a special appropriation for
promotional items by submitting a written request to the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State.
(B) A written request for a special appropriation under
subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section shall:
124 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(i) Specify the amount of the requested special
appropriation, the authorized appropriation section for the requested special
appropriation, and the funding source to be used for the requested special
appropriation; and
(ii) Provide a brief description of the type of
promotional items to be purchased and the purpose for which the promotional
items will be used.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this
section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may approve only up to five
thousand dollars ($5,000) in cumulative written requests per agency under
this subsection each fiscal year.
(B) A single written request for a special appropriation
under this subsection that exceeds the limit specified in subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section or a written request for a special appropriation
under this subsection that, if approved, would result in the cumulative
amount of approved written requests under this subsection exceeding the limit
stated in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall be submitted to the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, for review before the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
approve the written request.
(3) Upon approving a written request for a special appropriation
under this subsection, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall create a
new line item for promotional items for the agency making the request and
shall cause a transfer of the approved amount from the requesting agency's
operating expenses to the requesting agency's promotional items line item.

19-4-517. Authority of Treasurer of State to use certain funding for
operations.
(a) The Treasurer of State may utilize the funding for maintenance and
general operations provided for in the Constitutional Officers Fund and State
Central Services Fund to allow for reconciling items that may occur in the
operations of the office of the Treasurer of State.
(b) The Treasurer of State with the advice and approval of the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall develop policies and procedures
for proper accounting of reconciling items.

125 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Subchapter 6 — Annual Operations Plans of State Agencies

19-4-601. Responsibility generally.
Except as limited by appropriations and funding by the General Assembly
and other provisions of law, state agencies shall administer their programs
as authorized by the General Assembly and are responsible for the proper
management of their programs.

19-4-602. Compliance and approval required.
(a) A state agency shall not increase the salaries of its employees,
employ additional employees, expend money, or incur any obligations except in
accordance with law and with a properly approved annual operations plan that
includes a quarterly fiscal program.
(b) Appropriations subject to this subchapter are not available for
expenditures or encumbrance until the state agency has complied with this
subchapter.

19-4-603. Exemptions generally.
Appropriations for retirement benefits, refunds, and Social Security
requirements of the teacher and public employees retirement systems are
excluded from this subchapter.

19-4-604. State-supported institutions of higher education.
(a) At least thirty (30) days before the start of each fiscal year,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make studies for the purpose of
estimating the anticipated amounts of general revenues to be available for
distributions under the provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-
101 et seq., for the fiscal year. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
compute the estimated amounts of general revenues to be available for
allocation to the respective State Treasury accounts in accordance with their
percentage distributions of general revenues under the Revenue Stabilization
Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall certify to each of the
respective state-supported institutions of higher education, at least thirty
(30) days before the start of each fiscal year, the estimated amounts of
general revenues to be available for distribution to the State Treasury
126 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
account for their respective state-supported institutions of higher
education. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall include in each
certification the quarterly allocations of the amounts that are estimated to
be available for expenditures based upon these estimates.
(c) Upon receipt of the estimated amounts to be available for
expenditure and after reviewing the quarterly allocation of the amounts as
submitted by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a state-supported
institution of higher education may request revisions in the proposed
quarterly allocations as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(d) With the advice and consent of the Division of Higher Education,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall approve requested revisions in
the proposed quarterly allocations if he or she determines that:
(1) The proposed revisions in quarterly allocations do not
exceed the aggregate of the estimated funds to be available from estimates of
anticipated revenues and fund balances in the state-supported institution of
higher education's account in the State Treasury for the fiscal year; and
(2) The revised quarterly allocations will not impose an undue
hardship upon other allotments of revenues and other financial commitments to
be met from the distributions of general revenues during the fiscal year.
(e) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall periodically review
the estimates of projected general revenue collections anticipated to be
available during a fiscal year. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
make revisions in the amounts certified to the respective state-supported
institutions of higher education based upon these estimates and may revise
the quarterly amounts certified to each state-supported institution of higher
education based upon the revised estimates.
(f) From time to time, a state-supported institution of higher
education may request revisions in the quarterly allocations of moneys when
needs of the state-supported institution of higher education require those
revisions.
(g) Any unexpended balances remaining at the end of each fiscal year
shall be transferred forward and made available for the support of the state-
supported institution of higher education for the following fiscal year.
(h) The budget execution provisions set forth in this section are
applicable to all state-supported institutions of higher education, and
except for the annual fiscal program requirements, §§ 19-4-601, 19-4-602, and
127 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-605 — 19-4-607 do not apply to these state-supported institutions of
higher education. These state-supported institutions of higher education are
governed by this section and by procedures established under authority of §
6-61-209.
(i) The division shall coordinate with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State for administering this section.

19-4-605. Review and approval of annual operations plans.
(a) Each state agency other than the elected constitutional officers,
the legislative branch and its staff offices, the judicial branch and its
staff offices, the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the Office of the
Arkansas Lottery, the state-supported institutions of higher education, and
the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission shall prepare an annual
operations plan for the operation of each of its assigned programs for
submission to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(b) The annual operations plan shall be prepared in the form and
content determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and shall be
transmitted to the Department of Finance and Administration on the date
prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(c) In years when the General Assembly meets in regular session, the
annual operations plan shall be prepared after adjournment of the regular
session and shall take fully into consideration all applicable laws,
including appropriations, and shall be submitted to the Department of Finance
and Administration on a date set by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State but
before July 1 of that year.
(d) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall:
(1) Review each annual operations plan to determine that:
(A) It is consistent with the policy decisions of the
General Assembly and the Governor;
(B) Appropriations and funding have been provided by the
General Assembly;
(C) It reflects proper planning and efficient management
methods; and
(D) Appropriations and funding have been made for the
planned purpose and will not be exhausted before the end of the fiscal year;
and
128 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2)(A)(i) Approve the annual operations plan if he or she is
satisfied that it meets all requirements.
(ii) Otherwise, he or she shall require necessary
revisions of the annual operations plan in whole or in part.
(B) This section does not allow the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State to substitute his or her individual judgment as to the operation
or necessity of any program of any state agency for the judgment of the
executive head or board or commission charged with the responsibility for the
operation and control of that agency.
(e) Each annual operations plan shall indicate:
(1) The appropriation and funding provided by the General
Assembly;
(2) A detailed budget by quarters; and
(3) Any other supporting or related information required by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or requested by an interim committee of the
General Assembly, including the Legislative Council.

19-4-606. Fiscal controls.
To provide proper fiscal controls, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall assure the implementation of the procedures set out in this
section:
(1)(A) The annual operations plan of each state agency shall
contain a quarterly fiscal program indicating the proposed expenditures and
anticipated resources for each quarter of the ensuing fiscal year.
(B) Anticipated resources shall be based upon forecasted
resources estimated to be available by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(C) If a revision of forecasted resources is made during a
fiscal year, those agencies affected by the revised forecast shall submit a
new quarterly fiscal program based upon the revised forecast;
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall review and
approve the quarterly fiscal program if he or she finds that the forecasted
resources will be adequate for financing the proposed program during the
fiscal year and for each quarter or other appropriate period within the
fiscal year;
(3) If an agency incurs expenses at a level that would exceed
the proposed expenditures in its quarterly fiscal program, the Chief Fiscal
129 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Officer of the State may require the submission of a revised quarterly fiscal
program that reduces expenditures for the remainder of the fiscal year to a
total that is within the level of the estimated resources available to the
agency. Remaining appropriations are not available to the agency until the
revised program has been submitted and approved; and
(4) In case the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines
that the estimated revenues or other sources of income for an agency will be
less than was anticipated and that consequently the funds available for the
remainder of the fiscal year will be less than the amount estimated, he or
she shall reduce the amount of available appropriation to the level of
expected revenue after notice to the agency.

19-4-607. Productivity reporting.
(a) Each state agency, other than the elected constitutional officers,
shall institute and maintain a program to increase the productivity and cost
effectiveness of the employees for which the state agency is responsible.
(b)(1) On or before the twentieth day of each month, each executive,
judicial, legislative, and other state agency shall provide to the Bureau of
Legislative Research the following information as of the last day of the
immediately preceding month:
(A) The number of appropriated positions, including
without limitation all positions appropriated in a state agency's current
appropriation act and any additional positions approved during the interim;
(B) The number of temporary transition pool positions
created in the interim and active for the month;
(C)(i) The number of full-time employees, including part-
time employees in full-time positions.
(ii) If two (2) or more part-time employees share a
full-time position, only one (1) employee shall be included in the number;
(D) The number of vacant positions that are budgeted;
(E) The number of vacant positions that are unbudgeted;
(F) The number of appropriated extra-help positions,
including without limitation all extra-help positions appropriated in a state
agency's current appropriation act and any extra-help positions approved
during the interim;
(G) The number of extra-help employees;
130 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(H) The number of vacant extra-help positions;
(I) The total amount of overtime paid out during the
month;
(J) The total amount of straight time paid out during the
month;
(K) The total number of compensatory time hours taken
during the month; and
(L) Any other information requested by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(2) On or before the twentieth day of each month, each
institution of higher education shall provide to the Bureau of Legislative
Research the following information as of the last day of the immediately
preceding month:
(A) The number of appropriated full-time positions,
including without limitation all full-time positions appropriated in an
institution of higher education's current appropriation act and any
additional full-time positions approved during the interim, including without
limitation provisional, pool, and nine-month positions;
(B)(i) The number of full-time employees regardless of
funding source, including without limitation those in provisional, pool, and
nine-month positions.
(ii) Nine-month staff and faculty who are removed
from the payroll but are still considered to be employed by the institution
of higher education and are assumed to return the next semester shall be
included in the number during the months that they are not on the payroll;
(C) The number of appropriated full-time positions that
are vacant;
(D) The number of part-time and extra-help positions that
are appropriated and any additional part-time and extra-help positions
approved during the interim;
(E)(i) The number of part-time and extra-help employees,
including without limitation faculty and graduate assistants.
(ii) Contract workers and students in work-study
positions shall not be included in the number;
(F) The total amount of overtime paid out during the
131 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
month;
(G) The total amount of straight time paid out during the
month;
(H) The total number of compensatory time hours taken
during the month; and
(I) Any other information requested by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(3) The information required under this section shall be
compiled by each state agency and institution of higher education on forms
developed by the Bureau of Legislative Research and submitted to the
Legislative Council on a calendar-quarterly basis as two (2) separate
reports:
(A) One (1) report containing an average for each state
agency for the quarter; and
(B) One (1) report containing an average for each
institution of higher education for the quarter.
(4) Each executive, judicial, legislative, and other state
agency and each institution of higher education shall provide in the fourth
quarter of each fiscal year a list of all positions vacant for at least one
(1) year.

Subchapter 7 — Expenditures Generally

19-4-701. Fiscal periods of state.
(a) For the purpose of this chapter, relating to the appropriation and
disbursement of funds:
(1) The fiscal year of the state commences on July 1 and ends on
June 30 of the following year; and
(2) The biennial period, or “biennium”, commences on July 1
following the adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly and
ends on June 30 two (2) years thereafter.
(b)(1) The definition of the fiscal year, for the purposes of this
chapter, does not affect special appropriations when no fiscal period is
defined in the act making the special appropriation or affect the bond year
for other fiscal transactions.
132 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2)(A) In the case of a special appropriation in which the
emergency clause has been adopted by the General Assembly and when no period
of time is mentioned in the act making the appropriation, the appropriation
is available for a two-year period from and after the effective date of the
act.
(B) In the case of a special appropriation in which the
emergency clause has not been adopted and when no period of time is mentioned
in the act making the appropriation, the appropriation becomes available
ninety (90) days after the adjournment of the General Assembly. The
appropriation is available for a two-year period from and after the date the
appropriation became available.

19-4-702. Time limits for presenting vouchers.
(a)(1)(A) A state agency may pay carryover obligations of the state
that were incurred on or before June 30 of the current fiscal year up to
forty-five (45) days after the end of the current fiscal year.
(B) The carryover obligations shall be supported by
purchase documents with corresponding receipts for the goods or services that
have been recorded as received in the state's financial management system by
June 30 of the fiscal year previous to the fiscal year in which the carryover
obligations are requested to be paid.
(2) The payments of the carryover obligations shall be charged
against appropriations and fund cash balances of the fiscal year in which the
obligations were incurred.
(3) Any payments for carryover obligations that are not
supported by the documents as required in this subsection, or which are
requested to be paid after forty-five (45) days following June 30 of the
fiscal year previous to the fiscal year in which the carryover obligations
are requested to be paid, shall be charged to the appropriations and fund
cash balances of the then-current fiscal year.
(b) If the vouchers are approved for payment, the Auditor of State
shall issue his or her warrants in payment of them not later than two (2)
weeks following the receipt of the vouchers from the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(c)(1) In the event of a just claim against a state agency, when the
claim is submitted too late for payment in the manner prescribed in this
133 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
section and the state agency affected has an appropriation for the same
purpose for the fiscal period following that period in which the claim was
incurred, then the disbursing agent may draw his or her voucher in the
payment of the claim against the new appropriation, but only if there were
sufficient funds and appropriations for the prior year to cover the claim.
(2) Otherwise, the claim shall be submitted to the Arkansas
State Claims Commission for payment.
(d)(1)(A) If a biweekly pay period for personal services, as defined
in §§ 19-4-512 and 19-4-1607, commences in the closing period of one (1)
fiscal period and either ends in the following fiscal year or is paid in the
following fiscal year, then the payment of the obligation may be made in
whole from the appropriation for either fiscal period, as determined by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(B) However, an obligation shall not be incurred unless
there are funds on hand or estimated to become available to meet the
obligation when it becomes due.
(2)(A) For purposes of wages and compensation, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may determine the starting date of authorized job
classifications and positions to coincide with the payment of the obligation
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(B) However, the determination under subdivision (d)(2)(A)
of this section shall not cause any state fiscal year to be charged with
fewer than twenty-six (26) or more than twenty-seven (27) biweekly pay
periods.
(e)(1) All state agencies may carry over from the first fiscal year of
any biennium to the second fiscal year of the biennium any unexpended
appropriations and funds to the extent necessary to pay for items or
commodities ordered at least ninety (90) days before the end of the first
fiscal year but not received until after the end of the first fiscal year, if
the purchase of such items and commodities is substantiated by a written
contract resulting from the receipt of a formal bid.
(2)(A) All state agencies may carry over from the first fiscal
year of any biennium to the second fiscal year of the biennium any unexpended
maintenance and operation appropriations and funds, as defined under § 19-4-
513, to the extent necessary to pay for renovation and minor and major
repairs under the jurisdiction of the Building Authority Division that were
134 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under contract at least ninety (90) days before the end of the first fiscal
year but that will not be completed until after the end of the first fiscal
year and are substantiated by written contracts.
(B) This carryover provision applies only to
appropriations and funds involving maintenance and operations.
(3) This subsection is supplemental to any other authority
granted any state agency by law to carry forward unexpended fund balances
from one (1) fiscal year to another.

19-4-703. Redemption of warrants.
A warrant issued by the Auditor of State is not payable by the
Treasurer of State unless the warrant has been presented for payment within
the twelve (12) months immediately following the close of the fiscal year or
other appropriate fiscal period against the appropriation for which the
warrant was charged.

19-4-704. No obligations without appropriations.
(a) An obligations shall not be paid from appropriated funds until the
General Assembly has made an appropriation for that purpose.
(b) A state agency shall not enter into any contract that would
contemplate that payments under the contracts would be made beyond the
expiration of the biennial period unless the General Assembly, before the
expiration of the biennial period, makes an appropriation for that purpose,
or in the case of multiyear contracts for commodities or services, a
determination in writing has been made before use that:
(1) Estimated requirements cover the period of the contract and
are reasonably firm and continuing; and
(2) Such a contract would serve the best interests of the state
by encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economies in
state procurement.
(c) An obligations shall not be incurred unless there are sufficient
funds or an approved federal grant on hand, or estimated to become available,
to meet the obligation when it becomes due.

19-4-705. Obligations limited to funds available.
(a) A state agency for which regular operating appropriations are made
135 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
on a fiscal-year basis shall not incur an obligation under the appropriations
unless there are funds on hand or an approved federal grant, or estimated to
become available, during the fiscal year for the payment of the obligation.
(b) An agency shall not create any obligation in one (1) fiscal year
that will make it necessary to use the revenues of the following fiscal year
in order to meet the obligation except in the case of multiyear contracts for
commodities or services and as provided in § 19-4-707.
(c)(1) If an agency had bank funds that are not required by law to be
deposited into the State Treasury, the agency may create additional
obligations to the extent of the bank funds on hand, or that are estimated to
become available during the fiscal period.
(2) However, except in the case of multiyear contracts for
commodities or services and as provided in § 19-4-707, the agency shall not
create any obligations, in the aggregate, that would make the total of the
obligations exceed the total of all funds available to the agency during the
fiscal period.

19-4-706. Interest and carrying charges.
State agencies, including exempt agencies, may enter into contracts
that contemplate the payment of interest, late charges, but only when the
late charges are incurred sixty (60) days after payment is due, or carrying
charges under rules that the State Procurement Director promulgates.

19-4-707. Obligations for improvements.
Although disbursements shall not be made during any fiscal period in
excess of the appropriations made available by the General Assembly for the
fiscal period, contracts for improvements including major repairs,
alterations, and construction of new buildings and facilities may be let to
the extent of the appropriations made available for those purposes for the
biennial period. However, those contracts shall not be let in amounts
exceeding the probable funds available or that are estimated to become
available during the period.

19-4-708. Depletion of agency funds.
If a state agency incurs obligations in such manner that the funds
allocated or belonging to the agency are depleted and the agency is unable to
136 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
pay all of its outstanding commitments without incurring a deficit, then the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may suspend all exemptions under the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., with respect to the agency.
Under these circumstances, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may notify
the agency that all future obligations of any kind shall be approved by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State before they become valid obligations
against the funds of the agency.

19-4-709. Statement of financial condition.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may require, from time to
time as he or she deems necessary, a statement from a state agency setting
out the prospective funds that are estimated to become available and a
statement of the outstanding obligations and of the proposed expenditures of
that agency for the remainder of the fiscal period.
(b) If, in the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State's judgment, an agency
has incurred or is about to incur a deficit, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall call upon the agency to stop incurring obligations, under penalty
of the agency's disbursing bond.

19-4-710. Interagency transfers — Definition.
(a) To prevent the duplication of recording expenditures and revenues
resulting from interagency transactions, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, after securing the approval of the proposed procedures by the
Legislative Auditor, may provide for an interagency transfer of moneys or
recognize a journal entry to charge the expenditure to the disbursing agency
without creating a warrant and to identify the cash receipt by the receiving
agency.
(b) Budget manuals prepared for the General Assembly for the biennial
state budget shall identify the original revenue source of interagency
transfers of funds.
(c) As used in this section, “interagency transfer” means:
(1) The purchase of services or commodities by one (1) state
agency from another state agency, or within a state agency; or
(2) Other transfers of funds under § 19-20-106 or other
provision of law.

137 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-711. Transfer of responsibilities.
If a state agency or its responsibilities, or a part of its
responsibilities, is transferred by law within a biennium to another agency,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer all or part of the line-
item appropriations, personnel positions, and moneys necessary to accomplish
the transfer of responsibilities, subject to the same restrictions and
procedures applicable to the original appropriations and funds from which
transferred.

Subchapter 8 — Expenditure of Cash Funds

19-4-801. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Cash funds” means all moneys, negotiable instruments,
certificates of indebtedness, stocks, and bonds held by or owned by any state
agency that are not on deposit with or in the trust of the Treasurer of
State; and
(2)(A) “State agency” means all boards, commissions,
departments, agencies, institutions, offices or officers, state-supported
institutions of higher education, and any other office or unit of government
of the State of Arkansas created or established pursuant to law or pursuant
to any action of the Governor, functioning under appropriation made by the
General Assembly or functioning as a representative of the state without
appropriation of the General Assembly.
(B) “State agency” does not include the:
(i) Governor;
(ii) Secretary of State;
(iii) Attorney General;
(iv) Treasurer of State;
(v) Auditor of State;
(vi) Commissioner of State Lands;
(vii) Supreme Court and its justices;
(viii) Circuit courts and circuit judges;
(ix) Prosecuting attorneys;
(x) Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(xi) Arkansas Department of Transportation;
138 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(xii)(a) Office of the Arkansas Lottery.
(b) However, the office shall be considered a
state agency for the purposes of § 19-4-806 et seq.;
(xiii) General Assembly; and
(xiv) Respective staffs of the officers and agencies
listed in this subdivision (2)(B).

19-4-802. Authorization of General Assembly.
(a) Cash funds of state agencies shall be budgeted and proposed
expenditures approved by enactments of the General Assembly.
(b) The General Assembly shall budget, approve, and appropriate
expenditures of cash funds by the enactment of separate appropriation bills
setting forth the purpose for which the moneys are to be expended and the
dollar amount to be expended for that purpose.
(c) State agencies shall submit any budgetary information requested by
the Legislative Council and shall undertake whatever budgetary procedures the
Legislative Council may establish for the appropriation of cash funds.
(d) State agencies shall post all financial transactions of cash funds
in the state's financial management system in accordance with procedures
established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-4-803. [Reserved.]

19-4-804. Investment of fund balances.
(a) The state-supported institutions of higher education may determine
the depositories and the nature of investments of any of their cash funds
that are not currently needed for operating purposes. In making these
determinations, these state-supported institutions of higher education shall
seek to obtain the highest possible rate of return for their investments.
(b) All cash fund agencies other than the state-supported institutions
of higher education shall request and abide by the recommendations of the
State Board of Finance as to the best investment decisions for any idle cash
balances.

19-4-805. Petty cash accounts.
(a)(1) State agencies operating under this subchapter may establish
139 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
petty cash accounts, subject to approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.
(2) Only minor expenditures or emergency purchases shall be made
from petty cash accounts authorized by this subsection.
(b) State-supported institutions of higher education and other
agencies that can demonstrate the need for large petty cash accounts during
brief periods of time, such as student registration periods, are authorized
short-term petty cash accounts.

19-4-806. Voucher examination and approval — Responsibilities of state
agency executive administrators.
Each executive head of a state agency handling cash funds shall
establish:
(1) Adequate internal administrative procedures and controls to
ensure prompt and accurate payment of obligations to be liquidated from those
funds to promote good public relations and to take advantage of all available
discounts; and
(2) A system of pre-audit within his or her agency to ensure
that checks and vouchers, before being released by the state agency, are
prepared in accordance with all applicable purchasing and fiscal laws on the
subject by performing the following functions. He or she shall determine
that:
(A) Services, materials, supplies, and equipment received
comply with specifications indicated on purchase documents;
(B) Quantities received, as being indicated on the
invoice, agree with those shown on the receiving report;
(C) Unit prices agree with those indicated on the purchase
documents;
(D) The extensions and footings of the invoice are
correct;
(E) The voucher or check is prepared in sufficient time to
take advantage of all available discounts being offered;
(F) Sufficient legislative authorization for expenditures
and funds is available for payment of the obligation; and
(G) The obligation was incurred in conformity with all
purchasing and fiscal laws applicable to state agencies operating out of the
140 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State Treasury.

19-4-807. Erroneous or improper payments.
(a) The executive head of a state agency, the bonded disbursing
officer, or his or her designated bonded assistant is responsible for
recovery of erroneous or improper payments.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is not liable under his or
her surety bond for any erroneous or improper payments so made.

19-4-808. Supporting documentation.
Requirements for supporting documentation for disbursements are
determined as follows:
(1) In connection with purchasing procedures, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall prescribe and define the necessary documents and
other evidence that shall be retained by the agency for the purpose of
determining whether the proper purchasing procedures have been complied with;
(2) In all instances in which the evidences of indebtedness are
represented by vendor's invoices, the agency shall retain in the permanent
file of the business office of the agency the original invoice and
corresponding documentation of actual payment in accordance with procedures
established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;
(3) In connection with printing contracts, provided by the
Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state, the supporting documentation
shall be those prescribed by the Auditor of State or by the Department of
Finance and Administration, as appropriate;
(4)(A) In connection with the laws or rules governing travel,
when individuals are reimbursed for expenses incurred for travel in
connection with their official duties, the supporting papers shall be the
forms or statements of the expenses prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State.
(B) In the case of per diem or other expenses established
by law, the disbursing officer shall attach to the voucher issued in payment
of the allowances a citation of his or her authority for making the payments;
(5) Any indebtedness or expense incurred in connection with an
approved resolution of any state board or commission shall be made a part of
the permanent minutes of the state board or commission, and copies of the
141 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
resolution or minutes authorizing any indebtedness or expense shall be
attached to the voucher issued in payment of the indebtedness or expense; and
(6) In instances in which the General Assembly has authorized
grants to public schools, public welfare recipients, counties,
municipalities, and for other purposes specifically provided by law, for
payments made to individuals under retirement systems, and for income tax
refunds, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prescribe the forms of
the vouchers to be used and the procedure to be followed in making the
payments.

19-4-809. Original of supporting documentation to be retained by the
agency.
(a) The original evidences of indebtedness, including documents
prepared in connection with purchasing procedure, and all other original
contracts, invoices, statements, receipts, petty cash tickets, bank
statements, cancelled checks drawn upon bank accounts, and other original
supporting papers shall be retained in the permanent file of the business
office of each state agency, or attached to the office copy of the agency's
voucher, and the documents shall be kept in a safe place subject to audit and
shall not be destroyed until authorization is given for their destruction by
the Legislative Auditor.
(b) With the approval of the Legislative Auditor, a state agency may
retain evidences to satisfy record retention policies of indebtedness and
other contracts, invoices, statements, receipts, petty cash tickets, bank
statements, cancelled checks drawn upon bank accounts, and other supporting
papers by microform or a form of stored images in a computer system or other
form of computer technology in lieu of retaining the originals of the
documents.

19-4-810. Contracts for procurement of commodities and services.
A state agency that is authorized by law or under the purchasing
procedures of this state to enter into contract for the procurement of
property, commodities, or services shall keep on file in its respective place
of business a copy of the contract for public inspection or audit and shall
make a copy of the contract available to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State when so required by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
142 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-4-811. Constitutional officers and agencies.
(a) Beginning with fiscal year 2021, cash funds of the following
constitutional officers and departments shall be budgeted and proposed
expenditures approved by enactments of the General Assembly:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The Secretary of State;
(3) The Attorney General;
(4) The Treasurer of State;
(5) The Auditor of State;
(6) The Commissioner of State Lands;
(7) The Supreme Court and its justices;
(8) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(9) The Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(10) The General Assembly; and
(11) The respective staffs of the officers listed in this
subsection.
(b) Except cash funds whose distribution is controlled by a court
order or settlement agreement, the General Assembly shall budget, approve,
and appropriate expenditures of cash funds by the enactment of separate
appropriation bills setting forth the purpose for which the moneys are to be
expended and the dollar amount to be expended for that purpose.
(c) The constitutional officers and agencies listed in subsection (a)
of this section shall submit any budgetary information requested by the
Legislative Council and shall undertake whatever budgetary procedures the
Legislative Council may establish for the appropriation of cash funds.
(d) The constitutional officers and agencies listed in subsection (a)
of this section shall not be charged a service charge under § 19-21-106 when
complying with this section.
(e) This section does not provide the General Assembly with the
authority to approve expenditures of the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission or the Arkansas Department of Transportation, which shall be
subject only to review and appropriation by the General Assembly.

Subchapter 9 — Travel Rules

143 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-901. Rules generally.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall promulgate rules with
respect to travel and travel allowances and prescribe the forms and
procedures for reporting, approving, and paying such travel allowances for
all officers and employees of the state government or for other persons who
are authorized to carry out official duties in connection with the business
of the state.

19-4-902. Authorization for travel.
(a)(1) The board, commission, or administrative head in charge of each
state agency is responsible for authorizing travel, or any expenses in
connection with travel.
(2) Travel expenses shall not be authorized or allowed without
the approval of the board, commission, or administrative head of an agency.
(b) The administrative head of an agency shall keep on file in the
place of business of the agency, subject to audit, copies of all supporting
documents and required receipts for expenses incurred in connection with the
travel authorizations and allowances for persons traveling in behalf of the
agency.

19-4-903. Standard reimbursements and special authorizations —
Definitions.
(a)(1) Except for special authorization by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, reimbursement for meals and lodging while traveling on official
business of the state shall not exceed the maximum rates as prescribed by the
Federal Travel Directory published by the United States General Services
Administration.
(2)(A) Requests for special authorization shall be limited to
those rare occasions in which unusual circumstances may cause the existing
rates to be inadequate and shall be set out in writing in such detail as
shall be required in the state travel procedures and shall be executed in
behalf of each individual traveler for each special authorized occasion.
(B) Requests for special authorization by employees of an
institution of higher education are subject to the approval of the chief
executive officer of the institution of higher education and not the
Department of Finance and Administration.
144 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) Under such emergency conditions as shall be determined by
the Governor, the limitations of this subsection with respect to meals and
lodging may be waived or modified.
(b)(1) As used in this subsection, “state-owned motor vehicle” means a
motor vehicle purchased or leased by:
(A) The State of Arkansas;
(B) The office of a constitutional officer of the State of
Arkansas;
(C) A constitutionally independent agency or commission;
and
(D) A state-supported institution of higher education.
(2)(A) Unless otherwise provided by law, reimbursement for the
use of privately owned motor vehicles while traveling on official business
for the state shall not exceed the allowable rate of the Internal Revenue
Service per mile for business use of privately owned motor vehicles.
(B) A state agency director may authorize reimbursement
for travel expenses for meals, lodging, and private automobile or airplane
usage at amounts less than that established under the authority of this
section.
(C) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by rule may
establish procedures and the rate for reimbursing individuals for the use of
privately owned airplanes while traveling on official business for the state.
(3)(A)(i) An employee of the State of Arkansas who utilizes, but
whose job does not require the state employee to utilize, a state-owned motor
vehicle for transportation to or from his or her permanent residence from or
to his or her official station on a daily basis shall reimburse the fund from
which the operating expenses of the state-owned motor vehicle are paid at the
same rate authorized by the state agency director of the agency employing the
state employee for reimbursements for private automobile usage under
subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section.
(ii) As used in subdivision (b)(3)(A)(i) of this
section, “state employee”:
(a) Means an employee of a state agency,
board, commission, department, or state-supported institution of higher
education; and
(b) Includes a constitutional officer and an
145 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
employee of a constitutional officer.
(B) All state-owned motor vehicles or state-leased motor
vehicles shall be for official business use only.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter.

19-4-904. Exempt persons and agencies.
(a)(1) The limitations of this subchapter relating to travel rules do
not apply to:
(A) Except as provided in § 19-4-903(b), the
constitutional or elective officials and their employees; or
(B) Official guests of the state.
(2) This subchapter shall not be used to supersede or set aside
the provisions of law providing for fixed allowances, established amounts for
per diem, or to special travel privileges provided by law for specific
purposes when the allowances exceed those authorized in this subchapter.
(b)(1)(A) Personal reimbursement shall not be allowed to a state
official, state employee, or any other person traveling on official business
for expenses covering personal entertainment, flowers, valet service, laundry
and cleaning, or other personal expenses, as those expenses are defined in
the state travel rules.
(B) A state official, state employee, or any other person
traveling on official business shall submit his or her travel reimbursement
requests upon forms prescribed by the Department of Finance and
Administration, itemized in such detail as is necessary to carry out the
purposes and intent of this section.
(2) The tip reimbursement amount shall not exceed fifteen
percent (15%) of the meal amount expended.
(3) The total reimbursement for meals and tips shall not exceed
the maximum rates prescribed by the Financial Management Guide published by
the Office of Accounting of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) The cost of meals, lodging, and mileage of state employees who are
designated by a supervisor or agency director to attend official or special
board meetings or other functions recognized as being in the performance of
their official duties may be paid either as reimbursement to the state
employee or on direct billing, in the case of meals and lodging, subject to
146 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
approval of the supervisor or agency director.
(d) It is recognized that within the state-supported institutions of
higher education there exists an obligatory inherent cost of providing travel
expenses for a group or number of students who, when accompanied by those who
instruct the students in the fundamentals of a competitive sport and direct
team strategy, must travel and be recognized as a cohesive unit representing
not only their state-supported institution of higher education, but
exemplifying the State of Arkansas in their behavior, attitudes, interests,
presentation, and conduct. In these circumstances the payment of group travel
expenses, including those of students and employees, may be authorized as
follows:
(1) Meals and lodging;
(2) Transportation;
(3) Entertainment, within reasonable limits, to ease the
pressure on students of their objectives;
(4) Costs of group activities, including gratuities, laundry,
cleaning, and favors; and
(5) Other personal expenses to be paid only from auxiliary funds
not inconsistent with standards, rules, or prohibitions established by
recognized national or state governing associations pertaining to the
respective students and employees and the state-supported institutions of
higher education they are representing.

19-4-905. State-owned motor vehicles generally.
(a) All state-owned motor vehicles that are purchased under the
authority of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall be licensed in such
manner so as to identify each state-owned motor vehicle as state property.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall provide a special
state property license plate suitable for all state-owned motor vehicles and
shall establish procedures for the purpose of supplying information on all
state-owned motor vehicles, both those that are purchased and those that are
sold, traded in, or otherwise disposed of.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make rules for
obtaining the required special state property license plates and for
returning the special state property license plates when the state-owned
motor vehicles are disposed of and shall notify all state agencies of
147 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
procedures to be followed.
(d) Each agency shall pay the regular license fee for the special
state property license plate in the manner prescribed by the Department of
Finance and Administration.
(e) If the best interests of the state would be served by not
displaying a special state property license plate, such as in police work, an
exception to this section may be obtained only upon the written approval of
the Governor.

19-4-906. Motor vehicle restrictions and authorizations — Definition.
(a)(1) Funds appropriated for the various state agencies, authorities,
boards, commissions, departments, and institutions of higher education listed
in this section shall not be used to purchase, lease for over thirty (30)
days, operate, repair, or provide services for more than the maximum number
of passenger motor vehicles as stated in this section, except in an emergency
as proclaimed by the Governor.
(2)(A) As used in this section, “passenger motor vehicles” means
vehicles licensed for highway use, including without limitation automobiles,
trucks, and vans, that do not require a commercial driver's license to
operate.
(B) As used in this section, “passenger motor vehicles”
does not include vehicles that are primarily used for purposes of providing
health screenings or providing health treatment.
(3) Mileage reimbursement for employees' utilization of their
personal automobiles is not included in this restriction.
Item Agency, Authority, Board, Maximum Authorized
No. Commission, or Institution of Number of
Higher Education Passenger
Motor Vehicles
in any Year

(001) Arkansas Abstracters' Board [abolished] 0
(002) Administrative Office of the Courts 3
(003) Adv. Council for Vo-Tech Education [abolished] 2
(004) Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners 0
(005) Arkansas Board of Hearing Instrument Dispensers 0
148 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(006) Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine 0
(007) Building Authority Division 22
(008) Arkansas Bureau of Standards 34
(009) Arkansas Cemetery Board [abolished] 0
(010) Arkansas Code Revision Commission 0
(011) Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards of Training 15
(012) Arkansas Crime Information Center 11
(013) Division of Aeronautics 1
(014) Division of Emergency Management 15
(015) Division of Environmental Quality 57
(016) Arkansas Development Finance Authority 3
(017) Arkansas Economic Development Council 31
(018) Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board 0
(019) Arkansas Forestry Commission 396
(020) Office of the State Geologist 18
(021) Arkansas State Archives 3
(022) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission 81
(023) Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission 3
(024) Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission 5
(025) Arkansas Natural Resources Commission 8
(026) Arkansas Northeastern College 26
(027) Arkansas Psychology Board 0
(028) Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System 5
(029) Arkansas Public Service Commission 27
(030) Arkansas Real Estate Commission 3
(031) Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts 14
(032) Arkansas School for the Blind 8
(033) Arkansas School for the Deaf 14
(034) Arkansas Science and Technology Authority [abolished] 1
(035) Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board 0
(036) Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board 0
(037) Arkansas Spinal Cord Commission 3
(038) Arkansas State Board of Architects, Landscape Architects, and Interior
Designers 0
(039) Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners 1
(040) Arkansas State Board of Landscape Architects [abolished] 0
149 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(041) Arkansas State Board of Massage Therapy [abolished] 0
(042) Arkansas State Board of Nursing 1
(043) Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy 1
(044) Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy 0
(045) Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters [abolished] 0
(046) Arkansas State Board of Registration for Professional Soil Classifiers
[abolished] 0
(047) Arkansas State Board of Sanitarians 0
(048) Arkansas State Department of Health Building Commission [abolished]
0
(049) Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission 500
(050) Arkansas Department of Transportation 43
(051) Arkansas Department of Transportation 2,300
(052) Arkansas Department of Transportation — (NOAA) 0
(053) Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System 0
(054) Arkansas State Library 29
(055) Arkansas State Medical Board 0
(056) Division of Arkansas State Police 725
(057) Arkansas State University 131
(058) Arkansas State University — Beebe 32
(059) Arkansas State University — Mountain Home 15
(060) Arkansas State University — Newport 26
(061) Arkansas State University system 9
(062) Arkansas Student Loan Authority [abolished] 2
(063) Arkansas Teacher Retirement System 4
(064) Arkansas Tech University 70
(065) Arkansas Waterways Commission 1
(066) Black River Technical College 14
(067) Board of Corrections 6
(068) Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology 0
(069) Burial Association Board [abolished] 2
(070) Commission on Water Well Construction [abolished] 2
(071) Contractors Licensing Board 1
(072) Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas 20
(073) Division of Arkansas Heritage 11
(074) Department of Corrections 254
150 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(075) Department of Education 10
(076) Department of Finance and Administration — Alcoholic Beverage Control
Division 22
(077) Department of Finance and Administration — Alcoholic Beverage Control
Division — Administration Division 1
(078) Department of Finance and Administration — Management Services Division
44
(079) Department of Finance and Administration — Racing Division 1
(080) Department of Finance and Administration — Revenue Division 168
(081) Department of Health 111
(082) Division of Higher Education 2
(083) Department of Human Services 444
(084) Division of Information Systems 7
(085) Department of Labor 9
(086) Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism 187
(087) Division of Workforce Services 27
(088) Dept. of Education — National Migrant Student Record Transfer System
[abolished] 1
(089) Dept. of Education — Vo-Tech Division 22
(090) Dept. of Education — Vo-Tech Schools 280
(091) Dept. of Veterans Affairs and the veterans’ homes 11
(092) Disabled Veterans Service Office 0
(093) East Arkansas Community College 28
(094) Arkansas Educational Television Commission 14
(095) Health Services Permit Agency 1
(096) Henderson State University 45
(097) Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board 4
(098) Arkansas State University Mid-South 20
(099) National Park College 20
(100) North Arkansas College 30
(101) Northwest Arkansas Community College 22
(102) Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator 0
(103) Oil and Gas Commission 17
(104) Arkansas State University Three Rivers 15
(105) Ozarka College 12
(106) Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas 27
151 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(107) University of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College 25
(108) Arkansas Revenue Department Building Commission 0
(109) University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain 16
(110) SAU-Tech — Camden 15
(111) SAU-Tech — Arkansas Environmental Training Academy 6
(112) SAU-Tech — Arkansas Fire Training Academy 22
(113) South Arkansas College 20
(114) Southeast Arkansas College 15
(115) Southern Arkansas University — Magnolia 59
(116) State Athletic Commission 0
(117) State Bank Department 22
(118) State Board of Barber Examiners 0
(119) State Board of Collection Agencies 0
(120) Cosmetology Technical Advisory Committee 0
(121) State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors [abolished] 0
(122) State Board of Licensure for Professional Engineers and Professional
Surveyors 0
(123) State Crime Laboratory 15
(124) State Department for Social Security Administration Disability
Determination 3
(125) State Insurance Department 6
(126) Department of the Military 20
(127) State Plant Board 30
(128) State Securities Department 5
(129) University of Arkansas at Fayetteville 299
(130) University of Arkansas at Fort Smith 39
(131) University of Arkansas at Little Rock 75
(132) University of Arkansas at Monticello 64
(133) University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff 78
(134) University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville 10
(135) University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana 20
(136) University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton 16
(137) University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences 110
(138) University of Central Arkansas 100
(139) Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service 0
(140) Veterinary Medical Examining Board [abolished] 0
152 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(141) War Memorial Stadium Commission 3
(142) Workers' Compensation Commission 25
(143) Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas 326

(b)(1) The General Assembly recognizes that, in some cases, motor
vehicles are donated to educational institutions and agencies primarily for
use in automotive repair and maintenance courses and in instructional
programs for truck operators and that such motor vehicles are not normally
used for other purposes by the educational institutions and agencies and
should not be included in the maximum number of authorized passenger motor
vehicles prescribed for such educational institutions and agencies in this
section.
(2)(A) Therefore, motor vehicles donated to educational
institutions and agencies primarily for use in programs of instruction in
automotive maintenance and repair, in operator training, and in related
instructional programs shall not be included for the purpose of determining
the number of passenger motor vehicles authorized for those educational
institutions or agencies.
(B) This section does not apply to motor vehicles donated
under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.
(c)(1) The Department of Human Services is exempt from this section.
(2) The Department of Human Services may purchase vehicles
utilizing federal funds and the appropriate state matching funds required.

19-4-907. Motor vehicle records.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may direct all state agencies to
maintain records with respect to all state-owned motor vehicles and may
require that the agencies file reports on the state-owned motor vehicles
covering the operating costs of the state-owned motor vehicles.

Subchapter 10 — Credit Cards

19-4-1001. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, “credit cards” means only those credit
cards issued to state agencies, boards, or commissions for which the state
agencies, boards, or commissions assume responsibility for payment.
153 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-4-1002. Daily allowances, etc., not affected.
This subchapter does not change:
(1) The maximum daily allowance for meals and lodging authorized
in this chapter for an individual traveling on official state business within
or beyond the borders of this state; or
(2) Any special authorizations, exemptions, or limitations set
forth in this chapter.

19-4-1003. Responsibility for use.
(a) The board, commission, or administrative head in charge of an
agency is responsible for:
(1) Ensuring that only authorized expenditures are paid for by
use of state credit cards for which the state agency assumes responsibility
for payment; and
(2) The collection of any unauthorized expenditures that may
occur.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is not liable for any
unauthorized expenditures through the use of state credit cards for which the
state agency assumes liability for payment.

19-4-1004. Rules — Records.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall:
(1) Promulgate rules with respect to obtaining and utilizing
credit cards in payment of products and services;
(2) Prescribe the procedures for reporting, approving, and
paying for products and services purchased with credit cards; and
(3) Prescribe the necessary records to be maintained and the
supporting documentation to be provided with each voucher presented for
payment of charges resulting from the use of credit cards.

19-4-1005. No use of other credit cards.
(a) If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines it to be
essential to enable an agency, board, or commission to effectively carry out
its responsibilities, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may authorize an
agency, board, or commission, or certain employees of the agency, board, or
154 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
commission, to use state credit cards for which the state agency, board, or
commission assumes liability for payment, under rules as may be prescribed by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(b) Only credit cards approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall be used.

19-4-1006. Revolving funds for expenses.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may promulgate appropriate
rules authorizing state agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of
higher education to establish revolving funds that shall be within such
limitations as the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may prescribe or to make
advances of expense funds for authorized travel by officials and employees of
state agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of higher education
whose travel is in conjunction with institutionally sponsored events or
programs. The advanced funds shall be reimbursed by the individual borrowing
the funds from moneys to the individual upon filing an authorized expense
account in connection with the travel.
(b) The rules under subsection (a) of this section may authorize the
state agency, board, commission, or institution of higher education to
require the employee to file an agreement authorizing the agency, board, or
commission to:
(1) Recover any amounts advanced for travel expense purposes
from the amounts claimed and allowed the employee or student as reimbursement
for actual expenses incurred;
(2) Recover any amounts advanced for travel expense purposes
from the next or future salary payments to the employee; or
(3) Add any amounts advanced for travel expense purposes to the
receivables account of the student.

Subchapter 11 — Approval of Expenditures

19-4-1101. Examination and approval required.
(a) The expenditure of all funds deposited into the State Treasury is
subject to examination and approval in the manner provided by this subchapter
before the proposed expenditure is approved for payment from the funds.
(b) State agency funds that are not required by law to be deposited
155 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
into the State Treasury are subject to the procedures as required by § 19-4-
801 et seq.
(c) In connection with an examination of the fiscal activities of an
agency, the Legislative Auditor may audit any of the funds of the agency.

19-4-1102. Responsibilities of executive heads of agencies.
The executive head of a state agency shall establish:
(1) Adequate internal administrative procedures and controls to
ensure:
(A) Prompt and accurate payment of obligations in order to
promote good public relations and to take advantage of all available
discounts; and
(B) That all financial transactions of the agency are
posted in the state's financial management system in accordance with
procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;
(2) A system of pre-audit within his or her agency to ensure
that checks and vouchers, before being released by the agency, are prepared
in accordance with all applicable purchasing and fiscal laws and rules by
performing the following functions. He or she shall determine that:
(A) Services, materials, supplies, and equipment received
comply with specifications indicated on purchase documents;
(B) Quantities received, as being indicated on the
invoice, agree with those shown on the receiving report;
(C) Unit prices agree with those indicated on the purchase
documents;
(D) The extensions and footings of the invoice are
correct;
(E) The voucher or check is prepared in sufficient time to
take advantage of all available discounts being offered;
(F) Sufficient appropriation and funds are available for
payment of the obligation; and
(G) The obligation was incurred in conformity with all
purchasing and fiscal laws.
(3) That every voucher for a proposed disbursement is approved
by the bonded disbursing officer of the agency issuing the voucher or by his
or her authorized agent;
156 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(4) That an appropriation has been made to cover the proposed
disbursement and that there is sufficient balance remaining in the
appropriation account and in the fund against which it is drawn to ensure
that the voucher can be converted into a valid warrant;
(5) That the proposed disbursement has been drawn on the proper
voucher form and the name and address of the disbursing agency and the name
and address of the vendor or payee is properly identified on the voucher
form;
(6) That the proposed voucher is prepared in accordance with the
established general accounting procedures relating to appropriation titles
and codes and the proposed transactions are identified and classified in
accordance with the administrative rules on the subject; and
(7) That the voucher for the proposed disbursement is
accompanied by proper supporting documentation, as evidence that the
indebtedness has been incurred and that the amount for which the voucher is
written corresponds with the evidence.

19-4-1103. Duty to examine and approve.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall design the state's
financial management system to provide reasonable assurances that financial
transactions conform to the provisions of law and rules.
(b)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is not required to pass
upon the propriety of any financial transaction if the financial transaction
is found to conform to this subchapter.
(2) However, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may perform
examinations of financial transactions to determine the propriety of the
financial transactions in conformity with applicable laws and rules.

19-4-1104. Examination and approval generally.
(a) Before a voucher for the disbursement of funds in the State
Treasury is presented to the Auditor of State for the issuance of his or her
warrant in the payment of the voucher, the voucher shall be recorded in the
state's financial management system in accordance with procedures established
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(b) The Auditor of State may perform an examination, under the
procedures established in this subchapter, as he or she deems advisable
157 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
before issuing his or her warrant in the payment of a voucher for the
disbursement of funds in the State Treasury.

19-4-1105. Erroneous or improper payments.
(a) The state agency executive head or the bonded disbursing officer,
or his or her designated bonded assistant is responsible for recovery of
erroneous or improper payments.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Auditor of State, or
the Treasurer of State is not liable under their surety bonds for any
erroneous or improper payments so made.

19-4-1106. Supporting documents generally.
Supporting documents for the disbursement of state funds shall include
the following:
(1) In connection with purchasing procedure, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall prescribe and define the necessary documents and
other evidence that shall be for the purpose of determining whether the
proper purchasing procedures have been complied with;
(2)(A) In all instances when the evidences of indebtedness are
represented by vendors' invoices, the agency shall retain in the permanent
file of the business office of the agency the original invoice and
corresponding documentation in accordance with procedures established by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(B) In those instances when the daily transactions with
vendors are numerous, such as in the case of retail service station
purchases, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may prescribe the use of
monthly statements from the vendors as supporting documents for the vouchers;
(3) In connection with printing contracts provided for by the
Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state, the supporting documents shall
be those prescribed by the Auditor of State or by the Department of Finance
and Administration as appropriate;
(4)(A) In connection with the laws or rules governing travel,
when individuals are reimbursed for expenses incurred for travel in
connection with their official duties, the supporting papers shall be the
forms or statements of the expenses prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State.
158 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) In the case of per diem or other expenses established
by law, the disbursing officer shall attach to the vouchers issued in payment
of the allowances a citation of his or her authority for making the payments;
(5)(A) Any indebtedness or expense incurred in connection with
an approved resolution of any state board or commission shall be made a part
of the permanent minutes of the state board or commission.
(B) Copies of the resolution or minutes authorizing any
indebtedness or expense shall be attached to the vouchers issued in payment
of any indebtedness or expense; and
(6)(A)(i) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prescribe
the forms of the vouchers to be used and the procedure to be followed in
making payments in instances when the General Assembly has authorized grants:
(a) To public schools, public welfare
recipients, counties, and municipalities;
(b) For other purposes specifically provided
for by law;
(c) For payments made to individuals under
retirement systems; and
(d) For income tax refunds.
(ii) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
review all disbursements to determine that the disbursements are issued in
accordance with their respective appropriations and that there are sufficient
funds to cover all the payments.
(B) In the case of vouchers written upon the Public School
Fund for state equalization aid, the Auditor of State shall process warrants
to pay the vouchers upon certification by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State that funds are available from general revenues available for
distribution or from other sources for the benefit of the Public School Fund
with which to pay the warrants when they are presented for payment.
(C) In the case of payments made to welfare recipients
under the welfare laws of this state, the approved list of welfare recipients
may be certified directly to the Auditor of State, who shall approve the
issuance of warrants upon certification by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State that funds are available from general revenues available for
distribution or from other sources for the benefit of the Department of Human
Services Grants Fund Account of the Department of Human Services Fund with
159 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
which to pay the warrants when they are presented for payment.
(D) In the case of vouchers written upon the Arkansas
Public Employees’ Retirement System, the Arkansas Local Police and Fire
Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, the Arkansas Judicial
Retirement System, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System funds for
retiree benefits, the Auditor of State shall process paper or electronic
warrants to pay the vouchers upon certification by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State that funds are available from the Arkansas Public Employees'
Retirement System, the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, the
State Police Retirement System, the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, and
the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System funds with which to pay the warrants
when they are presented for payment.
(E) In the case of vouchers written upon the Uniform Tax
Rate Trust Fund, the Auditor of State shall process warrants to pay the
vouchers upon certification by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that
funds are available for the benefit of the Uniform Tax Rate Trust Fund with
which to pay the warrants when they are presented for payment.
(F) In the case of vouchers written upon specific funds
receiving federal funding, according to the Cash Management Improvement Act
of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-453, Oct. 24, 1990, 104 Stat. 1058, agreement, the
Auditor of State shall process warrants and the Treasurer of State shall
redeem the warrants presented for payment upon notification by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State that the executive head of the state agency has
certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that:
(i) A federal fund transfer request has been
completed and accepted by the federal funding source; and
(ii) Federal funds will be transferred for the
benefit of the state fund to pay the warrants.

19-4-1107. Retention of documents.
(a) The original evidences of indebtedness, including documents
prepared in connection with purchasing procedure, and all original contracts,
invoices, statements, receipts, petty cash tickets, bank statements,
cancelled checks drawn upon bank accounts, and other original supporting
papers shall be retained in the permanent file of the business office of each
state agency. These documents shall be kept in a safe place subject to audit
160 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and shall not be destroyed until authorization is given for their destruction
by the Legislative Auditor.
(b) With the approval of the Legislative Auditor, a state agency may
retain evidences, to satisfy record retention policies, of indebtedness and
other contracts, invoices, statements, receipts, petty cash tickets, bank
statements, cancelled checks drawn upon bank accounts, and other supporting
papers by microform or a form of stored images in a computer system or other
form of computer technology in lieu of retaining the originals of the
documents.

19-4-1108. Procurement contracts.
Each state agency that is authorized by law or under the purchasing
procedures of this state to enter into contracts for the procurement of
property, commodities, or services shall keep on file in their respective
places of business copies of these contracts for public inspection or audit
and shall make a copy of any such contract available to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State when so required by him or her.

Subchapter 12 — Disbursement of Public Funds

19-4-1201. Disbursing officers.
(a) For the purpose of compliance with this subchapter, the following
are designated as disbursing officers:
(1) The executive head of each state department;
(2) The executive head, or superintendent, of each state
institution; and
(3) The executive secretary of each board or commission having
such an officer.
(b) The board having charge of any institution may designate any other
full-time employee to act instead of the executive head, and the executive
head of any other agency may designate any other full-time employee to act in
his or her stead.
(c) Disbursing officers under this section shall furnish bond to the
state in the manner provided by law.

19-4-1202. Designation of disburser.
161 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) If appropriations are made available to a state agency or to a
nongovernmental agency or activity and no disbursing officer is provided for
by law, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Auditor of State shall
designate a person to act as disbursing officer and fix the amount of bond
for such purposes.
(b) If the General Assembly enacts legislation that provides for more
than one (1) disbursing officer from a fund or fund account and there are
insufficient funds available to finance all appropriations made therein, the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall certify the amount of funds and
appropriations to be made available for each disbursing officer.

19-4-1203. Disbursing agents.
If the executive head of a state agency designates a full-time employee
to act as his or her agent in the disbursement of funds under his or her
control, then that agent may act without furnishing additional bond if the
executive head of the agency notifies the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
and the Auditor of State in writing of the designation.

19-4-1204. Bond required.
(a) The disbursement of funds in the State Treasury, of federal funds
granted to the state or to a state agency, of bank funds of a state agency,
of trust funds of a state agency, or of any other special funds belonging to
a state agency shall be done only by a bonded official or bonded employee in
the manner prescribed by law.
(b) Each disbursing officer or disbursing agent shall furnish bond in
the penal sum required by law or, in the absence of any law on the subject,
in an amount fixed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Auditor
of State with a corporate surety company authorized to do business in this
state and conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties and
for the proper accounting for all funds received and disbursed by him or her.

19-4-1205. Signature or facsimile.
(a) The original copy of all checks drawn in connection with the
disbursement of public funds for which the disbursing officer is responsible
shall bear the manual signature of the disbursing officer or his or her
authorized agent, or may contain or bear a mechanically produced facsimile
162 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
signature of the disbursing officer or his or her authorized agent.
(b) When the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State has determined that the
executive head of a state agency has established adequate internal
administrative procedures and controls pursuant to law, and that
determination has been made only after the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
has consulted with the Legislative Auditor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State may grant an exemption from manual signatures to allow for a computer-
produced digitized signature of the disbursing officer or his or her
authorized agent.

19-4-1206. Duties generally.
(a) The bonded disbursing officer for each state agency or the bonded
disbursing officer for a regular or special fund provided for by the General
Assembly is responsible and held accountable for the proper expenditure of
the funds under his or her control.
(b) Each disbursing officer or agent shall:
(1) Keep advised as to the availability of the appropriations
and funds for which he or she is the disbursing officer and be informed as to
the legality of and authority for any obligations that may be incurred before
any disbursements are made;
(2) Keep advised as to the laws or administrative rules relating
to general accounting procedures and restrictions for the disbursement of
funds; and
(3) Certify that:
(A) Any disbursements that he or she may make are in
accordance with the terms of any applicable contracts, purchasing procedure,
or other authority;
(B) The services have been performed or the goods
received; and
(C) The vendor or payee is entitled to the amount set
forth in the check or voucher.

19-4-1207. Duty to monitor finances.
The executive head of the agency for which appropriations are
authorized and the agency's disbursing officer shall:
(1) Be cognizant at all times of the resources available,
163 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
including applicable fund balances, revenues, and other income, for financing
the appropriations authorized by the General Assembly;
(2) See that no obligations are incurred that cannot be lawfully
discharged from funds appropriated or available from other sources when they
become due and payable; and
(3) Not operate the agency during any fiscal year from the then-
current fiscal year's available resources at a level of operations that would
require for the succeeding fiscal year funds in addition to those already
authorized by the General Assembly.

19-4-1208. Compliance with other laws.
The disbursement of funds authorized by the General Assembly are
limited to the appropriations and the funds made available for the support of
the appropriations. The restrictions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-
61-101 et seq., the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201
et seq., the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., and rules
promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration authorized by law
shall be strictly complied with in the disbursement of the funds.

19-4-1209. Revenues insufficient to meet appropriations.
(a) The disbursements of funds are subject to the controls of the
procedures authorized by this subchapter, other acts of the General Assembly,
and rules established by the Department of Finance and Administration.
(b) If during any fiscal year the governmental revenues available to
the state or a state agency are not sufficient to cover the appropriations
made by the General Assembly from the revenues, then:
(1) The bonded disbursing officer for each agency is responsible
and held accountable for the incurring of any obligations and disbursements
of any funds in behalf of the agency for which he or she acts as disbursing
officer. He or she shall keep advised as to the amount of governmental
revenues available for the operation of his or her agency. Each disbursing
officer is prohibited from incurring any obligations in excess of the funds
made available by this chapter and other laws providing revenues for any such
agency, and the disbursing officer is subject to the restrictions and
limitations of this chapter;
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall exercise the
164 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
powers of his or her office to enforce the fiscal laws of the state to
prohibit deficit spending and to promulgate rules that will require that all
agencies comply with the fiscal laws.
(3)(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may require,
whenever he or she deems necessary, a financial report from any agency.
(B) If a financial report or any other available
information of an agency that has appropriated funds or an agency that has
both state and bank funds reveals that the agency is in financial distress,
then the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may direct that all of the funds
of the agency, including any bank funds, are subject to approval under this
chapter;
(4) If during any year it is determined that the proposed
disbursements exceed the amount approved for that year, then, upon direction
of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, necessary reductions in proposed
disbursements shall be made;
(5) If, in accomplishing the necessary reductions in
disbursements, it is required to reduce the salaries of employees, the
reductions shall be made in proportion to existing salaries, and the
reductions shall be made in the salaries of all employees, including
administrators and directors;
(6) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall withhold all
distributions of special and general revenues as prescribed in this chapter
and in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., at any time that a
state agency fails to comply with the restrictive provisions of this chapter;
and
(7)(A) The creditors of an agency have first consideration in
connection with disbursement of the funds of the agency.
(B) If the funds of an agency become depleted to an extent
that the creditors cannot be paid from funds on hand or that will become
available during the same fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall direct the agency to stop incurring obligations until the funds on hand
and the funds estimated to become available are sufficient to meet all the
obligations.

Subchapter 13 — Monitoring for Deficit Spending

165 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-1301. Legislative intent and purpose.
(a) This subchapter is an addition to the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., and other fiscal laws of this
state. This subchapter is enacted for the purpose of imposing additional
duties and responsibilities upon the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to
monitor state expenditures and financial obligations in order to assure that
all state agencies, programs, and services plan and use the funds provided or
made available for the support of the essential services of government within
their respective jurisdictions. This monitoring shall be done without
incurring obligations or commitments that would exhaust the available funds
within a time frame of less than twelve (12) months or that would create
deficits.
(b) The General Assembly is cognizant of the economic recession that
has reduced the growth of state revenues that are available for the operation
of many of the programmed commitments or expansions of services of
government. By this subchapter the General Assembly intends to strengthen the
responsibilities and duties of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to
provide for the planned and orderly, yet rigid, enforcement of the various
laws of this state designed to protect against deficit spending.
(c) It is further the intent and purpose of this subchapter to mandate
that all public officials, administrators, and employees charged with the
responsibility of administering and disbursing state funds be held strictly
accountable for the administration of the programs under their jurisdiction.
Those officials, administrators, and employees shall periodically reevaluate
and modify, if necessary, the various programs and services under their
respective jurisdiction to assure the orderly providing of the greatest
possible level of essential services and programs on a regular twelve-month
basis, within the limitation of the funds available.
(d) The General Assembly further recognizes that many agencies may
have to evaluate and curtail projected or planned program expansions. Many
agencies may also have to exercise options to reduce the levels of existing
services or program commitments to keep the projected expenditures for the
programs or services within the limitations of funds estimated to be
available for the programs or services, as provided in this subchapter. It is
the intention of the General Assembly that each state agency review its
ongoing obligations and services and make the necessary adjustments to
166 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
provide the greatest possible level of essential services commensurate with
the funds available on a year-round, twelve-month basis.

19-4-1302. Provisions supplemental.
This subchapter is supplemental and in addition to the fiscal laws of
this state and repeals only those laws and parts of laws that are
specifically in conflict with this subchapter.

19-4-1303. Exemptions.
Funds disbursed by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, and the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery and the funds appropriated in the general appropriation bill provided
for in Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 30, are exempt from this
subchapter.

19-4-1304. Failure to conform to directives and mandates.
(a) If a state agency fails or refuses to conform to the directives
and mandates of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to restrict or curtail
its financial obligations or program commitments as intended by this
subchapter, the executive head of the agency or members of the board or
commission responsible for the agency may be guilty of misfeasance in office
or employment and may be removed from office by appropriate legal
proceedings.
(b) The fact that it may be necessary for an agency to reduce existing
levels of services to conform to orders or directives of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, as intended by this subchapter, is not lawful
justification for failure to conform to the orders or directives.

19-4-1305. Failure to perform duties.
If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State fails to perform his or her
duties as mandated under this subchapter and within the time limitations set
forth in this subchapter, he or she is guilty of misfeasance of his or her
office and may be removed from office in the manner provided by law.

19-4-1306. Procedures for monitoring agency expenditures and fiscal
operations.
167 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) In addition to the powers and duties provided under this chapter
and other fiscal laws of the state, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall invoke additional procedures to assure that all state agencies are
operated on a planned and orderly basis of essential services within the
limitations of funds available.
(b) In furtherance of the purposes of this subchapter, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall institute the following additional
procedures and controls:
(1)(A) At least thirty (30) days before the commencement of each
fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make studies for the
purpose of estimating the anticipated amount of general and special revenues
to be made available for distribution under the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-20-101 et seq., and for the support of agencies that derive their support
from special revenues, for the fiscal year or the fiscal quarter, or for any
calendar month if he or she deems it necessary. In addition, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall compute the estimated amount of general revenues
that will be available for distribution to the respective State Treasury
accounts in accordance with the respective percentage distributions of
general revenues authorized under the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101
et seq.
(B) Each executive head of an agency responsible for
administering special revenues or federal funds shall notify the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State of any unusual events that would adversely affect the
estimate of the moneys received upon which the agency is operating. The
notification shall be given immediately upon knowing of the existence of
those events by the executive head of the agency;
(2) Upon completion of revenue estimates for each fiscal year or
each fiscal quarter, or monthly if deemed necessary, the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State shall prepare schedules reflecting the estimated amount of
general revenues to be available for distribution to the State Treasury funds
and accounts for each of the agencies that share in the distribution of
general revenue funds of the state, either in whole or in part. In addition,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may require the preparation of
estimates from the administering agency or prepare estimates of the
anticipated amount of special revenues to be available for distribution to
those agencies that receive support from special revenues, from both general
168 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and special revenues, or from cash funds or other sources;
(3)(A) After preparing the estimates and schedules for each
fiscal year, fiscal quarter, or month, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall review the annual operations budgets of each agency.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall institute
controls that he or she deems necessary to modify or restrict the level of
approved expenditures that may be incurred by each agency to assure that
sufficient funds will be available to maintain a minimum level of essential
services and programs by each agency without undue interruption or
curtailment of the level of programs and essential services provided for any
extended period during each fiscal year or that might create circumstances
that would institute deficit spending to meet the obligations or services in
excess of the funds available for the support thereof, as provided by law;
and
(4) If in reviewing the annual operations budgets of a state
agency, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines that the level of
operations of the agency or the projected commitment of the agency is being
operated in a manner that would impose serious curtailment of essential
services or would create circumstances of deficit spending, then he or she
shall immediately notify the executive head of the agency responsible for the
operation of the services as to the curtailments and controls that should be
instituted to bring the level of operations or services within the necessary
fiscal restraints recommended by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall furnish a copy of each
directive issued under subdivision (b)(4) of this section to the Governor, to
the Legislative Council, and to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

Subchapter 14 — Construction of Buildings and Facilities

19-4-1401. Notice required.
(a) In all instances in which the state has an interest in
construction work requiring bids, the notice provisions of §§ 22-9-201 — 22-
9-204 shall be complied with and observed.
(b) This subchapter does not amend or repeal §§ 22-9-201 — 22-9-204,
except those emergency procedures provided by §§ 22-9-201 — 22-9-204.

169 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-1402. Contracts to be filed.
(a) Executed counterparts of all contracts entered into by a state
agency with respect to proposed projects for new improvements or major
repairs or additions to existing buildings and facilities shall be approved
by and filed with the Building Authority Division before the issuance of any
vouchers making payments under the contract, unless the contract is exempted
from the jurisdiction of the Building Authority Division by a law or a rule
promulgated under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq.
(b)(1) The boards of trustees of the University of Arkansas, Arkansas
State University, University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State University,
Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University, respectively, are
exempt from the requirements of this section requiring the filing of the
contracts with the Building Authority Division.
(2) The governing boards of all other public institutions of
higher education shall be exempt from the requirement for approval and filing
of the contracts with the Building Authority Division:
(A) Upon approval of the Division of Higher Education; and
(B) If, before granting approval, the Division of Higher
Education has reviewed and approved policies and procedures adopted by the
governing boards of the public institutions of higher education with respect
to bidding and construction of capital improvement projects.
(3) This section does not prevent a public institution of higher
education exempt under this subsection from entering into an agreement with
the Building Authority Division to file its contracts with the Building
Authority Division.
(c)(1) All contracts for new improvements or major repairs or
additions to existing buildings and facilities under this subchapter shall
include a project disclosure statement prepared by the agency, board,
commission, or public institution of higher education.
(2) The disclosure statement shall provide the estimated
timeline, scope, and cost of the total project.
(3) The disclosure statement shall not be construed as
authorizing:
(A) Additional work that is beyond the scope of the bid
documents; or
170 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Payment exceeding the contract amount.
(d) This section does not prohibit an agency, board, commission, or
public institution of higher education from executing contract amendments.

19-4-1403. Agencies exempted.
This subchapter does not apply to the State Highway Commission and the
Arkansas Department of Transportation.

19-4-1404. Forces employed.
(a)(1) If an agency of the state determines to construct buildings and
facilities or to make repairs or additions to existing buildings and
facilities and there are funds available for these purposes, then the agency
may undertake the project by the employment and use of its own forces, or by
contract, or in part by its own forces and in part by contract, all as in the
opinion of the agency is in the best interest of the state.
(2) The agency may employ architects for the purposes stated
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(b) This section does not apply to a city, town, county, or school
district within this state.

19-4-1405. Bidding procedure — Definition.
(a)(1) After a state agency has caused the preparation and has
approved plans and specifications, the state agency shall then proceed to
advertise for bids for the contemplated work by the publication of notice one
(1) time each week for not less than two (2) consecutive weeks for projects
over the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and shall proceed to
advertise for bids one (1) time each week for not less than one (1) week for
projects more than the quote bid and less than or equal to fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000).
(2) The notice under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall:
(A)(i) Be published in a newspaper of general circulation
published in the county in which the proposed improvements are to be made or
in a trade journal reaching the construction industry.
(ii) The last publication in the newspaper shall be
not less than one (1) week before the date on which the bids are to be
received.
171 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Provide for the receipt of sealed bids;
(C) Set forth the time and place in which the bids will be
received;
(D) Specify from whom copies of the plans and
specifications and a draft of the proposed contract may be obtained for
examination;
(E) Contain the amount of the bid security; and
(F) Contain such other information and requirements as, in
the opinion of the state agency, may be necessary or desirable.
(b)(1) On the date and time fixed in the notice, the state agency
shall open, tabulate, and compare bids, and award the contract to the lowest
responsible bidder.
(2) However, the state agency shall have the right to reject any
bids and to waive any formalities.
(c)(1) The successful bidder shall be required to furnish bonds to the
State of Arkansas, with corporate guaranty or indemnity sureties on the
bonds.
(2)(A) The bonds shall be both for the completion of the
construction free of all liens and encumbrances, in an amount fixed by the
Building Authority Division, and for the protection of the state agency and
the state agency's members against all liability for injury to persons or
damage to, or loss of, property arising, or claimed to have arisen, in the
course of the work project, within limits fixed by the division.
(B) However, for projects undertaken by public
institutions of higher education, the bonds shall be in an amount and within
limits fixed by the governing board of the public institution of higher
education.
(d)(1)(A) Every bid submitted on state agency construction contracts
for projects over the amount stated in § 22-9-203 is void unless accompanied
by a cashier's check drawn upon a bank or trust company doing business in
this state or by a corporate bid bond and the agent's power of attorney as
his or her authority.
(B) Bid security is not required for projects under or
equal to the amount stated in § 22-9-203.
(2) The bid security shall indemnify the public against failure
of the contractor to execute and deliver the contract and necessary bonds for
172 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
faithful performance of the contract.
(3) The bid security shall provide that the contractor or surety
must pay the damage, loss, cost, and expense subject to the amount of the bid
security directly arising out of the contractor's default in failing to
execute and deliver the contract and bonds.
(4) Liability under this bid security shall be limited to five
percent (5%) of the amount of the bid.
(e)(1)(A) When it is obvious from examination of the bid document that
it was the intent of a bidder to submit a responsive bid and because of a
scrivener's error, the bid, if accepted, would create a serious financial
loss to the bidder, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services may relieve the bidder from responsibility under his or her
bond and may reject the bid.
(B) However, for projects undertaken by public
institutions of higher education exempt from review and approval of the
division, the chief executive officer of the public institution of higher
education or his or her designee may relieve the bidder from responsibility
under his or her bond and may reject his or her bid in the same manner and
within the same period as allowed by the division.
(2) As used in this section, “scrivener's error” means:
(A) An error in the calculation of a bid which can be
documented by clear and convincing written evidence and which can be clearly
shown by objective evidence drawn from inspection of the original work
papers, documents, or materials used in the preparation of the bid sought to
be withdrawn; and
(B) In the case of a bid sought to be withdrawn, the bid
was submitted in good faith and the mistake was due to a calculation or
clerical error, an inadvertent omission, or a typographical error as opposed
to an error in judgment.
(3)(A) To receive relief under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section, the bidder must serve written notice to the secretary or to the
chief executive officer or his or her designee of a public institution of
higher education exempt from review and approval of the division any time
after the bid opening, but no later than seventy-two (72) hours after
receiving the intent to award, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
(B) Failure to make a withdrawal request within seventy-
173 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
two (72) hours shall constitute a waiver by the bidder of the bidder's right
to claim that the mistake in his or her bid was a scrivener's error.
(4) If the secretary or the chief executive officer or his or
her designee of a public institution of higher education exempt from review
and approval of the division has relieved the bidder from responsibility
under his or her bond, action on the remaining bids should be considered as
though the withdrawn bid had not been received.
(f)(1) A state agency shall not require in plans or specifications
that a bidder or supplier:
(A) Hold membership in any professional or industry
associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations;
(B) Possess certification from any professional or
industry associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations as
steel building fabricators; or
(C) Be endorsed by any professional or industry
associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations.
(2) However, plans and specifications may include or reference
standards adopted by professional or industry associations, societies, trade
groups, or similar organizations.

19-4-1406. Method of financing.
(a) Before a state agency enters into a contract of employment with an
architect or takes any other affirmative action toward the construction or
financing of a project as provided in this subchapter, it shall submit to the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, in writing, a summary statement setting
forth:
(1) A general description of the proposed project;
(2) Its estimated overall costs; and
(3) The method it proposes to use to finance its cost, which
shall be a method of financing that must be approved by the Governor.
(b)(1) After examining the method of financing and making such
investigation as he or she shall deem necessary or advisable, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall notify the agency, in writing, of his or
her and the Governor's approval or disapproval of the method of financing the
project.
(2) In the event of disapproval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
174 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the State and the Governor under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the
agency may submit an alternate plan of financing the project.
(3) In any event, affirmative action shall not be taken by the
agency until a method of financing is approved by the Governor and the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(4) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may not pass upon the
need for any construction of a project as provided in this subchapter, as
such authority is vested solely in the agency.
(c)(1) The method of financing as required by this subchapter shall
include estimated dates for commencing and completing the project.
(2) After the contracts for the project have been awarded, then
the method of financing shall be amended to include the estimated dates of
completion in accordance with the awarded contracts.

19-4-1407. Matching funds.
(a) If funds provided by the state for projects regulated in this
subchapter are subject to matching provisions, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall require in the proposed method of financing that all of the
funds or approved grants available for the proposed project, including state,
federal, and agency funds, shall be considered in connection with preliminary
planning and the awarding of contracts in connection with the project.
(b) In those instances in which construction projects utilize funds
other than those deposited into the State Treasury, the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State shall prescribe the procedure for payments from all other funds
made available to the agency.

19-4-1408. Use of other funds.
(a)(1) A state agency for which appropriations have been made by the
General Assembly for construction and improvements shall not make any
contract or incur any indebtedness payable from those appropriations until
there are sufficient funds on hand or, in the case of federal grants, until
the grant has received final approval from the granting federal agency for
the benefit of the state agency to pay for the proposed obligations under the
contracts.
(2) An agency may accept and use grants and donations and use
the agency's unobligated cash income and other funds available to the agency
175 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to supplement appropriations for construction purposes.
(b) The appropriations and funds otherwise provided by the General
Assembly for personal services, maintenance, and general operation of the
agency shall not be used in connection with any proposed construction
projects for which specific appropriations have been made by the General
Assembly.

19-4-1409. Completion of contracts.
Upon completion of each contract awarded for the fulfillment of a
project authorized by the General Assembly:
(1) The affected state agency shall notify the Department of
Finance and Administration of the culmination of the contract;
(2) No further expenditures or obligations shall be incurred;
and
(3) The unexpended and unobligated funds shall be impounded.

19-4-1410. Processing of payments.
(a)(1) When a contractor submits a properly prepared request for
payment of work completed on state construction projects and the request for
payment conforms with the provisions of the contract award and laws of the
State of Arkansas, the following maximum time is allowed for the processing
of the payment requests by the various parties involved, excluding time
required for transmittal from one (1) party to another:
(A) A design professional — five (5) working days;
(B) A state agency or institution of higher education
exempt from review and approval by the Building Authority Division — five (5)
working days, including preparation of a voucher and submission for payment;
and
(C) The Department of Finance and Administration — five
(5) working days.
(2) If payment is contested by any of the parties listed in this
subsection, it shall be the responsibility of the parties contesting the
payment, within the time specified for processing payment, to notify the
contractor involved that payment has been contested and reasons for
contesting the payment.
(3) If any of the parties listed in this subsection fails to
176 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
properly process uncontested requests for payments within the time limits
specified following date of receipt, a penalty of eight percent (8%) per
annum of the amount of the request for payment shall be assessed against the
parties responsible for the delay.
(b)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish
procedures for monitoring payments to contractors. When it has been
determined that payment processing has exceeded the time limits established
in this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause an
investigation to be made for the purpose of determining the responsible
parties and the amount of penalty to be paid.
(2) Penalties assessed for failure to comply with this section
shall be paid to the contractor by the parties responsible in accordance with
procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-4-1411. Fund balances.
(a) If, after the expiration date of the second biennial period for
which funds have been appropriated for the benefit of any specific capital
improvement project, there remains a balance of funds or appropriations, then
such fund balances as may remain in the Development and Enhancement Fund for
the benefit of the capital improvement project shall be reallocated for the
benefit of proposed new or existing capital improvement projects of the
various state agencies as may be enacted.
(b) This section does not limit the authority of the General Assembly
to appropriate funds for the benefit of any proposed new or existing capital
improvement project of the various state agencies.

19-4-1412. Projects constructed with private funds.
(a) If funds from private sources are provided to a public institution
of higher education for projects that exceed five million dollars
($5,000,000) regulated in this subchapter sufficient to finance at least
eighty percent (80%) of the estimated cost of the proposed project, excluding
the cost of land, this subchapter and all other provisions of the Arkansas
Code governing construction of public facilities, including without
limitation §§ 22-9-101 and 22-9-103 and §§ 22-9-201 — 22-9-212, shall not be
applicable to such projects, subject to the following:
(1)(A) The governing board of the public institution of higher
177 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
education shall have adopted a resolution and procedure that shall:
(i) Set forth the method by which the architect,
engineer, construction manager, contractor, and major subcontractors are to
be selected for the project;
(ii) Include by appropriate public notice and
solicitation the opportunity for qualified, licensed professionals to submit
proposals and assure the design and completion of the project in an
expeditious manner while adhering to high standards of design and
construction quality; and
(iii) Require a payment and performance bond in an
amount determined by the governing board and provide for the manner in which
the construction shall be managed and supervised.
(B) In selecting a contractor and other professionals for
the projects, the governing board of the public institution of higher
education shall consider the experience of the person or firm in constructing
similar projects, the record of the person or firm in timely completion of
such projects, and other similar matters to assure that the person or firm
will complete the project within the time and to the specifications set by
the governing board of the public institution of higher education;
(2)(A) Before the public institution of higher education enters
into a contract with an architect, engineer, construction manager, or
contractor for the design, construction, or financing of any project financed
from private funds as provided in this section, the public institution of
higher education shall submit to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and
the Legislative Council, in writing, a summary statement setting forth a
general description of the proposed project, its estimated overall cost, and
the method proposed to finance the cost, including a description of the
sources and amount of private funds.
(B) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may forward a
copy of this statement to the Building Authority Division, the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, and the Governor for
information; and
(3) To enable a public institution of higher education to
qualify under this subsection, the private funds shall be paid to the public
institution of higher education or to a fund or foundation for the benefit of
the public institution of higher education, and such funds may be represented
178 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
in whole or in part by a written pledge or commitment from a donor, if the
public institution of higher education assures itself of the financial
stability of the donor to fulfill the pledge or commitment.
(b) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, § 19-4-
1405(f), §§ 22-9-401 — 22-9-404, § 22-9-501 et seq., § 22-9-601 et seq., and
§ 22-9-701 et seq. shall remain in full force and effect and shall not be
affected by this section.

19-4-1413. Projects exceeding five million dollars.
(a) If funds from any sources are provided to state agencies for
projects that exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000), excluding the cost of
land, this subchapter and all other provisions of the Arkansas Code governing
construction of public facilities, including without limitation § 22-9-201 et
seq., at the election of state agencies or the institutions of higher
education set forth in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall not be
applicable to the projects if the selection and contracting process set forth
in this section is followed.
(b)(1) A contract for projects between the state agency and the
construction manager, general contractor, architect, or engineer shall not be
entered into without first obtaining approval of the Building Authority
Division and review by the Legislative Council.
(2) The division shall have involvement in the selection and
contract process from the project inception.
(3) There shall be separate contracts for design and
construction services.
(4) The division may promulgate rules pertaining to the process
for awarding and overseeing the contracts.
(5) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas and the
Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State University System are exempt from
review and approval by the division and any rules promulgated by the
division, if the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas and the
Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State University System have adopted
policies and procedures involving the awarding and oversight of the contracts
for design and construction services.
(6) All procedures pertaining to the contracts shall provide, to
the extent practicable, substantial uniformity between institutions of higher
179 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
education with respect to the policies and procedures to be followed.
(c)(1) For all projects contemplated or contracted for, the division
shall:
(A) Review and approve the advertisement as stated in
subsection (d) of this section, the scope of work, the site selection,
funding review, and, to the extent available, all project drawings, plans,
and specifications before solicitation of proposals for the project;
(B) Conduct on-site observations of the construction
project on a regular basis and maintain project records; and
(C)(i) Review and approve all contract amendments.
(ii) State agencies shall submit a summary of all
contract amendments to the Legislative Council.
(2)(A) The institutions of higher education stated in
subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall perform all duties and
responsibilities stated in subdivision (c)(1) of this section under policies
and procedures adopted by their governing boards.
(B) Institutions of higher education shall submit a
summary of all contract amendments to the Legislative Council.
(d)(1) The selection procedures for the construction manager, general
contractor, architect, or engineer shall provide for solicitation for
qualified, licensed professionals to submit proposals.
(2) The procedures shall assure the design and completion of the
project in an expeditious manner while adhering to high standards of design
and construction quality.
(3) The state agency and each institution of higher education
stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall:
(A) Publish notice of its intention to receive written
proposals three (3) consecutive days in a newspaper of statewide
distribution;
(B) Allow a minimum of ten (10) working days for the
professionals to send letters or resumes in response to newspaper
advertisement; and
(C) Provide additional means of notification, if any, as
the state agency or institution of higher education stated in subdivision
(b)(5) of this section determines is appropriate.
(e)(1)(A) A preselection committee, which shall be composed of no more
180 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
than three (3) members from the state agency and two (2) members from the
division, shall review the proposals.
(B) A preselection committee for institutions of higher
education stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall consist of at
least three (3) members as determined by each of the institutions of higher
education, and the members may be from the division.
(C) The preselection committee shall select a maximum of
five (5) applicants and schedule interviews.
(D) The state agency or an institution of higher education
as stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall notify the finalists of
their status.
(2)(A) The final selection committee shall be composed of the
three (3) members from the state agency on the preselection committee.
(B) The final interviews shall be held at the time and
date as designated by the final selection committee.
(C) Representatives of the division may attend the final
selection meeting, but shall not vote in the final selection process.
(D) The final selection committee for institutions of
higher education stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall consist
of at least three (3) members as determined by each of the institutions of
higher education.
(E) Members of a preselection committee may also serve as
members of the final selection committee of the institutions.
(F) In selecting a general contractor, construction
manager, architect, or engineer, the state agency or institution of higher
education as stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall consider its
established criteria which shall include without limitation the following:
(i) The experience of the professional or
professionals in similar projects;
(ii) The record of the professional or professionals
in timely completion of the projects with high quality workmanship; and
(iii) Other similar matters to determine that the
professional or professionals will complete the project within the time and
budget and to the specifications set by the state agency or institution of
higher education as stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section.
(3)(A) The final selection committee shall select or make a
181 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
formal recommendation to its governing body of the professional or
professionals that it determines to be in the best interest of the state.
(B) Contracts for architectural, engineering, and land
surveying professional consultant services shall be negotiated on the basis
of demonstrated competence and qualifications for the type of services
required and at fair and reasonable prices without the use of competitive
bidding, and a rule shall not inhibit the agency's authority to negotiate
fees for the services.
(C) The final selection committee for the institutions of
higher education as stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall make a
recommendation to its governing board or appropriate committee of its
governing board of the professional or professionals which it determines to
be in the best interest of the institution of higher education, and the
governing board shall make the final decision and authorize the contract or
contracts to be negotiated and awarded, unless the governing board has
delegated the action to a committee of the governing board.
(f)(1) Construction contracts for the projects shall not be entered
into without a payment and performance bond in the amount of the contract and
any amendments to the contract and shall provide for the manner in which the
construction shall be managed and supervised.
(2) All project architects and engineers shall be properly
licensed in accordance with the Arkansas State Board of Architects, Landscape
Architects, and Interior Designers and the State Board of Licensure for
Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors.
(3) The construction manager or general contractor shall be
properly licensed by the Contractors Licensing Board.
(4)(A) All subcontractors on the project shall be properly
licensed by the Contractors Licensing Board.
(B) Any person who is not considered a contractor under §
17-25-101 et seq. may continue to perform subcontracting work under this
subchapter.
(g)(1) To enable a state agency or an institution of higher education
as stated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section to qualify under this
section, the funds shall be paid to or for the benefit of the state agency or
institution of higher education, or to a fund or foundation for the benefit
of the state agency or institution of higher education.
182 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) The funds may be represented in whole or in part by a
written pledge or commitment from a donor, if the state agency or institution
of higher education assures itself of the financial stability of the donor to
fulfill the pledge or commitment.
(h) All projects constructed pursuant to this section, to the extent
applicable, shall be in accordance and compliance with:
(1) Section 17-38-101 et seq., regulating plumbers;
(2) Section 17-33-101 et seq., regulating the heating,
ventilation, air conditioning, and refrigeration industry;
(3) The Fire Prevention Act, § 12-13-101 et seq.;
(4) Section 12-80-101 et seq., regarding earthquake resistant
design for public structures;
(5) Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines, 28
C.F.R. Part 36, Appx. A, adopted by the division; and
(6)(A) The minimum standards of the division and criteria
pertaining to projects constructed under this section.
(B)(i) However, institutions of higher education as stated
in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall be exempt from these standards
and criteria, if the institutions of higher education have adopted policies
and procedures involving the awarding and oversight of contracts for projects
under this section.
(ii) It is the intention of this section that all
procedures adopted by institutions of higher education pertaining to the
contracts shall provide, to the extent practicable, substantial uniformity
between institutions of higher education with respect to the policies and
procedures to be followed.
(iii) Notwithstanding anything in this subsection to
the contrary, § 19-4-1405(f), §§ 19-11-1412, 19-65-101, 19-65-102, 22-9-101,
22-9-103, 22-9-104, 22-9-212, 22-9-213, § 22-9-401 et seq., § 22-9-501 et
seq., § 22-9-601 et seq., and § 22-9-701 et seq. shall remain in full force
and effect and shall not be affected by this section.

19-4-1414. Job order contracting — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section, "job order contracting” means the
acquisition of contracting services using a selection method that requires
contractors to submit qualifications and prices based on wage rates inclusive
183 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of fringes and burden, plus a pricing matrix for markups on materials and
subcontractors.
(b) The state agency or the institution of higher education may supply
all materials for the work with no additional markup if the materials may be
purchased off state contracts at a lesser price than the contractor would be
able to procure.
(c)(1)(A) After a state agency or institution of higher education has
prepared appropriate scope documents and achieved appropriate reviews, the
state agency or institution of higher education shall advertise for bids and
award and file contracts for the contemplated work as identified in §§ 19-4-
1401 — 19-4-1405.
(B) Additional work may be awarded based upon the initial
bid within the fiscal year.
(2)(A) The bidder may not submit a multiplier representing
estimated cost inflation as part of the formal bid process.
(B) The bid will represent the fixed price amount for the
fiscal year.
(3) The most qualified bidder offering the best value for the
state agency or the institution of higher education shall be selected to
perform the construction services identified in the construction
specifications.
(d)(1) Job order contracting bid awards:
(A) Shall not extend beyond one (1) fiscal year; and
(B) Shall not exceed:
(i) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000)
per construction job for the first year of the contract for state agencies;
and
(ii) One million two hundred thousand dollars
($1,200,000) per construction job for the first year of the contract for
institutions of higher education.
(2) However, reasonable extensions may be granted at the
beginning of each new fiscal year not to exceed a total of four (4) years,
if:
(A) The price remains mutually agreeable to the state
agency or the institution of higher education and the contractor; and
(B) The quality of the work is satisfactory to the state
184 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
agency or the institution of higher education.
(3) On or before the four-year threshold under subdivision
(d)(2) of this section, the state agency or the institution of higher
education shall bid the construction service to assure competitive
opportunities and lowest cost circumstances.
(e)(1) Executed counterparts of a contract entered into by a state
agency with respect to job order projects shall be approved by and filed with
the Building Authority Division before the issuance of any vouchers making
payments under the contract.
(2)(A) The boards of trustees of the University of Arkansas,
Arkansas State University, University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State
University, Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University are
exempt from the requirements of this section regarding the approval and
filing of the contracts with the Building Authority Division.
(B)(i) With the exception of those boards of trustees
listed in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section, the governing board of a
public institution of higher education is exempt from filing the contracts
with the Building Authority Division if the governing board of the public
institution receives the approval of the Division of Higher Education.
(ii) Before granting approval under subdivision
(e)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the Division of Higher Education shall review
and approve the policies and procedures regarding bidding and construction of
capital improvement projects as adopted by the governing board of the public
institution of higher education.
(3) A public institution of higher education that is exempt
under this section may enter into an agreement with the Building Authority
Division to file its contracts with the Building Authority Division.

Subchapter 15 — Property and Equipment Inventory

19-4-1501. Uniform system of perpetual inventory.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prescribe and establish a
uniform system of perpetual inventory for property and equipment with a
central control being established and maintained in the Department of Finance
and Administration. In connection with the uniform system of perpetual
inventory for property and equipment, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
185 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
shall:
(1) Prescribe the procedure of accounting and reporting for the
sale, trade-in, exchange, discarding, junking, or other disposal of property
and equipment and the system for receiving credit for lost, stolen, or
damaged property and equipment. All state agencies shall be required to
report promptly, upon forms approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, all such property or equipment disposed of, lost, or damaged;
(2) Require that the addition and disposition of all new
property or equipment added, including purchase, trade-in, exchange, or
transfer, or by constructing or making such property or equipment, shall be
promptly reported upon such forms and in such detail as shall be required;
and
(3) By rule, distinguish between items of equipment, and
consumable supplies or goods, and such minor tools, materials, and parts as
shall be deemed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to be expendable
within a reasonable period of time. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
also prescribe that minor equipment costing less than some minimum amount
shall not be included in the perpetual inventory.

19-4-1502. Duty to keep record.
(a) The executive head of each state agency shall keep and maintain a
record of all property of the agency, belonging to the State of Arkansas.
(b) The executive head of each agency shall be held accountable for
all state property under his or her control and shall keep and maintain a
record of all state property under his or her control.

19-4-1503. Transfer or sale.
In order to expedite the necessary work of any state agency or to
eliminate duplication and promote economy and efficiency, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may:
(1) Transfer property and equipment, including furniture,
fixtures, and office equipment and supplies from one (1) agency to another if
the property or equipment of the agency from which the transfer is made is
not needed by the agency at the time of the transfer; or
(2) Sell surplus property and equipment of an agency at a
reasonable fair value of the surplus property and equipment as authorized by
186 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
§ 25-8-106.

Subchapter 16 — Salaries and Payroll Disbursement

19-4-1601. Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act.
(a) This section and § 21-5-101 shall be known as and may be cited as
the “Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act”.
(b) Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4, provides: “Except as
provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 31, the General Assembly
shall fix the salaries and fees of all officers in the State; and no greater
salary or fee than that fixed by law shall be paid to any officer, employee,
or other person, or at any rate other than par value; and the number and
salaries of the clerks and employees of the different departments of the
State shall be fixed by law.” Therefore, the following provisions shall be
applicable to all authorized regular salary positions in appropriation acts
unless specific exception is made otherwise by law:
(1) For any position authorized by the General Assembly for the
benefit of any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program
for which the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act,
§ 21-5-201 et seq., are to be applicable, it is declared to be the intent of
the General Assembly that the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §
21-5-201 et seq., shall govern with respect to:
(A) The entrance pay level;
(B) The procedures by which salary increases may be
granted; and
(C) The maximum pay level that may be paid for the grade
assigned each employee under the provisions of the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.;
(2) For any position authorized by the General Assembly for the
benefit of any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program
for which a maximum pay level is set out in dollars, it is the intent of the
General Assembly that the position is to be paid at a rate of pay not to
exceed the maximum established for the position during any one (1) fiscal
year and that the maximum pay level authorized is for full-time employment;
(3)(A) For all positions authorized by the General Assembly for
any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or program, it is the
187 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
intent of the General Assembly that in determining the annual salaries of
these employees, the administrative head of the department, agency, board,
commission, institution, or program shall take into consideration ability of
the employee and length of service.
(B) It is not the intent of the General Assembly that the
maximum pay level as authorized in the appropriation act, or any increases
established for the various grades under the provisions of the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., be paid unless the
qualifications are complied with and then only within the limitations of the
appropriations and funds available for this purpose.
(C) An employee authorized by the General Assembly shall
not receive from appropriated or cash funds, either from state, federal, or
other sources, compensation in an amount greater than that established by the
General Assembly as the maximum pay level for the employee unless specific
provisions are made therefor by law; and
(4) An employee of the State of Arkansas shall not be paid any
additional cash allowances, including without limitation uniform allowance,
clothing allowance, motor vehicle depreciation or replacement allowance,
fixed transportation allowance, and meals and lodging allowance, other than
for reimbursement for costs actually incurred by the employee unless the
allowances are specifically set out by law as to eligibility of employees to
receive the allowances, and the maximum amount of the allowances is
established by law for each employee or for each class of employee eligible
to receive the allowances.

19-4-1602. Payroll deductions.
(a) Deductions from the payrolls of state employees, both regular and
extra help, are authorized only for the following purposes:
(1) Withholding taxes;
(2) Social Security contributions;
(3) Contributions to any state retirement system or approved
plan of deferred compensation;
(4)(A) Group or individual hospital, medical, and life insurance
deductions.
(B) However, payroll deductions through the Arkansas state
mechanized payroll system for state employees for coverages other than the
188 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
state-authorized plan shall be approved by the State Board of Finance;
(5) Payments to state employees' credit unions;
(6) Value of maintenance perquisites;
(7) Payment of union dues, when requested in writing by state
employees;
(8) Purchase of United States Government savings bonds;
(9) Arkansas State Employees Association dues, when requested in
writing by state employees;
(10) Fees for participation in the State Employees Benefit
Corporation, when requested in writing by those state employees;
(11) Contributions to a major federated fund-raising
organization, when authorized by state employees;
(12) Arkansas State Police Association dues, when authorized in
writing by those state employees;
(13) Fraternal Order of Police dues, when requested in writing
by those state employees;
(14) Central Arkansas State Troopers Coalition dues, when
authorized in writing by state employees;
(15) Arkansas Rehabilitation Association dues, when authorized
in writing by state employees;
(16) Correctional Peace Officers Foundation dues, when
authorized in writing by state employees;
(17) Department of Corrections Employees Association dues, when
requested in writing by employees;
(18) Arkansas Association of Correctional Employees Trust dues,
when requested in writing by those employees;
(19) Division of Correction Bus Pool dues, when requested in
writing by those employees;
(20)(A) Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan under the Arkansas
Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, § 6-84-101 et seq., or a tax-deferred savings
program established by another state under 26 U.S.C. § 529, as it existed on
January 1, 2007.
(B) The tax-deferred savings plan must be in existence at
the time the payroll deduction request is made.
(C) The state employee shall provide information on his or
her Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan account to the Department of Finance
189 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and Administration so that the payroll deduction can be credited to the
appropriate account; and
(21) For such other purposes as are specifically authorized by
law but not enumerated in this subsection.
(b) If a state employee authorizes in writing the payroll deduction of
dues of any union or professional association representing the employee, the
agency shall deduct the dues from the payroll of the state employee and remit
the dues to the union or professional association.
(c) Deductions authorized by this section shall be made in compliance
with rules and procedures established by the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services.

19-4-1603. Procedures for position control.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services shall establish procedures for exercising position control
applicable to those state agencies subject to the provisions of the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.
(b) Exercising position control under subsection (a) of this section
shall be interpreted as follows:
(1) The secretary shall assign a position control number to each
line-item position authorized for the applicable agencies;
(2) The secretary shall establish reporting procedures so that
agencies shall provide complete reports to the Department of Finance and
Administration on the use of all authorized positions; and
(3) The secretary may restrict an agency's use of authorized
positions only after finding that the agency is in financial difficulty and
after invoking the fiscal controls provided in § 19-4-701 et seq. and § 19-4-
1201 et seq.

19-4-1604. Salary from two agencies.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a
person drawing a salary or other compensation from one state agency shall not
be paid salary or compensation, other than actual expenses, from any other
state agency except upon written certification to and approval by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services and by the
head of each state agency, stating that:
190 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) The work performed for the other state agency does not
interfere with the proper and required performance of the person's duties;
and
(2) The combined salary payments from the state agencies do not
exceed the larger maximum annual salary of the line-item position authorized
for either state agency from which the employee is being paid.
(b)(1) This section does not prohibit a state employee from
contracting to temporarily teach as adjunct faculty at a state-supported
institution of higher education and thereby receive combined salary payments
from the two (2) state agencies in excess of the larger maximum annual salary
of the line-item position authorized from either state agency.
(2)(A) This section does not prohibit a part-time or job-share
public defender from receiving compensation from an appellate court for work
performed in connection with an indigent client's appeal to the Supreme Court
or the Court of Appeals.
(B) A person employed as a full-time public defender who
is not provided a state-funded secretary may also seek compensation for
appellate work from the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals.
(3) This section does not allow a state employee to be on paid
sick leave with a state agency and to be paid a salary or compensation from
another state agency.
(c) A person drawing a salary or other compensation from a state
agency or institution of higher education shall not be paid a salary or
compensation from another institution of higher education except upon the
written certification to and approval by the Commissioner of the Division of
Higher Education that the:
(1) Work performed for the other state agency or institution of
higher education does not interfere with the proper and required performance
of the person's duties; and
(2) Combined salary payments from the state agency and
institution of higher education do not exceed the larger maximum annual
salary of the line-item position authorized for either the agency or
institution of higher education from which the employee is being paid.

19-4-1605. Payment from multiple funds.
In those instances in which a state agency has approved line-items for
191 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
salaries that are payable from more than one (1) fund, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may establish a paying account on his or her books and
on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State from which
all such salaries may be paid, with provisions for reimbursing the paying
account by directing the transfer of the necessary funds and appropriations
on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-4-1606. Review of payroll required.
(a)(1) The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall
review the payroll of state agencies covered by the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., with respect to the salaries of all
employees of affected state agencies.
(2) The review under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
determine the correctness of each payroll with respect to each position to
assure compliance with the compensation plan and to assure that no position
is being paid, during any payroll period, an amount greater than authorized
in the compensation plan or the amount authorized for the position in the
appropriation act applicable to the agency.
(b) A proposed rate of pay for an employee found not to be in
accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation
Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., and the appropriation act governing the agency shall
be changed to the appropriate rate of pay by the state agency covered by the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., before the
department approves it for payment.
(c) Payment of salary of an employee of a state agency affected by the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., shall not be
made without the certification of correctness by the department based on its
review duties as provided in this section.
(d) The department may develop and implement rules and procedures to
accomplish the purposes of this section.

19-4-1607. Monthly, biweekly, weekly, and hourly salaries.
(a)(1)(A) Except for those state agencies that operate principally on
a scholastic year, or on a part-time basis, or when such salaries or personal
services are specifically established for a period less than one (1) year,
192 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
all salaries established by the General Assembly shall be considered to be a
maximum amount to be paid for a twelve-month payroll period.
(B) A greater amount than that established for the maximum
annual salary of a state official or employee shall not be paid to the state
official or employee during any such twelve-month payroll period, nor shall
more than one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual salary be paid to the state
official or employee during any calendar month unless authorized in this
subchapter.
(2) The limitations set out in this section may be converted to
biweekly or weekly increments of one-twenty-sixth (126) or one-fifty-second
(152) of the maximum annual salary.
(3) For complying with federal requirements, upon approval of
the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services in
consultation with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the maximum annual
salaries may be converted to hourly rates of pay for positions established on
the basis of twelve (12) months or less if authorized by law.
(b) The remuneration paid to a state employee may exceed the maximum
annual salary as authorized by the General Assembly as follows, and the
following shall not be construed as payment for services or as salary as
contemplated by Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4:
(1) Overtime payments as authorized by law;
(2) Payment of a lump sum to a terminating state employee, to
include lump-sum payments of sick leave balances upon retirement as provided
by law;
(3) Payment for overlapping pay periods at the end of a fiscal
year as defined or authorized by law;
(4) Payment for the biweekly twenty-seven (27) pay periods;
(5) Payment for career service recognition as authorized by law;
and
(6) Payment in accordance with special language salary
provisions in individual agency appropriation acts.

19-4-1608. Personal services less than 12 months.
If an appropriation is made for the payment of personal services, when
it has been established by law on the basis of a scholastic year or for some
other period less than twelve (12) months, then any person so employed may be
193 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
paid from bank funds for the remainder of the year if his or her services are
required by the state agency.

19-4-1609. State-supported institutions of higher education.
(a)(1) Pursuant to administrative procedures established by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, each state-supported institution of higher
education may request a salary and personal services matching, or a
maintenance and general operations expense disbursement procedure, or both.
This procedure shall be requested, in writing from the executive head,
communicated to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by which, effective at
a date in accordance with the request, each payroll for all salaries of the
state-supported institution of higher education payable to employees, or a
maintenance and general operations expense of the state-supported institution
of higher education and personal services matching for employees of the
state-supported institution of higher education, or both, may be disbursed by
the state-supported institution of higher education and paid from state
agency bank funds of the state-supported institution of higher education,
subject to reimbursement and correction of reporting as provided in this
section.
(2)(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may approve such
salary and personal services matching, or a maintenance and general
operations expense disbursement procedure, or both, for such reimbursement if
he or she determines that each state-supported institution of higher
education has complied with all administrative procedures established by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(B)(i) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may revoke
any such approval by transmitting a thirty-day notice to the executive head
of the state-supported institution of higher education when the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State finds that internal administrative procedures and
controls of the state-supported institution of higher education are not
adequate.
(ii) The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall
advise the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and keep him or her informed
regarding any of its findings that may be relevant to such determination
regarding these state-supported institutions of higher education.
(b)(1) Upon completion of salary and personal services matching, or a
194 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
maintenance and general operations expense disbursement, or both, by the
state-supported institution of higher education, the disbursing officer or
other appropriate official of the state-supported institution of higher
education shall examine the payroll or a maintenance and general operations
expense, or both, as disbursed for such amounts as are properly payable from
State Treasury funds.
(2)(A) At such time as the disbursing officer or other
appropriate official of the state-supported institution of higher education
examines the payroll, or a maintenance and general operations expense for
determining the reimbursable amount, or both, he or she shall also review the
payroll or maintenance and general operations expense in order to discover
any erroneous or improper payments as provided by law.
(B) The liability for erroneous or improper payments is
with the executive head of that state-supported institution of higher
education and its bonded disbursing officer, or his or her designated bonded
assistant.
(c) All salaries and personal services matching, or a maintenance and
general operations expense, or both, are subject to the restrictions and
controls provided by law and the administrative procedures of the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State.
(d) Under this section, the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences may utilize appropriated funds to authorize procedures for the
disbursement of indigent care maintenance and general operations
appropriations to be paid from cash funds of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences, subject to reimbursement and correction of reporting.

19-4-1610. Retroactive pay prohibited.
(a)(1) If a state employee is being paid less than the maximum
provided for by law, and thereafter the head of the agency provides for an
increase in the rate of pay for the state employee, the rate of pay shall not
exceed one-twelfth (1/12) of the annual maximum amount of the salary position
on which he or she is placed, for the remainder of the annual period.
(2) Payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not
be made for a preceding fiscal year.
(b)(1) An increase in the rate of pay, either by paying the full
amount of the maximum salary or by placing a state employee in a position
195 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
calling for a greater salary, shall not be construed as authorizing the
payment of any retroactive salary to the state employee.
(2) Payments under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not
be made for a preceding fiscal year.
(c)(1) Salary payments made to correct an administrative error shall
not be considered retroactive pay, nor shall such a payment be construed as
exceeding the state employee's maximum authorized pay.
(2) Payments under subdivision (c)(1) of this section may be
made for a preceding fiscal year if:
(A) Requested within twelve (12) months of the end of the
preceding fiscal year; and
(B) Upon the consent of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services in consultation with the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State.

19-4-1611. Supplemental payments prohibited.
(a) If the General Assembly has established by law the maximum annual
salaries for certain positions for a state agency and has appropriated for
those positions, a greater salary than that established by law shall not be
paid to a person occupying the position by making supplemental payments from
agency bank funds.
(b) However, the salaries under subsection (a) of this section may be
paid partly from state-appropriated funds and partly from agency bank funds,
but the aggregate of the payments shall not exceed the maximum annual salary
rate, when the maximum annual salary rate is established by law.

19-4-1612. Overtime pay.
(a) It is the policy of the State of Arkansas that overtime pay for
state employees is the least desirable method of compensation for overtime
work.
(b)(1) All state departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and
institutions may pay overtime to their employees, under the rules and
regulations set out by the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.
(2)(A) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services shall specify those specific employees or groups of employees
other than employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation eligible to
196 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
receive overtime compensation, the circumstances under which overtime pay is
to be allowed, and other matters the secretary finds appropriate and
necessary to comply with the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 as
regards the payment of overtime compensation.
(B) The Director of State Highways and Transportation
shall make the determinations under this subsection as to employees of the
Arkansas Department of Transportation.
(c) The rules authorized by this section shall not go into effect
until the secretary, or the Arkansas Department of Transportation as to its
employees, has sought the advice of the Legislative Council.
(d) If the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 is held, for
whatever reason, to be nonapplicable to state employment, then any state
department, agency, board, commission, or institution may pay overtime to its
employees only if the General Assembly has given authorization by an
appropriation.
(e)(1) The State Highway Commission:
(A) For the purpose of paying overtime, may transfer a
portion of the appropriation for overtime in the operative appropriation act
for the Arkansas Department of Transportation to the appropriation for
regular salaries in the operative appropriation act for the Arkansas
Department of Transportation; and
(B) Shall notify the Auditor of State and the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration of a transfer authorized under
this subdivision (e)(1).
(2) If the commission makes a transfer under subdivision (e)(1)
of this section:
(A) The overtime applicable to any salaries may be paid
from the appropriation for regular salaries in the operative appropriation
act for the Arkansas Department of Transportation; and
(B) One (1) state warrant may be issued to each employee
for the total of the regular salary and overtime earned.
(3) The amount appropriated for salaries in the operative
appropriation act for the Arkansas Department of Transportation may be
exceeded for an employee eligible for overtime to the extent of the overtime
paid to the employee.
(4) The overtime paid shall be identifiable for each employee,
197 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and in total for all employees, on the voucher or other record that is
submitted to support the issuance of a state warrant.

19-4-1613. Lump-sum terminal pay.
(a) Upon termination, resignation, retirement, death, or other action
by which a person ceases to be an active employee of a state agency, the
amount due the employee or his or her estate, including any accrued unpaid
annual or holiday leave that is due in accordance with the policies of the
state agency and lump-sum payments of sick leave balances upon retirement as
provided by law, may, and should, be included in the final pay to the
employee or his or her estate for the employee's active work, even though the
final payment of salary or wages may exceed one-twenty-sixth (1/26) or other
fractional amount based upon days, weeks, or months of the employee's annual
authorized compensation at the date active employment ceases.
(b) An employee receiving the additional compensation shall not return
to state employment until the number of days for which he or she received
additional compensation has expired.
(c) Payment of the additional compensation shall not be considered as
exceeding the maximum for a position so authorized.
(d) If an employee receives compensation for unused sick leave at
retirement pursuant to § 21-4-501 and returns to state employment, the
employee shall not be required to wait until the expiration of the number of
days for which he or she received additional compensation before returning to
state employment or to repay the amount of the compensation.

19-4-1614. Judicial awards under federal laws.
(a)(1) If a state employee, or the authorized agent of a state
employee, files suit against the State of Arkansas in a court of competent
jurisdiction for relief under Title VII of the federal Civil Rights Act of
1964, as amended, or the federal Civil Rights Act of 1866, or the federal
Civil Rights Act of 1871, or the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States
Constitution, and the court finds for the state employee and in so finding
awards wages or salaries for personal services rendered in addition to wages
or salaries already paid or due, the additional wages or salaries shall be
paid from the regular salary appropriation from which the state employee is
normally paid.
198 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) If it is found, however, that a payment under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section will impair the regular salary appropriation, the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer the necessary appropriation
from the maintenance and general operations appropriation of the employing
agency to the regular salary appropriation in order that the additional wages
or salaries shall be paid.
(b) Any liquidated damages awarded by the court, pursuant to the
federal laws cited in subsection (a) of this section, are to be paid in the
same manner as the additional wages or salaries provided for in subsection
(a) of this section.
(c)(1) When notified that a state employee has filed suit or is in any
other manner claiming redress under the federal laws cited in subsection (a)
of this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may investigate the
circumstances surrounding the claim.
(2) If, based on the evidence and facts found during the
investigation under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State determines or has reason to believe that the court would
sustain the state employee's claim and find for the state employee and in so
doing award wages or salaries in addition to those paid or due for the state
employee's personal service rendered, then the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, with the advice of the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee, shall authorize payment of the additional wages or salaries as
provided in subsection (a) of this section.

19-4-1615. Awards from Arkansas State Claims Commission.
(a) If a state employee is awarded a claim by the Arkansas State
Claims Commission for wages or salaries for personal services rendered for a
state agency, the award shall be processed through the state mechanized
payroll system.
(b) The award under subsection (a) of this section shall be paid from
the regular salaries and personal services matching appropriation from which
the state employee is normally paid.

Subchapter 17 — Reimbursements, Collections, and Refunds

19-4-1701. Reimbursements and refunds generally.
199 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall prescribe the method
of handling refunds and reimbursements to the state for moneys previously
paid out or due the state. If no properly classified appropriation account
exists on the books of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Auditor
of State for which the respective refund is applicable, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may establish the appropriation account on the books of
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Auditor of State, and the various
fiscal officers.
(b) A refund shall not cause a transfer of appropriation on the books
of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Auditor of State, and the
various fiscal officers except for:
(1) Proceeds received from insurance policies for casualty
losses by state agencies;
(2) Proceeds received from vendors on account of overpayment of
obligations remitted by state agencies;
(3) Refunds to state agencies for cash advances or over-
allocations made to state and local agencies for subgrants;
(4) Refunds to state agencies for the erroneous payment or
overpayment of salaries to state employees;
(5) Proceeds derived from the maturity or redemption of
investments;
(6) Reimbursements to institutions of higher education for cash
fund expenditures for salaries that are properly chargeable to funds in the
State Treasury;
(7) Federal reimbursements of expenses paid in advance by the
state on behalf of the federal government; and
(8) Reimbursements by vendors or their agents for warranties,
product rebates, and service adjustments.

19-4-1702. Petty cash imprest funds.
(a) Petty cash imprest funds for a state agency shall be approved by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State only in the case of actual need for the
funds in connection with the daily operations of the agency and are subject
to limitations with respect to amount and use of the funds that may be
prescribed by him or her.
(b) The petty cash imprest funds shall not be used to circumvent
200 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
purchasing rules, nor for the purpose of reimbursing individuals for travel
expenses.

19-4-1703. Collections generally.
All fines, fees, penalties, court costs, taxes, and other collections
that, by the laws of this state, are to be remitted directly to the Treasurer
of State for credit in the State Treasury to an account of an agency of this
state shall be remitted directly to the agency to whose account they are to
be credited. Upon receipt, the agency shall transmit them to the Treasurer of
State who shall credit them in the State Treasury to the account of the
agency.

19-4-1704. Geological publications income.
Charges, income, receipts, or revenue derived from the sale of
publications by the Office of the State Geologist shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as a refund to expenditures.

19-4-1705. Deposits for highway employees retirement.
All moneys received in the State Treasury for deposit into the State
Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund that are derived from the sale or
redemption of stocks, bonds, or other securities, other than interest, are to
be classified and handled on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor
of State, and the Department of Finance and Administration as a refund to
expenditures.

19-4-1706. Grants, aids, and donations.
All state agencies are authorized to accept grants, aids, and donations
and to enter into contracts to accept grants, aids, and donations. Following
procedures prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, funds
received from grants, aids, and donations may be deposited, disbursed,
budgeted, and regulated.

19-4-1707. Federal funds generally.
(a) If the United States Congress appropriates funds for the benefit
of the state or a state agency or if any federal funds are paid to the state
or an agency thereof for the purpose of reimbursing the state for funds
201 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
previously paid out, and if any such federal funds are deposited into the
State Treasury and there is no law providing for the depositing of those
moneys into a state fund or appropriating them from a state fund, taking into
consideration the provisions and requirements of the miscellaneous federal
grant appropriation, then the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may direct
the State Treasury to establish funds, fund accounts, or accounts on the
books of the various fiscal officers of the state for the purpose of handling
and disbursing these federal funds.
(b) Any such federal funds shall be handled only in accordance with
the purpose for which the funds were granted to, or paid over to, the state
or any agency thereof. All such federal funds are subject to the procedures
prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for the disbursement of
funds.

19-4-1708. Federal funds for vocational schools.
Reimbursements of federal funds to the Division of Career and Technical
Education Fund Account shall be construed to be income of the fiscal year in
which the reimbursements were received.

Subchapter 18 — Federal Grants and Aids

19-4-1801. Submission of requests.
(a) Requests for federal funds for grants, aids, reimbursement, and
direct or indirect cost reimbursement plans, other than research grants,
originated by a state agency other than a state institution of higher
education shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration
before their submission to the granting source.
(b) Excepting the provisions of § 19-4-1807, the remainder of this
subchapter does not apply to state institutions of higher education.

19-4-1802. Preliminary or informal proposals.
(a) Preliminary or informal proposals that do not commit personnel,
space, facilities, or state funds may be submitted directly to the granting
source.
(b) However, when the grant requested, if approved, would result in
the commitment of state personnel, space, facilities, equipment, or funds, or
202 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the program to be proposed by the state agency with the resources from the
federal grant has not received specific legislative authorization through an
appropriation or specific enabling legislation, the requesting agency shall
notify, in writing, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration that the preliminary or informal proposal is being made and
shall briefly describe it.

19-4-1803. Evaluation report.
Each request submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration
shall be accompanied with an evaluation report prepared by the state agency
that includes without limitation the following information:
(1) A description of the purpose of the program;
(2) An explanation of the relationship of the program or plan to
the agency's total program and why the program is needed;
(3) Its priority in the total program;
(4) A statement whether similar programs are being conducted, if
known, or could be conducted in or by other agencies;
(5) An explanation of the effects of this program and the
state's obligation, if any, to continue the program, and the level of
continuance, if federal funds are curtailed;
(6) A statement of how the agency's programs and objectives
would be affected if the request is not approved; and
(7) The amount of overhead payment anticipated from federal
funds, and its adequacy, to reimburse the agency and central state services
for actual indirect costs reimbursements.

19-4-1804. Receipt of funds.
(a) When federal funds, grants, aids, or reimbursements, including
unsolicited funds, are received by a state agency, the Department of Finance
and Administration shall be notified on forms to be prescribed by the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(b) The department shall prescribe procedures for quarterly reporting
information relative to grants, aids, reimbursement, and direct or indirect
cost reimbursement plans and research grants and aids for the institutions of
higher education.

203 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-1805. Research grants.
The Department of Finance and Administration shall prescribe procedures
for reporting information relative to federal research grants and aids for
the colleges and universities.

19-4-1806. Letters of credit — Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Checks-paid letter of credit” means a system that requires
state warrants to be issued without federal moneys on deposit in the State
Treasury. The federal share of the warrants only become available to the
Treasurer of State on the day the warrants are presented for redemption. A
receipt is processed and credited to the proper fund before the warrants are
redeemed;
(2) “Delay-of-drawdown letter of credit” means a system that
requires the Auditor of State to issue warrants without federal moneys on
deposit in the State Treasury for specific programs primarily financed by
federal moneys. Moneys are drawn upon the letter of credit and deposited with
the Treasurer of State based on an agreement with the United States
Government establishing warrant redemption patterns. Deposits are made each
day based on estimates of the amount of warrants to be redeemed each day. If
warrants are presented for redemption on a given day in excess of the amount
deposited into the State Treasury, an additional amount of moneys may be
requested on a letter of credit and deposited with the Treasurer of State to
enable proper warrant redemption and to prevent deficit spending; and
(3) “Federal letter of credit” means an instrument certified by
an authorized official of a grantor agency which authorizes a grantee to draw
funds needed for immediate disbursement in accordance with Treasury Circular
1075.
(b)(1) Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and
under procedures prescribed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, letters
of credit, either individually or under a single, unified, checks-paid, or
delay-of-drawdown system may be included and accounted for on the books of
record of the Auditor of State, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and
the applicable state agency as deferred federal revenues to be treated as an
asset comparable to “cash on hand”. In connection therewith, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may direct the creation and establishment of a revolving
204 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
paying account on the books of records of the applicable state's accounting
records. Furthermore, upon implementation of a checks-paid or delay-of-
drawdown system:
(A) The affected agency may issue vouchers;
(B) The Department of Finance and Administration may
approve vouchers for payment; and
(C) The Auditor of State may issue warrants for federal
programs without regard to federal fund or paying account balances on deposit
in the State Treasury.
(2)(A) The Treasurer of State shall not redeem any warrants
without sufficient fund balances on deposit equal to the total amount of
warrants presented for redemption.
(B) In no event shall the implementation of a checks-paid
or delay-of-drawdown letter of credit system be construed as deficit
spending.
(C) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after
consulting with the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State, may
prescribe rules as necessary to implement a checks-paid or delay-of-drawdown
letter of credit system.
(3) An agency shall not implement a checks-paid or delay-of-
drawdown letter of credit system except upon approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State and upon advice of the Legislative Council.

19-4-1807. Quarterly reports.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall file quarterly reports with the Legislative Council itemizing and
summarizing all contracts or agreements entered into by the Governor with the
United States Government, or any agencies or instrumentalities of the federal
government, whereby the State of Arkansas is to participate in any program
involving the expenditure of federal funds.
(2) The quarterly reports shall be filed, whether or not state
funds are obligated in connection therewith, with respect to new federal
programs or expansions of existing federal programs that were not in
existence or that were not implemented by state participation, at the time of
the adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly and entered
into before the convening of the next regular session of the General
205 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Assembly.
(b) With respect to each contract or agreement, the report shall list:
(1) A brief statement of the purposes of the contract or
agreement;
(2) The amount of federal funds to be expended under the
contract or agreement;
(3) The amount of any state matching funds required in
connection with the program, if any, related to the contract or agreement;
(4) The name of the agency that will administer the program, if
any, related to the contract or agreement; and
(5) Any additional information that will enable the members of
the Legislative Council to determine the nature and purposes of the contract
or agreement.

19-4-1808. Review and continuance of programs.
(a)(1) The Legislative Council shall review the quarterly reports
filed by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration as
required in this subchapter.
(2) The Legislative Council shall submit findings and
recommendations to each succeeding regular session of the General Assembly
for enabling legislation to implement, restrict, or prohibit the state's
participation in any such new federal program or expanded federal program
that was implemented by contract or agreement entered into by the Governor
subsequent to the adjournment of the preceding session of the General
Assembly.
(b)(1) If the next regular session of the General Assembly fails to
prohibit or restrict the state's participation in any new or expanded program
implemented by contract or agreement signed by the Governor with the United
States Government during the interim since the immediately preceding regular
session of the General Assembly, then the state may continue to participate
in the federal program.
(2)(A) However, if the General Assembly restricts or prohibits
the state's participation in any new or expanded federal program implemented
by contract or agreement subsequent to the last regular session, then it is
unlawful for the state to continue to participate in or to expend any state
funds in connection with any such program.
206 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) All contracts or agreements entered into by the
Governor or any agency of the state acting under authority of the Governor
are void and the state's participation therein ceases upon the adjournment of
the General Assembly, or at such later date if a later date for the
termination of the state's participation therein has been prescribed by law.

Subchapter 19 — Losses and Recoveries

19-4-1901. Notice and proof of loss.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall give notice and make proof
of loss to, and demand payment of, the surety of any bond executed by any
state officer or employee in which the audit report by the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee of the records and accounts shows that the officer or
employee and his or her surety may in any way be liable.

19-4-1902. Payment of loss.
(a) Within a reasonable time after the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State has given notice and made proof of loss and demand for payment as
prescribed in this subchapter, the surety shall make payment to the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State of the amount so found to be due. The Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall forthwith transmit the amounts so received
to the Treasurer of State with instructions to credit it to the fund, fund
accounts, or accounts entitled to the funds.
(b) If the amounts so recovered are funds that are not required by law
to be deposited into the State Treasury, then the funds shall be transmitted
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to the agency to which the recovered
funds belong, with instructions to credit it to the accounts entitled to the
funds.

19-4-1903. Legal action.
If a surety fails or refuses to pay over the amounts so found to be
due, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall give notice of the failure
or refusal to the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall immediately
take the legal action that is necessary to collect the amount so found to be
due from the officer or employee and his or her surety.

207 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-4-1904. Auditor's testimony.
(a) In all criminal or civil actions brought as the result of the
findings set forth in an audit report, the auditors making the audit shall
give testimony upon request of the proper officers of the court and otherwise
make their services available in the prosecution of any action.
(b) An auditor is not entitled to witness fees for giving testimony.

Subchapter 20 — State-Funded Expenses of Constitutional Officers

19-4-2001. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, “constitutional officers” means the
Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, the Secretary of
State, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Commissioner of
State Lands.

19-4-2002. Documentation required.
(a) For all expenditures exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00), all
constitutional officers and their employees shall file with their disbursing
officers the following documents to substantiate expenditures for
transportation, lodging, food, or any other expense to be paid from the
maintenance and operations moneys appropriated by the General Assembly:
(1) A copy of the vendor's invoice or receipt;
(2) A statement of the purpose of the expenditure; and
(3) The names of all persons for which the expenditure was
incurred.
(b) For all expenditures not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00),
all constitutional officers and their employees shall file with their
disbursing officers the following documents to substantiate expenditures for
transportation, lodging, food, or any other expense to be paid from the
maintenance and operations moneys appropriated by the General Assembly:
(1) A statement of the purpose of the expenditure;
(2) The amount of the expense;
(3) The date, place, and nature of the expense; and
(4) The business relationship of any persons for whom the
expenditure was incurred, including the person's identity, title, or other
information sufficient to establish the a relationship.
208 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-4-2003. Expenditures for official state business only — Exemptions.
(a)(1) A constitutional officer or an employee of a constitutional
officer shall not expend for personal use any moneys appropriated by the
General Assembly for the maintenance and operation of the office.
(2) The moneys appropriated for the maintenance and operation of
the offices of the constitutional officers shall be expended only for
official state business.
(b) This subchapter does not apply to the purchase, maintenance, and
operation of state-owned motor vehicles.

19-4-2004. Expenditures — Disapproval.
A disbursing officer of state funds shall not approve any expenditure
from maintenance and operation funds for expenses for a constitutional
officer or an employee of a constitutional officer unless the request for the
expenditure is accompanied by the documentation required by this subchapter.

19-4-2005. Retention of documentation.
The constitutional officers and their employees shall retain the
original documentation required by this subchapter for a period of three (3)
years after the date of the request for expenditure.

Subchapter 21 — Review of Discretionary Grants

19-4-2101. Definitions — Review generally — Exempt grants.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Discretionary grant” means a grant in which the recipient
of the grant funds or the formula for the grant award is not specifically
stated in the legislation authorizing the grant;
(2) “Nondiscretionary grant” means a grant in which the
recipient of the grant funds or the formula for the grant award is
specifically stated in the legislation authorizing the grant, or in specific
agency rules promulgated by the agency and reviewed by the Legislative
Council, or in the case of federal funds, in the statute, regulation, or
other federal directive that restricts the disbursement of the funds
according to federal guidelines; and
209 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) “State agency” means:
(A) Every board, commission, department, division, or
office of state government whether executive, legislative, or judicial; and
(B) All state-supported postsecondary educational
institutions, including without limitation colleges and universities,
vocational and technical schools, and community colleges.
(b)(1) A state agency shall not award any discretionary grant before
review by the Legislative Council between legislative sessions or by the
Joint Budget Committee during legislative sessions.
(2) However, if a state agency determines that an emergency
exists requiring the discretionary grant to be awarded before review, it may
award the discretionary grant before the review by the Legislative Council or
the Joint Budget Committee and shall immediately notify the Legislative
Council between legislative sessions or the Joint Budget Committee during
legislative sessions, as to the facts constituting the emergency.
(c) Grants exempt from review include:
(1) Grants for which the total consideration is less than or
equal to ten thousand dollars ($10,000);
(2) Nondiscretionary grants as determined by the agency;
(3) Grants to another governmental entity such as a state
agency, public educational institution, federal governmental entity, or body
of a local government;
(4) Disaster relief grants;
(5) Grants identified as not requiring review by the Legislative
Council between legislative sessions or the Joint Budget Committee during
legislative sessions;
(6) Grants containing confidential information, the disclosure
of which is determined by the agency to constitute a violation of other
provisions of law regarding disclosure; and
(7) Any scholarship or financial assistance award to, or on
behalf of, a postsecondary student.

19-4-2102. Review of nonexempt grants.
The Legislative Council between legislative sessions and the Joint
Budget Committee during legislative sessions shall review all nonexempt
discretionary grants by state agencies and notify the agencies as to the
210 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
results of the review. The Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee
shall notify agencies of any other grants identified as not requiring review.

CHAPTER 5
DEPOSITORIES FOR PUBLIC FUNDS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Security for Deposits

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-5-101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Bank” or “banking institution” means a state bank, national
bank, savings bank, savings association, thrift, or other financial
institution authorized to do business and having a main office or branch
office in this state, which is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation; and
(2) “Public funds” or “funds” means funds handled by treasurers,
collectors, commissioners, sheriffs, clerks, and receivers appointed under §
14-62-104.

19-5-102. Legal funds.
The legal funds referred to in §§ 19-5-101 — 19-5-107 as being eligible
for deposit in depositories shall include funds that may come into the hands
of treasurers, collectors, commissioners, sheriffs, clerks, and receivers by
reason of their official capacities as commissioners.

19-5-103. Penalties.
(a)(1) It is a felony, punishable by fine of not more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or one (1) year in prison, or both, for an officer
of a bank to accept for deposit more public funds in the aggregate than that
amount designated by this section, § 19-5-101, § 19-5-102, and §§ 19-5-104 —
19-5-107.
(b)(1) More than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total general
deposits of public funds shall not be accepted until they have been reduced
211 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to the proper proportion of general deposits.
(2) When necessary, the depository boards may order a reduction
of deposits in a bank so as to conform to the twenty-five percent (25%)
limitation provided for in this section.
(3) A public officer knowingly depositing public funds in excess
of this amount shall likewise be guilty of a felony and subject to the same
penalty as prescribed in this section and shall be removed from office.
(c) The penalties provided in this section also shall apply in the
event of a depository bank’s investing any deposits in excess of the twenty-
five percent (25%) limitation in any manner other than that provided in § 19-
5-105(b) permitting a deposit in excess of the twenty-five percent (25%)
limitation.

19-5-104. Investment of public funds.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all public
funds shall be deposited into banks located in the state.
(b) A school district may seek a hardship waiver from the Legislative
Joint Auditing Committee from this section and deposit public funds into an
out-of-state bank if:
(1) The school district is designated as an isolated school
district under §§ 6-20-601 and 6-20-602;
(2) The school district lies on the borders of the state line;
(3) The nearest Arkansas bank is located at least eighteen (18)
miles from the administrative offices of the school district;
(4) The administrative offices of the school district are
located within six (6) miles from an out-of-state bank; and
(5) The out-of-state bank meets all other requirements
concerning collateralization of state funds.

19-5-105. Annual list of eligible banks.
(a) Annually, on December 1, the Bank Commissioner shall furnish to
the governing board of each city, or town officer, and the county board of
each county, and also any officer of any improvement district or any other
political subdivision, having the supervision of public funds or funds
belonging to the state or any political subdivision a list of all the banks
or banking institutions doing business in this state that are members of the
212 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The commissioner shall recommend the
maximum amount of deposit of public funds each bank shall be allowed to
receive. None of these public funds shall be deposited into any bank other
than those contained in the list.
(b)(1) The commissioner shall not recommend and a bank shall not
accept for deposit more public funds than twenty-five percent (25%) of the
total of its general deposits, exclusive of the public funds.
(2) Public money in excess of the amount allowed in this
section, if approved by the governing board, may be deposited into an
authorized bank if the excess deposit is carried in cash, United States
Government bonds, Housing and Home Finance Agency bonds, or demand loans on
cotton of the kind commonly known as “Commodity Credit Corporation loans”,
being only such loans as are guaranteed by the United States.

19-5-106. Depository boards.
(a)(1)(A) The quorum court of each county shall by ordinance establish
a county depository board.
(B) The county depository board shall be composed of the
county judge, the county treasurer and county collector, or the sheriff when
acting as ex officio tax collector, or those officials performing the duties
of the above officials when an elective county office has been changed in
accordance with Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 55.
(2) The board shall designate depositories and supervise the
depositing of all county funds and all other public funds held by the county
treasurer, except funds of a school district, and also shall designate
depositories and supervise the depositing of all funds collected and held by
the county collector.
(3) The board may also require county officials to settle with
the county treasurer more frequently than required by Arkansas law.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the
following persons shall constitute a three-member board to designate
depositories and supervise the depositing of municipal funds:
(A) A mayor;
(B) A city clerk or recorder or clerk-treasurer or
recorder-treasurer; and
(C) A city council member selected by the city council.
213 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Although the board shall not total more than three (3)
members, the city council may replace one (1) of the three (3) board members
listed in subdivision (b)(1) of this section with the city finance officer or
other official.
(3) A majority of the board members shall be necessary to
conduct business and to constitute a quorum.
(c) The commissioners of road, drainage, levee, and other improvement
districts shall designate depositories and supervise the depositing of funds
of their respective districts.
(d)(1) The board of directors of a school district shall constitute a
board to designate depositories and supervise the depositing of school
district funds.
(2) All school district funds, whether held by the treasurer of
the school district or by the county treasurer, shall be deposited as
designated by the board of directors.
(e) A receiver appointed under § 14-62-104 shall be a designated
depository and supervise the depositing of funds collected under § 14-62-101
et seq.

19-5-107. Depository agreements.
(a)(1) After the receipt from the Bank Commissioner of the list of
banks or banking institutions eligible for public deposits, the depository
boards shall:
(A) Designate the banks or banking institutions into which
the funds shall be deposited; and
(B) With each bank or banking institution designated under
subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, enter into a depository agreement and
any supplemental agreements under subsection (c) of this section needed to
perfect security of public deposits not fully insured directly by the United
States.
(2) The depository boards may at any time enter into depository
agreements with any new bank chartered if the bank is certified by the
commissioner as being eligible as a depository of public funds under the laws
of this state.
(3)(A) All depository agreements and supplemental agreements
required for creating an enforceable perfected security in collateral for
214 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
deposits of public funds shall continue in full force until the bank or
banking institution receives written notice of revocation by the depository
board or until there is a change of membership on the depository board as
prescribed in this subsection.
(B) Depository agreements and supplemental agreements
required to create an enforceable perfected security in collateral for
deposits shall be updated at the time a new treasurer takes office.
(C) Except as provided under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section, agreements required to be signed by all members of a depository
board shall be changed at the time of membership change on the depository
board.
(b)(1) The treasurers or other public officials or other persons
having custody of public funds shall deposit those public funds into the
designated depositories.
(2) The depositing of public funds as required under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section into the designated depositories shall relieve the
public officer or other person and his or her sureties from any liability for
the loss of the public funds by reason of the default or insolvency of any
depository.
(3) County officials shall make timely deposit and investment of
public funds to earn optimum interest consistent with the prudent investor
rule defined by Arkansas law.
(c)(1) County and municipal officials shall:
(A) Require security for the deposit of public funds in
the form of a demand deposit, a savings deposit, or a time deposit for
amounts not fully insured directly by the United States; and
(B) Enter into supplemental agreements with each
depository banking institution that satisfy the requirements of this
subsection.
(2)(A) The Treasurer of State shall make available upon request
to any county or municipality fillable depository agreement forms designed
for county and municipal governments and any necessary supplemental agreement
forms required for collateralizing public funds.
(B) The forms shall include language necessary to create
an enforceable perfected security interest in all collateral for deposits.
(3) Depository boards and banks or banking institutions giving
215 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
or holding collateral for deposits of public funds shall comply with federal
laws and regulations so that the governmental entity or political subdivision
depositing public funds holds a valid claim in deposits and collateral given
for those deposits against, and prevent avoidance of such a claim by, the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor or any similar deposit
insurance agency acting as receiver, conservator, or in any other capacity.
(4) All security required under this subsection shall meet the
requirements of an eligible security under § 19-5-203 and § 23-47-203(c).
(5) Public officials may require as a condition for placing
deposits or keeping funds on deposit such financial data as they need to make
an informed decision, including without limitation quarterly financial
statements, quarterly profit and loss statements, and tangible net worth or
capital-to-assets ratios.

19-5-108. Mortgages and securities as security.
When securities must be furnished by a depository in the State of
Arkansas as security for the deposit of funds, or when securities must be
deposited with an official of the State of Arkansas under a statute of this
state, mortgages insured and debentures issued by the Federal Housing
Administration and obligations of national mortgage associations shall be
considered eligible securities for those purposes.

19-5-109. Housing agency bonds as security.
All banks that are by law authorized to accept deposits of public funds
may tender, and all officers or boards whose duty it is to award contracts
for the deposit of public funds and all officers or boards whose duty it is
to accept security for the deposit of public funds may accept bonds of the
Housing and Home Finance Agency as security for deposits of public funds at
the face value of the bonds.

19-5-110. Farm credit obligations as security.
It is lawful for a person, firm, or corporation required by law to
maintain a cash deposit as public security, or in lieu of a cash deposit to
file a bond of approved security in favor of the State of Arkansas, to
deposit with the officer of the State of Arkansas designated as the custodian
of funds, in lieu of a cash deposit, an amount of notes, bonds, debentures,
216 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
or other similar obligations issued by the Federal Land Banks, Federal
Intermediate Credit Banks, or Banks for Cooperatives or any other obligations
issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, and acts amendatory thereto, which
at their market value equal or are in excess of the amount required as a cash
deposit.

19-5-111. Additional authority for investment of public funds —
Definition.
(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including §§ 19-5-103 and
19-5-105, the state or local government and any trusts established under the
Local Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 14-79-101 et seq., may invest
public funds through an eligible bank under § 19-5-105 if:
(1) The bank arranges for the deposit of all or a portion of the
funds into one (1) or more banks or savings and loan associations located
inside the United States for the account of the state or local government or
trust;
(2) Each deposit is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation for one hundred percent (100%) of the principal and accrued
interest of the deposit;
(3) The bank acts as custodian of the deposits made for the
account of the state or local government or trust and, as custodian, is
charged with the care of the deposits and their segregation in appropriate
records reflecting the total principal amount of the deposits for each
custodial account; and
(4) On the date the funds are deposited according to subdivision
(a)(1) of this section, the bank receives an amount of deposits from
customers of other financial institutions located inside the United States
that is equal to or greater than the amount of the funds invested by the
state or local government or trust.
(b) For any investment of public funds under this section, the
provisions of §§ 19-5-106 and 19-5-107 apply only to the eligible bank
selected under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Additional security shall not be required for investments of
public funds under this section.
(d) As used in this section, “local government” means a city, county,
town, or other political subdivision of the State of Arkansas, including, but
217 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
not limited to, any:
(1) School district or community college district;
(2) Improvement or other taxing or assessing district;
(3) Department, instrumentality, or agency of a city, county, or
other political subdivision, including without limitation any local fire and
police pension or relief funds; and
(4) Local government association as defined in § 14-79-103.

Subchapter 2 — Security for Deposits

19-5-201. Legislative intent and construction.
The law specifying what securities may be accepted as security for the
deposit of public funds of the State of Arkansas or any political subdivision
of the state is inadequate in that it is unduly restrictive on the types of
securities that may be accepted. The types of securities that may be accepted
as security for deposits of public funds is in need of being expanded, and
this subchapter is supplementary to and does not repeal any existing law that
specifies certain securities that may be accepted as security for deposit of
public funds. To that end, this subchapter is declared to be remedial and
shall be liberally construed.

19-5-202. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, “public funds” means without limitation
funds of:
(1) The State of Arkansas, or any agency, department, board,
commission, or instrumentality thereof;
(2) A political subdivision of the State of Arkansas, or an
agency thereof;
(3) A school board or school district;
(4) An improvement or other taxing or assessing district;
(5) A public corporation or authority created by or recognized
by the State of Arkansas, or any political subdivision thereof; and
(6) A receiver appointed under § 14-62-104.

19-5-203. Eligible security for deposits.
(a) When a depository in the State of Arkansas must furnish security
218 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for the deposit of any public funds pursuant to Arkansas law or when security
must be granted to a public official in connection with public funds, the
following shall be considered as eligible security for such purposes and
subject to the depositor's discretion regarding the suitability of the
collateral:
(1) The pledge or escrow of the assets of the bank consisting of
an investment in which a state bank may invest under § 23-47-401;
(2) A surety bond issued by an insurance company licensed under
the laws of the State of Arkansas and either:
(A) Rated “A” or better by any one (1) or more of the
following rating agencies:
(i) A.M. Best Company, Inc.;
(ii) Standard & Poor's Insurance Rating Service;
(iii) Moody's Investors Service, Inc.; or
(iv) Duff & Phelps Credit Rating Co.; or
(B) Listed on the then-current United States Department of
the Treasury Listing of Approved Sureties;
(3) Private deposit insurance issued by an insurance company
licensed under the laws of the State of Arkansas and either:
(A) Rated “A” or better by any one (1) or more of the
following rating agencies:
(i) A.M. Best Company, Inc.;
(ii) Standard & Poor's Insurance Rating Service;
(iii) Moody's Investors Service, Inc.; or
(iv) Duff & Phelps Credit Rating Co.; or
(B) Listed on the then-current United States Department of
the Treasury Listing of Approved Sureties; or
(4) An irrevocable standby letter of credit issued by a Federal
Home Loan Bank.
(b) The aggregate market value of assets pledged or escrowed or the
face amount of the surety bond, private deposit insurance, or letter of
credit securing the deposit of funds by a single depositor shall be equal to
or exceed the amount of the deposit to be secured.
(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if a political
subdivision, school district, improvement district, or other issuer has
defaulted on any bonds or other obligations within the preceding period of
219 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
ten (10) years, bonds or other obligations of the defaulting political
subdivision, school district, improvement district, or other issuer are not
eligible as security for the deposit of public funds or as security required
to be deposited in connection with public funds.

CHAPTER 6
PUBLIC OBLIGATIONS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. State Obligations
Subchapter 3. Refunding Bonds
Subchapter 4. Registered Public Obligations Act of Arkansas
Subchapter 5. Revenue Bond Reporting Act
Subchapter 6. Revenue Bond Act of 1987
Subchapter 7. Taxable Bond Act of 1989

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-6-101. Form of bonds that may be issued — Definitions.
(a) When existing Arkansas law authorizes a board, commission, or
agency of the State of Arkansas or a county, municipality, or improvement
district to issue bonds or coupon bonds, the authorization shall be deemed
to, and is extended to, include the authority to issue bonds that may be
either coupon bonds, payable to bearer, or may be registrable as to principal
only with interest coupons, or may be registrable as to both principal and
interest without coupons. These bonds may be exchanged for bonds of another
denomination, which bonds of another denomination may in turn be either
coupon bonds payable to bearer or coupon bonds registrable as to principal
only, or bonds registrable as to both principal and interest without coupons,
as the governing body determines.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Improvement district” means all improvement districts,
drainage districts, levee districts, and other special districts formed for
the purpose of constructing or maintaining a local improvement to be financed
by the assessment of benefits upon the real property in the district and the
levy of a tax on those assessed benefits;
220 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) “Municipality” means a city of the first class, a city of
the second class, or an incorporated town; and
(3) “Governing body” means the board of commissioners, city
council, county court, board of trustees, or other person or body given the
power and duty by the state under existing law to issue bonds by the state, a
board, commission, or agency of the state, or a county, municipality, or
improvement district.
(c) This section shall be liberally construed, and the authority set
forth in this section is cumulative and supplemental to all other provisions
of law authorizing the issuance of registrable bonds.

19-6-102. Replacement of lost, destroyed, or stolen bonds.
(a) In cases in which a valid bond, note, interest coupon, or evidence
of indebtedness, that is, an “instrument”, issued by the State of Arkansas,
or any of its departments, agencies, or political subdivisions, including
without limitation school districts and improvement districts of all kinds,
becomes lost, mislaid, destroyed, or stolen, the body that issued the
instrument, or its successor, shall issue and deliver to the one owning the
right, title, and interest to and in the instrument a replacement instrument,
but only on the filing with the body of:
(1) An affidavit reciting ownership of all right, title, or
interest in and to the lost, mislaid, destroyed, or stolen instrument and
giving its name, the name of the board, commission, or body that issued it,
the date of maturity, the denomination and number and that of a lost,
mislaid, destroyed, or stolen interest coupon appertaining thereto, and
briefly describing the circumstance of the loss, mislaying, destruction, or
theft; and
(2) A bond in double the face amount of the replacement,
including any interest coupons affixed thereto, with a surety company
licensed to do business in Arkansas as surety thereon, conditioned that if
the principal, the heirs, legal representatives, successors, or assigns of
the principal, or any of them, in case the instrument so lost, mislaid,
destroyed, or stolen is found or comes into the hands or power of any of
them, or into the hands, custody, or power of any other person, shall
deliver, or cause it to be delivered to the obligor for cancellation, and
also shall at all times indemnify and save harmless the obligor from and
221 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
against all loss, claims, actions, suits, damages, charges, or expenses of
any nature and character by reason of the lost, mislaid, destroyed, or stolen
instrument, or the issuance of a replacement in lieu thereof, or the paying
or crediting as prescribed of the face amount of the lost, mislaid,
destroyed, or stolen instrument without the surrender thereof, then the
obligation shall be void, otherwise to remain in full force and effect.
(b) This section does not:
(1) Limit or abridge any defense that the obligor may have
against the lost, mislaid, destroyed, or stolen instrument; or
(2) Waive any provision of any statute of limitations.

19-6-103. Paying agents to remit funds after three years.
(a) Paying agents with whom the state or any political subdivision of
the state has deposited or shall deposit funds for the payment of obligations
of the state or of any political subdivision of the state shall remit to the
Treasurer of State all the funds that have been in the paying agents' hands
for a period of three (3) years.
(b) The Treasurer of State shall invest these funds from paying agents
in government or state bonds that the Treasurer of State shall hold in trust
for the holders of the obligations for the payment of which the funds were
deposited with the paying agents.
(c) On the presentation to the Treasurer of State of any valid
obligation that was payable out of any fund remitted to the Treasurer of
State by a paying agent, the Treasurer of State shall sell the bonds
purchased with the fund and redeem the obligation.

19-6-104. Bonds held five years.
After the Treasurer of State has purchased and then held a government
bond or state bond for a period of five (5) years, the Treasurer of State
shall:
(1) Liquidate the bond and place the proceeds to the credit of
the General Revenue Fund Account; or
(2) Remit the bond to the political subdivision of the state to
which the bond belongs.

19-6-105. Pay until barred.
222 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Every bond issued by the state or by a political subdivision of the
state shall be paid by the state or by the political subdivision unless it is
barred by the statute of limitations.

Subchapter 2 — State Obligations

19-6-201. Authority of State Board of Finance.
The State Board of Finance may:
(1) Take such action as may be provided by law for the issuance
of refunding bonds for outstanding obligations to the State of Arkansas;
(2) Issue replacement bonds, either typewritten, printed, or
lithographed, for lost, mislaid, destroyed, or stolen bonds of the State of
Arkansas in the manner and within the limitations provided by § 19-6-102;
(3) Take such action as may appear necessary or desirable to
collect funds that may have been in the hands of paying agents for a period
of three (3) years or longer and to invest any funds so collected in the
manner provided by §§ 19-6-103 — 19-6-105; and
(4) Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as may
appear necessary or desirable to:
(A) Retire the direct bonded debt of the State of Arkansas
in an orderly manner;
(B) Safeguard state funds pledged for the payment of the
obligations; and
(C) Maintain and improve the credit standing of the State
of Arkansas.

19-6-202. Authorized paying agent.
(a) The agent of the state for payment of the maturing principal of,
and interest on, its direct obligation bonds, irrespective of any other
legislation on the subject, is for all obligations a bank located in this
state, to be designated by the State Board of Finance.
(b) Fees of the paying agent are as follows:
(1) For payment of interest, one-fourth of one percent (¼ of 1%)
of the total amount paid; and
(2) For payment of principal of each maturity, the aggregate
thereof to be calculated as follows, with each paying agent to receive its
223 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
respective proportion based upon the amount paid by it:
(A) One-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) on the first one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) paid;
(B) One-twentieth of one percent (1/20 of 1%) on the next
nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) paid;
(C) One-thirtieth of one percent (1/30 of 1%) on the next
four million dollars ($4,000,000) paid; and
(D) One-fortieth of one percent (1/40 of 1%) on all
amounts paid in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000).
(c) If an agent so designated refuses to accept the paying agency or
of an agent accepting this designation thereafter resigns or fails to furnish
service satisfactory to the board, the board shall name another commercial
bank as the successor paying agent.
(d) A paying agent shall render monthly statements of account to, and
in such form as shall be required by the Treasurer of State. With those
monthly statements, the paying agent shall transmit all paid and cancelled
obligations.

19-6-203. Registration.
The Treasurer of State is the official registrar of all direct
obligation bonds of this state. Upon the application of the holder of any
such obligations, the Treasurer of State shall register them as to principal
only or as to both principal and interest. Thereafter, upon similar
application, he or she shall discharge the obligations from registration.

19-6-204. Retirement of bonds before maturity.
(a) Whenever appropriations and funds are available, the State Board
of Finance may purchase direct obligations of this state in advance of
maturity for the purpose of retirement under the procedure set forth in this
subchapter.
(b) All obligations purchased as prescribed, and the unmatured
interest coupons attached to those obligations, shall be cancelled by
perforation.

19-6-205. Cancelled obligations.
The Treasurer of State shall classify and record all paid and cancelled
224 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
state obligations and, from time to time as directed by the State Board of
Finance, destroy these obligations by burning them to ashes after preparing
for execution certificates of incineration, which shall set forth a detailed
description thereof.

Subchapter 3 — Refunding Bonds

19-6-301. Delivery and deposit in trust — Definition.
(a) When refunding bonds are issued by the state, a county,
municipality, school district, state-supported educational institution,
improvement district of any kind, agency, or political subdivision, which may
be called “issuing authorities”, the bonds may either be sold or delivered in
exchange for the outstanding obligations being refunded. If sold, the
proceeds may be either applied to the payment of the outstanding obligations
or deposited into trust for the retirement of the obligations, either at
maturity or upon any authorized redemption date as specified in the
ordinance, resolution, order, or other instrument authorizing the issuance of
the refunding bonds.
(b) The bonds may be issued in the principal amount necessary to pay
the principal of, interest on, redemption premiums, if any, trustee's and
paying agent's fees, and charges in connection with the obligations being
refunded to maturity or to the redemption date specified in the instrument
authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds, these items to be called
“total debt service requirements of the obligations being refunded”, to pay
expenses incidental thereto, and to pay the expenses of authorizing and
issuing the refunding bonds.
(c)(1)(A) The bonds may be delivered when moneys or investment
securities or a combination thereof, sufficient to meet, as and when due, the
total debt service requirements of the obligations being refunded, have been
irrevocably deposited into trust with a bank or trust company organized under
the laws of the United States or any state of the United States.
(B) The bank or trust company shall be qualified to
receive trust funds pursuant to a trust agreement requiring the bank or trust
company to apply the trust funds to the payment, as and when due, of total
debt service requirements of the obligations being refunded. If the bank or
trust company is not the paying agent for the obligations being refunded, the
225 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
trust agreement shall require it to pay over trust moneys to the paying agent
as and when required for the timely meeting of total debt service
requirements of the obligations being refunded.
(2)(A) As used in this section, “investment securities” means
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which
are fully guaranteed by, the United States, maturing and bearing interest at
such times and in such amounts as, together with uninvested trust moneys,
will make available sufficient moneys to meet, as and when due, total debt
service requirements of the obligations being refunded.
(B) In determining the sufficiency of the trust deposit,
the principal amount of the investment securities and the interest to be
earned on them shall be considered.

19-6-302. Sale when old bonds cannot be presented.
(a)(1) Where refunding bonds are to be issued by a municipality,
county, state-supported educational institution, or improvement district of
any kind and the bonds to be refunded cannot be presented for payment and
cancellation simultaneously with the payment and delivery of the refunding
bonds, the refunding bonds may be delivered when the purchase money is
deposited into trust.
(2) The purchase money may be deposited for the purpose of
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds to be refunded with an
insured bank or trust company in the state that is otherwise fully qualified
to receive trust funds if the bonds to be refunded have fixed maturity dates
of not to exceed twelve (12) months from the date of the payment and delivery
of the refunding bonds or if the bonds are redeemable before maturity and
have been duly called for payment.
(b) If the bank or trust company is not the paying agent for the bonds
to be refunded, the purchase money shall be paid over by it to the paying
agent three (3) days before the maturity of the bonds or three (3) days
before the date for which the bonds have been called for payment.

19-6-303. Private sale to United States.
Refunding bonds authorized to be sold by the State of Arkansas or an
agency or instrumentality of the state at public sale, notwithstanding the
provision for public sale, nevertheless may be sold to the United States or
226 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
an agency of the United States at private sale without public advertisement
if the bonds are sold at not less than par and at a rate of interest not
greater than the rate borne by the bonds to be refunded.

19-6-304. Interest rate.
(a) A county, school district, improvement district, or municipality
may refund bonds issued under statutory or constitutional authority at any
time outstanding by the issuance of bonds bearing a rate or rates of interest
that the issuer deems to be just and fair, whether or not greater than the
rate or rates of interest borne by the bonds being refunded.
(b) Bonds shall not be refunded at a rate of interest greater than the
maximum rate set by the statutes or constitutional provision under which the
bonds were originally authorized.

19-6-305. Conversion privilege.
The refunding bonds may be issued with the privilege of conversion to a
lower rate or rates of interest if the issuer receives no less and pays no
more than the issuer would receive or pay if the bonds were not converted.
The conversion is subject to the approval of the issuer.

19-6-306. Inclusion of redemption premiums in principal.
The State of Arkansas, an agency of the state, a county, a
municipality, a school district, an improvement district of any kind, or any
other political subdivision of the state, which may be called “issuing
authorities”, may include in the principal of refunding bonds the amount of
redemption premiums required to be paid to accomplish the redemption of the
bonds being refunded.

Subchapter 4 — Registered Public Obligations Act of Arkansas

19-6-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas”.

19-6-402. Purpose.
(a) The Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., provides that
227 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
interest with respect to certain obligations may not be exempt from federal
income taxation unless the obligations are in registered form. It is
therefore a matter of state concern that public entities be authorized to
provide for the issuance of obligations in such form. It is a purpose of this
subchapter to empower all public entities to establish and maintain a system
pursuant to which obligations may be issued in registered form within the
meaning of the applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
§ 1 et seq.
(b) Obligations have traditionally been issued in bearer rather than
in registered form, and a change from bearer to registered form may affect
the relationships, rights, and duties of issuers of and the persons that deal
with obligations and, by such effect, the costs of issuing obligations. Such
effects will impact the various issuers and varieties of obligations
differently depending upon their legal and financial characteristics, their
markets, and their adaptability to recent and prospective technological and
organizational developments. It is therefore a matter of state concern that
public entities be provided flexibility in the development of such systems
and control over system incidents so as to accommodate the different impacts.
It is a purpose of this subchapter to empower the establishment, maintenance,
and amendment, from time to time, of differing systems of registration of
obligations so as to accommodate the differing impacts upon issuers and
varieties of obligations. It is further a purpose of this subchapter to
authorize systems that will facilitate the prompt and accurate transfer of
registered public obligations and develop practices with regard to the
registration and transfer of registered public obligations.

19-6-403. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Authorized officer” means any individual required or
permitted, alone or with others, by any provision of law or by the issuing
public entity, to execute, on behalf of the public entity, a certificated
registered public obligation or a writing relating to an uncertificated
registered public obligation;
(2) “Certificated registered public obligation” means a
registered public obligation that is represented by an instrument;
(3) “Facsimile seal” means the reproduction by engraving,
228 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
imprinting, stamping, or by other means of the seal of the issuer, official,
or official body;
(4) “Facsimile signature” means the reproduction by engraving,
imprinting, stamping, or by other means of a manual signature;
(5) “Financial intermediary” means a bank, broker, clearing
corporation, or other person, or the nominee of any of them, that in the
ordinary course of its business maintains registered public obligation
accounts for its customers, when so acting;
(6) “Issuer” means a public entity that issues an obligation;
(7) “Obligation” means an agreement of a public entity to pay
principal and any interest on the principal, whether in the form of a
contract to repay borrowed money, a lease, an installment purchase agreement,
or otherwise and includes a share, participation, or other interest in any
such agreement;
(8) “Official actions” means the actions by statute, order,
ordinance, resolution, contract, or other authorized means by which the
issuer provides for issuance of a registered public obligation;
(9) “Official or official body” means the officer or board that
is empowered under the laws of one (1) or more states, including this state,
to provide for original issuance of an obligation of the issuer by defining
the obligation and its terms, conditions, and other incidents, the successor
of any such official or official body, and such other person or group of
persons as shall be assigned duties of an official or official body with
respect to a registered public obligation under applicable law from time to
time;
(10)(A) “Public entity” means an entity, department, or agency
that is empowered under the laws of one (1) or more states, territories,
possessions of the United States, or the District of Columbia, including this
state, to issue obligations, any interest with respect to which, under any
provision of law, may be provided an exemption from the income tax referred
to in the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.
(B) “Public entity” includes without limitation this
state, an entity deriving powers from and acting pursuant to the Arkansas
Constitution or a special legislative act, a political subdivision, a
municipal corporation, a state university or college, a school or other
special district, a joint agreement entity, a public authority, a public
229 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
facilities board, a nonprofit corporation, and other organizations;
(11) “Registered public obligation” means an obligation issued
by a public entity pursuant to a system of registration;
(12) “System of registration” and its variants means a plan that
provides:
(A) With respect to a certificated registered public
obligation, that:
(i) The certificated registered public obligation
specifies a person entitled to the registered public obligation and the
rights it represents; and
(ii) Transfer of the certificated registered public
obligation and the rights it represents may be registered upon books
maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer; and
(B) With respect to an uncertificated registered public
obligation, that:
(i) Books maintained by or on behalf of the issuer
for the purpose of registration of the transfer of a registered public
obligation specify a person entitled to the registered public obligation and
the rights evidenced thereby; and
(ii) Transfer of the uncertificated registered
public obligation and the rights evidenced thereby be registered upon the
book; and
(13) “Uncertificated registered public obligation” means a
registered public obligation that is not represented by an instrument.

19-6-404. Applicability.
(a) Unless at any time before or at original issuance of a registered
public obligation the official or official body of the issuer determines
otherwise, this subchapter applies to the registered public obligation,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary. When this subchapter is
applicable, no contrary provision applies.
(b) This subchapter does not limit or prevent the issuance of
obligations in any other form or manner authorized by law.
(c) Unless determined otherwise pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, this subchapter applies with respect to obligations that have been
approved by vote, referendum, or hearing that authorizes or permits the
230 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
authorization of obligations in bearer and registered form or in bearer form
only. These obligations need not be resubmitted for a further vote,
referendum, or hearing for the purpose of authorizing or permitting the
authorization of registered public obligations pursuant to this subchapter.

19-6-405. Construction.
(a) This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the
intent and purposes of this subchapter and is the sole authority required for
the accomplishment of those purposes.
(b) This subchapter shall be construed in conjunction with the Uniform
Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq., and the principles of contract law
relative to the registration and transfer of obligations.

19-6-406. System of registration.
(a)(1) Each issuer may establish and maintain a system of registration
with respect to each obligation that it issues. The system of registration
may either be a system pursuant to which:
(A) Only certificated registered public obligations are
issued;
(B) Only uncertificated registered public obligations are
issued; or
(C) Both certificated registered public obligations and
uncertificated registered public obligations are issued.
(2) The issuer may amend, discontinue, and reinstitute any
system of registration, from time to time, subject to covenants.
(b) The system of registration shall be established, amended,
discontinued, or reinstituted for the issuer by, and shall be maintained for
the issuer as provided by, the official or official body.
(c) The system of registration shall be described in the registered
public obligation or in the official actions that provide for original
issuance of the registered public obligation and in subsequent official
actions providing for amendments and other matters from time to time. The
description may be by reference to a program of the issuer that is
established by the official or official body.
(d)(1) The system of registration shall define the methods by which
transfer of the registered public obligation shall be effective with respect
231 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to the issuer and by which payment of principal and any interest shall be
made.
(2) The system of registration may:
(A) Permit the issuance of registered public obligations
in any denomination to represent several registered public obligations of
smaller denominations; and
(B)(i) Provide for:
(a) The form of any certificated registered
public obligation or of any writing relating to an uncertificated registered
public obligation;
(b) Identifying numbers or other designations;
(c) A sufficient supply of certificates for
subsequent transfers;
(d) Record and payment dates;
(e) Varying denominations;
(f) Communications to holders or owners of
obligations; and
(g) Accounting, cancelled certificate
destruction, registration and release of security interests, and other
incidental matters.
(ii) Unless the issuer otherwise provides, the
record date for interest payable on the first or fifteenth day of a month
shall be the fifteenth day or the last business day of the preceding month,
respectively, and for interest payable on other than the first or fifteenth
day of a month, shall be the fifteenth calendar day before the interest
payment date.
(e) Under a system of registration pursuant to which both certificated
registered public obligation and uncertificated registered public obligations
are issued, both types of registered public obligations may be regularly
issued, or one (1) type may be regularly issued and the other type issued
only under described circumstances or to particular described categories of
owners. Provision may be made for registration and release of security
interest in registered public obligations.
(f) The system of registration may include covenants of the issuer as
to amendments, discontinuances, and reinstitutions of the system of
registration and the effect of such on the exemption of interest from the
232 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
income tax provided for by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.
(g) Whenever an issuer issues an uncertificated registered public
obligation, the system of registration may provide that a true copy of the
official actions of the issuer relating to the uncertificated registered
public obligations be maintained by the issuer or by the person, if any,
maintaining the system of registration on behalf of the issuer, so long as
the uncertificated registered public obligation remains outstanding and
unpaid. A copy of these official actions, verified to be such by an
authorized officer, are admissible before any court of record, administrative
body, or arbitration panel without further authentication.
(h) This subchapter does not preclude a conversion from one of the
forms of registered public obligations provided for by this subchapter to a
form of obligation not provided for by this subchapter if interest on the
obligation so converted will continue to be exempt from the income tax
provided for by the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.
(i) The rights provided by other laws with respect to obligations in
forms not provided for by this subchapter, to the extent not inconsistent
with this subchapter, shall apply with respect to registered public
obligations issued in forms authorized by this subchapter.

19-6-407. Signatures required.
(a)(1) A certificated registered public obligation shall be executed
by the issuer by the manual or facsimile signatures of authorized officers.
(2) A signature of an authorized officer may be attested by the
manual or facsimile signature of another authorized officer.
(b) In addition to the signatures referred to in subsection (a) of
this section, a certificated registered public obligation or any writing
relating to an uncertificated registered public obligation may include a
certificate signed by the manual or facsimile signature of an authenticating
agent, registrar, transfer agent, or the like.
(c) At least one (1) signature of an authorized officer or other
person required or permitted to be placed on a certificated registered public
obligation shall be a manual signature.

19-6-408. Signature of predecessor in office.
(a) A certificated registered public obligation signed by the
233 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
authorized officers at the time of the signing of the certificated registered
public obligation remains valid and binding, notwithstanding that before the
issuance thereof any of the officers had ceased to fill their respective
offices.
(b)(1) An authorized officer empowered to sign any certificated
registered public obligation may adopt as and for the signature of the
officer the signature of a predecessor in office if the predecessor's
signature appears on the certificated registered public obligation.
(2) An authorized officer incurs no liability by adoption of a
predecessor's signature that would not be incurred by the authorized officer
if the signature were that of the authorized officer.

19-6-409. Seal.
When a seal is required or permitted in the execution of a certificated
registered public obligation, an authorized officer may cause the seal to be
printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile on the
certificated registered public obligation. The facsimile seal has the same
legal effect as the impression of the seal.

19-6-410. Appointment of agents by issuer.
(a)(1) An issuer may:
(A) Appoint for such term as may be agreed, including for
so long as a registered public obligation may be outstanding, corporate or
other authenticating agents, transfer agents, registrars, and paying or other
agents; and
(B) Specify the terms of the corporate or other
authenticating agents, transfer agents, registrars, and paying or other
agents' appointment, including their rights, their compensation and duties,
limits upon their liabilities, and provision for their payment of liquidated
damages in the event of breach of certain of the duties imposed. These
liquidated damages may be made payable to the issuer, the owner, or a
financial intermediary.
(2) Corporate or other authenticating agents, transfer agents,
registrars, and paying or other agents appointed under this section do not
have to have an office or do business within this state.
(b)(1) An issuer may agree with custodian banks and financial
234 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
intermediaries, and nominees of any of them, in connection with the
establishment and maintenance by others of a central depository system for
the transfer of pledge of registered public obligations.
(2) Any such custodian banks and financial intermediaries, and
nominees, if qualified and acting as fiduciaries, may also serve as
authenticating agents, transfer agents, registrars, or paying or other agents
of the issuer with respect to the same issue of registered public
obligations.
(c) This section does not preclude the issuer from performing, either
alone or jointly with other issuers, a transfer, registration,
authentication, payment, or other function described in this section.

19-6-411. Payment of costs.
(a)(1) Before or at original issuance of registered public
obligations, an issuer may provide as a part of a system of registration
that:
(A) The transferor or transferee of the registered public
obligations pay all or a designated part of the costs of the system of
registration as a condition precedent to transfer;
(B) Costs be paid out of proceeds of the registered public
obligations; or
(C) Both methods in subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B) of this
section be used.
(2) The issuer is liable for the portion of the costs of the
system of registration not provided to be paid for by the transferor or
transferee or out of proceeds.
(b) As a part of a system of registration, the issuer may provide for
reimbursement or for satisfaction of its liability by payment by others. The
issuer may:
(1) Enter into agreements with others respecting the
reimbursement or payment;
(2) Establish fees and charges pursuant to the agreements or
otherwise; and
(3) Provide that the amount or estimated amount of the fees and
charges shall be reimbursed or paid from the same sources and by means of the
same collection and enforcement procedures and with the same priority and
235 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
effect as with respect to the obligations.

19-6-412. Reciprocal recognition for obligations.
Obligations issued by public entities under the laws of one (1) or more
states, territories, possessions, or the District of Columbia, which are in
registered form, whether or not represented by an instrument, and which,
except for their form, satisfy the requirements with regard to security for
deposits of moneys of public agencies prescribed pursuant to any law of this
state, satisfy all such requirements, even though they are in registered
form, if a security interest in the obligations is perfected on behalf of the
public agencies whose moneys are so deposited.

19-6-413. Registration records.
(a) With regard to the ownership of or security interest in registered
public obligations, records are not subject to inspection or copying under
any law of this state relating to the right of the public to inspect or copy
public records, notwithstanding any law to the contrary.
(b) Registration records of the issuer may be maintained at locations
within or without this state that the issuer determines.

19-6-414. Exemption of interest from taxation.
The state covenants with the owners of registered public obligations
that it will not amend or repeal this subchapter if the effect may be to
impair the exemption from income taxation of interest on registered public
obligations.

Subchapter 5 — Revenue Bond Reporting Act

19-6-501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Revenue Bond
Reporting Act”.

19-6-502. Annual report.
(a) All state and local agencies, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education, and authorities authorized by the state and cities and
counties shall annually file a report with the State Board of Finance, on or
236 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
before October 1, reflecting any revenue bonds that have been issued and have
not been liquidated as of the preceding July 1 by those governmental units.
(b) The report shall contain:
(1) The purpose for which the revenue bonds were issued;
(2) The total dollar amount issued;
(3) The percentage interest rate payable under the revenue
bonds;
(4) The total dollar amount outstanding;
(5) The repayment schedule; and
(6) The source, type, and amount of pledged revenues for the
bonds.
(c) The Secretary of the State Board of Finance shall compile a
summary report of all revenue bonds from information provided under this
section and present the summary report to the Legislative Council as soon as
practicable after each October 1.

Subchapter 6 — Revenue Bond Act of 1987

19-6-601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Revenue Bond
Act of 1987”.

19-6-602. Legislative determination.
The people of the State of Arkansas, by the adoption of Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 65, have expressed their intention to provide
governmental units expanded power and authority with respect to the creation
of bonded indebtedness for capital improvements of a public nature,
facilities for the securing and developing of industry or agriculture, and
other purposes as defined and prescribed by the General Assembly.

19-6-603. Legislative intent.
It is the specific intent of this subchapter that the provisions of
this subchapter are procedural only and are supplemental to other
constitutional or statutory provisions now existing or hereafter adopted that
may authorize the issuance of revenue bonds for the financing of capital
improvements. This subchapter is not a restriction or limitation upon
237 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
alternative means of financing previously available or hereafter made
available to municipalities or counties for the purposes set forth in this
subchapter.

19-6-604. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means:
(A) Bonds issued pursuant to an act of the General
Assembly under the authority of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 65; and
(B) All bonds or other obligations, the repayment of which
are secured by rents, loan payments, user fees, charges, or other revenues
derived from any special fund or source other than assessments for local
improvements and taxes;
(2) “Capital improvements of a public nature” or “capital
improvements” means, whether obtained by purchase, lease, construction,
reconstruction, restoration, improvement, alteration, repair, or other means:
(A) Any physical public betterment or improvement or any
preliminary plans, studies, or surveys relative thereto;
(B) Lands or rights in land, including without limitation
leases, air rights, easements, rights-of-way, or licenses; and
(C) Any furnishings, machinery, vehicles, apparatus, or
equipment for any public betterment or improvement, including without
limitation:
(i) Any facilities for state agencies, city or town
halls, courthouses and other administrative, executive, or other public
offices;
(ii) Court facilities;
(iii) Jails;
(iv) Firefighting facilities and apparatus;
(v) Public health facilities and apparatus;
(vi) Hospitals, nursing homes, and similar extended
care facilities;
(vii) Residential housing for low and moderate
income, elderly persons or individuals with disabilities and their families;
(viii) Parking garages or other facilities;
(ix) Educational and training facilities for public
238 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
employees;
(x) Auditoriums, stadiums, convention halls, and
similar public meeting or entertainment facilities;
(xi) Ambulance and other emergency medical service
facilities;
(xii) Civil defense facilities;
(xiii) Air and water pollution control facilities;
(xiv) Drainage and flood control facilities;
(xv) Storm sewers;
(xvi) Arts and crafts centers;
(xvii) Museums;
(xviii) Libraries;
(xix) Public parks, playgrounds, or other public
open space;
(xx) Marinas;
(xxi) Swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses,
camping facilities, gymnasiums, and other recreational facilities;
(xxii) Tourist information and assistance centers;
(xxiii) Historical, cultural, natural, or folklore
sites;
(xxiv) Fair and exhibition facilities;
(xxv) Streets and street lighting, alleys,
sidewalks, roads, bridges, and viaducts;
(xxvi) Airports, passenger or freight terminals,
hangars, and related facilities;
(xxvii) Barge terminals, ports, harbors, ferries,
wharves, docks, and similar marine services;
(xxviii) Slack water harbors, water resource
facilities, waterfront development facilities, and navigation facilities;
(xxix) Public transportation facilities;
(xxx) Public water systems and related transmission
and distribution facilities, storage facilities, wells, impounding
reservoirs, treatment plants, lakes, dams, watercourses, and water rights;
(xxxi) Sewage collection systems and treatment
plants;
(xxxii) Maintenance and storage buildings and
239 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
facilities;
(xxxiii) Police and sheriff stations, apparatus, and
training facilities;
(xxxiv) Incinerators;
(xxxv) Garbage and solid waste disposal, compacting,
and recycling facilities of every kind;
(xxxvi) Gas and electric generation, transmission,
and distribution systems, including without limitation hydroelectric
generating facilities, dams, powerhouses, and related facilities; and
(xxxvii) Social and rehabilitative facilities;
(3) “Governing body” means:
(A) With respect to any governmental unit defined in
subdivision (4)(A) of this section, the Governor;
(B) With respect to any governmental unit defined in
subdivision (4)(B) of this section, the:
(i) County court of a county;
(ii) Board of directors of a regional water
distribution district, regional wastewater district, or regional solid waste
management district; or
(iii) Council, board of directors, board of
commissioners, or similar elected body of a city or town; and
(C) With respect to an authority created under the
Regional Airport Act, § 14-362-101 et seq. between two (2) or more political
subdivisions of the State of Arkansas, the Governor, the county court of a
county participating in the agreement, or the council, board of directors,
board of commissioners, or similar elected body of a city or town
participating in the agreement;
(4) “Governmental unit” means:
(A) The State of Arkansas or an agency or other
instrumentality of the state other than an institution of higher education;
and
(B) A county, municipality, regional water distribution
district, regional wastewater district, regional solid waste management
district, or other political subdivision of the state, or an agency or
instrumentality of a political subdivision of the state; and
(5)(A) “Industrial enterprise” means facilities for
240 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
manufacturing, producing, processing, assembling, repairing, extracting,
warehousing, distributing, communications, computer services, transportation,
corporate and management offices, and services provided in connection with
any of the foregoing, in isolation or in any combination, that involve the
creation of new or additional employment or the retention of existing
employment, and industrial parks.
(B) “Industrial enterprise” does not include a shopping
center, retail store, shop, or other similar undertaking that is solely or
predominantly of a commercial retail nature.

19-6-605. Construction.
This subchapter shall be construed liberally to effectuate the
legislative intent and the purposes of this subchapter as complete and
independent authority for the performance of each act and thing authorized in
this subchapter. All powers granted in this subchapter shall be broadly
interpreted to effectuate that intent and those purposes and not as a
limitation of powers.

19-6-606. Proclamation, order, etc., authorizing issuance of bonds.
(a) When a governmental unit determines the need to issue bonds for
capital improvements of a public nature or industrial enterprise, the
governing body shall authorize the issuance of those bonds by proclamation,
order, ordinance, or resolution clearly stating the principal amount of and
the purpose or purposes for which the bonds are to be issued.
(b)(1) Only upon the proclamation, order, ordinance, or resolution of
the governing body shall the governmental unit be authorized to issue the
bonds.
(2) A proclamation, order, ordinance, or resolution is not
required for the issuance of refunding bonds, including refunding bonds when
the principal amount of the new bonds to be issued exceeds the outstanding
principal amount of the prior bonds or notes to be refunded.

19-6-607. Hearing.
(a) A proclamation, order, or ordinance prescribed by § 19-6-606 shall
be not entered by a governing body until the governing body, the governmental
unit, or the delegate of either has conducted a public hearing:
241 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) In the case of a regional water distribution district,
regional wastewater district, or regional solid waste management district
issuing bonds, in the county seat of the county that has the greatest amount
of territory within the district;
(2) In the case of a city or county issuing bonds, within the
city or county; or
(3) In the locality to be affected by the issuance of the bonds
if subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section are not applicable.
(b) At least ten (10) days before the date set for the public hearing,
notice of the hearing shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper of
general circulation:
(1) In the locality to be affected; or
(2) In the case of a regional water distribution district,
regional wastewater district, or regional solid waste management district, in
a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which land lies within
the boundaries of the district.
(c) The notice shall:
(1) Contain a general description of the purpose or purposes for
which the bonds are to be issued;
(2) Contain the maximum principal amount of the bonds; and
(3) State the date, time, and place of the public hearing.

Subchapter 7 — Taxable Bond Act of 1989

19-6-701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Taxable Bond
Act of 1989”.

19-6-702. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds and declares:
(1) The United States Supreme Court, in the case of South
Carolina v. Baker, 485 U.S. 505 (1988), held that no barrier exists under the
United States Constitution to the imposition of federal income taxation on
interest received by holders of bonds of governmental units. Such an
exemption from federal income taxation has been a desirable feature of these
bonds, operating to reduce interest expense to governmental units and
242 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
enhancing the marketability of the bonds;
(2) The continued ability of governmental units to provide for
the financing of public improvements and other projects and programs that
serve important public purposes by the issuance of bonds is essential for the
health, welfare, and economic well-being of the people of the State of
Arkansas;
(3) By the adoption of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1
et seq., the United States Congress has substantially limited the purposes
for which bonds may be issued with interest exempt from federal income
taxation and imposed other restrictive provisions as a condition of the
exemption. Additionally, under the authority of South Carolina v. Baker, the
United States Congress may be expected to enact other laws and effect changes
in federal tax policy to eliminate or further reduce the exemption of
interest on bonds of governmental units from federal income taxation, with
the result that, to provide financing for public purposes, governmental units
may now find it in their best interests to issue bonds the interest on which
is not exempt from federal income taxation;
(4) Under the Arkansas Constitution and existing laws of this
state, governmental units have had, and continue to have, the power to issue
bonds without respect to whether the interest thereon is subject to federal
income taxation. However, many statutes applicable to governmental units lack
effective, modern procedures under which the structure of a taxable financing
may comply with current market practices, obtain the lowest effective
borrowing cost, or provide terms most suitable to the governmental unit, the
project, or the financing program; and
(5) The purposes sought to be achieved by this subchapter are to
provide governmental units with all means necessary to obtain financing for
public purposes under the changing circumstances related to future tax policy
of the federal government and to supplement and complement the provisions of
existing and future laws authorizing the issuance of bonds, to the end that
governmental units may provide for the health, safety, and welfare of the
people by the issuance of bonds under terms and conditions necessary under
the then-existing conditions.

19-6-703. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
243 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) “Bonds” means any bonds, issued pursuant to the Arkansas
Constitution and pursuant to an act of the General Assembly heretofore or
hereafter enacted, and means all debentures, notes, warrants, tax
anticipation notes, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, or other
evidence of indebtedness or leases, installment purchase contracts, or other
agreements or certificates of participation therein issued by or on behalf of
a governmental unit, secured by revenues from any special fund or source or
assessments for local improvements and taxes;
(2) “Foreign currency” means currency, euros, or money other
than the legal tender of the United States;
(3)(A) “Governmental unit” means the State of Arkansas, a
department, board, commission, or other agency or instrumentality of the
state, or a county, municipality, school district, regional water
distribution district, improvement district, public trust, or other political
subdivision of the state, heretofore or hereafter created, or a board,
commission, authority, or other public agency or instrumentality of a
governmental unit that is now or hereafter authorized by law to issue bonds.
(B) This subchapter does not give a department, board,
commission, or other agency of the state any additional authority to issue
bonds or take any action independently and without acting by or through the
State Board of Finance if the participation of the board is otherwise
required by the law under authority of which the bonds are issued; and
(4) “Taxable bonds” means bonds the interest on which is not, in
any manner, exempt from federal income taxation or excludable from gross
income for federal income tax purposes.

19-6-704. Subchapter supplemental — Effect on other state laws or on
previously issued bonds.
(a) This subchapter is supplemental to all other provisions of state
law governing the issuance of bonds by any governmental unit and, except as
otherwise provided in this subchapter, the provisions of state law governing
the issuance of bonds by any governmental unit shall continue to apply to the
issuance by the governmental unit of taxable bonds.
(b) This subchapter does not broaden or otherwise alter any provisions
of state law as they relate to the issuance of the bonds the interest on
which is, in some manner, exempt or excludable from federal income taxation.
244 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The reference in this subchapter to law providing authority for
issuance of bonds means laws now in effect and as hereafter enacted or
amended by the General Assembly.
(d) This subchapter does not impugn the validity of any taxable bonds
heretofore issued.

19-6-705. Construction.
This subchapter shall be liberally construed to effectively carry out
the purposes of this subchapter.

19-6-706. Issuance of bonds authorized.
A governmental unit may issue taxable bonds for any purpose permitted
by the law heretofore or hereafter enacted under authority of which the
taxable bonds are issued, whether those purposes are set forth in each law by
specific category or by a general authorization to accomplish public
purposes.

19-6-707. Ordinance, resolution, indenture, etc.
The ordinance, resolution, indenture, agreement, or other instrument
providing for the issuance of taxable bonds may provide for any of the
following:
(1) The bonds shall be in such denominations, in such form,
either bearer or registered, and payable at such place or places, either
within or without the United States, at such time or times, as, in each case,
the governmental unit determines, subject to any limitations on the maturity
of bonds set forth in the law under authority of which the bonds are issued;
(2) The bonds shall be payable in legal tender of the United
States, in a foreign currency, in commodities, or in precious metals, as the
governmental unit determines;
(3) In connection with the bond issue, the governmental unit may
appoint:
(A) A cotrustee located outside of the boundaries of the
United States or its territories or possessions so long as it also appoints a
trustee otherwise meeting the requirements of the statutes under authority of
which the bonds are issued; and
(B) A paying agent or a copaying agent located outside the
245 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
boundaries of the United States or its territories or possessions;
(4)(A) In connection with, or incidental to, the sale and
issuance of bonds, the governmental unit may enter into any contracts that it
determines to be necessary or appropriate to achieve a desirable effective
interest rate in connection with the bonds by means of, but not limited to,
contracts commonly known as investment contracts, funding agreements,
interest rate swap agreements, currency swap agreements, forward payment
conversion agreements, futures, or contracts providing for payments based on
levels of or changes in interest rates, or contracts to exchange cash flows
or a series of payments, or contracts, including, without limitation,
options, puts or calls, whether or not used to hedge payment, rate, spread,
or similar exposure.
(B) Contracts or arrangements as described under
subdivision (4)(A) of this section:
(i) May also be entered into by governmental units
in connection with, or incidental to, entering into any agreement that
secures bonds or provides liquidity therefor; and
(ii) Shall be made upon the terms and conditions
established by the governmental unit, after giving due consideration for the
credit worthiness of the counterparties, when applicable, including any
rating by a nationally recognized rating service or any other criteria as may
be appropriate;
(5) In connection with, or incidental to, the sale and issuance
of the bonds, or entering into any of the contracts or arrangements referred
to in subdivision (4) of this section, the governmental unit may enter into
the credit enhancement or liquidity agreements, with payment, interest rate,
security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions that the
governmental unit determines; and
(6) Notwithstanding any provisions of state law relating to the
investment or reinvestment of surplus funds of a governmental unit, proceeds
of the bonds and any moneys set aside or pledged to secure payment of the
principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds, or any of the
contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (4) of this section, may be
invested in securities or obligations described in the ordinance or
resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

246 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-6-708. Sale.
The bonds may be sold at public or private sale. If the governmental
unit determines that a negotiated sale of the taxable bonds is in the best
interest of the governmental unit, the governmental unit may negotiate for
the sale of the taxable bonds.

19-6-709. Proceeds — Use.
(a) The proceeds of an issue of taxable bonds and the investment
earnings on the proceeds shall be used in the manner and to the extent
specified in the ordinance or resolution providing for the issuance of the
taxable bonds, by the governmental unit issuing the taxable bonds for a
purpose specified for the issuance of taxable bonds in the law under
authority of which the taxable bonds are issued.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, invested or
reinvested proceeds of an issue of taxable bonds shall be deemed to have been
expended for a purpose specified for the issuance of taxable bonds in the law
under authority of which the taxable bonds are issued if the earnings on the
proceeds and proceeds of liquidation of the investments are acquired with the
proceeds, to the extent that they are:
(1) Applied to pay or service debt service on the taxable bonds;
or
(2) Applied toward that purpose.
(c) When the bond proceeds of taxable bonds are invested or reinvested
by the governmental unit in obligations permitted by this subchapter, the
issuance of the taxable bonds shall be deemed to be for a public purpose,
provided that the net proceeds of such an investment or reinvestment, after
sufficient provision is made for debt service on the taxable bonds, are then
applied to a purpose for which the governmental unit has authority to issue
taxable bonds and the governmental unit has determined upon appropriate
findings of fact that the application of net proceeds is for a public purpose
that the governmental unit may perform.

19-6-710. Refunding bonds.
Notwithstanding any provisions of state law relating to the investment
or reinvestment of surplus funds of any governmental unit or any more
restrictive provisions of the law under authority of which the bonds are
247 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
issued, the proceeds of taxable bonds issued to refund or advance refund a
prior issue or issues of bonds may be invested in securities or obligations
described in the ordinance or resolution providing for the issuance of the
refunding bonds.

CHAPTER 7
FEDERAL FUNDS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Receipt of Federal Funds Generally
Subchapter 3. Miscellaneous Federal Grant Act
Subchapter 4. Grant Application Review — Indirect Cost Reimbursements
Subchapter 5. Sale or Lease of Minerals, Oil, and Gas
Subchapter 6. Educational Funding

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-7-101. Reports to Legislative Council.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall file quarterly reports with the Legislative Council itemizing and
summarizing all contracts or agreements entered into by the Governor with the
United States Government, or any agencies or instrumentalities of the federal
government, whereby the State of Arkansas is to participate in any program
involving the expenditure of federal funds, whether or not state funds are
obligated in connection therewith, with respect to new federal programs, or
expansion of existing federal programs that were not in existence or that
were not implemented by state participation, at the time of the adjournment
of the regular session of the General Assembly and entered into before the
convening of the next regular session of the General Assembly.
(b) With respect to each such contract or agreement, the report shall
list:
(1) A brief statement of the purposes of the contract or
agreement;
(2) The amount of federal funds to be expended under the
contract or agreement;
(3) The amount of any state matching funds required in
248 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
connection with the program, if any;
(4) The name of the agency or department that will administer
the program; and
(5) Any additional information that will enable the members of
the Legislative Council to determine the nature and purposes of the
agreement.

19-7-102. Legislative review of federal programs.
(a) The Legislative Council shall review the quarterly reports filed
by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration as required
in § 19-7-701 and shall submit its findings and recommendations to each
succeeding regular session of the General Assembly for enabling legislation
to implement, restrict, or prohibit the state's participation in any such new
federal program or expanded federal program that was implemented by contract
or agreement entered into by the Governor subsequent to the adjournment of
the preceding session of the General Assembly.
(b)(1) If the next regular session of the General Assembly fails to
prohibit or restrict the state's participation in any such new or expanded
program implemented by contract or agreement signed by the Governor with the
United States Government during the interim between the immediately preceding
regular session of the General Assembly, then the state may continue to
participate in that federal program.
(2)(A) However, if the General Assembly restricts or prohibits
the state's participation in any such new or expanded federal program
implemented by contract or agreement subsequent to the last regular session,
it shall be unlawful for the state to continue to participate in, or to
expend any state funds in connection with, any such program.
(B) All contracts or agreements entered into by the
Governor or any department or agency of the state acting under authority of
the Governor shall be void, and the state's participation therein shall cease
upon the adjournment of the General Assembly or at such later date if a later
date for the termination of the state's participation therein has been
prescribed by law.

19-7-103. Control of college study programs and basic educational
grants.
249 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) All state agencies, departments, and institutions receiving public
funds are charged with the responsibility of the handling, receipt, and
disbursement of these funds within their normal framework as provided by the
laws of the State of Arkansas. The control of these funds arising from the
federal programs of college work-study programs and basic educational
opportunity grants received by the named governmental entities within this
subchapter shall be within the daily control of the various administrators of
the state agencies, departments, and institutions.
(b)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall issue
rules for the administration of the funds received for college work-study
programs and basic educational opportunity grants for the vocational-
technical schools.
(2) The Division of Higher Education shall issue rules for the
administration of the funds received by state colleges and universities.
(3) The administration guidelines for the control of the funds
of these two (2) programs shall be treated within the fiscal management laws
of the State of Arkansas.
(4) Before these rules are implemented, the approval of the
Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be
obtained.
(c) All agreements made by state agencies with Arkansas Plan, Inc.,
are declared to be against public policy of the State of Arkansas, with such
agreements being null and void.
(d) A public servant who does not comply with the provisions of this
section commits a Class A misdemeanor. This offense is classified as
noncompliance with this section.

Subchapter 2 — Receipt of Federal Funds Generally

19-7-201. Sale of public lands generally.
From time to time, the Treasurer of State shall to draw for and receive
from the United States Secretary of the Treasury all sums of money that may
accrue to the state on account of the five percent (5%) of the net proceeds
of the sale of public lands of the United States lying within the State of
Arkansas.

250 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-7-202. Sale of public domain lands and leases.
(a) Funds received by the Treasurer of State from the federal
government on account of the sale of public domain lands from any funds
coming to the Treasurer of State from the Taylor Grazing Act, 43 U.S.C. §
315, shall be distributed to the respective counties in which the property is
situated.
(b)(1) Eighty percent (80%) of the funds of each county shall be
distributed to the school districts of the county in ratio to the leased
territory or public domain sold within the district.
(2) The remaining twenty percent (20%) of the funds for each
county shall be credited to the county road fund.
(c) The county treasurer shall make distribution of the school
districts' portion on an acreage basis or other equitable basis if the data
required for making a distribution of funds as provided in this section is
not available at the time funds are available for distribution.
(d)(1) The Treasurer of State shall distribute that portion of the
funds that accrue to the schools to the respective counties and distribute
the funds that accrue to the county road funds.
(2)(A) The county quorum court shall provide the county
treasurer with a statement showing the distribution of the funds in
accordance with law.
(B) Thereafter, the county treasurer shall credit the
respective school districts with the amounts indicated.

19-7-203. Lease of lands for flood control purposes.
All funds received by the Treasurer of State from the federal
government on account of the lease of lands acquired by the federal
government for flood control purposes, and distributed by the Treasurer of
State to the respective counties, shall be distributed by each county
receiving them as follows:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) of the funds received by each county
shall be distributed to the school districts in the county, with each school
district to receive the portion thereof that the flood control acreage in
that district bears to the total flood control acreage in all districts in
the county; and
(2) Twenty percent (20%) of the funds received by each county
251 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
shall be credited to the county road fund.

19-7-204. Revenues derived from forest reserves.
(a) All money paid into the State Treasury by the federal government
from the revenue derived from the forest reserves within this state for the
benefit of public schools and public roads, as provided by congressional act,
to the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or as much thereof as may
be so paid in, shall be appropriated as follows:
(1) Three-fourths (¾) of the money received by the State
Treasury from the federal government from the revenues derived from the
forest reserves within this state shall be apportioned to the public schools
as provided in § 6-20-218 and Acts 1933, No. 104, § 2 [obsolete]; and
(2) The remaining one-fourth (¼) shall be apportioned to the
public roads of the respective counties from which the money was derived.
(b)(1) On the first Monday in September of each year, the Auditor of
State shall draw his or her warrant on the State Treasury in favor of the
county treasurer in each county which has any funds from the forest reserve
revenue for the remaining one-fourth (¼) of the money. The county treasurers
shall add it to the funds of their respective counties for the improvement of
the public roads.
(2) The Auditor of State's warrant shall be drawn upon a
certified copy of an order of the county court, directing the county
treasurer to draw the funds.

19-7-205. Geological and Conservation Federal Fund.
(a) There is created in the Treasurer of State's office a fund to be
known as the “Geological and Conservation Federal Fund”.
(b) Federal funds as may be allotted to the Office of the State
Geologist shall be deposited into the fund.

19-7-206. Loans on agricultural products.
It is lawful for the Division of Correction and other state
institutions and the counties of the state that produce cotton or other
agricultural products to participate in government loans made available upon
these agricultural products. The superintendent of any such state institution
and the county judge of any such county may enter into the necessary papers
252 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to secure the benefits of these government loans.

19-7-207. Proceeds from sale of lumber on military bases.
(a) All moneys received by the Treasurer of State from the United
States Government from the sale of lumber and timber products on United
States military installations shall be distributed to the respective counties
in which the property is situated.
(b)(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the moneys for each county shall
be distributed to the respective school districts of the county in the same
proportion that the lumber and timber products sold within that school
district have to the total of lumber and timber products sold in the county.
(2) The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) of the moneys for
each county shall be credited to the county road fund.
(3) The county treasurer shall make distribution of the school
districts' portions on an equitable basis if the data required for making
distribution of funds as provided in this section is not available at the
time funds are available for distribution.

Subchapter 3 — Miscellaneous Federal Grant Act

19-7-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Miscellaneous
Federal Grant Act”.

19-7-302. Procedure upon availability of unanticipated federal funds.
(a) If new or additional federal funds, new or additional
Comprehensive Employment and Training Act, or its successor's, funds, or
changes in state use of appropriations for programs combined into block
grants from the United States Government become necessary, or if new federal
programs or new Comprehensive Employment and Training Act, or its
successor's, programs are initiated that are not authorized or contemplated
in the biennial operations appropriation act for the benefiting state agency
and such changes make it necessary that the benefiting state agency employ
additional personnel or require additional appropriations to expend these
funds in order to carry out the objectives of the federal programs or to meet
federal requirements, then the head of the affected state agency may request
253 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, as
provided in this section, for additional appropriations of one (1) or more
new or additional salaried positions to be utilized by that respective
agency. The salary rates for these positions shall not exceed the highest
maximum annual salary rate or the highest grade level position authorized in
the salary schedule of the requesting agency's biennial appropriation act for
operations, as governed by the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §
21-5-201 et seq.
(b) In the case of those agencies, departments, or institutions, that
are specifically exempt from the provisions of the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., such new or additional employees shall
be established at salary rates not to exceed the maximum established in the
salary schedule of the biennial operations appropriation act for the
respective agency for comparable positions. The additional positions shall
not exceed the maximum number of positions authorized for the agency in the
biennial appropriation act for operations.
(c) Whenever the head of a state agency deems it necessary to
establish new or additional appropriations or positions authorized in this
section, he or she shall file with the Governor a written report accompanied
by necessary supporting documents. These documents shall set forth:
(1) The facts, justifications, and circumstances that
necessitate the appropriations;
(2) The maximum number of positions sought, the titles of those
positions, and the maximum annual salary rate to be paid each position;
(3) A complete line item operations budget for the program;
(4) A statement of the expected duration into future years of
the federal funds; and
(5) Whether or not the program is anticipated to eventually be
supported either in part or in whole by state revenues.
(d) Upon receipt of the report and supporting documents, for
unanticipated miscellaneous federal grants, excluding the Comprehensive
Employment and Training Act or its successor, the Governor or the Governor's
designee shall study it. If he or she determines that the new or additional
positions or appropriations are being sought in strict compliance with this
subchapter, the Governor, after seeking the advice of the Legislative Council
or the Joint Budget Committee, may approve or modify the request for such
254 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
additional or new positions or appropriations as, in his or her judgment, he
or she deems necessary. The Governor shall forward a copy of the reviewed
request to the head of the requesting agency and the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State. Upon receipt of the reviewed request, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall direct the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State to
establish upon their books of record the necessary appropriation accounts in
accordance with the provisions as set out in this section and the applicable
classifications of appropriations as enumerated in §§ 19-4-511 — 19-4-516 and
in accordance with any federal limitations as may be applicable to the funds
that are available.
(e) Each even-numbered year the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall file with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee, a cumulative report summarizing all
appropriations transferred and all additional positions authorized in
relation to unanticipated federal funds subject to this subchapter, including
without limitation miscellaneous federal grants and miscellaneous workforce
investment programs, during the preceding two (2) fiscal years.

19-7-303. Additional procedures and limitations.
In addition to the limitations and procedures established in § 19-7-
302, the following additional procedures and limitations shall be held in
strict compliance:
(1) All new or additional federal funds or new or additional
state funds under the Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, §
15-4-3701 et seq., expended by the benefiting agency under the authority of
any appropriation provided by the General Assembly for such purposes and
transferred through the provisions and procedures established in this section
shall be deposited into, and expended from, the State Treasury;
(2)(A) Appropriations authorized by the General Assembly for
such purpose and transferred pursuant to the procedures set out in this
section shall be strictly used for the expenditure of the Arkansas Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., grant-in-aid moneys or
other federal grant-in-aid moneys received, reimbursements from the federal
government, and local or private funds designated as matching funds for these
federal projects.
(B) Amounts appropriated under subdivision (2)(A) of this
255 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
section shall be deposited into the State Treasury for the benefit of the
State of Arkansas, or any of its agencies, for use in emergency relief needs
or for the operation of any Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., programs or any other programs approved by the
federal government for which no appropriations or insufficient appropriations
were provided elsewhere for those purposes;
(3)(A) Additional positions authorized under § 19-7-302 shall be
paid from the Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701
et seq., funds deposited into the State Treasury for that specific Arkansas
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., program as may
be authorized through this subchapter or from federal, local, or private
funds deposited into the State Treasury for that specific federal program as
may be authorized through this subchapter.
(B) However, general, special, trust, or miscellaneous
state funds may not be used for the purpose of paying salaries of the
positions so authorized;
(4) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may promulgate rules
he or she may deem necessary and proper in order to carry out this
subchapter;
(5) Sections 19-4-1707 and 19-4-1801 that establish the federal
grants, aid, and reimbursements procedures and federal funds procedures of
the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq.,
shall be strictly complied with;
(6) Unless provided elsewhere, all federal funds received by
state agencies, departments, boards, and commissions benefiting from the
establishment of the biennial operations appropriation acts authorized by the
General Assembly for new federal or Arkansas Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., programs shall be deposited into the
State Treasury, except when such deposit is expressly prohibited, in writing,
as a condition for approval of the grant or reimbursement by the federal
grant or agency; and
(7) An appropriation as authorized by the General Assembly for
new federal or Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701
et seq., programs that the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State transfers or
causes to be transferred to the various agencies shall not be utilized for
entering into or making payments for personal service contracts.
256 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-7-304. Recommendation by Governor — Failure to appropriate.
(a) Upon the convening of each regular session of the General
Assembly, the Governor shall submit to the General Assembly and shall
recommend to the General Assembly the appropriation of the necessary federal
or state matching funds, or both, estimated to be necessary with respect to
any program during the subsequent fiscal biennium.
(b) If the General Assembly fails to appropriate funds for any program
entered into with the federal government as authorized by the laws of the
State of Arkansas, on June 30 following adjournment of the regular session of
the General Assembly, the program shall cease to exist, and the State of
Arkansas shall no longer participate in the program.

Subchapter 4 — Grant Application Review — Indirect Cost Reimbursements

19-7-401. Legislative determination.
It is found and determined by the General Assembly that all
governmental units, various nongovernmental organizations, and the general
public in the State of Arkansas should have the opportunity to review and
comment upon applications for federal funding assistance. The General
Assembly further finds that it is desirable that the State of Arkansas pursue
the utilization of indirect cost reimbursements available to state agencies
from the various federal agencies. It is further found that the state should
cooperate with the federal government in the development and utilization of
intergovernmental information exchange programs that may be of benefit to the
State of Arkansas and to utilize any available federal assistance funds for
the furtherance of the purposes of this subchapter.

19-7-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Executive Order 12372, Intergovernmental Review of Federal
Programs” means an instrument signed and placed into effect by the President
of the United States on July 14, 1982;
(2) “Federal funding assistance” means financial aid available
from the various federal government agencies to units of state and local
governments, as well as to private for-profit and private nonprofit
257 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
organizations;
(3) “Indirect cost reimbursements” means the reimbursement by a
federal agency to agencies of state government for the costs incurred that
are necessary for the efficient conduct of a federal grant or contract, as
stated in United States Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87, “A
Guide for State and Local Government Agencies — Cost Principles and
Procedures for Establishing Cost Allocations Plans and Indirect Cost Rates
for Grants and Contracts with the Federal Government”;
(4) “Office of Intergovernmental Services” means an
organizational unit within the Department of Finance and Administration;
(5) “Revenue sharing” means payments to units of local
government as authorized by the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of
1972;
(6) “Review and comment” means the process by which any unit of
government, organization, or individual may request to review and provide
comments upon any application for federal funding assistance, as limited by
other sections of this subchapter;
(7) “State agency” means an agency, board, commission,
department, or institution of this state; and
(8) “State clearinghouse” means that section of the Office of
Intergovernmental Services that is designated as the governmental unit
responsible for coordinating the review of applications for federal funding
assistance, pursuant to Executive Order 12372, Intergovernmental Review of
Federal Programs and other provisions of this subchapter.

19-7-403. Administration.
The Office of Intergovernmental Services is responsible for carrying
out the duties and responsibilities of this subchapter.

19-7-404. Federal grants, aids, and reimbursement procedures.
(a)(1) All formal applications for federal funds for grants, aids, and
reimbursements originated by a state agency shall be submitted to the
Department of Finance and Administration before their submission to the
granting source.
(2) Applications shall include, in a manner prescribed by the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, a summary of the
258 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
proposed project.
(3) The summary shall include the indirect cost rate of the
applicant agency, together with a projection of funds to be received as
indirect cost reimbursement.
(4) The Department of Finance and Administration shall file with
the Bureau of Legislative Research a summary of these applications for their
review.
(b)(1) Preliminary, preapplication, or informal proposals that may
eventually result in a commitment of personnel, space, facilities, or state
funds shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration at
the time they are submitted to the federal granting agency.
(2) In order to eliminate overlap, inefficiency, or a violation
of legislative intent, the secretary may require a review of the proposal,
soliciting comment from other agencies that might be affected, and may
require the suspension of negotiations until the review is completed.
(3) This subsection is not applicable to institutions of higher
education. However, a copy of the preliminary proposals shall be submitted to
the Department of Finance and Administration for the information of the
Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) The Department of Finance and Administration shall prescribe
procedures relative to preliminary proposals and formal applications for
federal grants, aids, and reimbursements.
(d)(1) When a state agency receives notification of an award of any
federal funds, grants, aids, or reimbursements, including unsolicited funds,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall be notified on forms to be
prescribed by the secretary.
(2) A section shall be included on the forms to report payments
from federal funds for indirect cost reimbursements resulting from:
(A) Overhead costs of the state agency; and
(B) Overhead costs of state central services allocated to
that state agency through the Statewide Cost Allocation Plan.
(3) The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide
the Bureau of Legislative Research a summary of the notifications for review.
(e)(1) The Office of Intergovernmental Services shall function as the
state clearinghouse for coordinating the review and comment process relative
to applications for federal funding assistance under Executive Order 12372,
259 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Intergovernmental Review of Federal Programs and other provisions of this
subchapter.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration is responsible,
in consultation with state and local elected officials, for developing
procedures to implement the review and comment process for applications for
federal funding assistance.

19-7-405. Indirect cost reimbursements.
(a) The Office of Intergovernmental Services is responsible for
preparation of the Statewide Cost Allocation Plan for the allocation of state
central services' overhead costs to state agencies that elect to seek
reimbursement for them according to the provisions of United States Office of
Management and Budget Circular A-87.
(b) The Office of Intergovernmental Services also shall:
(1) Prepare indirect cost rate proposals on behalf of the state
agencies; or
(2) Provide assistance as necessary to state agencies that
prepare their own indirect cost rate proposals if the state agency elects to
seek payment from the federal government for these costs.
(c) The Office of Intergovernmental Services may negotiate the
statewide cost allocations with the appropriate federal authorities and
indirect cost proposals prepared by the Office of Intergovernmental Services
with any state agency.
(d) A state agency that chooses to utilize indirect cost rates
according to this subchapter shall submit a copy of its indirect cost rate
proposals to the Department of Finance and Administration and also a copy of
its indirect cost rate agreement after the cognizant federal agency has
approved the rate proposal.

19-7-406. Transfer of reimbursements.
The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may transfer from the
Department of Human Services federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State to the appropriate state fund account those federal
funds recovered as reimbursement for indirect costs that are not required to
be transferred to the Constitutional Officers Fund or the State Central
Services Fund pursuant to this subchapter.
260 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-7-407. Expenditure of federal funds.
The Department of Finance and Administration may receive federal funds,
enter into contracts with federal agencies, and expend any such funds as
necessary to accomplish the duties set out in this subchapter.

19-7-408. Information exchange programs.
The Office of Intergovernmental Services may cooperate with agencies of
the federal government in the development and utilization of
intergovernmental information exchange programs that may be of benefit to the
State of Arkansas.

19-7-409. Revenue sharing.
The Office of Intergovernmental Services is responsible for providing
technical assistance to units of local government on matters relating to
federal revenue sharing. The Office of Intergovernmental Services is
designated as the liaison between the federal Office of Revenue Sharing
[abolished] and local governments in Arkansas.

19-7-410. Advice of legislative departments.
It is recognized by the legislative and executive departments of
government that some of the executive departments' authority or
responsibility as provided in this subchapter should possibly have the
legislative departments' concurrence before proceeding with that authority or
responsibility. The legislative department, through the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee, the Legislative Council, or joint interim committees,
interim committees, or subcommittees of the foregoing may request the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration to seek the
legislative department's advice before exercising certain authority or
responsibility as authorized by this subchapter.

Subchapter 5 — Sale or Lease of Minerals, Oil, and Gas

19-7-501. Federal lands.
(a) Moneys received by the Treasurer of State from the federal
government for a sale, lease, royalty, bonus, or rental of oil, gas, or
261 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
mineral lands belonging to the federal government and located in this state
shall be distributed under this section.
(b) Moneys received under subsection (a) of this section by and after
September 1, 2008, by the Treasurer of State shall be credited by the
Treasurer of State as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the moneys received shall be credited
to the General Revenue Fund Account for distribution to various funds that
participate in the distribution of general revenues in the respective
proportion to each fund, to be used for the purposes under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.; and
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the moneys received shall be
distributed to the counties in which the federal lands that generate the
moneys are located according to federal reports that identify the counties
with the federal lands that generate the moneys. Moneys under this
subdivision (b)(2) shall be distributed by the Treasurer of State as follows:
(A)(i) Sixty percent (60%) of the moneys shall be
distributed to the County Aid Fund, to be distributed by the Treasurer of
State to the county treasurer of each county that has a school district with
a boundary that includes a portion of the federal lands that generate the
moneys.
(ii) A county is responsible for distributing moneys
under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of this section to a school district with a
boundary that includes a portion of the federal lands that generate the
moneys.
(iii) If there is more than one (1) school district
with a boundary that includes a portion of the federal lands that generate
the moneys within a county receiving these moneys, then each school district
in that county shall receive a proportionate share of the moneys based on the
school district's portion of the acreage over the total acreage in all
districts in that county;
(B) Fifteen percent (15%) of the moneys received under
this subdivision (b)(2) shall be distributed to the County Aid Fund to be
distributed by the Treasurer of State to the county treasurer for credit to
the county road funds of the counties to which these moneys are allocated;
and
(C)(i) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the moneys received
262 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under this subdivision (b)(2) shall be distributed to the County Aid Fund for
distribution by the Treasurer of State to the county treasurer of the county
to which the moneys are to be distributed.
(ii) Except as provided under subdivision
(b)(2)(C)(iii) of this section, on receipt of the moneys under this
subdivision (b)(2)(C), the county treasurer of the county shall distribute
the moneys to the county general fund and to the respective cities, towns,
school districts, community college districts, and county and municipal
libraries in the county in the proportion that each taxing unit shares in the
real and personal property taxes collected in the county.
(iii) A school district in the county that receives
a distribution of funds under subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) of this section
and the county road fund that receives a distribution of funds under
subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) of this section are not entitled to receive an
additional distribution of the funds under this subdivision (b)(2)(C).

Subchapter 6 — Educational Funding

19-7-601. Federal Adult Basic Education Fund.
There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of
State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the
“Federal Adult Basic Education Fund”.

19-7-602. Federal Elementary and Secondary Education Fund.
There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of
State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the
“Federal Elementary and Secondary Education Fund”.

SUBTITLE 2 — REVENUE STABILIZATION LAW

CHAPTER 20. GENERAL PROVISIONS
CHAPTER 21. FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS GENERALLY
CHAPTER 22. GENERAL REVENUE OPERATING FUNDS AND FUND ACCOUNTS
CHAPTER 23. DISTRIBUTION OF GENERAL REVENUES
CHAPTER 24. BUDGET STABILIZATION TRUST FUND
CHAPTER 25. MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY AID FUNDS
263 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
CHAPTER 26. TRUST FUNDS
CHAPTER 27. MISCELLANEOUS FUNDS
CHAPTERS 28 — 39. [RESERVED.]

CHAPTER 20
GENERAL PROVISIONS

19-20-101. Title.
This subtitle shall be known and may be cited as the “Revenue
Stabilization Law”.

19-20-102. Legislative intent.
Because of the many revenue laws of the state providing for the levying
and collecting of taxes, licenses, and fees for the support of state
government and its agencies and enacted by the General Assembly, it is
declared to be the policy of the General Assembly with respect to all such
revenues and other state income that is required by law to be deposited into
the State Treasury to provide for the handling and deposit of the funds in
the manner provided in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.,
and in this subtitle in the following manner:
(1) To declare the objects and purposes for which the general
revenues as defined in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.,
and other incomes individually and collectively are to be used. It is the
intent and purpose of this section and other provisions of this subtitle to
comply with the provisions of the Arkansas Constitution, including Arkansas
Constitution, Article 16, § 11;
(2) Because the constitutional and fiscal agencies of the state
and certain other defined agencies or programs, either individually or
collectively, render services to every state department, board, commission,
institution, agency, or activity supported from revenues deposited into the
State Treasury, it is declared to be the policy of the General Assembly that
all taxes, licenses, and fees defined as general revenues and special
revenues under the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., shall
contribute to the support of the constitutional and fiscal agencies and other
defined agencies in the proportion and for the purposes as provided by law
for the payment of such services;
264 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) As to the taxes, licenses, fees, and other revenues
contributing to the general revenues as defined in the Revenue Classification
Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., it is not the purpose of this subtitle to levy or
to change the amount or rate of such taxes, but to state the purpose for
which such general revenues are to be used. This subtitle shall not be
construed as amending any of the provisions of the law with respect to the
taxes defined to be general revenues except for the purpose of providing for
the distribution of them and defining the purposes for which these revenues
are raised and collected; and
(4) As to the special taxes, licenses, fees, and other revenues
contributing to the special revenues as provided in the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., it is not the intent of the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., or of this subtitle to levy or
change the amount or rate of such taxes nor to change the purposes for which
those special revenues are to be used as provided by law. This subtitle shall
not be construed as amending any of the provisions of the law with respect to
the special revenues as defined in this subtitle, except for the purpose of
providing for the distribution of them and providing that the purposes for
which such revenues are collected shall also include the services rendered to
the constitutional and fiscal agencies and other defined agencies in the
manner provided in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., and
in this subtitle.

19-20-103. Fiscal year.
The fiscal year of the state, for the conduct of its financial affairs,
shall commence on July 1 and end on June 30 of the following year.

19-20-104. Establishment of other funds or accounts.
(a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may only establish such
other funds or fund accounts on the books and on the books of the Treasurer
of State and the Auditor of State for making payments that are composed of
funds derived from more than one (1) fund or fund account as established by
this subtitle.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may also establish
paying accounts on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of
State for making payments that are composed of funds derived from more than
265 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
one (1) source.
(3) However, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may establish
on the books accounts within funds or fund accounts carried on the books of
the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State that he or she deems are
necessary for the accounting system of his or her office.
(b) Nothing in this section prevents the establishment of new funds
composed solely of federal grants, aids, reimbursements, or any other moneys
received from the United States Government that are to be used for specific
purposes.

19-20-105. Appropriations for agencies not funded.
If the General Assembly has appropriated general revenue funds for any
agency, department, or institution for which funding is not provided in this
subtitle, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make the appropriation
payable from the General Revenue Fund from which the principal department as
created by §§ 6-11-101, 6-11-102, 25-2-101 — 25-2-109, 25-5-101, 25-6-102,
25-7-101, 25-8-101, 25-8-105, 25-9-101, , 25-10-102, 25-10-103 [repealed],
25-10-104, 25-10-105 [repealed], 25-10-106, 25-11-101, 25-11-102, 25-12-101,
25-13-101, and 25-14-101 draws its support. If the appropriation is made to
any other agency of the state, the appropriation shall be made payable from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.

19-20-106. Transfer of funds.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may direct a transfer of
funds on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the
Department of Finance and Administration for the following purposes:
(1) To correct accounting errors;
(2) To make loans to authorized funds, fund accounts, or
accounts and to repay such loans when they become due and payable, all of
which as may be authorized by law;
(3) To reimburse the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund or successor
funds, fund accounts, or accounts for the payment of claims, refunds, or
other authorized disbursements as may be authorized by law;
(4)(A) To transfer to the state agency responsible for
administering federal Social Security and state retirement programs for
public employees, public school teachers as defined by law, highway
266 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
employees, and state police employees in such amounts as shall be certified
as being due, including any penalties due to delinquency of obligations,
funds on deposit in the State Treasury containing operating moneys for any:
(i) Political entity, including any state agency,
board, commission, department, institution, state-supported community
college, college, or university;
(ii) Political subdivision of the state, including a
regional, county, or municipal government; or
(iii) School district.
(B)(i) The head of the state agency responsible for
administering the programs shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State the agencies, funds, amounts involved, and any other pertinent
information.
(ii) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
then notify the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of State of the transfers;
or
(5) To transfer funds between state agencies and within state
agencies in order to eliminate the double accounting of receipts and
expenditures that occurs under the method of issuing vouchers; or
(6) For such other purposes as may be specifically authorized by
law.
(b)(1) The transfer document form shall be designed by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, with the approval of the Treasurer of State and
the Auditor of State, and shall be designed in such form so as to be
compatible with the accounting and coding systems of all three (3) offices.
(2) The transfer document as executed by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall bear his or her manual signature or the signature
of a designated official of his or her office.
(3) In addition, there shall be stated in the document a clearly
understood reason for the issuance of the transfer and the specific legal
authority for the transfer.
(c)(1) The Treasurer of State shall issue an official transfer
document, designed by him or her with the approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State and the Auditor of State as to its form for the purpose
of distributing general and special revenues at the close of business each
month.
267 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) This document shall bear the manual signature of the
Treasurer of State or his or her deputy.
(d) The Treasurer of State may refuse to make any transfer if, in his
or her opinion, sufficient proof of the legality of the transfer is not
provided.
(e)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer moneys from
the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund accruing thereto from year-end
balances as authorized by § 19-27-204(b)(1) and (2), or from such other
funds, fund accounts, or accounts when the fund balances may be transferred
as set out in subdivision (e)(2) of this section.
(2) In those instances in which the General Assembly authorizes
carrying forward from one (1) fiscal year to the succeeding fiscal year, but
not exceeding a two-year appropriation period in conformity with Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 29, a transfer of moneys shall be made for
reimbursing the fund, in accordance with this subsection for the additional
moneys expended resulting from the carry-forward provisions of this
subsection.
(f)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may remove any inactive
funds other than those funds or fund accounts established by law upon
determination that the funds have no appropriations or outstanding warrants
and are therefore inactive, from the financial records of the State of
Arkansas and transfer any balances remaining in those funds to the General
Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall notify the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State of such transactions.
(3) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall report to the
Legislative Council and the Joint Budget Committee during the month of
November of each even-numbered year the status of all inactive funds, along
with his or her recommendation as to the disposition of the funds and
balances maintained in them.
(g) The Treasurer of State may transfer funds under this section by
direct deposit.

19-20-107. Appropriation for state agencies not provided by General
Assembly.
(a) If the appropriation is not provided by the General Assembly for
268 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
cash fund expenditures for any state agency pursuant to § 19-4-801 et seq.,
the state agency shall request a transfer of appropriation from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, stating clearly the amount required.
(b) Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and after
seeking prior review by the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee, the cash fund appropriations shall be established upon the books
of the Department of Finance and Administration. Upon request of the state
agency and with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the
requested appropriations may be established upon the books of the Department
of Finance and Administration in compliance with the applicable
classifications of appropriations as enumerated in §§ 19-4-512 — 19-4-516.

CHAPTER 21
FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS GENERALLY

19-21-101. State Apportionment Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “State Apportionment Fund”.
(2) All general revenues and all special revenues, as defined in
the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., shall be deposited by
the Treasurer of State into the State Apportionment Fund, there to be handled
and distributed as provided in this chapter.
(b) All revenue received by the Treasurer of State by 4:00 p.m. of any
normal working day shall be deposited and so credited to the State
Apportionment Fund as occurring on that day and shall be deemed to be gross
revenues for that respective day. For the purposes of accounting for such
revenue, the Treasurer of State shall credit it to the proper fund account of
the State Apportionment Fund as created by this section.

19-21-102. General Revenue Fund Account.
(a)(1) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State,
the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund
account to be known as the “General Revenue Fund Account” of the State
Apportionment Fund to which all gross general revenues are to be credited
upon receipt of them by the Treasurer of State, there to be distributed as
269 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
provided in this section.
(2) The Treasurer of State, with the approval of the Auditor of
State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, shall prescribe the
procedures and forms required to be used by all governmental units depositing
funds into the State Treasury.
(b) At the close of business at 12:00 noon on the last working day of
each month, the Treasurer of State shall make the following distributions of
the gross general revenues in the General Revenue Fund Account on properly
signed forms prescribed by him or her, with the approval of the Auditor of
State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State:
(1)(A) From such gross general revenues received during each
month, the Treasurer of State shall deduct the amounts represented by claims,
taxes erroneously paid, uncollected checks, and advance transfers made to the
Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund, the Corporate Income Tax Withholding
Fund, and the Home Owners Tax Relief Fund from each applicable revenue
received during that month and other advance transfers and shall keep a
record for accounting purposes.
(B) Advance transfers made during the month to funds or
fund accounts from which there are no applicable revenue sources shall be
made from gross general revenues received during the month.
(C) The remaining revenue in the General Revenue Fund
Account shall be designated as net general revenue; and
(2)(A)(i) If the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund has
insufficient balances to make loans to the Individual Income Tax Withholding
Fund, the Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund, and the Home Owners Tax
Relief Fund or to any of those funds or fund accounts enumerated in § 19-23-
102 to cover refunds or operating requirements during the month, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State may make advance transfers from the General
Revenue Fund Account to those funds to cover the refunds or operating
requirements and notify the Treasurer of State of the advance transfers.
(ii) However, the advance transfers to the funds or
fund accounts enumerated in § 19-23-102 shall not exceed the anticipated
general revenue distribution to the applicable fund or fund account for that
month. For calculation purposes only, the Treasurer of State shall add an
amount to the net general revenue equal to the advance transfers authorized
in this section processed for the current month.
270 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) From the net general revenue, after adding the advance
transfer, if any, the Treasurer of State shall make the following
distributions and shall notify the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State:
(i) First, the Treasurer of State shall deduct one
percent (1%), which shall be transferred to the Constitutional Officers Fund,
as created in § 19-21-105(c). An appropriate percentage of not less than two
percent (2%) and not to exceed three percent (3%), as determined from time to
time by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State as being the amount required to
support the estimated commitments and expenditures of the State Central
Services Fund for the current fiscal year, shall be transferred to the State
Central Services Fund, as created in § 19-21-105(e);
(ii) Next, any revenue deposited into the General
Revenue Fund Account from the net casino gaming receipts tax under § 5(c) of
The Arkansas Casino Gaming Amendment of 2018, Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 100, that exceeds thirty-one million two hundred thousand dollars
($31,200,000) in a fiscal year shall be held in a subaccount to be
transferred on the last business day of the fiscal year from the General
Revenue Fund Account to the Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund;
(iii)(a) On the last business day of the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2020, and on the last business day of each following fiscal
year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her
books and those of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State an amount
not to exceed thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) from the funds
available in the Restricted Reserve Fund and from any other funds designated
by the Governor to the Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.
(b) The amount to be transferred under this
subdivision (b)(2)(B)(iii) shall be calculated to provide the total sum of
thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund when combined with the funds transferred in that fiscal
year from the General Revenue Fund Account under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii) of
this section;
(iv) Next, the Treasurer of State shall deduct an
amount sufficient to pay for cash rebates which have been paid or approved
for payment during the current month upon applications filed therefor as
authorized in §§ 26-51-601 — 26-51-608 [repealed] and deduct an amount
271 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
sufficient to pay for refunds made during that month to taxpayers from
overpayment of the income tax as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State and transfer that amount to the Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund,
Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund, and Home Owners Tax Relief Fund, as
applicable;
(v)(a) Next, the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration shall certify the amount distributed to the
General Revenue Fund Account from the sales tax and the special privilege tax
on medical marijuana under § 17(c) of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana
Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, for the month.
(b) The Treasurer of State shall then deduct
an amount equal to the amount certified under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(v)(a) of
this section from the General Revenue Fund Account and transfer the amount to
the Restricted Reserve Fund to be used to address food insecurity and health
needs; and
(vi) The remaining revenue, known as general
revenues available for distribution, in the General Revenue Fund Account
shall be distributed as provided by this subtitle to the various funds and
fund accounts as created and established in § 19-22-101 et seq. and to any
other fund or fund account as may be authorized by law. The Treasurer of
State, after distributing the general revenues available for distribution due
each fund or fund account, shall deduct the amount of any advance transfers
made during the month from the distribution to each applicable fund or fund
account.
(c)(1) In determining the percentage to be deducted from net general
revenues as authorized in this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall take into consideration all revenues accruing to the benefit and fund
balances of the General Revenue Fund Account, as well as estimated
expenditures and commitments for the year from the State Central Services
Fund.
(2) In estimating the expenditures and commitments for the year,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall use the estimates obtained from
the agencies to which appropriations were made from the State Central
Services Fund.
(d) After determining the percentage deduction required to meet the
obligations and commitments as set out in subsection (c) of this section, the
272 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall obtain approval from the Legislative
Council.
(e)(1) It shall remain the jurisdiction of each state agency to
determine from which appropriations made payable from the General Revenue
Fund Account the reductions in spending will be made to meet their estimated
expenditure and commitment level, and each state agency shall notify the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State of its proposed plan of expenditures.
(2) A state agency may revise its spending plan from time to
time as long as the total of the expenditures by the state agency from the
General Revenue Fund Account does not exceed the amount determined by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and shall notify the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State of the proposed revisions.
(3) This subsection does not require any purchasing or budget
decision currently authorized by law for an elected constitutional officer or
staff of a constitutional officer to be transferred to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State.
(f) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall ensure that the
expenditures from the State Central Services Fund do not in any year exceed
the resources available to the General Revenue Fund Account. The Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall set up the appropriate safeguards on the
expenditures and obligations from the General Revenue Fund Account.
(g) In order that the General Assembly may be made aware of potential
problems as early as possible, the Department of Finance and Administration
shall report on the financial condition of the State Central Services Fund to
the Legislative Council and to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
monthly in such detail as may be required.

19-21-103. Special Revenue Fund Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund account to
be known as the “Special Revenue Fund Account” of the State Apportionment
Fund to which all gross special revenues are to be credited upon their
receipt by the Treasurer of State, there to be distributed as provided in
this section.
(b) At the close of books at 12:00 noon on the last working day of
each month, the Treasurer of State shall make the following distributions of
273 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the gross special revenues in the account on properly signed forms prescribed
by him or her, with the approval of the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State:
(1) From the gross special revenues received during each month,
the Treasurer of State shall deduct the amounts represented by claims, taxes
erroneously paid, and uncollected checks from the applicable revenues
received during that month and shall keep a record of such for accounting
purposes. The remaining revenue in the account shall be designated as net
special revenues; and
(2)(A) The Treasurer of State shall then deduct the same
percentage as determined to be deducted from net general revenues in § 19-21-
102 and be transferred under the same procedures as set forth in § 19-21-102
from each net special revenue collected by any of those agencies enumerated
in § 19-21-105(b) and one-half (½) of the percentage deductions set out in §
19-21-102 and transferred in the same proportion to the State Central
Services Fund and the Constitutional Officers Fund, from each net special
revenue collected by any other department, board, agency, or commission.
(B) The Treasurer of State shall then transfer the
remaining net special revenues to the proper fund or fund account as
designated by law and shall notify the Auditor of State and the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State of the transfers and distributions on forms approved by
the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State.

19-21-104. Revenue Holding Fund Account.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund account to
be known as the “Revenue Holding Fund Account” of the State Apportionment
Fund to which all taxes, licenses, fees, penalties, interest, or other income
that, at the time of being deposited with the Treasurer of State, cannot be
determined to be either special or general revenues or if any of the revenues
were erroneously paid as nonrevenues, there to be distributed or transferred
as provided in this section.
(2) Revenues credited to the Revenue Holding Fund Account that
are determined to be general revenues shall be transferred as gross general
revenues to the General Revenue Fund Account. Those revenues determined to be
274 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
special revenues shall be transferred as gross special revenues to the
Special Revenue Fund Account as soon as that determination is made by the
Treasurer of State. However, all such transfers shall be made on or before
June 30 of the fiscal year during which the revenues were deposited with the
Treasurer of State.
(b) If it is determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that
moneys credited to the Revenue Holding Fund Account must be transferred, due
to a worsening financial position of the benefiting agencies of such
revenues, to the Special Revenue Fund Account or to the General Revenue Fund
Account before the final determination of their classification can be made,
then the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may request the Treasurer of State
to transfer to the appropriate fund account of the State Apportionment Fund
from the Revenue Holding Fund Account an amount equal to no more than eighty
percent (80%) of the estimated general or special revenues in the Revenue
Holding Fund Account.

19-21-105. Constitutional Officers Fund and State Central Services
Fund.
(a) The elected constitutional officers and their departments of
government as established by the Arkansas Constitution and certain state
departments and employees of state departments are known and recognized as
performing and rendering, either individually or collectively, services to
every other state agency. The General Assembly declares that the services
rendered are embraced under or by one (1) or more of the items or agencies as
follows:
(1) Services rendered by the legislative, judicial, and
executive departments of the state as recognized by the Arkansas
Constitution;
(2) Services rendered by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
for management of the state's resources relating to general fiscal affairs,
administering the budget, accounting, purchasing, personnel, and other
applicable fiscal laws; and
(3) Those agencies supported from the State Central Services
Fund, which collect the general revenue and special revenues as defined in
the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., or such other laws as
may be enacted by the General Assembly.
275 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b)(1) Those departments and activities of the state which perform the
services as set out in subdivision (a)(1) of this section are declared to be
the following:
(A) The General Assembly, including State Capitol
renovation of the General Assembly quarters, Senate and House of
Representatives legislative session staff, interim expenses incurred by
members of the Senate and House of Representatives, and the appropriations
contained in the general appropriation bill made for services of the General
Assembly;
(B) The Governor;
(C) The Lieutenant Governor;
(D) The Secretary of State;
(E) The Attorney General;
(F) The Treasurer of State;
(G) The Commissioner of State Lands;
(H) The Auditor of State;
(I) The Supreme Court;
(J) The Court of Appeals; and
(K) The circuit courts and prosecuting attorneys.
(2) Those agencies and activities of the state which perform the
services as set out in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section are
declared to be the following:
(A) Senate and House of Representatives interim staff;
(B) The Bureau of Legislative Research, and interim
committee and interim committee study expenses of the Legislative Council;
(C) Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(D) The Secretary of State;
(E) Office of Administrative Services of the Department of
Finance and Administration and Revenue Division of the Department of Finance
and Administration;
(F) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(G) The Office of the Prosecutor Coordinator;
(H) The Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission;
(I) The Arkansas State Claims Commission; and
(J) Other activities supporting the legislative,
executive, and judicial departments.
276 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c)(1)(A) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Constitutional Officers Fund”, there to be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvements of those departments and activities
as set out in subdivision (b)(1) of this section unless specific and separate
funds are otherwise provided therefor.
(B) The Constitutional Officers Fund shall consist of:
(i) One-third (⅓) of the amount produced from the
three percent (3%) deduction from the net general revenue deposited into the
State Treasury;
(ii) One-third (⅓) of the amount produced from the
three percent (3%) deduction from the net special revenues collected and
deposited into the State Treasury by the agencies set out in subsection (b)
of this section; and
(iii) One-third (⅓) of the amount produced from the
one and one-half percent (1.5%) deduction from the net special revenues
collected and deposited into the State Treasury by any other state agency,
department, board, commission, or institution.
(C)(i) Any balance which remains in the Constitutional
Officers Fund at the end of a fiscal year which exceeds seven percent (7%) of
the anticipated obligations from the Constitutional Officers Fund for the
fiscal year just ended or which is estimated to be available for the fiscal
year may be transferred from time to time to the State Central Services Fund
for use in the next fiscal year.
(ii) If the funds transferred to the State Central
Services Fund are based on an estimated balance which is less than the actual
balance on June 30, the difference shall be transferred to the State Central
Services Fund on or before August 1.
(iii) If the funds transferred to the State Central
Services Fund are based on an estimated balance which is higher than the
actual balance on June 30, the difference shall be transferred from the State
Central Services Fund to the Constitutional Officers Fund on or before August
1.
(2) The Constitutional Officers Fund shall also be used to allow
the payment of claims for judges due to overpayments into the Arkansas
Judicial Retirement System prior to the enactment of §§ 24-6-204 and 24-8-201
277 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
— 24-8-211 by transfer to the Judges Retirement Fund in such amounts as may
be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(d)(1) Facts before the General Assembly drawn from statistical
computations, comparisons, and related data, taken over a period of many
years in the past, are conclusive of the proposition that the cost of the
services rendered by the agencies set out in subsection (b) of this section
have amounted to not less than three percent (3%) of the total general
revenues and special revenues as defined in the Revenue Classification Law, §
19-40-101 et seq.
(2) It is therefore declared to be the policy of the State of
Arkansas that every agency supported in whole or in part from the general
revenues or special revenues deposited into the State Treasury shall
contribute to the support of the services rendered by the agencies set out in
subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The purposes for which the taxes, licenses, or fees and
other income defined to be general revenues or special revenues are raised
and collected shall be deemed to include the services as defined in this
section.
(e)(1)(A) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “State Central Services Fund”, there to be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvements of those agencies and activities as
set out in subdivision (b)(2) of this section unless specific and separate
funds are otherwise provided therefor.
(B) The State Central Services Fund shall consist of:
(i) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-
201(9), (11), (19), (21), (37), (75), (76), (77), (78), (79), (82), (83),
(84), (85), (86), (87), (88), (89), (91), (96), (116), (118), (120), (124),
(149), (188), (231), (244), (246), (247), (266), and (267) and eight percent
(8%) of those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(20) of the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.;
(ii) The amount produced from the deduction from the
net general revenues deposited into the State Treasury;
(iii) The amount produced from the deduction from
the net special revenues collected and deposited into the State Treasury by
the agencies set out in subsection (b) of this section;
278 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(iv) The amount produced from the deduction from the
net special revenues collected and deposited into the State Treasury by any
other state agency, department, board, commission, or institution;
(v) All earnings and income collected by any of
those agencies set out in subsection (b) of this section;
(vi) Funds received from federal funds on account of
indirect cost reimbursement collected under a statewide indirect cost
allocation plan and paid to any of the agencies set out in subsection (b) of
this section;
(vii) Any other funds received from the United
States Government granted specifically to the agencies as set out in
subsection (b) of this section, unless otherwise required by the grantor
federal agency;
(viii) Interest earned on Social Security trust
funds which are remitted to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
and held in banks until transmitted to the Social Security Administration;
(ix) Reimbursements by transfer from the Ad Valorem
Tax Fund on account of expenditures made to Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(x) Such general revenues as may be provided by the
General Assembly;
(xi) One and one-half percent (1.5%) of those cash
funds of those state agencies as defined in § 19-21-106;
(xii) Such fund balances as may exist on June 30,
1995, in the Public Defender Fund [repealed] and all such funds as may accrue
to and be transferred from the Public Defender Fund [repealed] by the
Treasurer of State on the last day of each month;
(xiii) Moneys transferred or deposited from the
State Administration of Justice Fund for the benefit of the Arkansas Public
Defender Commission;
(xiv) Public defender attorney's fees to be used
solely to defray costs for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission as set out
in § 5-4-303(g)(2)(A);
(xv) Public defender user fees to be used to defray
the costs of the public defender system, § 16-87-213;
(xvi) That portion of nonrefundable fees charged by
bail bond companies for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, § 17-19-
279 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
301(e);
(xvii) The first one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) collected in taxes and penalties under § 26-26-1614 and deposited
as nonrevenue receipts during each fiscal year for use by the Revenue
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, § 26-26-1616; and
(xviii) Revenues from the real property transfer tax
distributed under § 26-60-112(b)(2)(B)(i).
(2) If required to help meet the commitments of the State
Central Services Fund and if funds are determined to be available, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer a sum not to exceed four million
dollars ($4,000,000) during any fiscal year from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund to the State Central Services Fund.
(3)(A) After all other deductions and transfers from other
sources authorized by law have been made available to the State Central
Services Fund, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer such
additional amounts as may be required from the General Revenue Fund Account
to the State Central Services Fund to fully finance the expenditures and
obligations from the appropriations set out in this section.
(B)(i) The amount of the transfer shall be determined by
subtracting the total of all estimated expenditures from the State Central
Services Fund from the total resources available to the State Central
Services Fund without a transfer of general revenue.
(ii) Then the result shall be multiplied by the
proportion that the estimated expenditures for the budgets as set out in
subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section bears to the total of all the estimated
expenditures from the State Central Services Fund.
(iii) The product shall be the amount of general
revenue required to meet the expenditures and commitments of the agencies and
budget set out in subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section.
(C) The appropriations to which this subdivision (e)(3)
applies are determined to be the:
(i) House of Representatives;
(ii) Senate;
(iii) Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(iv) Bureau of Legislative Research;
(v) Bureau of Legislative Research — Disbursing
280 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Officer;
(vi) Court of Appeals;
(vii) Administrative Office of the Courts —
Operations;
(viii) Supreme Court;
(ix) Governor;
(x) Lieutenant Governor;
(xi) Attorney General;
(xii) Auditor of State — Operations;
(xiii) Commissioner of State Lands;
(xiv) Secretary of State;
(xv) Treasurer of State;
(xvi) Department of Finance and Administration —
Division of Administrative Services:
(a) Director's Office;
(b) Director's Office — Office of Economic
Analysis and Tax Research;
(c) Office of Accounting;
(d) Office of Budget; and
(e) Office of Administrative Services — Office
of Information Services; and
(xvii) Department of Finance and Administration —
Revenue Division.
(D) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall notify the
disbursing officers of the appropriations from the State Central Services
Fund not enumerated in subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section of the amount of
their portion of any reduction required from their authorized appropriations
in order to maintain the State Central Services Fund with a projected
positive balance.
(E) Funds or appropriations for that particular disbursing
agency enumerated in subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this section shall not be
affected if a deficit occurs in other State Central Services Fund
appropriations or funds not enumerated in subdivision (e)(3)(C) of this
section for that particular disbursing agency.

19-21-106. Service charges against state agencies.
281 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a)(1) As used in this section, “state agency” includes all boards,
commissions, departments, agencies, institutions, offices, or officers, and
any other office or unit of the State of Arkansas created pursuant to law or
pursuant to any action of the Governor, functioning under appropriation of
the General Assembly or functioning as a representative of the State of
Arkansas without appropriation of the General Assembly.
(2) As used in this section, “state agency” does not include the:
(A) Department of Education and any of its divisions,
community colleges and branches thereof, universities and branches thereof,
technical colleges, technical institutes, postsecondary vocational-technical
schools, and comprehensive lifelong learning centers;
(B) Office of the Commissioner of State Lands; or
(C) Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.
(b)(1) Each state agency whose annual income or revenue as reflected
by the previous fiscal year's audit exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000), shall remit by check on the first day of each calendar quarter to
the Treasurer of State an amount equal to one and five-tenths percent (1.5%)
of the total expenditures of the previous calendar quarter from those cash
funds as defined under § 19-4-801, excluding funds received from the United
States Government or those held in trust by the state agency or those funds
of the various state retirement systems. Funds received by the Division of
Arkansas Heritage from voluntary donations are also excluded.
(2) If a state agency elects to deposit its cash funds into the
State Treasury under the provisions of § 19-4-503, then the amount required
under this section shall be transferred from the state agency's treasury fund
to the State Central Services Fund.
(c) The Treasurer of State shall deposit each check as a nonrevenue
receipt to the credit of the State Central Services Fund in order to provide
financial support for certain required administrative functions of state
government.

19-21-107. Certain sales and use taxes not subject to deduction,
transfer, or distribution.
The sales and use taxes levied under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
91, § 3, and Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 101, § 2, are not subject to
deduction, transfer, or distribution to the Constitutional Officers Fund or
282 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the State Central Services Fund under §§ 19-21-102, 19-21-103, and 19-21-105.

CHAPTER 22
GENERAL REVENUE OPERATING FUNDS AND FUND ACCOUNTS

19-22-101. Funds and fund accounts — Generally.
There are created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor
of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the general revenue
operating funds and fund accounts in this chapter which shall be used only
for those purposes as set out in this chapter. These funds shall consist of
the governmental revenues as set out in this chapter.

19-22-102. State General Government Fund.
The State General Government Fund shall consist of the following fund
accounts and funds made available for the support of the various departments
of government as set out below and shall be used for the same purposes as set
out for the following fund accounts:
(1) Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody
Fund Account shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of
the Division of Correction required in carrying out those powers, functions,
and duties relating to nonfarm or crop-producing programs as established by
law.
(B) The Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody
Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the inmate care and custody program;
(iii) Excess farm profits as may be provided by law;
and
(iv) Any other funds provided by law, including
federal reimbursements received for eligible expenditures by the various
programs of the Division of Correction from appropriations made payable from
the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account;
(2) Department of the Military Fund Account.
283 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) The Department of the Military Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Department of the
Military required in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set
out in the Military Code of Arkansas, Title 12, Chapters 60-64, or other
duties imposed by law upon the State Militia, Department of the Military, and
the Arkansas Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, which was separated from the
Department of Public Safety [abolished] by Acts 1981, No. 45, §§ 4 and 5.
(B) The Department of the Military Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Department of the Military; and
(iii) Any other funds as may be provided by law.
(C) Federal reimbursement funds received on account of
eligible expenditures by the State Militia or the Department of the Military
shall be deposited into the Special Military Fund established on the books of
the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, there to be used as may be provided by law;
(3) Parks and Tourism Fund Account.
(A) The Parks and Tourism Fund Account shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism as created by § 25-43-1301, or other duties
imposed by law upon the State Parks Division and the Tourism Division, the
State Parks, Recreation, and Travel Commission, or upon any state park of
Arkansas.
(B) The Parks and Tourism Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the various divisions of the State Parks Division and the Tourism
Division; and
(iii) Any other funds that may be provided by law.
(C) Funds received by the various state parks under the
direction of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism which are not
required to be deposited into the State Treasury shall be deposited into
284 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
banks, there to be disbursed as may be appropriated by the General Assembly
or to be used as may be otherwise provided by law;
(4) Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Division of Environmental Quality in carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties as set out in Title 8, Chapters 1-10, or other duties imposed by law.
(B) The Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by law;
(ii) Such funds received from the Arkansas State Game and
Fish Commission and from the Oil and Gas Commission as may be provided by
law;
(iii) Nonrevenue income derived from services provided by
the Division of Environmental Quality; and
(iv) Any other funds provided by law;
(5) Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account.
(A) The Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund
Account shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement
required by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission and the Arkansas
Economic Development Council in carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties as set out in §§ 15-4-101, 15-4-102, 15-4-201 — 15-4-204, 15-4-206,
15-4-209 — 15-4-212, 15-4-501 — 15-4-524, and 15-10-201 — 15-10-206, or other
duties imposed by law upon the Arkansas Economic Development Commission or
the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality.
(B) The Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund
Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
performed by the various divisions of the Arkansas Economic Development
Council; and
(iii) Any other funds that may be provided by law;
(6) Division of Higher Education Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Higher Education Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division
285 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of Higher Education in carrying out the duties imposed by law upon the
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board or the Commission on
Coordination of Educational Finance, which was transferred to the Arkansas
Higher Education Coordinating Board and to the Department of Higher
Education, under the provisions of § 25-7-101.
(B) The Division of Higher Education Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Federal reimbursement on account of eligible
expenditures made by the Division of Higher Education;
(iii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Higher Education; and
(iv) Any other funds provided by law.
(C) Proceeds derived from the repayment of loans, grants,
or scholarships funded by the Higher Education Grants Fund Account shall be
deposited into the State Treasury fund from which it originated;
(7) Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account.
(A) The Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Department of Labor and Licensing in carrying out those powers, functions,
and duties imposed by law upon the Secretary of the Department of Labor and
Licensing or the Department of Labor and Licensing, or upon the State Mine
Inspector as set out in § 11-7-201 et seq., or any other duties that may be
imposed by law upon the Department of Labor and Licensing which was
transferred to the Department of Labor and Licensing by § 25-12-101
[repealed].
(B) The Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(ii) Any other funds as may be provided by law, including
federal reimbursement received on account of eligible expenditures by the
various programs of the Department of Labor and Licensing operating from and
having appropriations made payable from the Department of Labor and Licensing
Fund Account;
(8) Livestock and Poultry Fund Account.
286 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) The Livestock and Poultry Fund Account shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission, which was separated from the Department of Commerce
[abolished] by Acts 1981, No. 867, § 1, in carrying out the functions,
powers, and duties as set out in § 2-33-101 et seq., or other duties imposed
by law upon the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.
(B) The Livestock and Poultry Fund Account shall consist
of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law; and
(ii) Any other funds provided by law;
(9) Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.
(A) The Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account may be used
for the state's membership in regional or national associations, grants to
certain organizations, and maintenance, operations, and improvements of
appropriation units as may be authorized by the General Assembly.
(B) The Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account shall consist
of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the various agencies and programs funded from the Miscellaneous
Agencies Fund Account;
(iii) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures of the various agencies and programs receiving primary
support from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account;
(iv) Those special revenues as specified in
subdivision (233) and that portion of subdivision (201) in § 19-42-201 of the
Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.;
(v) That portion of forfeited registration fees for
beer kegs sold for off-site consumption; and
(vi) Civil penalties paid or recovered as set out in
§ 2-24-108(d)(2).
(C) If there are not sufficient funds available in the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account to support the amounts appropriated from
the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
287 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State shall determine the amount of moneys to be made available for each of
the appropriations made from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, after
having first provided full funding for all national and regional association
dues;
(10) Division of Arkansas Heritage Fund Account.
The Division of Arkansas Heritage Fund Account shall consist of
those general revenues as provided by law for the Division of Arkansas
Heritage and shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of
the Division of Arkansas Heritage;
(11) Higher Education Grants Fund Account.
(A) The Higher Education Grants Fund Account shall be used
for the:
(i) State's contribution for tuition support for
Arkansas students attending out-of-state schools in dentistry, optometry,
veterinary, podiatry, osteopathy, and chiropractic; and
(ii)(a) Disbursement of funds for the Arkansas
Academic Challenge Scholarship Program and other various scholarship, loan,
and grant programs as authorized by law and administered by the Division of
Higher Education or other state agencies made disbursing agents by the
General Assembly from the Higher Education Grants Fund Account.
(b) Disbursement of additional funds allocated
for the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program under this
subdivision (11)(A)(ii) shall account for the distribution of up to two
million dollars ($2,000,000) by the Division of Higher Education on behalf of
students who are enrolled in a technical institute or a vocational-technical
institute.
(B) The Higher Education Grants Fund Account shall consist
of transfers from the Private Career School Student Protection Trust Fund
under § 6-51-607 and those general revenues and any other funds as may be
provided by law;
(12) Division of Community Correction Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Community Correction Fund Account
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Division
of Community Correction required in carrying out those powers, functions, and
duties as established by law.
(B) The Division of Community Correction Fund Account
288 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the probation, parole, post-release supervision, and community
correction program; and
(iii) Any other funds provided by law, including
federal reimbursements received for eligible expenditures by the various
programs of the Division of Correction from appropriations made payable from
the Division of Community Correction Fund Account;
(13) Department of Agriculture Fund Account.
(A) The Department of Agriculture Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Department of Agriculture in carrying out those powers, functions, and duties
imposed by law upon the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture as set out
in Title 25, Chapter 38, or any other duties that may be imposed by law upon
the Department of Agriculture which were transferred to the Department of
Agriculture under the provisions of §§ 25-38-206 and 25-38-211.
(B) The Department of Agriculture Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the various divisions of the Department of Agriculture;
(iii) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures by the various programs of the Department of
Agriculture operating from and having appropriations made payable from the
Department of Agriculture Fund Account; and
(iv) Any other funds as may be provided by law.

19-22-103. Institutions of higher education funds.
(a) University of Arkansas Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas Fund shall be used for the
289 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
maintenance, operation, and improvement of the University of Arkansas,
including the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, the Arkansas
Cooperative Extension Service, the Arkansas Agricultural Experiment Station,
the Graduate Institute of Technology, the Arkansas Archeological Survey, and
for such other related and miscellaneous programs as may be provided by law.
(3) The University of Arkansas Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues that may be provided by law;
(B) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(45),
§ 19-42-201(229), and § 19-42-201(232); and
(C) Funds received from the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund as authorized by § 19-24-101.
(b) University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund is to be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences and its various divisions and programs, including the
area health education centers and physician extender programs.
(3) The University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law;
(B) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(224);
and
(C) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences which are required to be
deposited into the State Treasury.
(c) University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Little Rock campus of
the University of Arkansas and its various divisions and programs, including
the Arkansas Economic Development Institute.
(3) The University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund shall consist
290 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law;
(B) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(229);
and
(C) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas at Little Rock which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(d) University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Monticello campus of
the University of Arkansas and its various divisions, the University of
Arkansas at Monticello College of Technology-Crossett, and the University of
Arkansas at Monticello College of Technology-McGehee.
(3) The University of Arkansas at Monticello Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law;
(B) The June 30, 2003, balances in the Forest Echoes
Technical Institute Fund Account and the Great Rivers Comprehensive Lifelong
Learning Center Fund Account; and
(C) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas at Monticello which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(e) University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Pine Bluff campus of
the University of Arkansas.
(3) The University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
291 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff and its various divisions, including the
special teacher training program, which are required to be deposited into the
State Treasury by law.
(f) Arkansas State University Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas State University.
(3) The Arkansas State University Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas State University which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(g) Arkansas State University — Beebe Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University — Beebe Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University — Beebe Fund shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas State University-
Beebe, including Arkansas State Technical Institute, Arkansas State
University-Searcy, and Arkansas State University-Heber Springs.
(3) The Arkansas State University — Beebe Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas State University-Beebe which are required to be deposited into the
State Treasury by law.
(h) Arkansas Tech University Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas Tech University Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas Tech University Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas Tech University.
(3) The Arkansas Tech University Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
292 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Arkansas Tech University which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(i) Henderson State University Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Henderson State University Fund”.
(2) The Henderson State University Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Henderson State University,
including the nursing program.
(3) The Henderson State University Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Henderson State University which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(j) Southern Arkansas University Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Southern Arkansas University Fund”.
(2) The Southern Arkansas University Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Southern Arkansas University.
(3) The Southern Arkansas University Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Southern Arkansas University and its programs which are required to be
deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(k) University of Central Arkansas Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Central Arkansas Fund”.
(2) The University of Central Arkansas Fund shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the University of Central
Arkansas.
(3) The University of Central Arkansas Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Central Arkansas which are required to be deposited into the
293 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State Treasury by law.
(l) University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the University of Arkansas
at Fort Smith.
(3) The University of Arkansas at Fort Smith Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas at Fort Smith which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(m) North Arkansas College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “North Arkansas College Fund”.
(2) The North Arkansas College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of North Arkansas College.
(3) The North Arkansas College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
North Arkansas College which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(n) East Arkansas Community College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “East Arkansas Community College Fund”.
(2) The East Arkansas Community College Fund shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement of East Arkansas Community
College.
(3) The East Arkansas Community College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of East
Arkansas Community College which are required to be deposited into the State
294 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Treasury by law.
(o) Arkansas Northeastern College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas Northeastern College Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas Northeastern College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas Northeastern College.
(3) The Arkansas Northeastern College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas Northeastern College which are required to be deposited into the
State Treasury by law.
(p) Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas Fund”.
(2) The Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas
Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of
Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas, including the
Stuttgart and DeWitt campuses.
(3) The Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas
Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas which are required
to be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(q) University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain
Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas Community College at Rich
Mountain Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement
of the University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain.
(3) The University of Arkansas Community College at Rich
Mountain Fund shall consist of:
295 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain which are required
to be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(r) Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund”.
(2) The Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of Northwest Arkansas
Community College.
(3) The Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Northwest Arkansas Community College which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(s) South Arkansas College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “South Arkansas College Fund”.
(2) The South Arkansas College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of South Arkansas College.
(3) The South Arkansas College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
South Arkansas College, which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(t) SAU-Tech Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “SAU-Tech Fund”.
(2) The SAU-Tech Fund shall be used for the maintenance,
operation, and improvement of SAU-Tech, the Arkansas Fire Training Academy,
and the Arkansas Environmental Training Academy.
(3) The SAU-Tech Fund shall consist of:
296 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of SAU-
Tech and its programs which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(u) Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas State University
Mid-South.
(3) The Arkansas State University Mid-South Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law;
(B) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201; and
(C) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas State University Mid-South which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(v) University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana
Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-
Texarkana Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement
of the University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana.
(3) The University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-
Texarkana Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana which are required
to be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(w) University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville Fund”.
297 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) The University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville
Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville.
(3) The University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville
Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville which are required to
be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(x) Arkansas State University — Newport Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University — Newport Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University — Newport Fund shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas State University
— Newport.
(3) The Arkansas State University — Newport Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas State University — Newport which are required to be deposited into
the State Treasury by law.
(y) Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas Fund”.
(2) The Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas
Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of
Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas.
(3) The Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas
Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas which are required
to be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(z) University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton Fund.
298 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton Fund”.
(2) The University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton
Fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton.
(3) The University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton
Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton which are required to
be deposited into the State Treasury by law.
(aa) Arkansas State University-Mountain Home Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University-Mountain Home Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University-Mountain Home Fund shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of Arkansas State
University-Mountain Home.
(3) The Arkansas State University-Mountain Home Fund shall
consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Arkansas State University-Mountain Home which are required to be deposited
into the State Treasury by law.
(bb) National Park College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “National Park College Fund”.
(2) The National Park College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of National Park College.
(3) The National Park College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues transferred each month from the
Garland County Community College Fund [repealed];
(B) The June 30, 2003, balances in the Garland County
Community College Fund [repealed]; and
299 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) Any other funds made available for the support of
National Park College which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(cc) School for Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “School for Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund”.
(2) The School for Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund shall be used
to provide for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts in carrying out its
powers, functions, and duties as set out by law.
(3) The School for Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Moneys allocated and transferred from the Educational
Excellence Trust Fund;
(B) Any general revenues as may be provided under this
subtitle; and
(C) Any other moneys as may be authorized by law.
(dd) Ozarka College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Ozarka College Fund”.
(2) The Ozarka College Fund shall be used for the maintenance,
operation, and improvement of Ozarka College.
(3) The Ozarka College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Ozarka College which are required to be deposited into the State Treasury by
law.
(ee) Southeast Arkansas College Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Southeast Arkansas College Fund”.
(2) The Southeast Arkansas College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Southeast Arkansas College.
(3) The Southeast Arkansas College Fund shall consist of:
300 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Southeast Arkansas College which are required to be deposited into the State
Treasury by law.
(ff) Arkansas State University Three Rivers Fund.
(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas State University Three Rivers Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas State University Three Rivers Fund shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Arkansas State
University Three Rivers.
(3) The Arkansas State University Three Rivers Fund shall
consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
Arkansas State University Three Rivers which are required to be deposited
into the State Treasury by law.

19-22-104. Education Fund.
The Education Fund shall consist of the following funds and fund
accounts made available for the support of the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, the
Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, and shall be
used for the same purposes as set out for the following fund accounts:
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
Fund Account shall be used to provide for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education created in
§ 25-6-102, and any other laws imposing functions, powers, and duties upon
the State Board of Education, the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education, and the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education,
including, but not necessarily limited to, history textbooks expenses, the
Publishing Revolving Account, audio-visual services, textbooks operation,
compact for education, including the state's membership, and the state's
contribution to the Southern Regional Education Board.
(B) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
301 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.; and
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by those programs supported from the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education Fund Account, including any rental property located on
the State Capitol grounds owned by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education;
(2) Division of Career and Technical Education Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Career and Technical Education Fund
Account shall be used to provide support for those programs placed under the
direction of the Director of the Division of Career and Technical Education
as authorized by §§ 6-11-101, 6-11-102, 25-6-101, 25-6-102, and Acts 1981,
No. 64, § 4, and any other laws imposing functions, powers, and duties upon
the State Board of Education with respect to career and technical education,
including without limitation the following:
(i) Vocational, technical, and adult education;
(ii) Adult basic education;
(iii) Manpower training;
(iv) Vocational standards;
(v) Industry training programs; and
(vi) Those functions, programs, and responsibilities
transferred to the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult
Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, as authorized by
these statutes.
(B) The Division of Career and Technical Education Fund
Account shall consist of those general revenues as may be provided by the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.;
(3) Educational Television Fund Account.
(A) The Educational Television Fund Account shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Educational
Television Division of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education in
carrying out those powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas Educational
Television Commission as set out in § 6-3-101 et seq. or other duties imposed
by law upon the Arkansas Educational Television Commission.
(B) The Educational Television Fund Account shall consist
302 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of those general revenues as may be provided by law and nonrevenue income
derived from services provided by the Educational Television Division of the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and any other nonfederal grant
funds provided by law;
(4) State Library Fund Account.
(A) The State Library Fund Account shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Library Division of
the Department of Education in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
as set out in § 13-2-201 et seq. or any other duties imposed by law upon the
State Library Commission, which were transferred to the Department of
Education by §§ 6-11-101, 6-11-102, and 25-6-102.
(B) The State Library Fund Account shall consist of those
general revenues as may be provided by law and nonrevenue income derived from
services provided by the Library Division of the Department of Education and
any other nonfederal grant funds provided by law;
(5) School for the Blind Fund Account.
(A) The School for the Blind Fund Account shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Arkansas
School for the Blind in carrying out those powers, functions, and duties as
set out in § 6-43-101 et seq. and § 6-43-201 et seq.
(B) The School for the Blind Fund Account shall consist of
those general revenues as may be provided by law and nonrevenue income
derived from services provided by the Arkansas School for the Blind and any
other nonfederal grant funds provided by law.
(C) Federal reimbursement funds received on account of
vocational education programs conducted by the Arkansas School for the Blind
shall not be deposited into the School for the Blind Fund Account;
(6) School for the Deaf Fund Account.
(A) The School for the Deaf Fund Account shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Arkansas School
for the Deaf in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set out in
§ 6-43-301 et seq. or other duties imposed by law upon the Arkansas School
for the Deaf, which were transferred to the Department of Education by §§ 6-
11-101, 6-11-102, and 25-6-102.
(B) The School for the Deaf Fund Account shall consist of
those general revenues as may be provided by law and nonrevenue income
303 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
derived from services provided by the Arkansas School for the Deaf and any
other nonfederal grant funds provided by law.
(C) Federal reimbursement funds received on account of
vocational education programs conducted by the Arkansas School for the Deaf
shall not be deposited into the School for the Deaf Fund Account;
(7) Rehabilitation Services Fund Account.
(A) The Rehabilitation Services Fund Account shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as
set out in § 6-52-101 et seq., the Rehabilitation Act of Arkansas, § 20-79-
201 et seq., and § 25-30-201 et seq., and for the program for adults with
disabilities at the Arkansas Health Center.
(B) The Rehabilitation Services Fund Account shall consist
of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by rehabilitation programs of Arkansas Rehabilitation Services; and
(iii) Any other nonfederal grant funds provided by
law;
(8) Technical Institute and Other Education Fund Accounts. The
Northwest Technical Institute Fund Account shall be used for the maintenance,
operation, and improvement of Northwest Technical Institute. The Northwest
Technical Institute Fund Account shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
Northwest Technical Institute which are required to be deposited into the
State Treasury by law;
(9) Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account.
(A) The Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account
shall be used for distribution of grants for programs providing academic
school facility and transportation assistance to the public school districts
as may be provided by law.
(B) The Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account
shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
304 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
law;
(ii) Moneys transferred from the Development and
Enhancement Fund; and
(iii) Any other moneys as may be provided by law;
(10) Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation Fund Account.
(A) The Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation Fund Account shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation as may be provided by law.
(B) The Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law; and
(ii) Any other funds made available for the support
of the Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation;
(11) Child Care Grant Fund Account.
(A) The Child Care Grant Fund Account shall be used for
the Child Care Grant program to consist of general revenues and any other
nonfederal funds, as may be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(B) Federal reimbursement received by the Department of
Education shall be deposited into separate funds on the books of the
Treasurer of State; and
(12) Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund Account.
(A) The Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund
Account shall be used for:
(i) The maintenance, operation, and improvement
required by the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education in
carrying out those functions, powers, and duties as set out in the Childcare
Facility Licensing Act, § 20-78-201 et seq.; and
(ii) Carrying out other duties imposed by law upon
the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education.
(B) The Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund
Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
305 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education; and
(iii) Any other nonfederal grant-in-aid funds
provided by law.

19-22-105. Public School Fund.
(a) The Public School Fund shall consist of the following fund
accounts and funds made available for the support of the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education, the Arkansas State Library, and the
Division of Career and Technical Education and shall be used for the same
purposes as set out for the following fund accounts:
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School
Fund Account. The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public
School Fund Account shall be used for grants and aids for the programs
administered by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education as
authorized by law;
(2) Division of Career and Technical Education Public School
Fund Account. The Division of Career and Technical Education Public School
Fund Account shall be used for grants and aids for the programs administered
by the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education
Section, and the Office of Skills Development, consisting of, but not limited
to:
(A) General adult education grants;
(B) Adult basic education grants;
(C) Manpower development and training grants;
(D) Vocational-technical and adult education; and
(E) Such other grants and aids as may be authorized by law
for disbursement by the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult
Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development; and
(3) State Library Public School Fund Account. The State Library
Public School Fund Account shall be used for State Aid to Public Libraries as
administered by the Arkansas State Library.
(b) The Public School Fund shall consist of those moneys as may be
provided by:
(1) The Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.;
(2) Any federal mineral leasing funds, federal forest reserve
306 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
funds, federal flood control funds, or any other similar turnback funds in
the State Treasury for which the eligible county or school district cannot be
identified;
(3) Fines collected pursuant to § 6-21-410 under the Free
Textbook Act of 1975, § 6-21-401 et seq.;
(4) Funds remitted by county treasurers for those school
districts which have local revenue per student in excess of the local base
per student, as set out in § 26-80-101(c);
(5) Amusement machine revenues up to and including thirty
thousand dollars ($30,000), as set out in § 26-57-407;
(6) Twenty-five percent (25%) of additional rental vehicle tax
revenues under § 26-63-302, to be used exclusively for teacher salaries; and
(7) Such other funds as may be authorized by law.
(c)(1) There is authorized a transfer of up to two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) per year from the Public School Fund to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account or the Division of Career and
Technical Education Fund Account, or a portion thereof to both, by the
Treasurer of State and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, upon
certification as to the amount required by the Commissioner of Elementary and
Secondary Education or by the Director of the Division of Career and
Technical Education, or both, to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(2) This transfer shall be used to provide additional support
for the administration of the program for children with disabilities and the
vocational-technical and adult education program.

19-22-106. Department of Human Services Fund.
The Department of Human Services Fund shall consist of the following
fund accounts and funds made available for the support of the Department of
Human Services and shall be used for the same purposes as set out for the
following fund accounts:
(1) Behavioral Health Services Fund Account.
(A) The Behavioral Health Services Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
Services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties, as set out in §
20-46-101 et seq. and § 25-10-101 et seq., or other duties imposed by law
307 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
upon the Arkansas State Hospital.
(B) The Behavioral Health Services Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Arkansas State Hospital;
(iii) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures;
(iv) Paying patient fees and other funds as may be
provided by law;
(v) Funds received from local sources for community
program matching; and
(vi) Funds received from the Division of Medical
Services;
(2) Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account.
(A) The Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Division of Developmental Disabilities Services in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties, as set out in § 20-48-101 et seq. and § 25-10-101 et
seq., and all laws amendatory thereto, or other duties imposed by law upon
the human development centers or the Board of Developmental Disabilities
Services.
(B) The Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account
shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived by services provided
by the human development centers;
(iii) Funds received from local sources to provide
matching for community developmental disabilities services programs; and
(iv) Reimbursement received from the Division of
Medical Services;
(3) Medical Services Fund Account.
(A) The Medical Services Fund Account shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division of
308 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Medical Services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set out
in § 20-76-101 et seq. and § 25-10-101 et seq., including the support and
administration costs of the expanded Medical Services Program of the Division
of Medical Services for the working poor in Arkansas.
(B) The Medical Services Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Medical Services;
(iii) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures for the administration of medical services programs;
(iv) Funds derived from fees collected pursuant to
the provisions of §§ 20-10-213 — 20-10-228 to be used for the maintenance and
operation of the long-term care facility licensure program of the Division of
Medical Services; and
(v) Any other nonfederal grant funds provided by
law.
(C) Other federal reimbursement funds received by the
Division of Medical Services shall be deposited into a separate federal
reimbursement fund on the books of the Treasurer of State;
(4) Youth Services Fund Account.
(A) The Youth Services Fund Account shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division of Youth
Services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set out in § 9-
28-201 et seq., including serious offender and community-based programs and
the youth service centers.
(B) The Youth Services Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the various programs of the Division of Youth Services; and
(iii) Any other nonfederal grants-in-aid funds
provided by law.
(C) Other federal reimbursement received by the Division
of Youth Services shall be deposited into a separate federal reimbursement
fund on the books of the Treasurer of State, including those received on
309 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
account of eligible expenditures of the youth service centers' vocational
education programs;
(5) Children and Family Services Fund Account.
(A) The Children and Family Services Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division
of Children and Family Services in carrying out those functions, powers, and
duties as set out in § 25-10-101 et seq.
(B) The Children and Family Services Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Children and Family Services; and
(iii) Any other nonfederal grant-in-aid funds
provided by law;
(6) Department of Human Services Administration Fund Account.
(A) The Department of Human Services Administration Fund
Account shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement
required by the office of the Secretary of the Department of Human Services
in carrying out the administrative duties and shared business services of the
Department of Human Services as set out in and under the restrictions and
provisions of § 20-46-301 and § 25-10-101 et seq.
(B) The Department of Human Services Administration Fund
Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by these divisions of the Department of Human Services; and
(iii) Any other funds, including reimbursement for
costs incurred by these divisions from the various other Department of Human
Services' divisions from nongeneral revenue sources, as may be required and
provided by law;
(7) Aging and Adult Services Fund Account.
(A) The Aging and Adult Services Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
310 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as imposed by law,
and § 25-10-101 et seq., upon the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral
Health Services of the Department of Human Services.
(B) The Aging and Adult Services Fund Account shall
consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) of those special revenues
as specified in § 19-42-201(201), there to be used to assist the Meals on
Wheels America program, and any other special revenues as may be provided by
law;
(iii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of
the Department of Human Services;
(iv) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health
Services of the Department of Human Services; and
(v) The first three million dollars ($3,000,000)
each year of the net revenues derived from the additional cigarette tax
levied in § 26-57-802, to be used exclusively for transportation services
benefiting the elderly, including the Meals on Wheels America program;
(8) County Operations Fund Account.
(A) The County Operations Fund Account shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division of
County Operations in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as set
out in § 25-10-102.
(B) The County Operations Fund Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the various programs of the Division of County Operations;
(iii) Any other nonfederal grants-in-aid funds
provided by law;
(iv) Funds received from the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education for surplus commodities; and
(v) Federal reimbursement received on account of
311 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
eligible expenditures of the Division of County Operations.
(C) Other federal reimbursement funds received by the
Division of County Operations shall be deposited into a separate federal
reimbursement fund on the books of the Treasurer of State;
(9) Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account.
(A) The Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account
shall be used for the following grant programs to consist of general revenues
and any other nonfederal funds, as may be appropriated by the General
Assembly:
(i) Children's Medical Services;
(ii) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Employment
and Training Program;
(iii) Aid to the Aged, Blind, and Disabled;
(iv) Transitional Employment Assistance Program;
(v) Private nursing home care;
(vi) Infant Infirmary — nursing home care;
(vii) Public Nursing Home Care;
(viii) Prescription drugs;
(ix) Hospital and Medical Services;
(x) Child Health and Family Life Institute;
(xi) Community Services Block Grant Program;
(xii) ARKids First Program; and
(xiii) Child health management services.
(B) Federal reimbursement received by the Department of
Human Services shall be deposited into separate funds on the books of the
Treasurer of State;
(10) Long-Term Care Facility Receivership Fund Account.
(A) The Long-Term Care Facility Receivership Fund Account
shall be used for paying the expenses of receivers appointed under the
Arkansas Long-Term Care Facility Receivership Law, § 20-10-901 et seq., as
administered and disbursed under the direction of the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services.
(B) The Long-Term Care Facility Receivership Fund Account
shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues and such other funds as
may be provided by law; and
312 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(ii) The balance in the Long-Term Care Facility
Receivership Fund Account which remains at the end of a fiscal year; and
(11) Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund Account.
(A) The Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund
Account shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement
required by the Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance in
carrying out its powers, functions, and duties.
(B) The Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund
Account shall consist of:
(i) Those general revenues as may be provided by
law;
(ii) Nonrevenue income derived from services
provided by the Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance;
(iii) Federal reimbursement received on account of
eligible expenditures for the administration of medical services programs or
other programs; and
(iv) Any other nonfederal grant funds provided by
law.

19-22-107. Public Health Fund.
(a) The Public Health Fund shall be used for the maintenance,
operation, and improvement required by the regional health centers and the
various divisions of the Department of Health in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties as set out in § 20-7-102 et seq. or other duties
imposed by law upon:
(1) The Department of Health;
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Health;
(3) The State Board of Health; and
(4) The Secretary of the State Board of Health, or the State
Health Officer, whose office was transferred under § 25-9-101 [repealed] to
the Department of Health.
(b) The Public Health Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(41), (65),
(68), (69), (80), (97), (131), (133), (136), (137), (140), (141), (142),
(143), (144), (147), (155), (166), (177), (194), (204), and that portion of §
19-42-201(58) of the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.;
313 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) General revenues as may be provided by law;
(3) Nonrevenue income derived from services provided by the
various divisions of the Department of Health;
(4) Federal reimbursement received on account of eligible
expenditures by the various divisions of the Department of Health;
(5) Other funds as may be provided by law;
(6) Moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund to support alcoholism treatment programs and
for use in the drug abuse prevention and treatment program of the Division of
Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
Services;
(7) Amusement machine revenues over thirty thousand dollars
($30,000), as set out in § 26-57-407; and
(8) Criminal, civil, and administrative penalties collected
under the Arkansas Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Act of 2011, § 20-27-2501 et seq.

19-22-108. Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste Systems Revolving Fund.
(a) A special fund to be known as the “Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste
Systems Revolving Fund” is created to provide a depository for funds that may
be appropriated or otherwise secured for the purposes of matching or
supplementing federal grants and loans.
(b) The Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste Systems Revolving Fund shall be
used to provide low interest loans to cities, towns, counties, and other
eligible applicants.
(c) Funds from the repayment of loans made from the Water, Sewer, and
Solid Waste Systems Revolving Fund shall return to the Water, Sewer, and
Solid Waste Systems Revolving Fund and shall be reloaned in a manner that is
consistent with the purposes of this section.

19-22-109. Black River Technical College Fund and University of
Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College Fund.
(a)(1) The Black River Technical College Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of Black River Technical College.
(2) The Black River Technical College Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of
314 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Black River Technical College that are required to be deposited into the
State Treasury by law.
(b)(1) The University of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College Fund
shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of University
of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College.
(2) The University of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College Fund
shall consist of:
(A) Those general revenues as may be provided by law; and
(B) Any other funds made available for the support of the
University of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College that are required to be
deposited into the State Treasury by law.

19-22-110. State Services for the Blind Fund.
(a) The State Services for the Blind Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Division of State
Services for the Blind in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties as
set out in § 25-11-201 et seq. or other duties imposed by law upon the
division.
(b) The State Services for the Blind Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those general revenues provided by law;
(2) Nonrevenue income derived from services provided by programs
of the division; and
(3) Any other nonfederal grant funds provided by law.

CHAPTER 23
DISTRIBUTION OF GENERAL REVENUES

19-23-101. Allocations for Fiscal Year 2024-2025 and thereafter.
Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and each fiscal
year thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall transfer all remaining general
revenues available for distribution on the last day of business in July 2024,
and on the last day of business in each calendar month thereafter during the
fiscal year to the various funds and fund accounts participating in general
revenues in the proportions of the maximum allocation as the individual
allocation to the fund or fund account bears to the total of the maximum
allocation as provided in § 19-23-102.
315 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-23-102. Maximum allocations of revenues for Fiscal Year 2024-2025
and thereafter.
ALLOCATION A. The Treasurer of State shall first make monthly
allocations in the proportions set out in this section to the funds and fund
accounts listed below until there has been transferred a total of six billion
three hundred eleven million four hundred sixty thousand five hundred sixty-
six dollars ($6,311,460,566) or so much thereof as may become available;
provided, that the Treasurer of State shall make such monthly allocations in
accordance with each fund or fund account's proportionate part of the total
of all such allocations set forth in this section:
Maximum
Name of Fund or Fund Account Allocation
PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund
Account $ 2,443,582,431
(2) State Library Public School Fund Account $ 5,641,919
(3) Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account
$ 26,883,872
(4) Division of Career and Technical Education Public School Fund Account -
Adult Education $ 8,489,176

EDUCATION FUND
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account $
18,282,199
(2) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account - Succeed
Scholarship $ -
(3) Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account $ -
(4) Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation Fund
Account $ 2,857,204
(5) Educational Television Fund Account $ 5,825,736
(6) School for the Blind Fund Account $ 8,218,836
(7) School for the Deaf Fund Account $ 11,812,933
(8) State Library Fund Account $ 3,859,435
(9) Division of Career and Technical Education Fund Account $ -
(10) Rehabilitation Services Fund Account $ 11,942,101
316 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(11) Child Care Grant Fund Account $ 7,056,193
(12) Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund Account $ 2,589,553
Technical Institutes:
(13) Northwest Technical Institute Fund Account $ 3,308,152

DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FUND
(1) Department of Human Services Administration Fund Account $
24,518,586
(2) Children and Family Services Fund Account $ 139,333,393
(3) Youth Services Fund Account $ 48,980,104
(4) Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account $ 65,603,057
(5) Medical Services Fund Account $ 2,442,596
(6) Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account $ 1,389,725,705
(7) Behavioral Health Services Fund Account $ 103,643,589
(8) Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund Account $ 5,515,977
(9) County Operations Fund Account $ 57,419,886


STATE GENERAL GOVERNMENT FUND
(1) Division of Arkansas Heritage Fund Account $ 7,755,838
(2) Department of Agriculture Fund Account $ 19,479,187
(3) Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account $ 3,909,567
(4) Division of Higher Education Fund Account $ 11,989,758
(5) Higher Education Grants Fund Account $ 40,619,625
(6) Arkansas Economic Development Commission Fund Account $ 21,339,734
(7) Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account $
434,873,587
(8) Division of Community Correction Fund Account $ 105,311,074
(9) Department of the Military Fund Account $ 10,109,327
(10) Parks and Tourism Fund Account $ 22,082,257
(11) Division of Environmental Quality Fund Account $ 4,202,841
(12) Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account $ 78,026,413

COUNTY AID FUND $ 21,428,616
COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT FUND $ 25,765,944
CRIME INFORMATION SYSTEM FUND $ 2,186,443
317 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT FUND $ 13,288,801
PUBLIC HEALTH FUND $ 81,954,072
PERFORMANCE FUND $ -
MOTOR VEHICLE ACQUISITION REVOLVING FUND $ -
MUNICIPAL AID FUND $ 29,372,099
DIVISION OF ARKANSAS STATE POLICE FUND $ 92,596,808
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE SERVICES FUND-NEW HIRE REGISTRY $ 150,000
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE SERVICES FUND-ADULT EDUCATION $ 1,026,253
STATE SERVICES FOR THE BLIND FUND $ 1,972,456
SKILLS DEVELOPMENT FUND $ 3,608,348
ARKANSAS CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL FREEDOM ACCOUNT FUND $ 97,487,318
SUSTAINABLE BUILDING MAINTENANCE PROGRAM FOR STATE-SUPPORTED INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION REVOLVING LOAN FUND $ 4,555,985


INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(1) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY FUND $ 62,150,956
(2) ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY FUND $ 36,356,050
(3) HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY FUND $ 18,832,354
(4) SOUTHERN ARKANSAS UNIVERSITY FUND $ 16,861,877
(5) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND $ 134,584,010
(6) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-UA SYSTEM $ 3,479,474
(7) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-ARCHEOLOGICAL SURVEY $ 2,369,274
(8) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-DIVISION OF AGRICULTURE $ 65,800,138
(9) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-CLINTON SCHOOL $ 2,336,896
(10) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-CRIMINAL JUSTICE INSTITUTE $ 2,458,634
(11) SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCES, AND ARTS FUND $ 1,133,048
(12) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT FORT SMITH FUND $ 21,045,824
(13) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT LITTLE ROCK FUND $ 60,049,349
(14) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND $ 93,012,881
(15) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND - CHILD ABUSE/RAPE/DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE $ 350,000
(16) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND - PEDIATRICS/PSYCHIATRIC
RESEARCH $ 1,985,100
(17) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND - INDIGENT CARE $
5,438,340
318 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(18) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO FUND $ 16,696,750
(19) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF FUND $ 21,902,693
(20) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF FUND - 1890 LAND GRANT STATE MATCH
$ 5,800,000
(21) UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL ARKANSAS FUND $ 56,013,219
(22) ARKANSAS NORTHEASTERN COLLEGE FUND $ 8,765,839
(23) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - BEEBE FUND $ 11,356,380
(24) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MOUNTAIN HOME FUND $ 3,695,854
(25) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - NEWPORT FUND $ 6,559,812
(26) COSSATOT COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND $
3,757,578
(27) EAST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE FUND $ 8,749,489
(28) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY MID-SOUTH FUND $ 4,013,696
(29) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY MID-SOUTH FUND - ADTEC $ 1,527,000
(30) NATIONAL PARK COLLEGE FUND $ 9,040,569
(31) NORTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 7,605,726
(32) NORTHWEST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE FUND $ 11,649,679
(33) PHILLIPS COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND $
8,923,812
(34) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT RICH MOUNTAIN FUND $
3,546,964
(35) SAU-TECH FUND $ 5,530,868
(36) SAU-TECH FUND-ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY $ 375,036
(37) SAU-TECH FUND-FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY $ 1,780,943
(38) SOUTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 6,084,362
(39) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT BATESVILLE FUND $
4,406,596
(40) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT HOPE-TEXARKANA FUND $
4,647,636
(41) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT MORRILTON FUND $ 5,089,458

(42) BLACK RIVER TECHNICAL COLLEGE FUND $ 6,321,306
(43) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY THREE RIVERS FUND $ 3,381,360
(44) OZARKA COLLEGE FUND $ 3,248,284
(45) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - PULASKI TECHNICAL COLLEGE FUND $
14,765,510
319 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(46) SOUTHEAST ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 5,354,958

19-23-103. Authority of Treasurer of State.
The Treasurer of State, in calculating the proportionate share of the
maximum allocation to determine the monthly distribution of net general
revenues available for distribution for each fund or fund account, as
authorized in this chapter, shall compute the calculation of five (5) digits
to the right of the decimal point, “rounded off”. In the event the Treasurer
of State shall determine that there are errors in any of the totals of the
respective funds or fund accounts for which distributions are authorized in
this chapter, the maximum allocation authorized for each fund and fund
account within each subsection shall govern with respect to the allocation to
be made to those funds and fund accounts. The Treasurer of State is
authorized to correct errors in totals thereof, as reflected in this chapter,
prior to computing the calculations of the proportionate share of the maximum
allocations to be determined in making monthly distributions of net general
revenues available for distribution for each fund or fund account, as
authorized within the respective priorities set forth in this chapter.

19-23-104. Transfer of remaining revenues.
(a) After making the maximum annual allocation as provided for in §
19-23-102, the first two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the remaining general revenues
available for distribution during each fiscal year shall be transferred on
the last day of business in each calendar month to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund, there to be used as stated under subsection (b) of
this section; and
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the remaining general revenues
available for distribution during each fiscal year, but not to exceed fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000) each fiscal year, shall be transferred on the
last day of business in each calendar month to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund.
(b)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine whether
the balance of the Catastrophic Reserve Fund is twenty percent (20%) of the
total amount of general revenue funds last distributed under § 19-23-102.
320 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines that the
balance of the Catastrophic Reserve Fund is less than twenty percent (20%) of
the total amount of general revenue funds last distributed under § 19-23-102,
then after the distributions under subsection (a) of this section, any
additional revenue, including the distributions under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section and any additional revenues in excess of those distributed under
subsection (a) of this section, shall be transferred to the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund to ensure that the Catastrophic Reserve Fund balance equals but
does not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total amount of general revenue
funds last distributed under § 19-23-102.
(3) If it is determined that the balance of the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the total amount of general
revenue funds last distributed under § 19-23-102, the amount in excess shall
remain in the Catastrophic Reserve Fund unless the General Assembly directs
otherwise.
(c) Any additional revenues available after the distributions in
subsection (b) of this section shall be transferred on the last day of
business in each calendar month to the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund, there to be used for the respective purposes as provided by law.

CHAPTER 24
BUDGET STABILIZATION TRUST FUND

19-24-101. Budget Stabilization Trust Fund — Creation — Purpose.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Budget Stabilization Trust Fund”.
(2) The Budget Stabilization Trust Fund shall consist of funds
made available and transferred to it from the Securities Reserve Fund as set
out in § 19-26-203, the fund balance and other assets remaining in the State
Budget Revolving Fund on June 30, 1987, and any other funds made available by
law.
(b) The Budget Stabilization Trust Fund shall be used for the purpose
of:
(1)(A) Making temporary loans to those funds and fund accounts
as set out in § 19-23-101 et seq., to the Division of Correction Farm Fund
321 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for farm production purposes, to the Division of Correction Prison Industry
Fund, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Fund Account, to the
Income Tax Refund Fund, to the Gasoline Tax Refund Fund, to the Interstate
Motor Fuel Tax Refund Fund, and to the various funds established in the
Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., and any other funds or fund
accounts as may be specified elsewhere in this section. The loans made to the
funds and fund accounts set out in § 19-23-101 et seq. shall be repaid on or
before June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan is made, except as
provided elsewhere in this section.
(B)(i) The loans made to the Division of Correction Farm
Fund are to be repaid on or before June 30 of the fiscal year following the
fiscal year in which the loan was made after the amount of the outstanding
loan made the previous fiscal year has been reduced by the value of farm-
produced products produced or processed on the farm that were consumed by
inmates and other authorized personnel, in amounts as determined and
certified by the Legislative Auditor to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.
(ii) Processed beef purchased by the Division of
Correction must be labeled as being from the United States.
(iii)(a) The value of products produced or processed
on the farm that were consumed by inmates of the Division of Correction or
inmates in the custody of the Division of Community Correction and other
authorized personnel shall be based upon prices obtained by the Division of
Correction and the State Procurement Director for purchasing similar products
and quantities on the open market for other state agencies, institutions, and
universities.
(b) However, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State may grant an extension not to exceed sixty (60) days for repayment of
loans made to the Division of Correction Farm Fund upon receipt by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State of a certification by the Director of the
Division of Correction that farm-produced products are held in storage or are
on hand that exceed in market value the amount of loans that are due, and the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may grant an additional extension not to
exceed sixty (60) days for repayment of the loan made to the Division of
Correction Farm Fund, after obtaining the advice of the Legislative Council
in regard to a request from the Division of Correction for the additional
322 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
sixty-day extension for repayment of the loan.
(iv) Loans made to the Division of Correction Prison
Industry Fund for operation expenses shall be repaid on or before June 30 of
the fiscal year in which the loan was made, but loans made for the purchase
of equipment necessary for implementing the various industries shall be
repaid from time to time.
(C)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision
(b)(1)(C), loans made to the Income Tax Refund Fund, to the Gasoline Tax
Refund Fund, to the Interstate Motor Fuel Tax Refund Fund, and to those other
funds established in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., are
to be repaid on the last day of the month of which the loan was made.
(ii) Loans made under subdivision (b)(1)(D) of this
section shall be repaid by June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan was
made.
(iii)(a) Loans made to the Department of Human
Services Fund during June of any fiscal year for making cash assistance
payments to eligible individuals under the Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families Program for delivery on or about July 1 of the following fiscal year
shall be repaid on or before July 31 of the fiscal year following the fiscal
year in which the loan was made.
(b) Loans made to the Department of Human
Services for the Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account and the
Behavioral Health Services Fund Account in the last month of a fiscal year
for federal reimbursement for Medicaid-eligible services and Medicare-
eligible services shall be repaid immediately upon receipt of reimbursement
but no later than July 31 of the fiscal year following the fiscal year in
which the loan was made.
(D)(i) The maximum amount of funds that may be loaned to
the funds established in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.,
shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the estimated revenues to be
deposited into the State Treasury during that month to the credit of the
State Apportionment Fund and which will become available to that operating
fund at the end of the month, excluding the Division of Correction Farm Fund,
the Division of Correction Prison Industry Fund, the Division of Arkansas
State Police Fund, and the State Forestry Fund.
(ii) Except with respect to the funds excluded under
323 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this subdivision (b)(1)(D), loans in excess of one hundred percent (100%)
shall not be made more than four (4) times per fiscal year per fund.
(iii) Loans and distribution of general revenue
funds made to the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund are to be made
on the basis and to the extent of the funds estimated to be available as
stated in § 19-23-102(a) so that an equal monthly distribution of general
revenues is made, based upon the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State's monthly
forecasts of general revenue distribution.
(E) Temporary loans may be made to the institutions of
higher education for operational purposes. In making these loans, the
following procedures shall be applicable. The institutions of higher
education shall submit requests for loans to both the Commissioner of the
Division of Higher Education and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
setting forth the need for the loan. The requests shall include at least the
following:
(i) The current total cash balance of all accounts
of the requesting institution's cash funds;
(ii) The reasons why the cash fund balances and
their general revenue fund balances are insufficient to meet current
obligations;
(iii) The anticipated duration of the loan; and
(iv) A proposed repayment schedule.
(F)(i)(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the
Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education shall review the request for
the loan.
(b) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher
Education shall recommend, in writing, the approval or disapproval of the
loan and the reasons for the recommendation to the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State.
(c)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall review the institution's request, the funds available in the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund, and the recommendation of the Commissioner of the
Division of Higher Education.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State may request such additional information as is deemed necessary to make
a determination as to whether the request should be approved.
324 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State determines that the request is proper and necessary for the operation
of the institution and that sufficient funds are available, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall approve the request and establish a repayment
schedule for the loan.
(4) If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State determines that the loan is not necessary or required, or that funds
are not available, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall deny the
request.
(5) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall communicate in writing to the institution and to the Commissioner
of the Division of Higher Education the reasons for disapproval of the
requested loan.
(ii) All loans made to the institutions of higher
education under this section shall be repaid in full by June 30 of the fiscal
year in which the loan was made.
(iii) If an agency or program is established by the
General Assembly that is to be supported solely from other than general
revenues or federal funds, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may make a
temporary loan from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the agency or
program to the extent necessary for carrying out the intent of the enabling
legislation.
(iv) The amount of the loan shall be determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the loans shall be repaid in full
by June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan was made;
(2) Making transfers to the University of Arkansas Fund on
account of interest on the University of Arkansas Endowment Fund of an amount
which, when added to the interest earned on the investment of the University
of Arkansas Endowment Fund, shall not exceed the sum of six thousand six
hundred thirty-three dollars and thirty-four cents ($6,633.34) during any
fiscal year;
(3) Making transfers to the Department of the Military Fund
Account of the State General Government Fund as established in § 19-22-
102(2)(A)-(C) for the purpose of providing reimbursement or immediate funding
for expenses incurred by the Department of the Military on behalf of the
Arkansas National Guard emergency call-up appropriation;
325 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(4) Making transfers to the Development and Enhancement Fund as
established in § 19-27-205 in order to provide supplemental funding for
appropriations supported from the Development and Enhancement Fund as may be
provided by law;
(5) Providing funding, either in whole or in part, for programs
as may be authorized by the General Assembly and which are specified as being
funded in whole or in part from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund;
(6) Making transfers to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund as may be authorized by law and making transfers not to
exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) in any one (1) fiscal year to provide
the state's proportionate share of each declared emergency or major disaster
as required by the federal Disaster Relief Act of 1974;
(7) Making transfers to the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, as
established in § 19-27-209, to provide funding in whole or in part for
appropriations made payable from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund;
(8) Making temporary advances to the various federal accounts of
state agencies upon certification of the pending availability of federal
funding by the director of the state agency making the request, subject to
the following:
(A) The requests shall be limited to those occasions
whereby the continued operations of the state agency programs would be
seriously impaired and unnecessary hardships would be created due to either
administrative oversight, delays by the United States Government in
forwarding the moneys, or by problems created by the federal fiscal year
conversion; and
(B)(i) Upon receipt of the grant award authorizations or
letter of credit documents, the state agency director shall certify to the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amounts of temporary advances to be
recovered, whereby the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall make recovery
and notify the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State of the recovery.
(ii) The temporary advances shall be recovered under
subdivision (b)(8)(B)(i) of this section on or before June 30 of the fiscal
year in which the temporary advances were made; and
(9) Those functions formerly performed by the State Budget
Revolving Fund.
(c)(1) In addition to the purposes for which the Budget Stabilization
326 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Trust Fund may be used as set forth in this section, the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund shall also be used to make temporary loans to the Constitutional
Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund.
(2) Loans made to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State
Central Services Fund under the provisions of this section shall be repaid on
or before June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loans are made.
(d)(1)(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer up to a
maximum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund to the State Central Services Fund, only in those instances when
obligations incurred by the State Central Services Fund are estimated to
exceed or are actually exceeding estimated or actual available resources.
(B) The transfer shall also be utilized to provide a level
of funding, for those appropriations made payable from the State Central
Services Fund, equal to the previous year's expenditure or the current year
appropriation, whichever is less, in the event that income from all sources
does not provide that funding level.
(2) Any transfer made as authorized in this section shall
require the review and advice of the Legislative Council prior to the
transfer of those funds.

19-24-102. Loans from fund.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall be guided by the
following limitations and procedures in making loans from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund for the respective purposes for which the loans may
be made, as established in this subsection:
(1) State agencies supported solely from special revenues are
not eligible to make applications for or receive loans from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund; and
(2)(A) Moneys deposited into the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund
shall not be used to make loans to any state agency without the state
agency’s first submitting proof of the need for the moneys and submitting
justification therefor verifying that other funds or resources are not
available to the state agency or cannot be obtained by the state agency from
other funds belonging to or available to the state agency.
(B) A loan from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund shall
not be made to a state-supported institution of higher education in an amount
327 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
equal to or exceeding eighty-five percent (85%) of its monthly guarantee of
general revenues estimated to be available for distribution to the state
agency during the month.
(b) An official or employee knowingly submitting false information to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State in support of any loan from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund, upon conviction thereof, is guilty of misfeasance
in office and shall be removed from the office or position of employment.
(c) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall have no
authority to request loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to
provide moneys for distribution to public school districts in this state, nor
to write warrants payable from any funds borrowed from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund, for making monthly payments to school districts in
this state earlier than the fifth day before the end of the month.

19-24-103. Work release centers.
(a) The Community Correction Revolving Fund may borrow from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund for the establishment of new work release centers
for the Division of Correction.
(b) Loans under subsection (a) of this section shall be repaid by the
end of the fiscal year in which the loans are made.

19-24-104. Loans of anticipated proceeds of Aging and Adult Services
Fund Account.
In addition to those purposes for which the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund may be used, the Department of Human Services may borrow from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund an amount equal to eighty percent (80%) of the
anticipated proceeds made available to the Aging and Adult Services Fund
Account from nursing home bed license fees. The borrowed amounts shall be
transferred to the Aging and Adult Services Fund Account in such amounts and
under such restrictions and conditions as are determined to be in the best
interest of the state by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and, in any
event, shall be repaid to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in full by June
30 of the year in which the funds were borrowed.

19-24-105. Financial aid programs.
(a) To provide timely payments under financial aid appropriations, the
328 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may provide loans from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund to make available all funds attributable to the
financial aid programs under the then current official revenue estimates. If
an unanticipated state revenue shortfall occurs, any such loans remaining at
the end of a fiscal year shall be repaid from revenues distributed in the
first two (2) months of the next fiscal year.
(b) Funds for appropriations for purposes other than financial aid
shall not be affected by the application of this section.

CHAPTER 25 — MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY AID FUNDS

19-25-101. Municipal Aid Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Municipal Aid Fund”.
(b) The Municipal Aid Fund shall consist of:
(1) Such general revenues as may be made available to the
Municipal Aid Fund by the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.;
(2) Such special revenues derived from highway user imposts,
known as highway revenues, as may be made available to the Municipal Aid Fund
for the benefit of municipalities by the Arkansas Highway Revenue
Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.; and
(3) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(135) of
the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.
(c)(1) All of the general revenues and the special revenues shall be
distributed within ten (10) days after the close of each calendar month to
the respective cities of the first, cities of the second class, and
incorporated towns on the basis of population according to the most recent
federal decennial or special census.
(2) The amount to be apportioned to each such city or
incorporated town is to be in the proportion that each population bears to
the total population of all such cities and incorporated towns.
(3) If an annexation occurs, the population of the annexed area,
as certified by the United States Bureau of the Census of the United States
Department of Commerce, may be added to the most recent federal decennial
census or special census of the annexing municipality.
329 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(4)(A) The moneys received by the respective cities and
incorporated towns under this section shall be revenues of the year in which
received by them and shall not be revenues of the year in which such moneys
were collected and paid into the State Treasury.
(B) Of the moneys so received by the respective cities and
incorporated towns, the general revenues shall be used for general purposes
of municipal government, and the special revenues derived from highway
revenues shall be used as provided by the Arkansas Highway Revenue
Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.
(5)(A) If the Workers' Compensation Commission has paid claims
from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund on account of any municipal employee
covered under workers' compensation, the amount shall be deducted from
general revenue turnback as provided by §§ 14-26-103 and 14-60-103.
(B) The moneys so deducted shall be transferred to the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, there to be used as provided by law.
(6) If a municipality incorporates during a year in which a
federal decennial census is conducted, then for purposes of this section and
until data from a federal decennial census or special census is made
available to the municipality, the population of the municipality shall be
based on the most recent federal decennial census as calculated by the
Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office.
(d)(1) It is unlawful for the Treasurer of State to distribute any
general revenues and special revenues to any cities or incorporated towns in
this state that have expended funds belonging to the city or town for the
payment of annual membership dues to, or for the purchase of services
rendered by, the Arkansas Municipal League or any other league or association
of cities in this state unless the books, affairs, and records of such
Arkansas Municipal League or other league or association of cities and towns
of this state receiving moneys from cities or towns has been audited by
Arkansas Legislative Audit or consent for such an audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit has been given by any such league or association.
(2) Arkansas Legislative Audit may audit the books, affairs, and
records of the Arkansas Municipal League or any other league or association
of cities or incorporated towns in this state, upon request thereof by the
appropriate officials of those leagues or associations.
(e) If the United States Bureau of the Census determines that the
330 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
population for a municipality is more than was originally certified in the
federal decennial census or the population for a municipality was incorrectly
assigned to another municipality and a census count correction or a
correction to the designated municipality is received from the United States
Bureau of the Census by the appropriate officials of the state, the Treasurer
of State shall:
(1) Determine the amount of general and special revenue that the
municipality should have received based upon the corrected census count; and
(2) Submit the amount of general and special revenue determined
under subdivision (e)(1) of this section to the Arkansas State Claims
Commission for inclusion in the appropriation bill requested from the General
Assembly for approved claims.

19-25-102. County Aid Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “County Aid Fund”.
(b) The County Aid Fund shall consist of:
(1) The general revenues as may be provided by the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., to the County Aid Fund;
(2) Such special revenues derived from highway user imposts,
known as highway revenues, as may be provided by the Arkansas Highway Revenue
Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.;
(3) Those special revenues as set out in § 19-42-201(74) and
(117) and thirty-four percent (34%) of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(20) of the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.; and
(4) Twenty-five percent (25%) of all severance taxes other than
those imposed upon saw timber and timber products as set out in § 19-42-
201(18) of the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq.
(c) All of the general revenues and special revenues shall be
distributed within ten (10) days after the close of each calendar month to
the respective counties as follows:
(1)(A) The general revenues made available to the County Aid
Fund by the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., shall be
distributed with seventy-five percent (75%) divided equally among the
seventy-five (75) counties of this state and twenty-five percent (25%)
331 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
distributed on the basis of population according to the most recent federal
decennial census or special census, with each county to receive the
proportion that its population bears to the total population of the state.
(B) The moneys so received by the county treasurer shall
be credited to the county general fund to be used for general county
purposes, unless otherwise appropriated by the quorum court;
(2) The special revenues distributed to the respective counties
shall be distributed as may be authorized by law;
(3) All moneys received by the respective counties under this
section shall be revenues of the year in which received by them and shall not
be revenues of the year in which the moneys were collected and paid into the
State Treasury; and
(4)(A) If the Workers' Compensation Commission has paid claims
from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund on account of any county employee
covered under workers' compensation, this amount shall be deducted from
county general revenue turnback funds as provided by §§ 14-26-103 and 14-60-
103.
(B) The moneys so deducted shall be transferred to the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, there to be used as provided by law.
(d)(1) It is unlawful for the Treasurer of State to distribute any
general revenues to any county in this state or any special revenues to any
county in this state that has expended funds belonging to the county for the
payments of annual membership dues to, or for the purchase of services
rendered by, the Association of Arkansas Counties or to any other league or
association of counties in this state unless the books, affairs, and records
of the Association of Arkansas Counties or other league or association of
counties in this state receiving moneys from the counties has been audited by
Arkansas Legislative Audit or consent for an audit by Arkansas Legislative
Audit has been given by the league or association.
(2) Arkansas Legislative Audit may audit the books of the
Association of Arkansas Counties or any other league or association of
counties in this state upon request of the Association of Arkansas Counties
or other league or association of counties by the appropriate official of the
league or association.
(e) Any appropriation provided by the General Assembly for aid to
counties may be supplemented, if necessary, by a transfer from an
332 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
appropriation provided for unanticipated special revenues.

19-25-103. Overpayments to funds.
(a) If moneys are distributed to the County Aid Fund and the Municipal
Aid Fund during any month that are in excess of one-twelfth (1/12) of the
amount estimated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to become available
to the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund during the then-current
fiscal year, as certified monthly by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to
the Treasurer of State, up to a maximum of that set out in § 19-23-102 for
the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund, there shall be transferred
from the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund to the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund such amounts as are necessary to repay any loans
outstanding from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the County Aid Fund
and the Municipal Aid Fund before any distribution of general revenue is made
to any county or municipality in this state.
(b) The amount remaining to be distributed after repaying the loans
under this section shall not be less than one-twelfth (1/12) of the amount
estimated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to become available to the
County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund during the then-current fiscal
year or the amount as set out for the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid
Fund in § 19-23-102, whichever is the lesser.
(c)(1) The amount of moneys to be loaned to the County Aid Fund and
the Municipal Aid Fund in any month from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund
shall be determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State after taking
into consideration the amount distributed during the prior months in the
then-current fiscal year as well as the amounts estimated to be distributed
to the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund in succeeding months of the
then-current fiscal year.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide a
distribution to the counties and municipalities each month of such general
revenue as is available that, together with loans from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund, will provide as even a flow of moneys as is
possible throughout the fiscal year while at the same time maintaining the
Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in a strong financial position.
(d) All loans made to the County Aid Fund and the Municipal Aid Fund
from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund shall be repaid by June 30 of the
333 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fiscal year in which the loans were made.

CHAPTER 26
TRUST FUNDS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Enumeration of Trust Funds
Subchapter 3. Enumeration of Trust Funds, Continued

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Enumeration of Trust Funds

19-26-201. Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund”.
(b) The Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund shall consist of those
general revenues transferred to the Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund
under § 19-21-101 et seq. and those funds received from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund as provided in § 19-24-101 et seq.
(c) The Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund shall be used to make
income tax refunds to corporate taxpayers in such amounts as may be
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or the courts and for
repaying temporary loans made during each month from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund, as may be required.

19-26-202. Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund”.
(b) The Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund shall consist of those
general revenues transferred to it under § 19-21-102(b)(2) and those funds
received from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund as provided in § 19-24-101
et seq.
(c) The Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund shall be used to make
334 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
income tax refunds to individual taxpayers in such amounts as may be
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State or the courts and for
repaying temporary loans made during each month from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund, as may be required.

19-26-203. Securities Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Securities Reserve Fund”.
(b) The Securities Reserve Fund shall consist of moneys derived from
savings effected in the retirement in advance of maturity of nonhighway
direct general obligation bonds of the state, of discounts received in the
purchase of securities, and of premiums and interest derived from the sale of
securities held in the Securities Account by the Treasurer of State as
custodian. The Securities Reserve Fund shall be used as follows:
(1) To pay premiums and the purchase and absorbing of discounts
in the sale of securities held in the Securities Account, not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in any one (1) fiscal year;
(2) To guarantee bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to
exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) outstanding at any time, with no
bond bearing interest at a rate exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum, of
the Museum and Cultural Commission Fund authorized, and in the manner
prescribed in the Arkansas Museum and Cultural Center Act, § 13-5-301 et
seq., not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in any one (1)
fiscal year;
(3) To guarantee bonds of any other park or recreation facility
approved by the Governor and the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism,
not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the aggregate,
after seeking advice of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee;
(4) To guarantee industrial development bonds as authorized by
§§ 15-4-702 — 15-4-710;
(5) To absorb losses incurred in the investing of securities
held in the Securities Account in the State Treasury and in bank
depositories. The balance of the Securities Reserve Fund shall always be
available for this purpose;
335 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(6) To guarantee loans to students to attend truck driving
school at the Arkansas Commercial Driver Training Institute at Arkansas State
University-Newport, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed four
hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) outstanding at any one (1) time;
(7) To distribute:
(A) Interest income earned on investment of balances of
the following:
(i) The Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund,
as authorized by § 27-70-204;
(ii) The Game Protection Fund, as authorized by §
15-41-110;
(iii) The funds deposited into the State Treasury by
state agencies, boards, and commissions that were previously held as cash
funds in a bank depository or investment depository, as authorized by § 19-3-
318(d); and
(iv) State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972,
31 U.S.C. § 6701 et seq., as authorized by § 19-3-321(c); and
(B) Interest income earned from investment of State
Treasury balances by any other laws enacted by the General Assembly;
(8) After the distributions enumerated in subdivision (b)(7) of
this section, for a one-time transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to the
Arkansas Highway Transfer Fund, to be transferred only in Fiscal Year 2017;
(9) After the distributions enumerated in subdivisions (b)(7)
and (8) of this section, for a transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State of five million dollars ($5,000,000) each fiscal year to the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund;
(10) After the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund
enumerated in subdivision (b)(9) of this section, for a transfer by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) beginning
in Fiscal Year 2018 and each fiscal year thereafter to the Arkansas Highway
Transfer Fund;
(11) For a transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State on
the last business day of the fiscal year to the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund to reimburse the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund for any current fiscal
year transfers that have been made to the following:
336 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) The Division of Correction Farm Fund under § 19-24-
101(b)(1);
(B) The Department of the Military Fund Account under §
19-24-101(b)(3);
(C) The Disaster Assistance Fund under § 19-27-206;
(D) The Miscellaneous Revolving Fund under § 19-27-209;
(E) The State Central Services Fund under § 19-24-101(d);
and
(F) The State Board of Election Commissioners, as
authorized by law; and
(12) After all distributions and transfers under this section,
less one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under § 19-3-321(a)(2), for a
transfer by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State on the last business day of
the fiscal year of the fund balance to the Catastrophic Reserve Fund.
(c)(1) If any loss is sustained in relation to securities at any time
held in the Securities Account or in any bank depository and if the credit
balance in the Securities Reserve Fund is insufficient to absorb the loss,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause a transfer of moneys to be
made from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Securities Reserve Fund
in such amount as shall, when added to the credit balance in the Securities
Reserve Fund, equal the amount of the loss.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that no loss shall
be sustained by any account the funds of which were used in making such
investments and deposits.

19-26-204. Ad Valorem Tax Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Ad Valorem Tax Fund”.
(2) The Ad Valorem Tax Fund shall consist of those trust
revenues derived from the ad valorem taxes as authorized by §§ 26-26-1614 —
26-26-1616 and § 26-26-1701 et seq.
(3) The Ad Valorem Tax Fund shall be used to reimburse the State
Central Services Fund on account of expenditures made for local audits by
Arkansas Legislative Audit and to the appropriate fund or fund account from
which the Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service Commission and the
337 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Assessment Coordination Department derive their support, there to be used to
reimburse such fund or fund account for expenditures made by Arkansas
Legislative Audit, the Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service
Commission, and the Assessment Coordination Department each fiscal year.
(b) All ad valorem tax moneys transferred to the appropriate fund or
fund account from which the department derives its support, as required by
subsection (a) of this section, remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall
remain in the fund or fund account and shall be carried forward and made
available to the department in the following fiscal year.
(c) In the event there are insufficient moneys available in the Ad
Valorem Tax Fund to fully reimburse the appropriate funds or fund accounts,
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer to each fund an amount
based upon the following:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) to the State Central Services Fund for
local audits by Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(2) Five percent (5%) to the appropriate fund or fund account
from which the Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service Commission derives
its support; and
(3) Fifteen percent (15%) to the appropriate fund or fund
account from which the department derives its support.
(d)(1) Any moneys that may be available after reimbursing the various
funds or fund accounts as provided in this section shall be transferred
annually to the County Aid Fund by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(2) Thereafter the Treasurer of State shall transmit the moneys
to the respective county treasurers, as provided by §§ 26-26-1616, 26-26-
1701, and 26-26-1707.

19-26-205. Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the repayment of moneys loaned or
invested through the Revolving Loan Program of the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purpose of making loans to school
districts and for investment purposes.
338 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-206. Revolving Loan Certificate Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Revolving Loan Certificate Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such income as may be provided by law,
there to be used for purchasing revolving loan certificates of indebtedness
by the various school districts and for such other purposes as may be
authorized by law.

19-26-207. Department of Health Building Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Department of Health Building Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys received from the lessee or
purchaser as provided by Acts 1968 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 14, approved June 5,
1968, which is appropriation legislation, or subsequent law and shall be used
as may be provided by law.

19-26-208. Second Injury Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Second Injury Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the revenues provided by §§ 11-9-101 —
11-9-105, 11-9-107 — 11-9-112, 11-9-401 — 11-9-403, 11-9-409, 11-9-501 — 11-
9-529, 11-9-601 — 11-9-603, 11-9-701, 11-9-702, 11-9-704 — 11-9-716, and 11-
9-801 — 11-9-811 and shall be used for the purposes as set out in those
statutes.

19-26-209. Division of Workforce Services Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Division of Workforce Services Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be authorized by
the United States Government for support of various programs within the
Division of Workforce Services, any interest accruing on these revenues, and
339 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used for the payment of program expenses of the
division.

19-26-210. Gasoline Tax Refund Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Gasoline Tax Refund Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the special revenues mentioned in the
Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., and as provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for making refunds of a portion of the tax
paid on gasoline by users as authorized by law.

19-26-211. Judges Retirement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Judges Retirement Fund”.
(b) The Judges Retirement Fund shall consist of trust funds as
provided by law and moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund.
(c) The Judges Retirement Fund shall be disbursed or transferred as
provided by law for benefit of retirants and for investment purposes.

19-26-212. Teacher Retirement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Teacher Retirement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of trust fund income as provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The operation, maintenance, and improvement of the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System;
(2) Payment of retirement and disability benefits;
(3) Making refunds; and
(4) Investing surplus funds.

19-26-213. State Police Retirement Fund.
340 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Police Retirement Fund”.
(b) The State Police Retirement Fund shall consist of the trust funds
designated by law, moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund and non-DWI driver's license reinstatement
fees as set out in § 27-16-808.
(c) The State Police Retirement Fund shall be used for payment of
personal services, operating expenses, investments, benefits, refunds, and
for such other purposes as may be authorized by law and in § 24-6-201 et seq.

19-26-214. Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of trust funds as provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The payment of retirement and disability benefits to members
of the Arkansas State Highway Employees’ Retirement System;
(2) Refunds to members of the system;
(3) Investment purposes; and
(4) Such other purposes as may be authorized by law.

19-26-215. Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of trust funds as provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the payment of personal services,
operating expenses, investments, benefits, refunds, and for such other
purposes as may be authorized by law.

19-26-216. Educational Buildings Maintenance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Educational Buildings Maintenance Fund”.
341 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of rents and any other revenues that are
made available by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purposes of operating expenses,
maintenance, renovations, and repairs.

19-26-217. State Insurance Department Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “State Insurance Department Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of those special revenues specified in §
19-42-201(172), with the exception of § 19-42-201(172)(B), grants, refunds,
gifts, and any remaining funds of the Arkansas Earthquake Authority as
provided in § 23-102-119 and examination of insurers' payments as set out in
§§ 23-61-201 — 23-61-206.
(2) The fund shall be used:
(A) To defray the expenses of the State Insurance
Department in the discharge of its administrative and regulatory powers and
duties as prescribed by law and as set out in the State Insurance Department
Trust Fund Act, § 23-61-701 et seq.;
(B) To defray the administrative expenses and losses
incurred by the Arkansas Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool of the
Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, § 23-79-501 et seq.; and
(C) To fund capital expenditures and training for fire
departments certified by the Division of Emergency Management.
(c) Annually by June 30, one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) shall be transferred from the State Insurance Department Trust
Fund to the State Central Services Fund for the use of the Revenue Division
of the Department of Finance Administration for expenses related to the
online insurance verification system established under the Arkansas Online
Insurance Verification System Act, § 27-22-201 et seq., and other related
costs.

19-26-218. Red River Waterways Project Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Red River Waterways Project Trust Fund”.
342 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The Red River Waterways Project Trust Fund shall consist of those
moneys approved by the General Assembly from the Budget Stabilization Trust
Fund and the interest income earned from the investment of funds accruing to
the Red River Waterways Project Trust Fund.
(c) The Red River Waterways Project Trust Fund may be used for such
purposes as may be authorized by law.
(d)(1) Investment of the funds available shall be by the Treasurer of
State in such amounts and in such manner as may be directed by the Red River
Commission.
(2) The funds shall not be invested for longer than a continuous
two-year period.

19-26-219. Workers' Compensation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Workers’ Compensation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the revenues provided by §§ 11-9-101 —
11-9-105, 11-9-107 — 11-9-112, 11-9-401 — 11-9-403, 11-9-409, 11-9-501 — 11-
9-529, 11-9-601 — 11-9-603, 11-9-701, 11-9-702, 11-9-704 — 11-9-716, and 11-
9-801 — 11-9-811, and shall be used for the purposes as set out in §§ 11-9-
101 — 11-9-105, 11-9-107 — 11-9-112, 11-9-401 — 11-9-403, 11-9-409, 11-9-501
— 11-9-529, 11-9-601 — 11-9-603, 11-9-701, 11-9-702, 11-9-704 — 11-9-716, and
11-9-801 — 11-9-811.

19-26-220. Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the revenues provided by §§ 11-9-101 —
11-9-105, 11-9-107 — 11-9-112, 11-9-401 — 11-9-403, 11-9-409, 11-9-501 — 11-
9-529, 11-9-601 — 11-9-603, 11-9-701, 11-9-702, 11-9-704 — 11-9-716, and 11-
9-801 — 11-9-811, and shall be used for the purposes as set out in §§ 11-9-
101 — 11-9-105, 11-9-107 — 11-9-112, 11-9-401 — 11-9-403, 11-9-409, 11-9-501
— 11-9-529, 11-9-601 — 11-9-603, 11-9-701, 11-9-702, 11-9-704 — 11-9-716, and
11-9-801 — 11-9-811.

343 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-26-221. State Forestry Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Forestry Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Income derived from management of state forests by the
Arkansas Forestry Commission to the extent this income is not needed to fund
the general operations of the commission; and
(2) Income derived from management of state nurseries by the
commission to the extent this income is not needed to fund the general
operations of the commission.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The management and improvement of state forests;
(2) Acquisition of state forests;
(3) The purchase of fire fighting equipment and other forest
fire suppression activities;
(4) Improvements at commission's nurseries and the seedling
storage and distribution system; and
(5) Such other purposes as may be authorized by law.

19-26-222. State Insurance Department Criminal Investigation Division
Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Insurance Department Criminal Investigation Division
Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(191), interest income, grants, refunds, gifts, or any other
resources.
(c) The fund shall be used to defray the expenses of the Criminal
Investigation Division of the State Insurance Department in the discharge of
its administrative and regulatory powers and duties as prescribed by law and
as set out in the State Insurance Department Criminal Investigation Division
Trust Fund Act, § 23-100-101 et seq.

19-26-223. Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.
344 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund”.
(b) The Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund shall consist
of all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the Hazardous Substance
Remedial Action Trust Fund, gifts, donations, interest earnings, fees on the
generation of hazardous waste, punitive damages, penalties, and any other
moneys legally designated, with the exception of those moneys deposited into
the Environmental Education Fund as set out in § 8-7-509(d), all moneys
received as penalties under §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301
— 8-4-313, and 8-6-201 — 8-6-212, §§ 8-6-214, 8-7-201 — 8-7-226, 8-7-504, and
20-27-1001 — 20-27-1007, and all punitive damages collected under § 8-7-517,
there to be administered by the Director of the Division of Environmental
Quality as provided in § 8-7-509.

19-26-224. Public Facilities Debt Service Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Public Facilities Debt Service Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those revenues as specified in the
Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983, § 22-3-1201 et seq., and shall be used
for the purposes as set out in the Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983, §
22-3-1201 et seq.

19-26-225. Vietnam Veterans Monument Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Vietnam Veterans Monument Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations and other funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds, in recognition
and appreciation of the State of Arkansas Vietnam veterans, as provided in §
22-3-215.

19-26-226. Local Sales and Use Tax Trust Fund.
345 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Local Sales and Use Tax Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be used for the refund of taxes as may be
authorized by law.

19-26-227. Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund”.
(b) The Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund shall consist
of receipts from the advance interest tax and any penalties and interest, as
transferred from the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account, there
to be used for:
(1) Paying interest incurred by the state on advances from the
Federal Unemployment Trust Fund;
(2) Making refunds of advance interest taxes or interest and
penalty payments which were erroneously paid; and
(3) Returning moneys to the account that were incorrectly
identified and erroneously transferred.

19-26-228. State Library Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Library Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys collected by the Arkansas State
Library from payments for lost books, use of copy machines, charges for
database searches, and other miscellaneous sources.
(c) The fund shall be used by the library to replace lost books, pay
copy machine costs, and for such other purposes as authorized by law.

19-26-229. Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund shall consist of
346 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
employer unemployment contributions made under § 11-16-206 and temporary
loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund received under § 11-16-208.
(c) The funds shall be used to reimburse the Division of Workforce
Services, in a timely manner, for unemployment compensation benefits paid by
the division and charged to a state agency, as provided in § 11-16-201 et
seq., and other laws applicable to state employees' unemployment compensation
and for such other purposes as may be authorized by law.

19-26-230. Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Workers’ Compensation Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Workers’ Compensation Revolving Fund shall consist of employer
workers’ compensation benefits contributions made under § 11-17-305 and
temporary loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund received under § 11-
17-307.
(c) The Workers’ Compensation Revolving Fund shall be used to pay
workers' compensation benefits awarded to state employees by the Workers'
Compensation Commission and for such other purposes as may be authorized by
law.

19-26-231. Educational Excellence Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Educational Excellence Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those additional revenues enacted by the
Seventy-Eighth General Assembly meeting in regular session, the phrase “those
additional revenues” being limited to any increases enacted in those taxes
classified as general revenues in the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101
et seq., there to be distributed to the various funds and fund accounts as
set out in § 6-5-301 et seq.

19-26-232. County Assessors' Continuing Education Trust Fund.
(a)(1)(A) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “County Assessors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund”.
347 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B)(i) The quorum court of each county shall annually
appropriate and pay into the County Assessors’ Continuing Education Trust
Fund in the State Treasury the sum of six hundred dollars ($600) from fees of
the office of the county assessor.
(ii) If any quorum court fails or refuses to
appropriate and pay over the funds to the County Assessors’ Continuing
Education Trust Fund in the State Treasury, the Treasurer of State shall
withhold funds from the county aid due to the county and shall credit the
funds to the County Assessors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund.
(2) The County Assessors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund shall
consist of all moneys required to be paid in annually as set out in this
section, all interest earned from the investment of fund balances, and any
remaining fund balances carried forward from year to year.
(b) The funds in the County Assessors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund
shall be used exclusively for the establishment and operation of a continuing
education program for county assessors and for paying the meals, lodging,
registration fees, and mileage at the rate prescribed in state travel rules
of county assessors who attend the continuing education programs.

19-26-233. Court Awards Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Court Awards Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of state and federal asset forfeitures.
(c) The fund shall be used for expenditures of the Division of
Arkansas State Police for the respective purposes as provided by law.

19-26-234. County Collectors' Continuing Education Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “County Collectors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund”.
(b) The County Collectors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund shall
consist of fees, as annually appropriated by the quorum court of each county,
of the office of county collector and funds withheld from the County Aid Fund
for those counties that fail or refuse to provide the appropriated fees.
(c) The County Collectors’ Continuing Education Trust Fund shall be
348 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
used exclusively for the establishment and operation of a continuing
education program for county collectors and sheriff-collectors as set out in
§ 14-15-1001.

19-26-235. County Treasurers' Continuing Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “County Treasurers’ Continuing Education Fund”.
(b) The County Treasurers’ Continuing Education Fund shall consist of
fees from the office of county treasurer, as appropriated by the quorum court
of each county and any moneys transferred from the County Aid Fund.
(c) The County Treasurers’ Continuing Education Fund shall be used
exclusively for the establishment and operation of a continuing education
program for county treasurers and payment of expenses for attending the
program, all as provided in § 14-15-811.

19-26-236. Manufactured Housing Recovery Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Manufactured Housing Recovery Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of fees assessed under the Arkansas
Manufactured Home Recovery Act, § 20-29-101 et seq., by the Arkansas
Manufactured Home Commission.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purposes set out in §§ 20-29-104 —
20-29-108 and 20-29-110.

19-26-237. Children's Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Children’s Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(189) and moneys received from the United States Government, other
governments, or persons or any other entities that do not obligate the State
of Arkansas.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Human Services.

349 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-26-238. Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Crime Victims Reparations Revolving Fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund;
(2) Twenty-four percent (24%) of the fees collected under § 12-
12-1510(c); and
(3) All other moneys received by the Crime Victims Reparations
Board.
(c) The fund shall be used to compensate and assist victims of
criminal acts as set out in the Arkansas Crime Victims Reparations Act, § 16-
90-701 et seq.

19-26-239. Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grants and Trust
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grants and Trust
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of eighty percent (80%) of those special
revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(145).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Natural and Cultural
Resources Council for use in the acquisition, management, and stewardship of
state-owned lands and other purposes as set out in §§ 15-12-101 — 15-12-103.

19-26-240. Natural and Cultural Resources Historic Preservation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Natural and Cultural Resources Historic Preservation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of ten percent (10%) of those special
revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(145).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Natural and Cultural
Resources Council for providing a source of funds for the operation of the
Arkansas Historic Preservation Program and the Main Street Arkansas program
350 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
as set out in § 15-12-103.

19-26-241. Long-Term Care Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Long-Term Care Trust Fund”.
(b) The Long-Term Care Trust Fund shall consist of all moneys and
interest received from the imposition of civil penalties levied by the state
on long-term care facilities found to be out of compliance with the
requirements of federal law or regulations, or state law or rules, there to
be administered by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services solely
for the protection of the health or property of residents of long-term care
facilities, including without limitation the payment for the costs of
relocation of residents to other facilities, maintenance and operation of a
facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, and reimbursement of
residents for personal funds lost.
(c) Funds from the Long-Term Care Trust Fund may also be administered
by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services for programs or uses
that, in the determination of the Director of the Office of Long-Term Care,
enhance the quality of life for long-term care facility residents through the
adoption of principles and building designs established by the Eden
Alternative, Inc., or Green House Project programs or other means.

19-26-242. Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of bond premiums collected under § 21-2-701
et seq.
(c) The fund shall be administered and disbursed by the Governmental
Bonding Board for the use and benefit of participating governmental entities
for bond claims and board expenses.

19-26-243. Special Needs Trust Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
351 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
be known as the “Special Needs Trust Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys received from individuals who
establish or maintain eligibility for benefits under a medical assistance
program, but possess income or resources in excess of established federal
eligibility requirements, and moneys received from any other source and
interest income.
(c) The fund shall be used for implementing the provisions of § 20-77-
701 et seq.

19-26-244. Tourism Development Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Tourism Development Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(146) and fifty percent (50%) of those special revenues as specified
in § 19-42-201(262), there to be used by the Department of Commerce
exclusively for the promotion of wine tourism in Arkansas.

19-26-245. Identification Pending Trust Fund for Local Sales and Use
Taxes.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Identification Pending Trust Fund for Local Sales and Use
Taxes”.
(b) The Identification Pending Trust Fund for Local Sales and Use
Taxes shall consist of:
(1) Money reported as local sales and use taxes collected in
local taxing jurisdictions that are not immediately identifiable;
(2) Money collected in local jurisdictions that have no tax;
(3) Vending device sales taxes as provided in § 26-57-
1002(d)(2); and
(4) That portion of vending devices decal fees and penalties as
provided in §§ 26-57-1206 and 26-57-1208(b)(2).
(c) Money deposited into the Identification Pending Trust Fund for
Local Sales and Use Taxes:
(1) Under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section shall be
352 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
used for transfers to the Local Sales and Use Tax Trust Fund when a local tax
jurisdiction is identified for money and for transfers to general revenues
when the total amount in the Identification Pending Trust Fund for Local
Sales and Use Taxes exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as provided in
§§ 26-74-221, 26-74-317, and 26-82-113; and
(2) Under subdivisions (b)(3) and (4) of this section shall be
distributed to cities and counties under §§ 26-74-221(a)(2)(C)(ii), 26-75-
223(a)(2)(C)(ii), and 26-82-113(a)(2)(A)(ii).

19-26-246. Insurance Continuing Education Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Insurance Continuing Education Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of certification filing fees as provided in
§ 23-64-306.
(c) The fund shall be used for administering continuing education
provisions for insurance agents, solicitors, consultants, and brokers as
provided in § 23-64-301 et seq.

19-26-247. Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund”.
(b) The Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund shall consist of:
(1) The petroleum environmental assurance fees as provided in §
8-7-906;
(2) All other fees assessed under the Petroleum Storage Tank
Trust Fund Act, § 8-7-901 et seq.;
(3) Gifts, grants, and donations;
(4) Other funds made available by the General Assembly;
(5) The excess of a reserve of two (2) months’ requirements of
debt service from fees in the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Revenue Bond
Debt Service Fund as provided in § 15-5-1206; and
(6) Any moneys recovered by the Division of Environmental
Quality that are attributable to collections of civil penalties under § 8-7-
806 or to costs under § 8-7-807 not owed the Regulated Substance Storage Tank
353 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Program Fund.
(c) The Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund shall be administered by the
Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, who shall make
disbursements from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund as authorized by the
Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act, § 8-7-901 et seq.

19-26-248. Private Career School Student Protection Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Private Career School Student Protection Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of a fee to be set by the Division of
Higher Education in consultation with the State Board of Private Career
Education as provided in § 6-51-607.
(c) The fund shall be used for paying claims and other expenses as
provided in § 6-51-607.

19-26-249. Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues specified in §§ 19-42-201(154) and
19-6-301(240)
(2) Reimbursement of funds pursuant to § 8-6-610;
(3) Federal funds that may become available;
(4) Interest earnings, gifts, and donations; and
(5) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental
Quality as set out in the Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund Act, § 8-
6-601 et seq.

19-26-250. State Health Department Building and Local Grant Trust
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Health Department Building and Local Grant Trust
354 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Fund”.
(b) Except as provided in § 20-7-203(b), the fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys authorized by law to be used only for expansion,
renovation, construction, or improvements to the State Health Department
building and for grants for construction, renovation, or other expansion of
approved local health unit facilities in this state; and
(2) Moneys authorized under § 20-7-408(f).

19-26-251. Water Resources Development Bond Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water Resources Development Bond Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds as issued by the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from projects financed
under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981, § 15-22-601 et
seq., in amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or trust
indenture authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to provide for payment of all or part
of debt service on bonds issued under the Arkansas Water Resources
Development Act of 1981, § 15-22-601 et seq., either at maturity or upon
redemption before maturity, as administered by the Treasurer of State.

19-26-252. Water Resources Development Debt Service Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water Resources Development Debt Service Reserve Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds as issued by the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from projects financed
under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981, § 15-22-601 et
seq., in amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or trust
indenture authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
355 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to ensure prompt payment of debt
service on bonds issued under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of
1981, § 15-22-601 et seq., either at maturity or upon redemption before
maturity, as administered by the Treasurer of State.

19-26-253. Water Resources Development Operation and Maintenance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water Resources Development Operation and Maintenance Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds as
issued by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from
projects financed under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981,
§ 15-22-601 et seq., in amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or
trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds.
(c) The fund shall be used for all or a part of the operation and
maintenance needs of projects financed under the Arkansas Water Resources
Development Act of 1981, § 15-22-601 et seq.

19-26-254. Water Resources Development Construction Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water Resources Development Construction Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds issued
by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission.
(c) The fund shall be used, pursuant to appropriation by the General
Assembly, for projects developed under the Arkansas Water Resources
Development Act of 1981, § 15-22-601 et seq.

19-26-255. Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Construction Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Construction Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds as
356 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
issued by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from
projects financed under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., in amounts or portions
as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the
bonds.
(c) The fund shall be used for the development of projects and the
payment of the costs and expenses of the issuance of the bonds under the
Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of
1987, 15-22-701 et seq.

19-26-256. Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Bond
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Bond
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued by the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from projects financed
under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., in amounts or portions as set
forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to provide for payment of all or part
of debt service on bonds issued under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and
Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq.,
either at maturity or upon redemption before maturity, as administered by the
Treasurer of State.

19-26-257. Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Debt
Service Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Debt
Service Reserve Fund”.
357 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds as issued by the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from projects financed
under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., in amounts or portions as set
forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to ensure prompt payment of debt
service on bonds issued under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., either at
maturity or upon redemption before maturity, as administered by the Treasurer
of State.

19-26-258. Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Operation
and Maintenance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities Operation
and Maintenance Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds as
issued by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from
projects financed under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq., in amounts or portions
as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the
bonds.
(c) The fund shall be used for all or a part of the operation and
maintenance of the projects financed under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and
Pollution Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq.

19-26-259. Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of revenues as provided in § 5-64-
505(i)(1)(B)(iv) and any other revenues as may be provided by law.
358 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be administered through rules established by the
Arkansas Drug Director and distributed by the Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse
Coordinating Council in accordance with the intent and purposes of the
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-101 et seq.

19-26-260. Public Facilities Construction Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Public Facilities Construction Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the remainder of the proceeds from the
sale of certificates of indebtedness as provided in § 22-3-1214.
(c) The fund shall be used only for the redemption of the 1977 bonds
and the 1979 bonds and for the construction of buildings authorized under the
Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983, § 22-3-1201 et seq.

19-26-261. Higher Education Projects Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Higher Education Projects Development Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds as
issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and revenues derived
from any project financed under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of
1989, § 6-62-701 et seq., in amounts or portions as set forth in the
resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds.
(c) The fund shall be used to provide for the development of projects
at state institutions of higher education and the payment of project costs
and expenses of the issuance of bonds as set out in the Arkansas College
Savings Bond Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq.

19-26-262. College Savings Bond Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “College Savings Bond Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds as issued by the Arkansas
Development Finance Authority and revenues derived from any project financed
359 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq., in
amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture
authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to provide for payment of all or a
part of debt service on bonds issued under the Arkansas College Savings Bond
Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq., either at maturity or upon redemption before
maturity, as administered by the Treasurer of State.

19-26-263. College Savings Debt Service Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “College Savings Debt Service Reserve Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Proceeds from the sale of bonds as issued by the Arkansas
Development Finance Authority and revenues derived from any project financed
under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of 1989, § 6-62-701 et seq., in
amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture
authorizing or securing the bonds;
(2) General revenues; and
(3) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used only to ensure prompt payment of debt
service on bonds issued under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of 1989,
§ 6-62-701 et seq., either at maturity or upon redemption before maturity, as
administered by the Treasurer of State.

19-26-264. Inventors' Assistance Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Inventors’ Assistance Program Fund”.
(b) The Inventors’ Assistance Program Fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys received by the Center for Prototype Development
and Emerging Technologies to be developed and operated by the University of
Arkansas at Little Rock for implementation of the Inventors' Assistance Act,
§ 15-4-1401 et seq.; and
360 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) All fees received under the Inventors’ Assistance Act, § 15-
4-1401 et seq.
(c) The Inventors’ Assistance Program Fund shall be used for the
implementation of the Inventors’ Assistance Act, § 15-4-1401 et seq.
(d) Any amount in the Inventors’ Assistance Program Fund not directly
needed for implementation of the Inventors’ Assistance Act, § 15-4-1401 et
seq., shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund Account.

19-26-265. Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(167);
(2) Federal funds;
(3) Interest earned; and
(4) Any gifts or donations.
(c) The fund shall be used solely for the administration of and for
landfill post-closure corrective action as administered by the Division of
Environmental Quality as set out in § 8-6-1001 et seq., and shall not be
appropriated for any other purpose.

19-26-266. Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for constructing and erecting a
military war veterans monument as provided in § 22-3-219.

19-26-267. Land Reclamation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Land Reclamation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
361 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Open-cut mining civil penalties and bond forfeiture amounts;
(2) Quarry operation reclamation, operation, and safe closure
fees, fines, and bond forfeitures;
(3) Gifts, grants, and donations; and
(4) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly,
including all interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The reclamation of affected lands as administered by the
Division of Environmental Quality as provided in The Arkansas Open-Cut Land
Reclamation Act, § 15-57-301 et seq.; and
(2) Contract awards for affected lands as required by the
Arkansas Quarry Operation, Reclamation, and Safe Closure Act, § 15-57-401 et
seq.

19-26-268. Division of Workforce Services Special Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Division of Workforce Services Special Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of unemployment compensation
contribution interest and penalty payments collected under §§ 11-10-716 — 11-
10-723 and interest and penalty payments on overpayments collected under §
11-10-532.
(2) The fund shall be used for refunds of interest and penalties
erroneously paid and other additional purposes as determined by the Director
of the Division of Workforce Services under §§ 11-10-532 and 11-10-716 — 11-
10-723 to be necessary to the proper administration of the following:
(A) The Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et
seq.;
(B) The Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
§ 15-4-3701 et seq., or its successor;
(C) The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program, §
20-76-101 et seq., or its successor;
(D) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., or its successor; and
(E) Any other programs transferred under the direction and
supervision of the Division of Workforce Services, by either executive order
362 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
or legislative enactment, or their successor programs.
(c)(1) The fund shall include a subaccount for penalties collected
under § 11-10-532(a)(3) that are in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the
overpayment.
(2) The subaccount under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be used exclusively for activities to protect the integrity of the
unemployment insurance program that are necessary to the proper
administration of the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et
seq., as determined by the director.
(d) The director shall report to the Legislative Council on a
quarterly basis on all uses of the fund and the subaccount.

19-26-269. Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of the following:
(A) All revenues derived from taxes levied on soft drinks
sold or offered for sale in Arkansas under the Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, §
26-57-901 et seq., there to be used exclusively for the state match of
federal funds participation under the Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(B) The additional ambulance annual fees stated in § 20-
13-212;
(C) The special revenues specified in §§ 19-42-201(156)
and 19-42-201(236);
(D) The amounts collected under §§ 26-57-604 and 26-57-605
above the forecasted level for insurance premium taxes set by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State under § 10-3-1404(a)(1)(A);
(E) The amount provided for in § 19-23-102(a)(3); and
(F) Payments from surety bonds issued regarding risk-based
provider organizations, as defined in § 20-77-2703.
(2) If the Arkansas Medicaid Program should be discontinued for
any reason, the revenues derived from the soft drink tax levied in the
Arkansas Soft Drink Tax Act, § 26-57-901 et seq., and the funds described in
subdivision (b)(1)(E) of this section shall be used exclusively to provide
services to Arkansas residents comparable to the services now provided under
363 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Arkansas Medicaid Program.

19-26-270. Arkansas State Parks Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas State Parks Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of severance taxes collected from diamond
mining pursuant to § 26-58-107.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used by the State Parks, Recreation, and
Travel Commission as appropriations are available.
(2) The commission shall annually expend at least ninety percent
(90%) of the funds available for the purpose of development, preservation,
and protection of the infrastructure in the existing state parks of Arkansas.

19-26-271. Interstate Alternative Fuels Refund Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Interstate Alternative Fuels Refund Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the amount, estimated quarterly, that is
transferred monthly from gross alternative fuel tax collections.
(c) The fund shall be used to pay refunds to licensed interstate users
and licensed IFTA carrier users of alternative fuels as provided by law and
as provided in § 26-62-210.

19-26-272. Soybean Board Escrow Account Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Soybean Board Escrow Account Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those moneys required for the payment of
refunds in such amounts and for such time periods as is required by the
United States Secretary of Agriculture or as is authorized by § 2-20-401 et
seq., and determined by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in § 2-20-401 et seq.

19-26-273. Interstate Motor Fuel Tax Refund Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
364 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Interstate Motor Fuel Tax Refund Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the amount, estimated quarterly, that is
transferred monthly from gross motor fuel taxes and gross special motor fuel
tax collections.
(c) The fund shall be used to pay refunds to interstate users of motor
fuels and special motor fuels as provided in §§ 26-55-714 and 26-56-215.

19-26-274. Mining Reclamation Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Mining Reclamation Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all forfeitures collected under the
Arkansas Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Act of 1979, § 15-58- 101 et
seq., and interest earned on the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used only to accomplish reclamation of land
covered by forfeitures of performance bonds for surface coal mining.

19-26-275. State Administration of Justice Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Administration of Justice Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of court costs and filing fees under §§
9-15-202, 16-10-305, 16-17-705, 16-90-1419(b)(1), and 21-6-403, the special
revenues from real estate transfer taxes under § 19-42-201(117), district
court installment fees under § 16-13-704(b)(3)(E)(ii), and any interest
earned.
(2) The fund shall be used for:
(A) Trial court administrators as stated in § 16-13-3301
et seq.;
(B) Substitute trial court administrators as stated in §
16-10-801 et seq.; and
(C) The distribution of revenue as stated in § 16-10-310.

19-26-276. Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
365 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of a portion of the taxes levied on
insurers or any other state funds designated for support of fire and police
retirement programs.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in § 24-11-209 [repealed].

19-26-277. Uniform Tax Rate Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Uniform Tax Rate Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those moneys received from local
governments and transmitted to the State Treasury as required by Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 74.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 74.
(d) The Auditor of State shall issue warrants drawn from the fund as
requested by vouchers submitted by the Treasurer of State upon certification
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that funds will be available when
the warrants are presented for payment.
(e)(1) The Treasurer of State may voucher a single warrant payable to
the Treasurer of State for the purpose of distributing funds to multiple
payees from the fund.
(2) Documentation shall accompany the voucher indicating the
payees, amount, and account numbers to which the distribution is to be made.

19-26-278. Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator
Disposal Trust Fund — Definitions.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator
Disposal Trust Fund”.
(b) The Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal
Trust Fund shall consist of funds transferred to the Abandoned Agricultural
Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal Trust Fund from the Remedial Action
Trust Fund and other funds that are made available by law.
366 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The Abandoned Agricultural Pesticide and Plant Regulator Disposal
Trust Fund shall be used by the State Plant Board to defray the costs of
developing and implementing a plan for the disposal of abandoned agricultural
pesticides and plant regulators.
(d) The General Assembly intends to provide a method for disposal of
agricultural pesticides that have been abandoned due to a change of ownership
of the real property or a change in agricultural practices in a region of the
state.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Abandoned” means chemicals that are no longer used and for
which there is no planned use;
(2) “Agricultural pesticide” means any substance or mixture of
substances:
(A) Intended for:
(i) Preventing, destroying, repelling or mitigating
any pests; or
(ii) Use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or
desiccant; and
(B) Intended to be used as a spray adjuvant; and
(3)(A) “Plant regulator” means any substance or mixture of
substances intended through physiological action for accelerating or
retarding the rate of growth or rate of maturation or for otherwise altering
the behavior of plants or the produce thereof.
(B) “Plant regulator” does not include substances to the
extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional
chemicals, plant inoculants, or soil amendments.

19-26-279. Individual Development Account Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund for
the Division of Workforce Services to be known as the “Individual Development
Account Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of Transitional Employment Assistance
Program funds under § 20-76-401.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in § 20-86-101
et seq.
367 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-280. Performance Partnership Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Performance Partnership Trust Fund”.
(b) The Performance Partnership Trust Fund shall consist of funds
transferred from the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund and such other funds as
are made available by law.
(c) The Performance Partnership Trust Fund shall be used by the
Division of Environmental Quality to defray the costs of developing and
implementing a management organization utilizing the principles of the
National Environmental Performance Partnership System, advocated by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency, which integrates environmental
indicators, management information, and performance-based budgeting and
accounting to measure agency performance.

19-26-281. Property Tax Relief Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Property Tax Relief Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as generated by §§ 26-52-
302(c), 26-52-317(c)(1)(B), 26-52-319(a)(2)(B), 26-53-107(c), 26-53-
145(c)(1)(B), 26-53-148(a)(2)(B), and 26-56-224(c)(2) and shall be used for
such purposes as set out in § 26-26-310.

19-26-282. Arkansas Disaster Relief Program Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Disaster Relief Program Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) State income tax checkoff funds certified each quarter in
accordance with § 26-51-2502;
(2) Interest earnings;
(3) Gifts;
(4) Grants;
(5) Bequests;
368 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(6) Devises;
(7) Donations; and
(8) Any other moneys made available by law.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Finance and
Administration and disbursed as appropriated for the Arkansas Disaster Relief
Program provided in § 26-51-2502 et seq.

19-26-283. Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b)(1) The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of moneys
transferred from the Development and Enhancement Fund, interest earnings,
repayment of loans, and moneys recovered for loan losses under the loan
program created in the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution
Control and Prevention Technologies Act, § 8-5-801 et seq., and any other
moneys made available by law or from any other source.
(2) The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall be administered
by the Division of Environmental Quality and used exclusively for those
purposes set out in the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution
Control and Prevention Technologies Act, § 8-5-801 et seq.

19-26-284. State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund shall consist
of:
(A) Investment income;
(B) Grants;
(C) Refunds;
(D) Gifts; and
(E) All license fees paid into the State Insurance
Department Prepaid Trust Fund pursuant to the Arkansas Prepaid Funeral
Benefits Law, § 23-40-101 et seq.
(2) The State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund shall be
369 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
used for the operations and improvements of the Division of Prepaid Funeral
Benefits of the State Insurance Department, as administered by the Insurance
Commissioner and the Treasurer of State as set out in § 23-40-107.
(3) The State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund shall also
consist of the assets of the Prepaid Funeral Contracts Recovery Program Fund,
there to be administered by the commissioner.

19-26-285. Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Natural Resources Damages Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Payments to the State of Arkansas for restoration,
rehabilitation, replacement, or acquisition of natural resources;
(2) Gifts;
(3) Donations;
(4) Federal funds;
(5) Interest income; and
(6) Any other funds that may be made available by the General
Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used for natural resource restoration,
rehabilitation, replacement, or acquisition, as authorized by the Natural
Resources Damages Advisory Board, contingent upon any order of a court of
appropriate jurisdiction and conditions contained in gifts or donations, as
may be provided by law.

19-26-286. Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement General
Obligation Bond Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement General
Obligation Bond Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of bonds issued
by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission and revenues derived from
projects financed under the Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Financing Act of 1997 in amounts or portions as set
370 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds.
(c) The fund shall be used for the development of projects and the
payment of the costs and expenses of the issuance of the bonds.

19-26-287. Ouachita River Waterways Project Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Ouachita River Waterways Project Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys approved by the General Assembly; and
(2) The interest income earned from the investment of moneys
accruing to the fund.
(c)(1) The fund may be used for such purposes authorized by law,
including without limitation wildlife and recreation purposes and bank
stabilization.
(2) The fund shall not be used for bend cuts or bend widenings.
(d)(1) Investment of the funds available shall be by the Treasurer of
State in such amounts and in such manner as may be directed by the Ouachita
River Commission.
(2) Funds shall not be invested for longer than a continuous
two-year period.

19-26-288. Environmental Settlement Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a trust fund to
be known as the “Environmental Settlement Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys received by the State of Arkansas pursuant to
settlement agreements for environmental or natural resources damages;
(2) Interest earnings; and
(3) Any other moneys designated to be deposited into the fund.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the Director of the Division of
Environmental Quality.

19-26-289. Geographic Information Systems Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
371 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Geographic Information Systems Fund”.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(A) Funds approved by the General Assembly;
(B) Grants, gifts, and donations received by the State of
Arkansas for the purposes of this section;
(C) Agency investments toward enterprise geographic
information systems projects;
(D) Federal funds; and
(E) Any other funds allowable by law.
(3) The fund shall be used to:
(A) Carry out the duties, responsibilities, and authority
of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board as described by § 15-21-
504;
(B) Create, operate, and maintain GeoStor, the Arkansas
Spatial Data Infrastructure; and
(C) Create, update, maintain, and disseminate framework
spatial data as defined by § 15-21-502.
(b)(1)(A) The State Geographic Information Officer shall manage the
fund, and the Governor shall oversee the expenditures from the fund.
(B) The board shall establish standards and methodologies
for evaluating the funding of enterprise-level geographic information systems
projects.
(2)(A) The State Geographic Information Officer, with advice
from the board, shall evaluate, prioritize, and approve proposals for
geographic information systems projects.
(B) The proposals and requests for funding shall
demonstrate any or all of the following:
(i) Improvement in the quality of life for
Arkansans;
(ii) Elimination of redundant systems;
(iii) Improved service for Arkansas citizens;
(iv) Enhanced economic development opportunities in
Arkansas;
(v) Implementation of electronic government twenty-
four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week;
372 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(vi) Substantial benefit to more than one (1) agency
through lower operating costs; and
(vii) Continued development of the Arkansas Spatial
Data Infrastructure.

19-26-290. Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of that portion of those unallocated
premium taxes levied on insurers for the support of police retirement
programs as provided in § 24-11-211.
(c) The fund shall be used for providing financial assistance to
certain retired police officers and their survivors who are receiving
pensions from policemen's pension and relief funds as provided in § 24-11-
211.

19-26-291. Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of the net proceeds of the construction
permit surcharge as set out in § 6-55-106.
(2) The fund shall be used to support training programs set out
in The Arkansas Construction Industry Craft Training Act, § 6-55-101 et seq.,
administered by the Office of Skills Development and the Arkansas
Apprenticeship Coordination Steering Committee.

19-26-292. Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Healthy Century Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) An initial principal amount of $100,000,000 of tobacco
settlement funds as provided in § 19-90-104; and
(2) Interest earnings.
373 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be used for those programs provided in § 19-90-107
and administered by the State Board of Finance.

19-26-293. Tobacco Settlement Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Tobacco Settlement Program Fund”.
(b) The Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys deposited from the Tobacco Settlement Cash
Holding Fund as provided in § 19-90-104; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Tobacco Settlement Program Fund shall be used for the transfer
of funds to the various funds and fund accounts as provided in § 19-90-108
and administered by the State Board of Finance.

19-26-294. Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund shall consist of:
(1) Investment earnings transferred from the Tobacco Settlement
Program Fund and each of the Tobacco Settlement Program Accounts as provided
in § 19-90-108; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission Fund shall be used as
provided in § 19-90-108 and administered by the State Board of Finance.

19-26-295. Prevention and Cessation Program Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Prevention and Cessation Program Account”.
(b) The Prevention and Cessation Program Account shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Program
Fund as provided in § 19-90-108; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Prevention and Cessation Program Account shall be used by the
374 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Department of Health as provided in § 19-90-109.

19-26-296. Targeted State Needs Program Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Targeted State Needs Program Account”.
(b) The Targeted State Needs Program Account shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Program
Trust Fund as provided in § 19-90-108; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Targeted State Needs Program Account shall be used as provided
in § 19-90-110.

19-26-297. Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account”.
(b) The Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account shall consist
of:
(1) Those moneys transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Program
Fund as provided in § 19-90-108; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account shall be used
as provided in § 19-90-111.

19-26-298. Medicaid Expansion Program Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Medicaid Expansion Program Account”.
(b) The Medicaid Expansion Program Account shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys transferred from the Tobacco Settlement Program
Trust Fund as provided in § 19-90-108; and
(2) Interest earnings.
(c) The Medicaid Expansion Program Account shall be used by the
Department of Human Services as provided in § 19-90-112.

375 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-26-299. Juvenile Accountability Incentive Block Grant Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Juvenile Accountability Incentive Block Grant Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those federal funds received through a
grant award under the Juvenile Accountability Incentive Block Grant Program.
(c) The fund shall be used to provide funds to state and local units
of government to establish a coordinated enforcement plan for reducing
juvenile crime developed by a Juvenile Crime Enforcement Coalition, as
administered by the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human
Services.

Subchapter 3 — Enumeration of Trust Funds, Continued

19-26-301. Baby Sharon's Children's Catastrophic Illness Grant Program
Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Baby Sharon's Children's Catastrophic Illness Grant Program
Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 26-51-2504 shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund shall also consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Baby Sharon's Children's
Catastrophic Illness Grant Program Committee for the Baby Sharon's Children's
Catastrophic Illness Grant Program.
(d) The Treasurer of State shall credit to the fund the amount
certified each quarter in accordance with § 26-51-2504.
(e)(1) The moneys credited to the fund shall be held as trust funds in
interest-bearing accounts only.
(2) All interest earned shall be credited to the fund and shall
be used only for the purposes of the fund.
(f) All moneys deposited into the fund, all interest earned on
deposits, and the fund balance in the fund may be disbursed as appropriated
in each fiscal year of the biennium for the program.
376 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-302. Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation
Fund — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Memorial area” means the designated area of the State
Capitol grounds for use in remembrance and honoring a person or group of
persons; and
(2) “Monument” means a statue, display, or other artful fixture
that is constructed to be attached to a memorial area.
(b)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation
Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial
Preservation Fund shall consist of funds made available from:
(A) Private donations received by the Capitol Arts and
Grounds Commission;
(B) Fees paid by sponsors of the monuments and memorial
areas under subsection (c) of this section;
(C) Additional moneys appropriated to the Arkansas Capitol
Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund by the General Assembly; and
(D) Accrued interest from the Arkansas Capitol Grounds
Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund.
(3) The Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial
Preservation Fund shall be used for the maintenance, repair, alteration,
additions, reconstruction, or upkeep of any kind of any monument or memorial
area on the State Capitol grounds.
(c)(1)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this
section, following the enactment of an act authorizing the memorial area or
monument and before construction begins, a group or organization that
sponsors and pays the cost of the construction or replacement of a memorial
area or monument on the State Capitol grounds shall pay to the Secretary of
State a fee for placement of the monument or memorial area of:
(i) Ten percent (10%) of the cost of the monument;
and
(ii) Ten percent (10%) of the construction cost of
377 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the memorial area.
(B) The Secretary of State may allow the beginning of
construction of a memorial area on State Capitol grounds if:
(i) A dedicated funding source has been established
for the purpose of payment of the fees under this subsection; and
(ii) The organization demonstrates that substantial
funds have been raised to complete the project.
(2) The amount of the fee may be reviewed by the commission as
to how the fee under this subsection was calculated by the Secretary of
State.
(d)(1) All moneys deposited into the Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument
and Memorial Preservation Fund and any accrued interest shall remain in the
Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund.
(2) The Secretary of State shall administer the Arkansas Capitol
Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund.
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, the
Arkansas Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund shall be
used for the maintenance, repair, alteration, additions, reconstruction, or
upkeep of any kind for any monument or memorial area on the State Capitol
grounds.
(2) Before the expenditure of any moneys from the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund for the maintenance,
repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep of any kind for a
specific monument or memorial areas on State Capitol grounds, if there is a
fund dedicated to that specific monument or memorial, the Secretary of State
shall utilize the gifts, grants, and donations made to the following funds
for the maintenance, repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep
of that specific monument or memorial:
(A) Vietnam Veterans' Monument Fund;
(B) Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund;
(C) Ten Commandments Monument Display Act under § 22-3-
221;
(D) Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund; and
(E) Arkansas Fallen Firefighters Memorial Board under §
22-3-1704.

378 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-26-303. Arkansas Public Transit Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Public Transit Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of seventy-five percent (75%) of the net
revenues derived from the additional rental vehicle tax imposed by § 26-63-
302.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for:
(1) The purpose of acquiring federal matching funds for the
purchase of public transportation vehicles;
(2) Public transit equipment or facilities; and
(3) The operation of the United States Department of
Transportation Federal Transit Administration assistance programs.

19-26-304. Military Family Relief Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Military Family Relief Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 26-51-2506 shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund shall also consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Adjutant General or his
or her designee to assist members and families of members of the Arkansas
National Guard and reserve components of the armed forces.
(d) The Treasurer of State shall credit to the fund the amount
certified each quarter in accordance with § 26-51-2506.
(e)(1) The moneys credited to the fund shall be held as trust funds in
interest-bearing accounts only.
(2) All interest earned shall be credited to the fund and shall
be used only for the purposes of the fund.
(f) All moneys deposited into the fund, all interest earned on
deposits, and the fund balance in the fund may be disbursed as appropriated
in each fiscal year of the biennium for the Military Family Relief Check-off
Program.
379 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-305. Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys received by the Administrator
of the Risk Management Division of the State Insurance Department, including
without limitation the premiums collected and any insured loss or loss
expenses paid by insurance or reinsurance companies and interest income as
provided in § 25-35-103.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in § 25-35-103.

19-26-306. Organ Donor Awareness Education Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Organ Donor Awareness Education Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys donated or collected for the purpose of educating
or informing the public of the need for organ donations;
(2) All interest earned from the investment of fund balances;
(3) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
(4) Any gifts, grants, bequests, devises, and donations.
(c) The fund shall be used for educational or informational materials
and other related costs associated with informing or educating the public
about organ donations and organ donation awareness as set out in § 20-17-502.

19-26-307. Economic Development Superprojects Project Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Economic Development Superprojects Project Fund”.
(b) The fund may consist of:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of bonds, together with all
revenues derived by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority from any
superproject financed or refinanced under § 15-4-3012; or
(2) Any other funds authorized by law.
380 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund may be used to:
(1) Provide for payment of all or a part of debt service on
bonds and to directly fund superprojects on a pay-as-you-go basis as provided
in § 15-4-3012; or
(2) Fund projects authorized under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 82.

19-26-308. Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The proceeds of the administrative assessment specified in §
11-10-706(c)(3) and any interest accruing on these revenues; and
(2) Any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used for worker training under rules promulgated
by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.
(d) The director shall report to the Legislative Council on a
quarterly basis on all uses of the fund.

19-26-309. Public School Insurance Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Public School Insurance Trust Fund”.
(b) The Public School Insurance Trust Fund shall consist of:
(1) A Permanent Insurance Reserve Fund, insurance premiums,
adjustments, earnings, interest income, and the like, as provided by the
Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq.,
and the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act, § 6-21-701 et seq.;
(2) All funds transferred from the former Public Elementary and
Secondary School Insurance Fund established under §§ 6-20-1510 [repealed] and
former 19-5-908 [repealed]; and
(3) All funds transferred from the former School Vehicle
Insurance Reserve Trust Fund established under § 6-21-710.
(c)(1) The Public School Insurance Trust Fund shall be used for the
operation, maintenance, and execution of the Public Elementary and Secondary
381 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
School Insurance Program under the Public Elementary and Secondary School
Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., and the Public School Motor Vehicle
Insurance Program under the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act, § 6-21-701 et
seq.
(2) No money shall be appropriated from the Public School
Insurance Trust Fund for any purpose except for the use and benefit of the
Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance Program and the Public
School Motor Vehicle Insurance Program.
(3) All funds received by the State Insurance Department in the
administration of the Public Elementary and Secondary School Insurance
Program and the Public School Motor Vehicle Insurance Program as premiums,
adjustments, earnings, and the like:
(A) Shall be used for the following purposes, listed in a
descending order of priority:
(i) To defray administrative costs;
(ii) To pay claims; and
(iii) To maintain the Public School Insurance Trust
Fund; and
(B) May be invested and reinvested as the Insurance
Commissioner may determine.
(4) Moneys invested and interest earned thereon shall be
administered as program funds.
(5) All moneys deposited into the Public School Insurance Trust
Fund shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of
assessment.
(d) The initial loan from the former Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Fund as established by the Public Elementary and Secondary
School Insurance Act, § 6-20-1501 et seq., of one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to fund the former School Vehicle Insurance
Reserve Trust Fund established under the School Motor Vehicle Insurance Act,
§ 6-21-701 et seq., is cancelled.

19-26-310. Arkansas Fair Housing Commission Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Fair Housing Commission Trust Fund”.
382 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys received by the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission;
(2) Administrative or civil penalties levied and collected
pursuant to § 16-123-301 et seq.; and
(3) Any other moneys provided by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used for fair housing education of the public
and the operational expenses of the commission, as provided in § 16-123-301
et seq.

19-26-311. Animal Rescue and Shelter Trust Fund — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “registered governmentally owned animal
rescue shelter” means an animal rescue or shelter owned by a county or
municipality that has submitted notice to the Department of Finance and
Administration as required under subsection (f) of this section and is on the
official list of registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelters
prepared by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
under subsection (f) of this section.
(b) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Animal Rescue and Shelter Trust Fund”.
(c) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
27-24-1409(c)(1)(B) and any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(d) The fund shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Thirty-five percent (35%) is distributed to and used by the
counties as follows:
(A) Each county that has at least one (1) registered
governmentally owned animal rescue shelter shall receive a proportional
distribution based on the county's population as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census;
(B) Funding received by a county under this subdivision
(d)(1) shall be used exclusively for the construction, maintenance, or
operation of registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelters; and
(C) A county may contract with or provide grants to a
private nonprofit organization for the operation of the registered
governmentally owned animal rescue shelter;
(2) Thirty-five percent (35%) is distributed to and used by
383 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
municipalities as follows:
(A) Each municipality that has at least one (1) registered
governmentally owned animal rescue shelter shall receive a proportional
distribution based on the municipality's population as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census;
(B) Funding received by a municipality under this
subdivision (d)(2) shall be used exclusively for the construction,
maintenance, or operation of registered governmentally owned animal rescue
shelters; and
(C) A municipality may contract with or provide grants to
a private nonprofit organization for the operation of the registered
governmentally owned animal rescue shelter; and
(3)(A) Thirty percent (30%) is distributed to the Rural Services
Division of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to provide grants to
a county or municipality based only on the infrastructure needs for animal
rescues or animal shelters.
(B) Moneys distributed under this section shall not be
limited to registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelters but shall
be used exclusively for infrastructure needs for animal rescues or animal
shelters.
(e) Any funds received by a county or municipality under subsection
(d) of this section that are not used within one (1) year from the date of
receipt by the county or municipality must be returned to the fund.
(f)(1)(A) On or before October 1, 2009, a county or municipality that
owns one (1) or more animal rescues or animal shelters on the date that
notification is mailed shall notify the secretary in writing to qualify for
funding under this section.
(B) The notification under subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this
section shall include the physical address and telephone number of each
animal rescue or animal shelter that the county or municipality owns.
(2)(A) On or before October 15, 2009, the secretary shall
provide the Treasurer of State with a list of each county and municipality
that has registered as owning an animal rescue shelter.
(B) The list submitted by the department shall be known as
the official list of registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelters
that are eligible to receive funding under subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of
384 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this section.
(C) The list submitted by the department shall include the
physical address, telephone number, and the municipality, if applicable, and
county in which the registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelter is
located.
(3)(A) A county or municipality that begins to own or operate an
animal rescue or animal shelter after October 1, 2009, may notify the
department in the same manner as provided under subdivision (f)(1) of this
section and shall begin to receive funds under subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of
this section on the first distribution by the Treasurer of State following
sixty (60) days after written notice to the department was received.
(B) As soon as practicable to ensure that a county or
municipality that begins to own or operate a registered governmentally owned
animal rescue shelter after October 1, 2009, the department shall revise the
official list of registered governmentally owned animal rescue shelters to
include the addition of the most recent registered governmentally owned
animal rescue shelters and provide the list to the Treasurer of State.

19-26-312. Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(a) This is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(104).
(c) The fund shall be used to defray the costs of operating the
Division of Environmental Quality as set out in §§ 8-1-101 — 8-1-107.

19-26-313. Lottery Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Lottery Trust Fund”.
(b) The Lottery Trust Fund shall consist of funds transferred from the
Budget Stabilization Trust Fund.
(c) The Lottery Trust Fund shall also consist of other moneys as may
be authorized by law.
(d) The Lottery Trust Fund shall be used for personal services and
385 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
operating expenses associated with the Office of the Arkansas Lottery.

19-26-314. Water Performance Bond Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Water Performance Bond Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the following:
(1) Funds appropriated by the General Assembly;
(2) All forfeitures collected under § 8-4-201 et seq.;
(3) Grants made by a person or the United States Government;
(4) Gifts and donations; and
(5) Interest earned on the moneys deposited into the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality to
hire a third-party contractor to:
(1) Take remedial action, including without limitation
corrective action, the closure of a nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment
works, and any other action the Director of the Division of Environmental
Quality determines to be necessary; or
(2) Maintain and operate a nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works.

19-26-315. Nonmunicipal Domestic Sewage Treatment Works Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Nonmunicipal Domestic Sewage Treatment Works Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds appropriated by the General Assembly;
(2) Trust fund contribution fees under § 8-4-203(b);
(3) Grants made by any person, state agency, or federal
government agency;
(4) Gifts and donations; and
(5) Interest earned on the moneys deposited into the fund.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality
to ensure adequate operation, maintenance, and completed closure of a
nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works if the Director of the Division
of Environmental Quality determines that an owner or operator has not
386 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
adequately operated, maintained, or completed closure of the nonmunicipal
domestic sewage treatment works.
(2) If the director determines that an owner or operator has not
adequately operated, maintained, or completed closure of the nonmunicipal
domestic sewage treatment works, the division may use moneys in the fund to
hire a third-party contractor to:
(A) Take remedial action, including without limitation
corrective action;
(B) Initiate or complete the closure of a nonmunicipal
domestic sewage treatment works;
(C) Maintain and operate a nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works; or
(D) Take any other action the director determines to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and § 8-4-203(b).
(3) The fund may be used by the division to do the following:
(A) Provide reimbursement to a nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works under § 8-4-203(b);
(B) Provide technical support to nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works to promote adequate operation, maintenance, or
completed closure of a facility; and
(C) Pay reasonable costs and expenses of the division for
administering the fund.

19-26-316. Social Innovation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Social Innovation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Any loans, investments, or other amounts received by the
Division of Community Correction under the Pay-for-Success Act, § 12-27-201
et seq.;
(2) Grants made by any person or federal government agency; and
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the division to make any payments
required under the Pay-for-Success Act, § 12-27-201 et seq.

387 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-26-317. Accountability Court Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Accountability Court Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants made by any person or federal government agency; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Administrative Office of the Courts
for adult and juvenile specialty court programs as defined under § 16-10-139,
based upon a formula to be developed by the Arkansas Judicial Council, Inc.,
reviewed by the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee, and approved by
the Legislative Council.

19-26-318. Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall be an interest-bearing account and may be
invested in the manner permitted by law, with the interest income a proper
credit to the fund and which shall not revert to general revenue, unless
otherwise designated in law.
(2) The fund shall be overseen by the State Insurance Department
and shall be used to pay all proper costs incurred in implementing the
provisions of the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Act of 2015, §
23-61-901 et seq.
(c) The following moneys shall be paid into the fund:
(1) Penalties imposed on submitting entities pursuant to the
Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Act of 2015, § 23-61-901 et seq.,
and rules promulgated under the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative
Act of 2015, § 23-61-901 et seq.;
(2) Appropriations from the General Assembly; and
(3) All other subscription fees or payments made by third
parties to the department for data access.
(d) Activities of the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative
Board and the availability of data as authorized in § 23-61-905(c)(1) are
contingent upon available funding.
388 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-319. Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys saved and accrued under the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., including without
limitation:
(A) Increases in premium tax collections; and
(B) Other spending reductions resulting from the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.; and
(2) Other revenues and funds authorized by law.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall use the fund to pay for
future obligations under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
created by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-
1001 et seq.

19-26-320. Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations as provided under the Gold Star Family Memorial
Monument Act, § 22-3-222, and other funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds in recognition
and appreciation of Gold Star Families, as provided in the Gold Star Family
Memorial Monument Act, § 22-3-222.

19-26-321. Used Tire Recycling Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Used Tire Recycling Fund”.
(b)(1) The Department of Finance and Administration shall deposit into
the State Treasury ninety-three percent (93%) of the moneys collected under §
389 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
8-9-404 to the credit of the Used Tire Recycling Fund.
(2) The Used Tire Recycling Fund shall consist of:
(A) Penalties assessed and collected under the Used Tire
Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.;
(B) Interest, earnings, and any other revenues as may be
authorized by law;
(C) Any United States Government moneys designated for
deposit into the Used Tire Recycling Fund;
(D) Any gift or donation to the Used Tire Recycling Fund;
and
(E) Those special revenues specified in § 8-9-404 and §
19-42-201(165).
(3) The Used Tire Recycling Fund shall not include:
(A) Five percent (5%) of the rim removal fee retained for
administrative costs by tire retailers under § 8-9-404(a)(5)(B) and
commercial generators under § 8-9-404(d)(5)(B);
(B) The percentage of net special revenue deducted and
deposited to the credit of the Special Revenue Fund Account under § 19-21-
103; or
(C) Seven percent (7%) deducted from the proceeds of fees
imposed under § 8-9-404 and deposited into the Division of Environmental
Quality Fee Trust Fund under § 8-9-404(b)(1)(B), § 8-9-404(c)(3)(A)(ii), and
§ 8-9-404(d)(7)(B).
(c)(1) At least ninety percent (90%) of the moneys available in the
Used Tire Recycling Fund each fiscal year shall be used by the Division of
Environmental Quality to provide reimbursements to used tire programs, to
administer the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program, and to perform
other duties under the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401
et seq.
(2) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may
use not more than ten percent (10%) of the moneys available in the Used Tire
Recycling Fund each fiscal year:
(A) For waste tire site abatement aid;
(B) For the development, implementation, and maintenance
of the electronic uniform used tire manifest system; and
(C) To provide market and economic stimulus incentives.
390 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-322. National Statuary Hall Collection Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “National Statuary Hall Collection Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Gifts, grants, and donations from individuals and
organizations to fund Arkansas's contribution to the National Statuary Hall
Collection in the United States Capitol; and
(2) Any other funds as may be provided by law, including
appropriations made specifically to the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of placement
and replacement of Arkansas statues in the National Statuary Hall Collection
in the United States Capitol as provided under § 1-4-134.

19-26-323. Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust Fund shall
consist of:
(1) Grants, donations, or transfers made by any person or
government agency or office;
(2) Any remaining balances in the Arkansas Major Historic
Rehabilitation Trust Fund carried forward from year to year; and
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust Fund shall be
used to offset the costs of the income tax credits allowed under the Arkansas
Major Historic Rehabilitation Income Tax Credit Act, § 26-51-2601 et seq., as
follows:
(1) By June 30 of each year, the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration shall certify:
(A) To the Division of Arkansas Heritage the amount in the
Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Trust Fund, which shall serve as the
maximum amount of Arkansas major historic rehabilitation income tax credits
that the division may approve for the next fiscal year; and
391 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) To the Treasurer of State the amount of Arkansas major
historic rehabilitation income tax credits claimed during the current fiscal
year; and
(2) On July 1 of each year, the Treasurer of State shall
transfer the amount certified under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section to
the General Revenue Fund Account to be distributed as authorized under § 19-
21-102(b)(2)(B)(vi).

19-26-324. University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences National Cancer
Institute Designation Trust Fund — Report.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences National Cancer
Institute Designation Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Winthrop P. Rockefeller Cancer
Institute at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences solely to
achieve and maintain status as a National Cancer Institute-Designated Cancer
Center.
(d) The Treasurer of State shall invest the moneys available in the
fund.
(e)(1) The investment of funds under this section is exempt from § 19-
3-318(a)(2)(B)(i)(b) and (c).
(2) Moneys in the fund may be invested in any instrument:
(A) Listed in § 19-3-318(b)(1)(B); and
(B) Approved by the guidelines established by the State
Treasury investment policy approved by the State Board of Finance.
(f) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.
(g)(1) The Winthrop P. Rockefeller Cancer Institute at the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall submit a semiannual report containing
the following information to the Governor; the Legislative Council or, if the
392 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee; the Senate
Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; and the House Committee on
Public Health, Welfare, and Labor:
(A) The balance of the fund as of the reporting date;
(B) A list of the administrative costs paid for from the
fund, including without limitation salaries, pensions, and packages;
(C) The total revenue received by the fund during the
reporting period; and
(D) A detailed description of the steps taken and the
progress made toward achieving status as a National Cancer Institute-
Designated Cancer Center during the reporting period.
(2) The semiannual report required under this subsection shall
be submitted by January 1 and July 1 of each year.

19-26-325. Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall be an interest-bearing account and may be
invested in the manner permitted by law, with the interest income a proper
credit to the fund and which shall not revert to general revenue.
(2) The fund shall be overseen by the Division of Emergency
Management and shall be used to pay all authorized expenditures and proper
costs as described in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.
(c) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Public safety charges assessed and collected under § 12-10-
318(b) and § 12-10-326; and
(2) Any other moneys as authorized by law.
(d) On or before the fifteenth business day of December 2019 and on
the fifteenth business day of each month thereafter, up to fourteen thousand
dollars ($14,000) of the moneys in the fund shall be distributed to the
division to provide administrative support for the fund.
(e) On or before the fifteenth business day of July 2020 and on the
fifteenth business day of each fiscal quarter thereafter, moneys in the fund
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Up to sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($62,500) to
393 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training; and
(2) Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the division to
support upgrades and maintenance for the Arkansas Wireless Information
Network.
(f) Between December 2019 and June 2020, the fund shall withhold
moneys necessary to make the distributions under subsections (d) and (e) of
this section.
(g) Each month after the distributions under subsections (d)-(f) of
this section are satisfied, all remaining funds in the fund shall be
transferred to the Arkansas 911 Board.
(h) Subsections (d)-(g) of this section shall be applied for fiscal
year 2021 and each successive fiscal year.

19-26-326. Arkansas Firefighter Cancer Relief Network Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Firefighter Cancer Relief Network Trust Fund”.
(b)(1) The State Insurance Department shall deposit into the State
Treasury one hundred percent (100%) of the moneys collected under § 21-5-110
to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of funds donated under § 21-5-110 and
any other moneys as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for providing funds for relief for
firefighters who are diagnosed with cancer and participating in a firefighter
cancer relief network under § 21-5-110.

19-26-327. Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund — Creation —
Purpose — Definitions.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a trust fund to
be known as the “Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund”.
(b) The Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund shall be used for
one-time grants for the defrayment of expenses for broadband due-diligence
business studies incurred by prospective federal broadband program
applicants, in anticipation of and before application for funding from:
(1) The Federal Communications Commission's Rural Digital
394 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Opportunity Fund program;
(2) The United States Department of Agriculture's Rural
eConnectivity Pilot Program, otherwise known as the “ReConnect Program”;
(3) The United States Department of Agriculture's “Farm Bill”;
or
(4) Other federal grants or loans for broadband development
programs.
(c) The Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund shall consist of
funds authorized or provided by law.
(d) Broadband due-diligence business studies shall be conducted and
concluded within one hundred eighty (180) days of the receipt of the Rural
Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund grant.
(e) Upon receipt of a Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund grant,
the local entity shall file a surety bond for the benefit of the State of
Arkansas with the Treasurer of State in the amount of the Rural Broadband
I.D. Expenses Trust Fund grant for assurance that the Rural Broadband I.D.
Expenses Trust Fund grant is utilized for broadband due-diligence business
studies.
(f) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Broadband due-diligence business studies” means
analytical research designed to acquire the data necessary to support
applications for federal grants or loans for broadband development programs.
(B) “Broadband due-diligence business studies” includes
without limitation:
(i) Full feasibility determinations, including
economic business plans;
(ii) Twenty-year financial break-even analysis;
(iii) Competitive broadband analysis;
(iv) Demographic analysis, with comparison to other
projects;
(v) The ordering of construction plans to maximize
return; and
(vi) Analysis of federal funding opportunities; and
(2) “Local entity” means a county, including without
limitation an unincorporated community within a county, a city of the first
class, a city of the second class, and an incorporated town.
395 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-328. Law Enforcement Family Relief Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Law Enforcement Family Relief Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys generated from the Law Enforcement Family Relief
Check-off Program under § 26-51-2511;
(2) Any gifts, grants, bequests, devises, and donations received
under the program under § 26-51-2511; and
(3) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Secretary of the
Department of Public Safety as stated in § 26-51-2511.
(d) All moneys deposited into the fund, all interest earned on
deposits, and the fund balance in the fund may be disbursed as appropriated
in each fiscal year of the biennium for the program.

19-26-329. Arkansas Cultural Institutions Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Cultural Institutions Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants, donations, or transfers made by any person or
government agency or office;
(2) Any remaining balances in the fund carried forward from year
to year; and
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purposes set out in § 13-8-305.

19-26-330. Arkansas Supplemental Digital Product and Motion Picture
Industry Development Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Supplemental Digital Product and Motion Picture
Industry Development Trust Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Supplemental Digital Product and Motion Picture
396 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Industry Development Trust Fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants, donations, or transfers made by any person or
government agency or office;
(2) Any remaining balances in the Arkansas Supplemental Digital
Product and Motion Picture Industry Development Trust Fund carried forward
from year to year; and
(3) Any other moneys authorized or provided by law.
(c) The Arkansas Supplemental Digital Product and Motion Picture
Industry Development Trust Fund shall be used to offset the costs of
supplemental digital product and motion picture incentive act tax credits
allowed under § 15-4-2014, as follows:
(1)(A) At the request of the Secretary of the Department of
Commerce, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall
certify to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission the amount in the
Arkansas Supplemental Digital Product and Motion Picture Industry Development
Trust Fund.
(B) The amount certified under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section is the maximum amount of supplemental digital product and motion
picture industry development tax credits that may be approved; and
(2) On the first day of the month following the certification in
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the Treasurer of State shall transfer the
amount certified under subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the General
Revenue Fund Account to be distributed as authorized under § 19-21-
102(b)(2)(B)(iii).

19-26-331. Monument to Unborn Children Display Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Monument to Unborn Children Display Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations as provided under the Monument to Unborn
Children Display Act, § 22-3-223, and other funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds commemorating
unborn children aborted during the era of Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973),
as provided in the Monument to Unborn Children Display Act, § 22-3-223.
397 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-26-332. Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys received by the Arkansas Cyber Response Board for
the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program, including:
(A) Premiums collected by the Arkansas Cyber Response
Board under this subchapter; and
(B) Restitution, interest payments, grants, gifts, and
refunds; and
(2) All income derived through investment of the fund.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by and disbursed at the
direction of the Arkansas Cyber Response Board.
(2) Moneys shall not be appropriated from the fund for any
purpose except for:
(A) The use and benefit of participating governmental
entities for claims; and
(B) Expenses of the Arkansas Cyber Response Board,
including without limitation travel expenses, actuarial fees, consultant
expenses, and service contract fees.
(3) The assets of the fund may be invested and reinvested as the
Arkansas Cyber Response Board may determine with the advice of the State
Board of Finance.
(4) For the purposes of investment, fund moneys invested and
interest earned on fund moneys invested shall be administered as trust funds
under the State Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-301 et seq.
(5) All moneys deposited into the fund shall not be subject to
any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of assessment.

19-26-333. University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Maternal Health
Workforce Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Maternal Health
398 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Workforce Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used by the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences solely to open and offer programs in education and training,
including without limitation:
(A) Obstetrician-gynecologist residencies and fellowships;
(B) Family practice obstetrician fellowships;
(C) Nursing Midwife certifications;
(D) Doula certifications;
(E) Maternal community health worker training; and
(F) Maternal therapist certifications.
(2) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall
prioritize spending and allocating funds in a manner to maximize impact of
the expanded maternal health workforce considering the recommendations of the
Maternal Mortality Review Committee.
(d) Funds may be allocated to student financial aid in the form of
scholarships and loans for students who agree to:
(1) Participate in programs offered by the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences; and
(2) Practice in the State of Arkansas for at least two (2)
years.
(e) The Treasurer of State shall invest the moneys available in the
fund.
(f)(1) The investment of funds under this section is exempt from § 19-
3-318(a)(2)(B)(i)(b) and (c).
(2) Moneys in the fund may be invested in any instrument:
(A) Listed in § 19-3-318(b)(1)(B); and
(B) Approved by the guidelines established by the State
Treasury investment policy approved by the State Board of Finance.
(g) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.
(h)(1) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall submit a
399 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
semiannual report containing the following information to the Governor; the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee; the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor:
(A) The balance of the fund as of the reporting date;
(B) A list of the administrative costs paid for from the
fund, including without limitation salaries, pensions, and packages;
(C) The total revenue received by the fund during the
reporting period; and
(D) A detailed description of the steps taken and the
progress made toward addressing the maternal health workforce needs of
Arkansas during the reporting period.
(2) The semiannual report required under this subsection shall
be submitted by January 1 and July 1 of each year.

CHAPTER 27
MISCELLANEOUS FUNDS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Enumeration of Miscellaneous Funds
Subchapter 3. Enumeration of Miscellaneous Funds, Continued

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Enumeration of Miscellaneous Funds

19-27-201. Publication Development and Resale Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Publication Development and Resale Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of income derived from the sale of
publications by the Division of Arkansas Heritage, there to be used to
develop or purchase additional publications for resale.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the Central Administration
Division of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.
(d) Any funds remaining in the fund from which it derives its support
400 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
at the end of each fiscal year shall carry forward and be made available for
the same purpose for the next fiscal year.

19-27-202. Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be financed by:
(1) Its proportionate share of moneys made available from the
allocation of general revenues as authorized by the Revenue Stabilization
Law, § 19-20-101 et seq.;
(2) Moneys made available upon the disposal of used vehicles,
which moneys shall be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle
Acquisition Revolving Fund rather than being deposited to the owing state
agency's fund;
(3) Deposits of moneys from benefiting state agencies; and
(4) Transfers from other State Treasury funds and fund accounts
of benefiting state agencies.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purpose of acquiring motor vehicles
as authorized by §§ 22-8-201 — 22-8-209.

19-27-203. Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Private funds;
(2) Federal funds;
(3) Any portion of real estate transfer taxes deemed appropriate
by the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program; and
(4) Repayment of loans made pursuant to the Historic
Preservation Loan Act, § 13-7-501 et seq.
(c) The fund shall be used to make loans as provided in the Historic
Preservation Loan Act, § 13-7-501 et seq., as administered by the Arkansas
Historic Preservation Program.

401 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-27-204. General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund”.
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the General Revenue Allotment
Reserve Fund shall consist of:
(1) The remainder of the general revenues collected by the state
after deductions as specified in § 19-21-102 have been made and which are not
required to fulfill the requirements of the maximum allotments of general
revenues as may be provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et
seq., for the fiscal year in which the general revenues were collected and
deposited into the State Treasury; and
(2) The portion not determined to be special revenues by § 19-
40-110 of the year-end fund balances of the funds and fund accounts created
in § 19-22-102, except for § 19-22-102(11)(A), and in § 19-22-104(2), (7),
and (10), §§ 19-22-106, 19-22-107, 19-43-203, and 19-43-210, which fund
balances are to be transferred on or before August 15 of the fiscal year next
following the fiscal year during which balances accrued.
(c) Any funds that remain in the Division of Career and Technical
Education Fund Account or the fund accounts created in § 19-22-104(8) at the
end of a fiscal year due to the provisions of this section shall be
transferred by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to the Development and
Enhancement Fund there to be used exclusively to provide additional funding
for appropriations for the applicable vocational and technical schools,
technical institutes, or comprehensive lifelong learning centers, that are
made payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund.
(d) However, any funds that remain in the General Revenue Allotment
Reserve Fund or in the funds or fund accounts subject to this section that
have been reappropriated by the General Assembly may be carried forward from
one fiscal year to the next, in such amounts that do not exceed the actual
remaining balance of available appropriation as certified by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State.
(e) The General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund shall be used for such
purposes as may be authorized by law.

19-27-205. Development and Enhancement Fund.
402 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Development and Enhancement Fund”.
(b) The Development and Enhancement Fund shall consist of those
special revenues specified in § 19-42-201(171) and any other funds made
available by the General Assembly from time to time.
(c) The Development and Enhancement Fund shall be used to provide
financing of various projects authorized by the General Assembly and to make
temporary loans or provide funding for appropriations authorized by the
General Assembly.
(d) The Development and Enhancement Fund shall be the successor fund
to the General Improvement Fund for the payment of any outstanding balances,
warrants, and reappropriations enacted by the General Assembly previously
payable from the General Improvement Fund.

19-27-206. Disaster Assistance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Disaster Assistance Fund”.
(b) The Disaster Assistance Fund shall consist of moneys received from
the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in such amounts as may be required to
provide state moneys for each declared emergency or major disaster as
required by the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq.,
but not to exceed in the aggregate the sum of sixteen million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($16,250,000) per fiscal year.
(c)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may authorize temporary
loans of moneys from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Disaster
Assistance Fund for making available immediate payments to individuals,
families, and public assistance grants for providing assistance to such
recipients that may be eligible for federal assistance.
(2)(A) These temporary loans shall be repaid to the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund upon receipt of any federal funds for each declared
emergency.
(B) For each declared emergency, the temporary loans shall
be repaid on or before June 30 in the year the loan was made.
(C) However, the temporary loan shall not be necessarily
403 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
repaid on or before June 30 of the fiscal year in which the loan was made,
but may be repaid upon availability of federal moneys for such purpose.
(d)(1) Funds credited to the Disaster Assistance Fund shall be used
for making grants, loans, and assistance payments, as authorized by the
Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., and applicable
federal laws for making grants and assistance payments to eligible recipients
enumerated in the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et
seq.
(2) The moneys or funds may also be used for making refunds of
federal moneys or funds advanced or determined to be ineligible
disbursements.

19-27-207. Special Military Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Special Military Fund”.
(b) The Special Military Fund shall consist of federal reimbursement
received on account of eligible expenditures by the Department of the
Military.
(c) The Special Military Fund shall be used to provide funding wholly
or partially for appropriations made payable from the Special Military Fund
and to provide supplemental support, to the extent necessary, to the
Department of the Military Fund Account of the State General Government Fund,
there to be used solely for the programs of the department.

19-27-208. Armory Construction Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Armory Construction Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of proceeds derived from the sale or other
disposition of National Guard armories or property thereof.
(c) The fund shall be used for the construction, improvement, or
equipping of National Guard armories or for such other purposes as may be
provided by law.

19-27-209. Miscellaneous Revolving Fund.
404 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Miscellaneous Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Miscellaneous Revolving Fund shall consist of such general
revenues as may be provided by the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et
seq., and moneys transferred from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund in such
amounts as may be required to provide funding for authorized expenditures as
appropriated by the General Assembly for:
(1) The Governor's Emergency Fund;
(2) Noncontroversial claims;
(3) Small controversial claims;
(4) Claims awarded to surviving spouses or dependent children of
deceased police officers, firefighters, and Arkansas Department of
Transportation employees killed in performing their official duties;
(5) Workers' compensation claims for municipal and county
employees;
(6) Claims for payment of college scholarships to surviving
children of law enforcement officers and firefighters killed in the official
line of duty;
(7) Miscellaneous tax refunds; and
(8) Livestock and poultry indemnities, not to exceed those
amounts appropriated by the General Assembly for the then-current biennial
period.
(c)(1) Excepting disbursement for livestock and poultry indemnities,
claims awarded to surviving spouses or dependent children of deceased police
officers, firefighters, and highway employees, college scholarships to
surviving children of law enforcement officers and firefighters killed in the
official line of duty, and workers' compensation claims for municipal and
county employees, the various funds shall reimburse the Miscellaneous
Revolving Fund for expenditures made for which the Miscellaneous Revolving
Fund is the beneficiary, upon request by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.
(2) This reimbursement shall be done after determining that it
will not jeopardize the then-current fiscal year's operation of the affected
state agency or State Treasury fund from which the agency is being supported.
(3) The reimbursements shall be made to reimburse the Budget
405 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Stabilization Trust Fund.

19-27-210. Property Sales Holding Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Property Sales Holding Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the proceeds of property sold,
transferred, or rented by the Marketing and Redistribution Section, as
authorized by law, and such other funds as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the expenditure of proceeds from the
sale or disposition of property by the benefiting state agency and for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Marketing and Redistribution
Section.

19-27-211. Crime Information System Fund.
(a) This is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Crime Information System Fund”.
(b)(1) The Crime Information System Fund shall consist of:
(A) Those special revenues as specified in §§ 19-42-
201(14) and 19-6-301(235)
(B) Thirty-eight percent (38%) of the fees collected under
§ 12-12-1510(c);
(C) Fifty percent (50%) of the fees collected under § 12-
12-1012;
(D) Allocations of general revenues as authorized by the
General Assembly;
(E) Moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund; and
(F) Any federal grants and aid or reimbursements as may be
received.
(2) The Crime Information System Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, improvement, and necessary expenditures for
administering the Arkansas Crime Information System.
(3) The Crime Information System Fund may be used for personal
services and operating expenses as provided by law.
406 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The then-current year allocations of general revenues not used or
needed for current year operations shall be transferred by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State to the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2013, excluding the disposal fees that are to be
deposited into the Marketing Recyclables Program Fund under § 8-6-607(b)(2),
the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of fees collected
each fiscal year under § 8-6-607 shall be deposited into the State Treasury
and credited to the Crime Information System Fund to be used exclusively for
the scrap metal logbook program.
(e) Notwithstanding any other rule or provision of law to the
contrary, the Arkansas Crime Information Center may transfer appropriation
from the Contingency line item authorized for the Arkansas Crime Information
Center to the Scrap Metal Logbook line item appropriation.
(f) Moneys remaining in the Crime Information System Fund at the end
of each fiscal year shall carry forward and be made available for the
purposes stated in this section in the next fiscal year.

19-27-212. Performance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Performance Fund”.
(b) The Performance Fund shall be used for transfer of funds and
appropriations to various state agencies, funded, in whole or in part, with
general revenues, for regular salary and personal services matching
adjustments authorized by the General Assembly and to award raises to
employees based upon the performance evaluation system and in accordance with
rules promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and which do not
have sufficient funding or appropriations to pay for the raises or increases.
(c) The Performance Fund shall consist of those general revenues
provided by law.
(d) Any references to the Merit Adjustment Fund in this Code or acts
of the General Assembly, including without limitation appropriation acts,
shall be deemed and interpreted as the Performance Fund.

19-27-213. Child Support Enforcement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
407 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Child Support Enforcement Fund”.
(b) The Child Support Enforcement Fund shall consist of:
(1) The state share of funds collected by the Office of Child
Support Enforcement that were previously paid by the state as Aid to Families
with Dependent Children payments;
(2) All incentive payments received from the United States
Government for both Aid to Families with Dependent Children and non-Aid to
Families with Dependent Children collections;
(3) All amounts received as reimbursement from the state and
federal programs; and
(4) All amounts earned as interest on these amounts.
(c) The Child Support Enforcement Fund shall be used for deposit of
funds collected by the Office of Child Support Enforcement under Title IV,
Part D, of the Social Security Act.
(d)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Office of
Child Support Enforcement operated under Title IV, Part D, of the Social
Security Act utilize funds retained in the Child Support Enforcement Fund for
operation and improvement of the program in this state.
(2) All funds accumulated in the Child Support Enforcement Fund
shall be retained by the program to pay expenses incurred in the operation
and improvement of the program in Arkansas.

19-27-214. Rural Fire Protection Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Rural Fire Protection Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such general revenues as may be provided
by law and any other funds made available by § 14-284-301 et seq.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in § 14-284-305.

19-27-215. Higher Education Building Maintenance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Higher Education Building Maintenance Fund”.
(b) The Higher Education Building Maintenance Fund shall consist of
408 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
those moneys received by the state under § 19-7-501(b)(1) after having been
transferred from the General Revenue Fund Account as specified in subsection
(c) of this section.
(c) At the close of each quarter of each state fiscal year, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be transferred on the books and on
those of the Treasurer of State from the General Revenue Fund Account to the
Higher Education Building Maintenance Fund an amount equal to those funds
received under § 19-7-501(b)(1) during the quarter just closed.
(d) The funds accruing to the Higher Education Building Maintenance
Fund under this section shall be disbursed by the Commissioner of the
Division of Higher Education in accordance with the recommendations of the
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, but only after the board
determines the projects and priorities for which the funds shall be used, and
after the board has sought the advice of the Legislative Council with respect
to them.

19-27-216. County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund —
Definitions.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such special or general revenues or
other moneys that may be deposited into the County Solid Waste Management
System Aid Fund as provided by the General Assembly, to be used for the
purpose of providing financial assistance to counties in the manner provided
in this section, for the establishment, expansion, maintenance, and operation
of county solid waste collection and disposal systems.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “County solid waste collection and disposal system” or
“county solid waste management system” means:
(A) A county-owned and operated solid waste management and
disposal system funded by moneys appropriated by the quorum court;
(B) A municipally owned and operated solid waste
management and disposal system located within the county or adjoining
counties, operated under contract with the county whereby the county is
provided access thereto, and the quorum court appropriates funds to defray
409 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the county's share of the cost of operating such facility;
(C) A privately owned solid waste management and disposal
system located within the county, or an adjoining county, in which the county
has entered into a contract providing access and services of the facility for
the use and benefit of the county under the terms of which the county's share
of the operating cost is funded by an appropriation made by the quorum court
of the county; or
(D) A solid waste collection and disposal system operated
by two (2) or more counties, or by one (1) or more counties and one (1) or
more municipalities, or operated by a private owner, under a compact or
agreement whereby each of the participating counties and municipalities has
access to the facility and appropriates, through its governing body, funds to
defray their respective shares of the cost of the facility; and
(2) “Solid waste management system” means the entire process of
storage, collection, transportation, processing, treatment, and disposal of
solid waste.
(d) All of the general revenues and special revenues and other funds
deposited into the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund during each
fiscal year shall be allocated by the Treasurer of State to each of the
counties in the state, to be distributed to the counties only as provided in
this section, on the basis of seventy-five percent (75%) divided equally
among the seventy-five (75) counties of the state and twenty-five percent
(25%) on the basis of population according to the most recent federal
decennial census, with each county to receive an allocation of the funds in
the proportion that its population bears to the total population of the
state.
(e)(1) Before any county is eligible to receive its portion of the
moneys in the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund during any fiscal
year, the county, on or before the first day of the fiscal year, shall
furnish the Treasurer of State the following information on forms to be
developed by the Treasurer of State:
(A) Proof that the county operates, or is in the process
of establishing, a solid waste management system for that county and that the
solid waste management system is available to serve the residents of the
county and may be available for service to various cities and towns within
the counties through interlocal agreements, compacts, or authorities;
410 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) That the quorum court of the county has established
and approved a budget for the operation of the county solid waste management
system for the fiscal year and has appropriated funds for it in an amount
sufficient to support not less than fifty percent (50%) of the costs of
operating the solid waste management system and that the funds appropriated
for this purpose will be used solely for the cost of establishing, operating,
and maintaining the solid waste management system, and for the hiring of
personnel and for the acquisition of equipment and land required to operate
the solid waste management system; and
(C) That the amount of funds allocated to the county for
the year under this section shall be used exclusively for establishing,
operating, and maintaining the solid waste management system, meeting the
requirements of this section, including the acquisition of land, and
acquisition, maintenance, repair, and operation of equipment used in
connection with the operation of the solid waste management system.
(2)(A) If any county fails, during any fiscal year, to expend an
amount of county funds equal to at least fifty percent (50%) of the cost of
operating its solid waste management system, or uses any of the state funds
allocated under this section for any purpose other than as intended by it,
the county shall be ineligible to receive moneys during the next-following
fiscal year from the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund.
(B) However, the quorum court may make reapplication for
state assistance funds during the year thereafter, upon offering the
appropriate assurances in writing that it will meet the full requirements of
the intent and purposes of this section in the use of the funds.
(f)(1) The moneys saved from legislation enacted by the Seventy-Fifth
General Assembly that reduced contributions made by the state for state
employees who are employed by a state agency funded, in whole or in part,
with general revenues shall be set aside and implemented by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State and the Treasurer of State in the amount and in
accordance with procedures set forth in this subsection:
(A) Beginning the month after the month in which the
reductions in retirement contributions occur, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State shall determine the amount of the general revenue savings, by fund or
fund account, based upon the previous month's payroll deductions for
retirement contributions to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;
411 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) During each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall cause to be transferred on the books and those of the
Treasurer of State the amount of the monthly general revenue savings from
each affected fund or fund account to the Revenue Holding Fund Account before
the close of business on the last day of each month until an aggregate of
five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the general revenue savings during a
fiscal year has been transferred to the Revenue Holding Fund Account from
those sources. Monthly transfers of the general revenue savings to the
Revenue Holding Fund Account shall then cease for the remainder of the fiscal
year; and
(C) After providing for the distribution of general
revenues available for distribution, the Treasurer of State shall transfer
the total amount of the general revenue savings as certified to the Treasurer
of State by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from the Revenue Holding
Fund Account to the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund. This
amount shall be used to make monthly distributions from the County Solid
Waste Management System Aid Fund in the manner provided by law to the
respective counties of this state to be used for the support of the county
solid waste management system as provided in this section.
(2)(A) If any county fails to qualify for its proportionate
share of the moneys in the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund
during any fiscal year, the moneys shall be reapportioned among various
counties that qualify to receive their proportionate shares of the County
Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund moneys during the fiscal year, in
accordance with the distribution formula set forth in subsection (d) of this
section.
(B) The Treasurer of State shall monthly distribute moneys
to the eligible counties as authorized in this section in the same manner as
other county aid funds are distributed, and the moneys shall be credited and
used solely for the support and operation of the county solid waste
management system.

19-27-217. Department of Human Services Renovation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Department of Human Services Renovation Fund”.
412 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall be used for constructing, acquiring, renovating,
maintaining, repairing, and equipping facilities of the Department of Human
Services and for paying disallowances by the United States Government.
(c) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Federal reimbursement received by the department and
deposited into the various fund accounts of the department;
(2)(A) General revenues transferred from the Division of Youth
Services, the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services, and the Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the purposes of repairing, renovating, equipping, acquiring, and
constructing department facilities with an annual maximum of five million
dollars ($5,000,000).
(B) The projects for which these transfers are authorized
shall be projects that:
(i) Were unanticipated during the preceding regular
session of the General Assembly; and
(ii) If not carried out in the interim period
between regular sessions of the General Assembly, would cause greater harm to
the facilities, clients, or programs of the department than if carried out
during the next regular session; and
(3) Other nongeneral revenue funds as may be available within
the department that can be used for the purposes of the fund.
(d)(1) At the request of the Secretary of the Department of Human
Services and upon certification of the availability of such funds, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall initiate the necessary transfer documents
to reflect the transfer on the books of record of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the department.
(2) The secretary shall submit any transfer plan to and must
receive approval of the plan from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the
Governor, and the Legislative Council before the effective date of the
transfer.
(e) Any nongeneral revenue funding that may remain in the fund at the
end of any fiscal year shall be carried over into the next fiscal year, and
all obligated general revenue funding that may remain in the fund at the end
of any fiscal year shall be carried over into the next fiscal year to satisfy
any legal and contractual obligations that have been entered into before the
413 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
end of the fiscal year.
(f) Determining the amount of funds appropriated to a state agency is
the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating specific line items and by identifying the appropriation and
funding attached to that line item. The General Assembly has determined that
the department could be operated more efficiently if some flexibility is
given to the department. That flexibility is being accomplished by providing
transfer authority in subsection (d) of this section, and since the General
Assembly has granted the department broad powers under the transfer authority
concept, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfer authority by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council in the utilization of this transfer
authority. Therefore, the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council
is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

19-27-218. White River Navigation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “White River Navigation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys that may be appropriated for the
fund by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Waterways Commission in
making available the state funds that may be required by the United States
Congress in connection with the White River Navigation Improvement Project,
if the United States Congress authorizes the project, and shall provide funds
to the United States Army Corps of Engineers for the project, conditioned
upon the State of Arkansas' providing financial assistance in connection with
defraying a portion of the cost of the project.

19-27-219. Special account for youth services centers.
All funds received by the youth services centers from tie-in fees
charged persons who connect with the water lines installed under Acts 1961
(1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the
credit of a special account to be used for future construction, repairs, and
414 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
improvements at the youth services centers.

19-27-220. Arkansas Public Service Commission Tax Division Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Public Service Commission Tax Division Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Public Service Commission Tax Division Fund shall be
used for the maintenance, operations, and improvement of the Tax Division of
the Arkansas Public Service Commission in carrying out its functions, powers,
and duties as set out by law and by rules not inconsistent with law.
(c) The Arkansas Public Service Commission Tax Division Fund shall
consist of:
(1) The proportion due the Tax Division of the Arkansas Public
Service Commission of those ad valorem taxes levied on rolling stock as set
out in §§ 26-26-1614 — 26-26-1616, as prescribed in § 19-26-204;
(2) Moneys transferred from the Arkansas Public Service
Commission Fund in such amount as provided by this section in order to
support those activities of the Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service
Commission that relate to the assessment and levying of taxes on utility
property; and
(3) Moneys transferred from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account in an amount that shall not exceed the difference between the total
appropriation provided by the General Assembly for the Tax Division of the
Arkansas Public Service Commission and the aggregate total of:
(A) The prior year remaining balance in the Arkansas
Public Service Commission Tax Division Fund; and
(B) The transfer provided from the Arkansas Public Service
Commission Fund.
(d) On July 1 of each fiscal year, the amount of the transfer from the
Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund to the Arkansas Public Service
Commission Tax Division Fund shall be in an amount which is equal to sixty-
five percent (65%) of the difference between the total appropriation provided
by the General Assembly for personal services and operating expenses of the
Tax Division of the Arkansas Public Service Commission for the current fiscal
year and the balance remaining in the Arkansas Public Service Commission Tax
Division Fund on the immediately preceding June 30.
415 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-27-221. Department of Human Services Consolidated Cost Revolving
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Department of Human Services Consolidated Cost
Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Treasurer of State may establish a revolving fund for the
Office of Finance and Administration of the Department of Human Services, for
the purposes of providing a system to charge consolidated costs for such
items as postage, vehicle maintenance, vehicle insurance, vehicle license and
title fees, tires and tubes, fuel, credit card purchases, office supplies,
duplication supplies, micrographic supplies, equipment acquisition, equipment
maintenance and repair, sales and use taxes, and various other licenses and
permits. These items will be purchased by the Office of Finance and
Administration through the use of the fund and charged to each division and
office as that division or office uses them. This will allow for the
expenditure to be appropriately charged to the benefiting program.
(c)(1) The replenishment of the fund shall consist of such funds as
budgeted by the division and offices for these items of cost that could be
general revenue, special revenue, federal funds, cash funds, or any other
funds under the authority of the divisions and offices.
(2) The fund shall be replenished as needed but not less than
six (6) times per fiscal year.
(d) The fund shall be established and maintained in accordance with
procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-27-222. Environmental Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Environmental Education Fund”.
(b)(1) The Environmental Education Fund shall consist of that portion
of moneys transferred from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund
as set out in § 8-7-509.
(2) Moneys transferred under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall not exceed two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) per
416 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fiscal year.
(c) The Environmental Education Fund shall be used by the Division of
Environmental Quality to provide environmental educational materials and
training.

19-27-223. Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys received through a grant from the
United States Secretary of the Interior pursuant to the state abandoned mine
reclamation program.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality
for the program.

19-27-224. Surface Coal Mining Operation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Surface Coal Mining Operation Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of application and permit fees for surface
coal mining.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality
only for the administration and enforcement of the Arkansas Surface Coal
Mining and Reclamation Act of 1979, § 15-58-101 et seq., and as the state's
matching percentage share for any grants available to the state for the
administration and enforcement of the state program as defined in § 15-58-
104.

19-27-225. Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund”.
(b) The Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys remaining in the Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund as
of July 1, 2011;
(2) All moneys recovered under the Arkansas Lead-Based Paint-
417 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Hazard Act of 2011, § 20-27-2501 et seq.; and
(3) Any other moneys received by the state as a gift or donation
to the Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund.
(c) The Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Fund shall be used for the lead-based
paint program as administered by the Department of Health as set out in the
Arkansas Lead-Based Paint-Hazard Act of 2011, § 20-27-2501 et seq.

19-27-226. Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all forfeitures collected under the
Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.
(c) The fund shall be used only to accomplish remedial action,
including closure of lands covered by performance bonds forfeited under the
Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

19-27-227. Juvenile Detention Facilities Operating Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Juvenile Detention Facilities Operating Fund”.
(b) The Juvenile Detention Facilities Operating Fund shall consist of
moneys transferred from the Youth Services Fund Account of the Department of
Human Services Fund.

19-27-228. Research Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Research Development Fund”.
(b) The Research Development Fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds transferred from the Higher Education Building
Maintenance Fund; and
(2) Any other moneys provided by the General Assembly.
(c) The Research Development Fund shall be used for the administration
and operations of the Arkansas Research Development Program of the Division
of Higher Education, as provided in the Arkansas Research Development Act, §
418 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
6-61-801 et seq.

19-27-229. Revenue Local Tax Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Revenue Local Tax Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of income taxes or any taxes not otherwise
prohibited by law levied by counties or municipalities and for which the
collection and administration of such taxes are performed by the state, as
authorized in § 26-73-105, there to be transmitted at least quarterly in each
state fiscal year to the local government levying the tax, all as provided in
§§ 26-73-101 — 26-73-109.

19-27-230. Rural Health Services Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Rural Health Services Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Rural Health Services Revolving Fund shall consist of funds
transferred from the Development and Enhancement Fund or any other funds made
available by the General Assembly.
(c) The Rural Health Services Revolving Fund shall be used to provide
matching funds, on a fifty-fifty (50:50) cash basis up to a maximum of two
hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per applicant, for assisting in the
stabilizing of necessary medical services provided by county, local,
commercial, or nonprofit operations, all as administered by the Department of
Health as set out in the Rural Health Services Revolving Fund Act, § 20-12-
401 et seq.

19-27-231. Rural Medical Clinic Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Rural Medical Clinic Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the making of loans by the
State Board of Finance, upon application therefor, for the construction and
equipping of rural medical clinics in rural areas of this state, as defined
419 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
in § 20-12-202.

19-27-232. City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund”.
(b) The City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund shall consist of
moneys deducted from the General Revenue Fund Account in such amounts
necessary to meet the quarterly payments to cities and counties that are
parties to an agreement with the state, entered into pursuant to § 14-171-
210.
(c) The City-County Tourist Facilities Aid Fund shall be administered
by the State Board of Finance and disbursed by the Treasurer of State as
provided in the City-County Tourist Meeting and Entertainment Facilities
Assistance Law, § 14-171-201 et seq.

19-27-233. Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise secured
for the purposes of cost sharing with the United States Government in local
water resources development projects and loan repayments to the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used to:
(1) Provide loans or grants to local governments as provided in
the Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Finance Act, § 15-22-801 et seq.; and
(2) Allow up to twenty percent (20%) of the total cost of a
project as administrative costs.

19-27-234. Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund”.
(b) The Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund;
420 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) General revenue that is transferred from the Behavioral
Health Services Fund Account;
(3) Federal reimbursement received on account of eligible
expenditures; and
(4) Other funds as may be provided by law.

19-27-235. Law Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Law Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement
Training Fund”.
(b) The Law Enforcement and Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training Fund
shall consist of those moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund.

19-27-236. County Jail Reimbursement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “County Jail Reimbursement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those general revenues or general
improvement funds that may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Correction for
reimbursing counties housing prisoners sentenced to the Division of
Correction.
(d) The fund shall be used by the Division of Community Correction for
reimbursing counties that are housing prisoners:
(1) Sentenced to the Division of Community Correction;
(2) Placed on probation if the probation is accompanied by
incarceration in the Division of Community Correction; or
(3) Confined in a county jail under any prerelease program or
sanction imposed in response to a violation of a supervised condition.

19-27-237. Building Authority Division Maintenance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
421 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund to be known as the “Building Authority Division Maintenance Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of all moneys received in connection
with the leasing, management, and operation of building facilities and lands
belonging to or managed by the Building Authority Division.
(2) The moneys received by the division are declared to be
nonrevenue receipts.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of lands, buildings, and facilities that may be acquired by the
division.

19-27-238. Arkansas Medicaid Rebate Program Revolving Fund — Arkansas
Medicaid Rebate Program Revolving Fund Act of 1991 — Definition.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Medicaid Rebate Program Revolving Fund Act of 1991”.
(b) As used in this section, “drug manufacturer” means any person,
partnership, corporation, or other institution or entity that is engaged in
the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or
processing of drugs, either directly or indirectly by extraction from the
substance of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis,
or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, or in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, and distribution of drugs.
(c)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Medicaid Rebate Program Revolving Fund”.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Medical
Services of the Department of Human Services.
(d)(1) The department is authorized to receive moneys in the form of
rebates from drug manufacturers as established by contract or pursuant to the
provisions of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-
508.
(2) Any moneys accruing to the department through these rebates
shall be deposited into the State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts to be
credited to the Arkansas Medicaid Rebate Program Revolving Fund and
transferred by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services to the
Department of Human Services Medicaid Paying Accounts Account to be used
solely for paying pharmacy claims in the Arkansas Medicaid Drug Rebate
422 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Program.
(3) Any general revenues that accrue as a result of the receipt
of the Medicaid rebate shall be transferred to the Department of Human
Services Grants Fund Account.

19-27-239. Parks and Tourism Outdoor Recreation Grants Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Parks and Tourism Outdoor Recreation Grants Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of ten percent (10%) of those special
revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(145).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism for making grants for outdoor recreational purposes to cities and
counties of this state in accordance with the Arkansas Statewide
Comprehensive Outdoor Recreation Plan as provided in § 15-12-103.

19-27-240. Justice Building Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Justice Building Fund”.
(b) The Justice Building Fund shall consist of all moneys transferred
or deposited from the State Administration of Justice Fund.
(c) The Justice Building Fund shall be used exclusively by the
Building Authority Division for the maintenance of the Arkansas Justice
Building.

19-27-241. Trial Expense Assistance Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Trial Expense Assistance Fund”.
(b) The Trial Expense Assistance Fund shall consist of moneys
transferred to it from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund.
(c) The Trial Expense Assistance Fund shall be used to pay for
reimbursement of costs incurred in certain trials as set out in § 16-92-109.

19-27-242. Cities in School Fund.
423 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Cities in School Fund”.
(b) The Cities in School Fund shall consist of those moneys
transferred from the General Revenue Fund Account.
(c) The Cities in School Fund shall be used for providing grants to
community-based pilot programs directed toward solving problems of children
and their families as provided in Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, §§ 7 and
8.

19-27-243. Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Nonrevenue receipts derived from services provided to
various agencies of the federal, state, city, and county governments; and
(2) Any other moneys that may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Division of Information Systems as provided in the
Arkansas Information Systems Act of 1997, § 25-4-101 et seq.

19-27-244. Information Technology Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Information Technology Reserve Fund”.
(b) The Information Technology Reserve Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those funds transferred from the Division of Information
Systems Revolving Fund in an amount up to the authorized reserve for
equipment acquisition as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
within thirty (30) days following the closing of each fiscal year;
(2) Any loans that may be received from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund; and
(3) Any other moneys that may be provided by law.
(c) The Information Technology Reserve Fund shall be used exclusively
for major equipment acquisitions or improvements as provided in § 25-4-122.
424 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-27-245. Technology Equipment Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created a cash fund, as defined by § 19-4-801, to be
known as the “Technology Equipment Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b) The funds for the Technology Equipment Revolving Loan Fund shall
consist of all moneys appropriated for the purpose of the fund, all moneys
transferred to the fund pursuant to law, all moneys required by this section
or any other law to be paid into or credited to the fund, all moneys,
including interest, paid by borrowers to the fund in repayment of loans made
from the fund, and all moneys given to the fund by interested individuals or
entities, and the Technology Equipment Revolving Loan Fund Committee shall be
authorized to accept the moneys on behalf of the fund from any source,
including federal and state grants.
(c) The fund shall be used to provide qualified individuals with
disabilities and their family members with the financial opportunity to
purchase or modify equipment, facilities, and related services used by one
(1) or more persons with a disability to enhance independence, productivity,
and full participation in the community. Expenditures from the fund may
include, but are not limited to, communication devices, prostheses,
wheelchairs, wheelchair car-lifts, ramps and roll-in showers, and
telecommunication devices for persons who are Deaf, deaf, or Hard of Hearing,
and devices which allow persons who are blind or visually impaired to discern
printed materials.
(d) Unexpended moneys contained in the fund at the end of the fiscal
year shall be carried forward from year to year.

19-27-246. Major Industry Facilities Incentive Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Major Industry Facilities Incentive Fund”.
(b) The Major Industry Facilities Incentive Fund shall consist of
those moneys transferred from the General Revenue Fund Account.
(c) The Major Industry Facilities Incentive Fund shall be used for
making payments to state agencies or political subdivisions as provided in
the Major Industry Facilities Incentive Act, § 15-4-1801 et seq.

425 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-27-247. Emergency Medical Services Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Emergency Medical Services Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those funds that may be made available.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Health as
provided in the Emergency Medical Services Revolving Fund Act, § 20-13-101.

19-27-248. Nursing Student Scholarship Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Nursing Student Scholarship Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds appropriated for nursing student scholarships; and
(2) Grants, contributions, or gratuities derived from federal
means or private persons or corporations.
(c) The fund shall be used for providing scholarships or financial
assistance to nursing students, as administered by the Graduate Nurse
Educator Loan and Scholarship Board as provided in § 6-81-1201 et seq.

19-27-249. Geology Map Resale Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Geology Map Resale Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of moneys received from the resale of
publications of maps by the Office of the State Geologist.
(c) The fund shall be used for personal services and operating
expenses relating to the purchase of publications of maps for resale by the
Office of the State Geologist, as authorized in Acts 1975, No. 80, § 6.

19-27-250. County Road Construction and Maintenance Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “County Road Construction and Maintenance Revolving
Fund”.
(b) The County Road Construction and Maintenance Revolving Fund shall
426 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
consist of moneys transferred from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund from
time to time, not to exceed the amount as set out in § 27-72-317.
(c) The County Road Construction and Maintenance Revolving Fund shall
be used for making advance transfers to the several county highway funds,
state-aid road funds, federal-aid secondary road funds, and all other
provisions of county road construction assistance as administered by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, as provided in §§ 27-72-301, 27-72-305,
27-72-312, 27-72-313, 27-72-315, and 27-72-317 — 27-72-319.

19-27-251. Arkansas Agricultural Marketing Grants Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Agricultural Marketing Grants Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the fees specified by § 19-43-311(b) and
such moneys as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for making payments of grants to eligible
Arkansas wineries with respect to the purchase of grapes, fruits, berries, or
vegetables produced in this state and purchased for use in this state for the
production of wine.

19-27-252. Wastewater Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Wastewater Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of examination, license, and license
renewal fees as set out in § 8-5-209.
(c) The fund shall be used only for the administration of § 8-5-201 et
seq.

19-27-253. Information Network of Arkansas Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Information Network of Arkansas Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all moneys received by the Information
Network of Arkansas from gifts, donations, grants, or any other sources
available by law.
427 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in the Information Network of
Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et seq.

19-27-254. Higher Education Tuition Adjustment Fund — Intent.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Higher Education Tuition Adjustment Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of revenues allocated to the fund by law.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the fund ensure that
bona fide Arkansas income taxpayers, and their dependents, who are residents
of a bordering state in a contiguous county to the Arkansas state line, which
is contiguous to a county where an institution of higher education is located
receive the same higher education opportunities as all other taxpayers.
(d)(1) In establishing this policy, it is the intent of the General
Assembly that taxpayers should have affordable access to the state's higher
education institutions.
(2) Further, the Division of Higher Education shall require each
institution to track and report the number of qualifying students each year.
(3) A list of students who benefit from the out-of-state tuition
waiver, including their Social Security numbers or their Arkansas taxpaying
parents' or guardians' names and Social Security numbers, shall be furnished
by the division to the Department of Finance and Administration for
confirmation that they or their parents are employed in Arkansas at a wage in
excess of five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) per year.
(4) Documentation should be either an official W-2 form from an
Arkansas employer reflecting wages of at least five thousand five hundred
dollars ($5,500) in the tax year before enrollment in college or official
employer verification of a current year salary minimum of at least five
thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500), which the college shall keep on file
for enrollment audit purposes.
(e)(1) The Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education shall
determine the difference between the amount of tuition revenue that would
have been generated by charging the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating
Board-approved out-of-state tuition rate to the students as compared to
approved in-state or out-of-district rates.
(2) Upon such a determination, the commissioner shall certify to
428 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Treasurer of State the amounts
that are required to be transferred from the fund.
(3) Upon receiving the certification, the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and the Treasurer of State shall cause to be transferred the
necessary funds and appropriation to the fund account of the institution
receiving the certification from the commissioner.

19-27-255. Administrative Services — Client Specific Emergency
Services Revolving Fund Paying Account.
(a) The Office of Finance and Administration of the Department of
Human Services is authorized to establish and maintain as a cash fund account
the Client Specific Emergency Services Revolving Fund Paying Account
consisting of federal grants, aids, cash donations, reimbursements, and state
general revenue, not to exceed a daily balance of ten thousand dollars
($10,000), for delivery of immediate care, short-term, or emergency services
to eligible clients.
(b) The account shall be established and maintained in accordance with
procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for cash
funds and shall be administered under the direction of the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services.

19-27-256. EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “EMS Enhancement Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of revenue that may be provided by law.
(c) Any funds remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year
shall be made available for distribution as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be available for
distribution to the eligible state-licensed emergency medical services
through a grant program managed by the Division of Emergency Medical Services
of the Department of Health under § 20-13-103;
(2) Ten percent (10%) of the funds shall be authorized for use
by the division for administering the grant program prescribed in § 20-13-
103, as well as for training, education, equipment, and supplies as needed to
maintain staff proficiency in emergency medical services and testing support;
429 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3)(A) Five percent (5%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purposes of upgrading or instituting educational training sites and the
increased availability of emergency medical services training programs.
(B) The training sites shall meet the certification
standards of the division;
(4)(A) Ten percent (10%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purpose of instituting special projects managed by the division that are
directed toward the improvement of emergency medical services and the
presentation of specialized training programs.
(B) The programs or projects shall meet the standards set
forth in the United States Department of Transportation's National Standard
Curriculum of 1998 for Emergency Medical Technician training and approved by
the division;
(5) Twenty percent (20%) of the funds shall be authorized for
the purpose of instituting and maintaining a trauma system and trauma
registry; and
(6) Five percent (5%) of the funds shall be authorized for use
by the division for:
(A) Maintaining quality emergency medical services; and
(B) Ensuring public safety and proper medical care by
inspecting and licensing ambulance services and registering emergency medical
services vehicles.

19-27-257. Highway Safety Special Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Highway Safety Special Fund”.
(b) The Highway Safety Special Fund shall consist of those moneys
transferred or deposited from the State Administration of Justice Fund.
(c) The Highway Safety Special Fund shall be used for support of
programs of the Arkansas Highway Safety Program.

19-27-258. District Court Judge and District Court Clerk Education
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
430 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund to be known as the “District Court Judge and District Court Clerk
Education Fund”.
(b) The District Court Judge and District Court Clerk Education Fund
shall consist of those moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund.
(c) The District Court Judge and District Court Clerk Education Fund
shall be used for providing continuing education opportunities within the
State of Arkansas to district court judges and district court clerks.

19-27-259. Court Reporter's Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Court Reporter's Fund”.
(b) The Court Reporter’s Fund shall consist of those moneys
transferred or deposited from the State Administration of Justice Fund.
(c) The Court Reporter’s Fund shall be used for paying such salaries,
transcript fees, and expenses of court reporters as may be provided by law to
be paid from state funds, as set out in § 16-13-508 [repealed].

19-27-260. Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Crime
Prevention Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Crime
Prevention Program Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Crime Prevention
Program Fund shall consist of those moneys transferred or deposited from the
State Administration of Justice Fund, and nonrefundable administrative bail
bond fees collected under § 17-19-301(f)(1).
(c) The Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug Abuse and Crime Prevention
Program Fund shall be used exclusively for the establishment and operation of
alcohol abuse, drug abuse, and crime prevention programs, and other related
purposes in the counties.

19-27-261. Waterworks Operators Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
431 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Waterworks Operators Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of fines collected under § 17-51-102.
(c) The fund shall be used to defray the costs of administering § 17-
51-101 et seq.

19-27-262. Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The time-payment fees established by § 16-13-704;
(2) Electronic payment access fees established by § 16-92-118;
(3) Court technology fees established by § 21-6-416;
(4) Federal court certified question fees and fees for Court of
Appeals or Supreme Court decision petitions for rehearing established by §
21-6-401(a)(2) and (3), respectively; and
(5) Fees for electronic filing and public online access to court
decisions and other court records established by § 21-6-401(d).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Administrative Office of the Courts
for the purchase of computer hardware and software as provided in § 16-13-
712.

19-27-263. Higher Education Consolidation Matching Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Higher Education Consolidation Matching Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of funds made available by the General
Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used to match documented savings at public
institutions of higher education that consolidate or merge as provided in §
6-60-102.

19-27-264. Justice Building Construction Fund.
(a) There is created in accordance with §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-805 and the
Revenue Classification Law, § 19-40-101 et seq., a cash fund entitled the
432 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
“Justice Building Construction Fund”, which shall be maintained in such
depository bank or banks as may, from time to time, be designated by the
Building Authority Division.
(b) All moneys transferred to and deposited into the fund, whether
pursuant to § 16-10-310 or otherwise, and all income, interest, and earnings
thereof, are declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use, and
dedicated and are to be used solely for the financing of additions,
extensions, and improvements to, the renovation of, and the equipping of such
additions, extensions, and improvements of the Arkansas Justice Building
situated on the State Capitol grounds. Such cash funds shall not be deemed to
be a part of the State Treasury for any purpose, including, without
limitation, the provisions of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29, Article
16, § 12, or Amendment 20, or any other constitutional or statutory
provision.
(c) The fund shall be held and the amounts therein invested by the
division in accordance with the authority provided in the Arkansas Justice
Building Act, § 22-3-901 et seq. The division may also use the fund to
provide for the repayment of obligations issued by the Arkansas Development
Finance Authority pursuant to the State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act
of 1991, § 22-3-1401 et seq., to accomplish the purposes specified in
subsection (b) of this section and to pay the costs and expenses related to
the issuance of such obligations.

19-27-265. Bail Bondsman Board Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Bail Bondsman Board Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those moneys collected under §§ 17-19-
111 and 17-19-301 and other moneys from the collection of fees.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the operation of the
Professional Bail Bond Company and Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing
Board.

19-27-266. Health Facility Services Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
433 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund to be known as the “Health Facility Services Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those fees collected under §§ 17-107-
205, 20-7-117(e), 20-9-214(b), 20-9-222, and 20-10-812(a), and deposited as
nonrevenue receipts.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used by the Division of Health Facility
Services of the Department of Health for supporting and operating programs
through which fees under §§ 17-107-205, 20-7-117(e), 20-9-214(b), 20-9-222,
and 20-10-812(a) were collected.
(2) Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of each state
fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for
the same intent and purposes as provided in §§ 17-107-205, 20-7-117(e), 20-9-
214(b), 20-9-222, and 20-10-812(a).

19-27-267. Military Support Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
revolving fund to be known as the “Military Support Revolving Fund”.
(b)(1) The Military Support Revolving Fund shall consist of:
(A) All funds provided by law for the Military Support
Revolving Fund;
(B) All moneys received by the Department of the Military
from the United States Army, the United States Air Force, the United States
Navy, foreign allied governments, and reserve forces of the United States,
allied nations, and other federal agencies; and
(C) All federal reimbursements received by the Department
of the Military under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency
Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 5121 et seq., for expenditures from the Military
Support Revolving Fund.
(2) All reimbursements and payments to the Military Support
Revolving Fund from any source shall be considered a refund to expenditures.
(c) The Military Support Revolving Fund shall be used by the
department to pay reimbursements for periodic, short-term personnel
augmentation for National Guard members on state active duty for costs
incurred in training activities, which shall include without limitation,
goods, supplies, rations, fuel, operating expenses, and related costs and
expenses.
434 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d) As federal reimbursements replenish the Military Support Revolving
Fund, the department is authorized to return funds, as necessary, to the
Special Military Fund.

19-27-268. Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund”.
(2)(A) The fund shall be used to pay counties and professional
reappraisal companies for the reappraisal of real property required by § 26-
26-1901 et seq. and shall be in lieu of real property reappraisal funding by
the local taxing units in each county of this state.
(B) There shall be no deduction from the proceeds of the
fund to pay any other fees or expenses except as provided in § 26-26-1901 et
seq.
(b) For cause and after an opportunity for hearing, the Director of
the Assessment Coordination Division may suspend or terminate the contract of
any appraisal firm or county.
(c)(1) The fund proceeds shall be distributed monthly, except when
there is a determination by the Assessment Coordination Division that proper
reappraisal procedures established by the division are not being followed.
(2)(A)(i) Upon a finding by the division that proper reappraisal
procedures are not being followed, the county assessor or contractor shall be
notified that the reappraisal is out of compliance with accepted guidelines
established in § 26-26-1901 et seq. and rules enacted pursuant to § 26-26-
1901 et seq.
(ii) The division shall notify the county assessor
or contractor in writing that the assessor or contractor has thirty (30) days
in which to bring the reappraisal into compliance.
(B) If there is a further finding that proper reappraisal
procedures are not being followed, the contract shall be promptly terminated,
and the division shall negotiate another contract and management plan for the
completion of the reappraisal project.
(d) Based on its expertise and the criteria and requirements set forth
in § 26-26-1901 et seq., the division shall establish by rule the findings
that indicate that proper reappraisal procedures are not being followed.
435 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(e) At the end of each countywide reappraisal, the division shall
issue a report of the status of the county.

19-27-269. Public Roads Incentive Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Public Roads Incentive Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Contributions made by taxpayers for public roads projects
approved by the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission; and
(2) Any other funds as are designated or deposited into the fund
by law.
(c)(1) A separate account shall be established for each project, and
contributions for a project shall be applied to provide funding assistance
for that project.
(2) Any contributions that remain in the fund when a project is
completed or terminated shall be held and applied to other public roads
projects in the manner that the director determines.

19-27-270. Breast Cancer Research Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Breast Cancer Research Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Twenty percent (20%) of those special revenues as specified
in § 19-42-201(192);
(2) That portion of those special revenues as specified in § 19-
42-201(201); and
(3) Those general revenues that may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively as provided in § 20-15-1303.

19-27-271. Breast Cancer Control Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Breast Cancer Control Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
436 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) That portion set out in § 26-57-1106 of those special
revenues specified in § 19-42-201(192);
(2) That portion of those special revenues specified in § 19-42-
201(201); and
(3) Those general revenues provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used:
(1) Exclusively as provided in § 20-15-1304; and
(2) At the option of the Department of Health and in amounts not
to exceed that appropriated by the General Assembly for such purposes, for
cervical cancer.

19-27-272. Reward Pool Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Reward Pool Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all monetary donations or gifts made by
private citizens and corporations.
(c) The fund shall be used for the payment of rewards or enhancing
state-funded rewards for information leading to the arrest of persons
committing arson, as administered by the Governor and as provided in § 5-38-
301.

19-27-273. Youth Services Facilities Needs Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Youth Services Facilities Needs Fund”.
(b) The Youth Services Facilities Needs Fund shall consist of funds
transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement Fund and other funds
authorized by law.
(c) The Youth Services Facilities Needs Fund shall be used for
contracts, repairs, acquisition, construction, equipment, and operational
expenses to improve the facilities of the Division of Youth Services.

19-27-274. Building Authority Division Real Estate Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
437 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund to be known as the “Building Authority Division Real Estate Fund”.
(b)(1) The Building Authority Division Real Estate Fund shall consist
of funds transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement Fund, or
other funds, gifts, bequests, foundation grants and gifts, the Governor's
Emergency Fund or other emergency funds, federal grants and matching funds,
short-term loans and advances, proceeds from bond issues, leases, service
charges or fees, interagency transfers of funds, partnerships and debentures,
and other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) The Building Authority Division Real Estate Fund shall be
used to acquire either by deed or by lease, to own or operate, to maintain,
to repair, to renovate, to develop, or to construct real properties,
including any necessary demolition and site improvements, for use by state
agencies, as defined in § 22-2-102, for capital improvement needs under the
jurisdiction of the Building Authority Division.

19-27-275. Rural Physician Incentive Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
revolving fund to be known as the “Rural Physician Incentive Revolving Fund”.
(b) Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of each state fiscal
year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for the same
intent and purpose set forth in § 20-12-501 et seq.

19-27-276. Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
miscellaneous fund to be known as the “Department of Labor and Licensing
Special Fund”.
(b) The Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund shall consist
of:
(1) Those special revenues set out in § 19-42-201(25), (36),
(72), (112), (158), (180), and (251); and
(2) The fee, penalty, and assessment income and all other
income, the disposition of which is not otherwise provided by law, of the
Department of Labor and Licensing.
(c) The Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund shall be used
438 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for the maintenance, operation, and improvements required by the department
in carrying out the special revenue programs enumerated in subsection (b) of
this section and to defray the costs of the maintenance, operation, and
improvements required by the department or the Secretary of the Department of
Labor and Licensing in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties imposed
by law on the department or the secretary.
(d) The secretary, with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, is authorized to transfer funds from the Department of Labor and
Licensing Special Fund to the Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account.

19-27-277. Arkansas Athletic Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Athletic Commission Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those fees set out in § 17-22-101 et
seq.
(c) The fund shall be used as provided in § 17-22-101 et seq.

19-27-278. Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental
Quality and may be used to:
(1) Promote market research and development grants to determine
the most efficient means of collecting, transporting, and processing scrap
electronic equipment;
(2) Work with the Department of Finance and Administration and
the Marketing and Redistribution Section to establish statewide contracts for
computer and electronics recycling and demanufacturing businesses; and
(3) Support and fund other measures necessary to implement and
promote the recycling, donation, demanufacturing, or disposal options for
computers and electronic equipment.

19-27-279. Arkansas Economic Development Commission Super Projects
Fund.
439 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Economic Development Commission Super
Projects Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for economic development super projects of
the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

19-27-280. Drug Prevention and Intervention Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Drug Prevention and Intervention Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Health to fund drug
prevention and intervention activities.

19-27-281. Port Priority Improvement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Port Priority Improvement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the funds or other moneys that may be
deposited into the fund as provided by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used to:
(1) Provide financial assistance to public port authorities as
set out in the Arkansas Port Priority Improvement Program Act, § 15-23-901 et
seq.; and
(2) Develop port infrastructure, including paying for associated
engineering and construction costs.

19-27-282. Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Nonpartisan Filing Fee Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of nonpartisan office filing fees under
§ 7-10-103.
(2) The fund shall be used to cover the cost of election
440 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
expenses of the State Board of Election Commissioners as set out in § 7-10-
103 and for personal services and operating expenses for the State Board of
Election Commissioners.

19-27-283. Educational Adequacy Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Educational Adequacy Fund”.
(b) After the Treasurer of State has made deductions from the revenues
under § 19-21-103(b)(2)(A), the Educational Adequacy Fund shall consist of:
(1) All net revenues collected due to enactments of the Eighty-
Fourth General Assembly meeting in Second Extraordinary Session, unless a
different distribution of those additional net revenues is otherwise provided
in the act creating those additional net revenues;
(2) The revenues credited to the Educational Adequacy Fund under
§ 26-54-113(b)(2);
(3) The revenues generated by § 26-52-302(d), § 26-52-316, § 26-
52-317(c)(1)(C), § 26-52-319(a)(2)(C), § 26-53-107(d), § 26-53-145(c)(1)(C),
§ 26-53-148(a)(2)(C), § 26-56-224(c)(3), and § 26-57-1002(d)(1)(A)(ii); and
(4) Other revenues as provided by law.
(c)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State will determine, from time
to time, the amount of funds required from the Educational Adequacy Fund
which, when added to other resources available to the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account of the Public School Fund
and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Fund Account of the
Education Fund, is needed to fulfill the financial obligation of the state to
provide an adequate educational system as authorized by law and shall certify
the amounts to the Treasurer of State.
(2) At the end of each month, the Treasurer of State shall
transfer all moneys available from the Educational Adequacy Fund to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account of
the Public School Fund and to the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education Fund Account of the Education Fund until the sum of all transfers
from the Educational Adequacy Fund equals the amounts determined in
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, there to be used as determined by law.
(d) In the event the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines that
441 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the transfers from the Educational Adequacy Fund, when added to the other
resources available to the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
Public School Fund Account of the Public School Fund, are not sufficient to
meet the state's financial obligation to provide an adequate educational
system as authorized by law, the additional amount required shall be
transferred from the other funds and fund accounts, except the Educational
Facilities Partnership Fund Account, within § 19-23-102 based upon the
proportion that each of the remaining funds and fund accounts, excluding the
Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account, bears to the total of the
remaining funds and fund accounts in § 19-23-102.

19-27-284. Area Agencies on Aging Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Area Agencies on Aging Fund”.
(2) The Treasurer of State shall credit to the fund the amount
certified each quarter under § 26-51-2507.
(b)(1) The Treasurer of State shall distribute moneys in the fund to
the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the
Department of Human Services to be distributed to the eight (8) area agencies
on aging based on the division's funding formula.
(2) The division's funding formula shall take into consideration
the following factors without limitation:
(A) The geographical distribution of the older individuals
in the state; and
(B) The distribution of the older individuals in the state
who have the greatest economic need and social need, with particular
consideration of the low-income minority older individuals.

19-27-285. Purchase and Corporate Travel Card Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
revolving fund to be known as the “Purchase and Corporate Travel Card Program
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be used for rebates from vendor banks, distribution
to participating agencies, and operating expenses connected with the
442 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
administration of the Purchase and Corporate Travel Card Program.

19-27-286. UAMS Cancer Research Center Matching Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “UAMS Cancer Research Center Matching Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenue as may be authorized by
law.
(c) The fund shall be used as matching funds for the construction of
and endowments for the Arkansas Cancer Research Center of the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences.
(d)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall release funds to
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences on a matching basis in an
amount equal to the amount of grants and donations received as cash, cash
equivalent, or an in-kind property pledge enforced by a binding written
agreement. The period for which grants and donations shall be counted for
matching purposes shall be January 1, 2007 — June 30, 2009.
(2) The release of the funds shall be upon documentation
demonstrating that the matching requirement has been met. The documentation
shall be signed by the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences.
(3) Requests for the release of funds may be made on a quarterly
basis, and pending a favorable review of the documentation by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, payments shall be made in the first month
following the request.

19-27-287. Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing
Fund”.
(b) The Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund shall
consist of:
(1) Money transferred from the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund; and
(2) Any other money provided by law.
443 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund shall
be used by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission for investment
incentives to compete with other states to attract new business and economic
development to the state or to retain existing business in the state.
(d) Money from the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing
Fund may be used in conjunction with other incentives offered by the state to
attract new business or retain existing business.
(e)(1) Any proposed use of the Economic Development Incentive Quick
Action Closing Fund by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall
first be approved by the Governor.
(2) Upon approval by the Governor, the Governor shall submit the
proposed use of the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund
for the review of the Legislative Council.
(f) The Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall submit an
annual written report to the Legislative Council concerning the Economic
Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund, which shall contain the
following:
(1) The name and address of the businesses receiving money from
the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund;
(2) The date, amount, and reason of the disbursements of money
from the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund;
(3) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the disbursements made
from the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund; and
(4) Any suggestions for improving the use of the Economic
Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund.

19-27-288. Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance
Administration Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Division of Workforce Services Unemployment
Insurance Administration Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of:
(A) The proceeds of the administrative assessment as
specified in § 11-10-706(c)(2) and any interest accruing on these revenues;
and
444 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Any other funds made available by the General
Assembly.
(2) The fund shall be used for personal services and operating
expenses of the unemployment insurance program necessary to the proper
administration of the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et
seq., including expenses for modernizing information technology systems and
hardware utilized in the administration of the unemployment insurance
program, as determined by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.
(c) The director shall report to the Legislative Council on a
quarterly basis on all uses of the fund.

19-27-289. Division of Workforce Services Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Division of Workforce Services Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those general revenues as may be authorized by law; and
(2) Any other nonfederal funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Division of Workforce Services in carrying out those powers, functions, and
duties imposed by law upon the Director of the Division of Workforce Services
as set out in the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq.,
and § 20-76-101 et seq.; or
(2) Any other duties that may be imposed by law upon the
division.

19-27-290. Science, Technology, Engineering, and Math Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Science, Technology, Engineering, and Math Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be used for retaining, recruiting, and attracting
competent science, technology, engineering, and math teachers by providing
industry-competitive income to certified, qualified teachers who teach
science, technology, engineering, and math subjects.
(c) The fund's balance shall not be reclaimed at the end of the
445 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
biennium but shall be carried forward for the same use in subsequent years.

19-27-291. Technology Acceleration Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Technology Acceleration Fund”.
(b)(1) The Technology Acceleration Fund shall consist of funds
transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement Fund, or other funds,
gifts, bequests, foundation grants and gifts, the Governor's Emergency Fund
or other emergency funds, federal grants and matching funds, proceeds from
bond issues, service charges or fees, interagency transfers of funds, and
other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) The Technology Acceleration Fund shall consist of money
transferred from the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund and any other
money provided by law.
(c) The Technology Acceleration Fund shall be used by the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission and the Arkansas Development Finance
Authority for investment incentives to enhance the economy of the state
through technology development.
(d) Money from the Technology Acceleration Fund may be used in
conjunction with other incentives offered by the state to create, attract, or
retain business.
(e)(1) Any proposed use of the Technology Acceleration Fund by the
commission or the authority shall first be approved by the Governor.
(2) The commission and the authority shall make a joint
recommendation to the Governor for any proposed use of the Technology
Acceleration Fund.

19-27-292. Innovate Arkansas Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Innovate Arkansas Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of funds as may be provided for by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission for the sole support of a contract between the commission and the
entity selected to provide support and assistance for development and growth
446 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of knowledge-based and technology-based companies in the State of Arkansas.

19-27-293. Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b)(1) The Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund shall
consist of funds transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement Fund,
or other funds, gifts, bequests, foundation grants and gifts, the Governor's
Emergency Fund or other emergency funds, federal grants and matching funds,
proceeds from bond issues, service charges or fees, interagency transfers of
funds, and other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) The Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund shall
consist of funds received from agencies, boards, or commissions to repay
loans for the Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies, funds
made available by the General Assembly from time to time, and such revenues
as may be authorized by law.
(c) The Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund shall be used
to provide loans to agencies for the program as authorized by law and
approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

19-27-294. Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those funds provided by the income tax
check-off program pursuant to § 26-51-2508, federal and private grants and
donations, and any other funds authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in the Newborn
Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative Act, § 20-8-501 et seq.

19-27-295. Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization
Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization
447 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Revolving Fund”.
(b) The Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization Revolving
Fund shall consist of the unexpended fund balances remaining in the Small
Business Loan Fund Account of the 82nd Session General Improvement Fund or
its successor fund or fund accounts, including the Development and
Enhancement Fund, as of the close of business on June 30, 2009, and such
other funds as may be authorized by law.
(c) All reimbursements, repayments of loans, and interest earned and
deposited into the Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization
Revolving Fund from any source shall be treated as a refund to expenditure.
(d) The Minority and Women-Owned Business Loan Mobilization Revolving
Fund shall be used to promote the development of minority and women-owned
business enterprises in the state, increase the ability of minority and
women-owned business enterprises to compete for state contracts, and sustain
the economic growth of minority and women-owned business enterprises in the
state.

19-27-296. Trial Court Administrator Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Trial Court Administrator Fund”.
(b) The Trial Court Administrator Fund shall consist of those moneys
transferred from the State Administration of Justice Fund, the first one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) collected annually from filing fees for
the office of the prosecuting attorney, and other moneys as authorized by
law.
(c) The Trial Court Administrator Fund shall be used for paying and
reimbursing:
(1) Trial court administrators under § 16-13-3301 et seq.; and
(2) Substitute trial court administrators under § 16-10-801 et
seq.

19-27-297. Fire Protection Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Fire Protection Licensing Fund”.
448 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All funds provided by law for the fund; and
(2) Examination and renewal fees charged pursuant to § 20-22-
610.
(c) The fund shall be used for maintenance, operation, and improvement
as required by the Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board in carrying out
the powers, functions, and duties as set out in § 20-22-601 et seq.

19-27-298. Arkansas Acceleration Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Acceleration Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds provided by law; and
(2) Grants made by any person or federal government agency.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Science and Technology
of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to provide support and
assistance for the accelerated growth of knowledge-based and high-technology
jobs in the State of Arkansas through focused funding of the state
initiatives and programs as defined under the Arkansas Acceleration Fund Act,
§ 15-3-501 et seq.

19-27-299. Health Information Technology Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Health Information Technology Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 25-42-101 et seq. [repealed] shall
be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Health Information
Technology Fund as special revenues.
(2) The Health Information Technology Fund shall also consist of
funds transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement Fund, or other
funds, gifts, bequests, foundation grants and gifts, the Governor's Emergency
Fund or other emergency funds, federal grants and matching funds, proceeds
from bond issues, service charges or fees, interagency transfer of funds, and
other funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly.
(c) The Health Information Technology Fund shall be used by the Office
449 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of Health Information Technology for the operating expenses of the office and
the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange.

Subchapter 3 — Enumeration of Miscellaneous Funds, Continued

19-27-301. Arkansas Great Places Program Fund.
(a) The Division of Arkansas Heritage may establish in a bank
authorized to do business in this state and selected by the division a
revolving cash fund entitled “Arkansas Great Places Program Fund” into which
the division shall deposit all funds received as matching funds from eligible
organizations participating in the Arkansas Great Places Program under § 15-
11-801 et seq.
(b) The division may receive gifts, grants, bequests, devises, and
donations made to the division, amounts received as matching funds from
eligible organizations participating in the Arkansas Great Places Program
under § 15-11-801 et seq., and any other funds authorized by law to be used
in the furtherance of the purposes of the Arkansas Great Places Program under
§ 15-11-801 et seq.
(c) In addition, the division may accept gifts, grants, or donations
from the United States Government or agencies thereof, and private
individuals, foundations, or concerns to be used for the purposes of the
Arkansas Great Places Program under § 15-11-801 et seq.

19-27-302. County Juror Reimbursement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “County Juror Reimbursement Fund”.
(b) The County Juror Reimbursement Fund shall consist of those moneys
transferred from the State Administration of Justice Fund and other moneys as
authorized by law.
(c) The County Juror Reimbursement Fund shall be used for
reimbursements to counties for a portion of the cost of per diem compensation
for jurors and prospective jurors pursuant to § 16-34-106.

19-27-303. County Voting System Grant Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
450 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “County Voting System Grant Fund”.
(b) The Secretary of State shall periodically remit to the Treasurer
of State the fees the Secretary of State collects associated with the Uniform
Commercial Code activity under §§ 4-9-525(a)(1), 4-9-525(a)(3), and 4-9-
525(b)-(d), and the Treasurer of State shall deposit those funds into the
County Voting System Grant Fund.
(c) The County Voting System Grant Fund shall be used by the Secretary
of State to provide grants to counties to purchase voting system equipment,
programming, and maintenance.
(d) A county that receives a grant from the County Voting System Grant
Fund shall establish on the books of the county treasurer a fund to be known
as the “voting system grant fund” into which grants from the Secretary of
State shall be paid under this section.
(e) The County Voting System Grant Fund may be used by the Secretary
of State to issue refunds and reimbursements of fees collected for the grant
program described in § 7-5-301(d)(2).

19-27-304. Alternative Motor Fuel Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Alternative Motor Fuel Development Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants made by a person, entity, or federal government
agency;
(2) Other funds that become available through energy programs;
(3) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
(4) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality to
provide rebates and incentives under the Arkansas Alternative Motor Fuel
Development Act, § 15-10-901 et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

451 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-27-305. Open Enrollment Public Charter School Capital Grant Program
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Open Enrollment Public Charter School Capital Grant
Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those general revenues as may be
authorized by law and other nonfederal funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for distributing grants for programs
providing assistance to open enrollment public charter schools concerning
academic facilities and equipment and the repayment of debt incurred relating
to academic facilities and equipment under the Open Enrollment Public Charter
School Capital Grant Program established in § 6-23-801 et seq., and as may
otherwise be provided by law.

19-27-306. Open-Enrollment Public Charter School Facilities Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a
miscellaneous fund to be known as the “Open-Enrollment Public Charter School
Facilities Loan Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues as may be authorized by law;
(2) Grants received by the Division of Public School Academic
Facilities and Transportation for the purpose of providing open-enrollment
public charter school facilities assistance, including grants from the United
States Department of Education;
(3) Donations or bequests received by the division for the
purpose of starting, augmenting, or replenishing the fund;
(4) Revenues received from open-enrollment public charter
schools for the repayment of a loan granted under the Open-Enrollment Public
Charter School Facilities Loan Fund program; and
(5) Other revenues as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for distributing loans to open-enrollment
public charter schools for the purposes of the construction, lease, or
purchase of an academic facility, the repair, improvement, or addition to an
academic facility, and enhancing credit for financing purposes under § 6-23-
452 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
701 et seq., and as may be otherwise provided by law.

19-27-307. Safe Harbor Fund for Sexually Exploited Children —
Definition.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Safe Harbor Fund for Sexually Exploited Children”.
(b) The fund shall consist of fines collected under § 5-18-103(d), §
5-18-104(c), § 5-18-106(c), § 5-18-107(f), § 5-70-102(e), § 5-70-103(d), § 5-
70-104(c), § 5-70-105(c), § 5-70-106(c), and § 5-70-107(e) and any other
revenues authorized by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by the Department of Human
Services.
(2) The department shall use the fund to provide:
(A) Services and treatment, such as securing residential
housing, health services, and social services for sexually exploited
children;
(B) Grants to service providers working with sexually
exploited children; and
(C) For the management and operation of the fund.
(d) As used in this section, “sexually exploited child” means a person
less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual
exploitation because the person:
(1) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-103;
(2) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. § 1591,
as it existed on January 1, 2013; or
(3) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or sexual
solicitation under § 5-70-103 or § 5-70-107.

19-27-308. Arkansas Port, Intermodal, and Waterway Development Grant
Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Port, Intermodal, and Waterway Development
Grant Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
453 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) The funds specified under § 26-26-1616(d);
(2) Grants made by any person or federal government agency; and
(3) Any other funds authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Waterways Commission to
provide grants to port authorities and intermodal authorities under the
Arkansas Port, Intermodal, and Waterway Development Grant Program established
under § 15-23-205.
(d) Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of each state fiscal
year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for the same
intent and purpose stated in this section.

19-27-309. New Markets Performance Guarantee Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “New Markets Performance Guarantee Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fees paid under § 15-4-3609;
(2) Grants made by a person, organization, or federal or state
government agency; and
(3) Any other funds provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission to guarantee qualified community development entities' performance
under the New Markets Jobs Act of 2013, § 15-4-3601 et seq.

19-27-310. Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants made by any person, state agency, or federal
government agency;
(2) Donations made by private persons or entities;
(3) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
(4) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture to award
454 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
grants to counties under the Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Act, § 14-305-101
et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-311. Arkansas Wireless Information Network Financing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Wireless Information Network Financing
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of bond revenues, driver's license fees,
general revenues, and other moneys as authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for maintenance, repair, upkeep,
replacement, contracting expenses, and tower repair and replacement for the
Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

19-27-312. Workforce Initiative Act of 2015 Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Workforce Initiative Act of 2015 Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those general revenues as may be
authorized by law and other nonfederal funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Higher Education for
distributing grants to programs identified under § 6-60-107.

19-27-313. Future Transportation Research and Workforce Development
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Future Transportation Research and Workforce
Development Fund”.
(b) The Future Transportation Research and Workforce Development Fund
shall consist of:
(1) If available after the deposit of the funds required under §
14-143-130, interest income received under § 27-70-204 up to a maximum amount
455 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) each year from the Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund; and
(2) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The Future Transportation Research and Workforce Development Fund
shall be used by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for distributing
grants under the Transportation-Related Research and Workforce Development
Grant Program, § 27-65-145.

19-27-314. Mandatory Publication Reimbursement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Mandatory Publication Reimbursement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of reimbursements to the Secretary of State
for mandatory publication of petitions and measures under § 7-9-113.

19-27-315. Arkansas Children's Advocacy Center Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Children's Advocacy Center Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The fines specified under §§ 5-4-703, 27-50-306, and 27-51-
217;
(2) Grants or donations made by a person, state agency, or
federal government agency; and
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic
Violence Commission as provided in § 9-5-106 and as provided by any other
provisions of law.

19-27-316. Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund — Definition.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of fees collected under § 5-5-501(d), fines
collected under § 5-18-103(d), § 5-18-104(c), § 5-18-106(c), § 5-18-107(f), §
5-70-102(e), § 5-70-103(d), § 5-70-104(c), § 5-70-105(c), § 5-70-106(c), and
456 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
§ 5-70-107(e), and any other revenues authorized by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by the Attorney General.
(2) The Attorney General shall use the fund to provide:
(A) Grants to nonprofit, religious, and other third-party
organizations that provide services and treatment, such as securing
residential housing, health services, and social services for victims of
human trafficking;
(B) Training and education related to human trafficking to
law enforcement; and
(C) For the management and operation of the fund.
(d) As used in this section, “victim of human trafficking” means a
person who has been subject to sexual exploitation because the person:
(1) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-103;
(2) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. § 1591,
as it existed on January 1, 2017; or
(3) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or sexual
solicitation under § 5-70-103 or § 5-70-107.

19-27-317. Restricted Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Restricted Reserve Fund”.
(b) The Restricted Reserve Fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds transferred from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund;
(2) Interagency transfers of funds or fund accounts to the
Restricted Reserve Fund;
(3) Any revenues provided by law; and
(4) Any other funds and fund transfers provided for by law.
(c) For the purpose of and after meeting the requirements of
subsection (d) of this section, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
from time to time transfer on his or her books and those of the Treasurer of
State and the Auditor of State funds from the Restricted Reserve Fund to one
(1) or more general revenue operating funds or fund accounts, the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for state matching funds, the State Central Services Fund, the
Development and Enhancement Fund, and any fund, fund account, or
457 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
appropriations authorized by the General Assembly upon prior approval of the
greater of three-fifths (3/5) of the quorum present or a majority of the
membership of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(d)(1) If at any time during the fiscal year a department, state
agency, board, commission, state institution of higher education, or
constitutional officer determines that it is necessary to perform its duties
or is in the best interest of the citizens of the State of Arkansas to
request a transfer from the Restricted Reserve Fund, that entity shall submit
a detailed request in writing to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
stating:
(A) The need and purpose of the transfer;
(B) Efforts to find efficiencies and savings prior to
making the request;
(C) Current year-to-date budget and expenditures by line
item; and
(D) A detailed line item budget reflecting proposed
expenditures in the amount requested.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may request additional
information to make a determination and may then approve, modify, or deny the
request.
(3) Upon the determination by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State that a transfer is necessary, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
shall submit the entity's request and his or her recommendation for approval
as required in subsection (c) of this section.
(e) The funds available in the Restricted Reserve Fund may be
transferred as provided in § 19-21-102(b)(2)(B)(iii).

19-27-318. Arkansas River Navigation System Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas River Navigation System Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Grants made by any person or federal government agency;
(2) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year; and
458 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Waterways Commission to
develop, improve, and expand river transportation resources within the
portion of the McClellan-Kerr Arkansas River Navigation System located in the
State of Arkansas.

19-27-319. Graduate Medical Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Graduate Medical Education Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Gifts, grants, and donations;
(2) Any revenues provided by law; and
(3) Any other funds and fund transfers authorized or provided
for by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Higher
Education as provided in § 6-82-2001 et seq., and as provided by any other
relevant provisions of law.
(2) The moneys in the fund shall be disbursed at the direction
of the Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board as provided under
§ 6-82-2001 et seq.

19-27-320. Immediate Disaster Response Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
revolving fund to be known as the “Immediate Disaster Response Fund”.
(b) Reimbursements received from any federal, state, or local
government agency or other states shall be deposited into the State Treasury
to the fund as a refund to expenditure.
(c) The fund shall consist of such revenue as may be authorized by
law.
(d) The fund shall be used by the Division of Emergency Management
for immediate costs of disasters within the state and to assist other states
in disaster response requests.

19-27-321. COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund — Definition.
459 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund”.
(b) The COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds transferred from the General Revenue Allotment Reserve
Fund to the COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund;
(2) Any revenues provided by law; and
(3) Any fund or fund account transfers provided for by law.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall use the COVID-19 Rainy
Day Fund for transfers to provide funding for one (1) or more appropriations
authorized by the General Assembly and to offset general revenue reductions,
funding needs, and unanticipated needs created by the coronavirus 2019
(COVID-19) crisis.
(d)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the release of any
funds from the COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund shall require prior approval, as
defined in this subsection, of the:
(A) Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or her
designee;
(B) Majority party leader of the House of Representatives
or his or her designee;
(C) Minority party leader of the House of Representatives
or his or her designee;
(D) President Pro Tempore of the Senate or his or her
designee;
(E) Majority party leader of the Senate or his or her
designee; and
(F) Minority party leader of the Senate or his or her
designee.
(2)(A) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and all other members of the General
Assembly of a request for the release of funds from the COVID-19 Rainy Day
Fund.
(B)(i) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall communicate the request to the
respective majority party leader and respective minority party leader.
460 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(ii) If a majority party leader or a minority party
leader is unavailable or recuses from the vote, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall contact the
non-responding majority party leader’s designee or non-responding minority
party leader’s designee.
(3)(A) As used in this section, “prior approval” means:
(i) At least two (2) members listed in subdivision
(d)(1) of this section from the House of Representatives and two (2) members
listed in subdivision (d)(1) of this section from the Senate approve the
release of funds from the COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund; and
(ii) The written or electronic approval by the two
(2) members listed in subdivision (d)(1) of this section from the House of
Representatives and by the two (2) members listed in subdivision (d)(1) of
this section from the Senate occurs within two (2) hours after the members
received written or electronic notification of the request by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(B) In the event the majority party leader or the minority
party leader is not available within two (2) hours after the notification has
been given or has recused, the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall contact the non-responding majority
party leader’s designee or non-responding minority party leader’s designee
and the designee shall either be immediately available or is deemed to vote
for approval of the release of funds from the COVID-19 Rainy Day Fund.
(4)(A) The action taken under this subsection shall be reported
to the members of the General Assembly.
(B) The report shall include:
(i) Remaining balances in the COVID-19 Rainy Day
Fund;
(ii) Total amount released to date; and
(iii) The amount of each prior release and the
purpose of the release.
(e) Determining the general revenue funding for a state agency each
fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually
accomplished by delineating such maximums for a state agency with general
revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq. Further, the General
461 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Assembly has determined that the various state agencies may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided authorizing broad powers under
this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the
General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval as set out in
subsection (d) herein, by this section. The requirement of approval as set
out in subsection (d) of this section is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement of approval as set out in subsection (d) of this
section is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this
entire section is void.

19-27-322. Skills Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Skills Development Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law;
(2) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(3) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Office of Skills Development as
provided in § 25-30-109.

19-27-323. Arkansas Foresters for the Future Scholarship Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Foresters for the Future Scholarship Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Foresters for the Future Scholarship Fund shall
consist of:
(1) Moneys received and deposited into the State Forestry Fund
under § 15-31-108 that are equal to the cost of the Arkansas Foresters for
the Future Scholarship each academic semester; and
(2) Special revenue funds.
(c) The Arkansas Foresters for the Future Scholarship Fund shall be
administered by the Department of Agriculture, Forestry office, as provided
in the Arkansas Foresters for the Future Scholarship Program Act of 2021, §
6-82-2101 et seq., and as provided by any other relevant provisions of law.
462 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-27-324. State Meat Inspection Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “State Meat Inspection Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fees collected under § 20-60-212;
(2) Moneys obtained from federal grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund;
(3) Gifts, grants, and other moneys both public and private; and
(4) Other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture for
expenses of the State Meat Inspection Program.

19-27-325. Automotive Technologist Education Grant Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Automotive Technologist Education Grant Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission shall periodically remit to
the Treasurer of State five percent (5%) of the fees the commission collects
from the issuance of licenses by the commission, and the Treasurer of State
shall deposit those funds into the Automotive Technologist Education Grant
Fund.
(c) The commission may receive gifts, grants, bequests, devises, and
donations made to the commission, amounts received as matching funds from
eligible organizations participating in the Automotive Technologist Education
Grant Program under § 23-112-207, and any other funds authorized by law to be
used in the furtherance of the purposes of the program.
(d) In addition, the commission:
(1) May accept gifts, grants, or donations from the United
States Government or agencies of the United States Government and private
individuals, foundations, or concerns to be used for the purposes of the
program; and
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this
section, shall at the end of each fiscal year in addition to its contribution
under subsection (b) of this section, fund the amount necessary to increase
463 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Automotive Technologist Education Grant Fund balance to two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000).
(B) Funding provided by the commission under subdivision
(d)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed the amount necessary for the
commission to retain three (3) years of its running average operating
expenses.
(e) The Automotive Technologist Education Grant Fund may be used by
the commission to issue Automotive Technologist Education Grants for the
program.

19-27-326. Agri Fair Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Agri Fair Fund”.
(b) The Agri Fair Fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues appropriated to:
(A) Agriculture show premiums, refunds, and
reimbursements;
(B) County fair improvement grants; and
(C) Community improvement grants, county fairs, and
rodeos; and
(2) Other revenues as authorized by law.
(c) The Agri Fair Fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture
for:
(1) Grants and aid under § 2-36-101; and
(2) Personal services and operating expenses of the department.

19-27-327. Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law;
(2) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(3) Any other revenues authorized by law.
464 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of the Department of
Energy and Environment as provided in § 15-10-101.

19-27-328. Public Safety Equipment Grant Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Public Safety Equipment Grant Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law;
(2) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(3) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of the Department of
Public Safety as provided in § 12-1-103.

19-27-329. Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Academic
Accountability Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Academic
Accountability Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education to create and maintain the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas
Kids Program under the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program Act,
§ 6-18-2301 et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-330. ARSafeSchools Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
465 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund to be known as the “ARSafeSchools Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences Psychiatric Research Institute solely to create and maintain the
ARSafeSchools school safety and crisis line under § 6-18-111.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.
(e) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Psychiatric
Research Institute is not required to implement provisions of this section if
the ARSafeSchools school safety and crisis line under § 6-18-111 is not
funded.
(f)(1) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Psychiatric
Research Institute shall submit an annual report containing the following
information to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee:
(A) The balance of the fund as of the reporting date;
(B) A list of administrative costs paid for from the fund,
including without limitation salaries, pensions, and packages;
(C) The total revenue received by the fund during the
reporting period; and
(D) A detailed description of steps taken to create and
implement the ARSafeSchools school safety and crisis line.
(2) The annual report required under this subsection shall be
submitted by January 1 and July 1 of each year.

19-27-331. Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account
Fund”.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for fiscal year
2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, in addition to all other amounts
466 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
required under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program,
the Department of Education shall include in its annual budget request
submitted under § 19-4-301 et seq., and the Governor shall include in each
recommendation submitted to the General Assembly under § 19-4-201, an
appropriation to the Department of Education, Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education, for the greater of an amount not less than two percent
(2%) of:
(A) Net public school enrollment adjusted for state
foundation funding aid purposes; or
(B) The total number of eligible program applications
received by the division, if available, multiplied by the prior year's
statewide net foundation funding aid allotted per student.
(2) The amount appropriated under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall be transferred by the division to the fund to be used solely to
meet the obligations required under the program, except as otherwise provided
in this section.
(3) The Governor shall include a recommendation, as required
under § 19-4-201, that the total amount of funds appropriated to the division
that was not transferred to the fund during the previous fiscal year due to
an accumulated balance from previous fiscal years as provided under
subsection (c) of this section be reappropriated for the subsequent fiscal
year.
(c) Each fiscal year, the amount required to be requested and
recommended for appropriation under subsection (b) of this section shall be
reduced by the sum of:
(1) Any unused, accumulated amounts transferred to the fund due
to the requirements under this subsection from previous fiscal years; and
(2) Any unused appropriations made to the department due to the
requirements under this subsection that were not transferred to the fund due
to an accumulated balance from previous fiscal years.

19-27-332. Literacy Tutoring Grant Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Literacy Tutoring Grant Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
467 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education to create and maintain a literacy tutoring grant program under the
Right to Read Act, § 6-17-429.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-333. Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Higher Education to
create and maintain the Arkansas Teacher Academy Scholarship Program Act, §
6-82-2201 et seq., which shall include only the following expenses:
(1) Reimbursing an eligible postsecondary institution for
Arkansas Teacher Academy scholarships distributed under the Arkansas Teacher
Academy Scholarship Program Act, § 6-82-2201 et seq., that cover the balance
of tuition and fees for undergraduate, graduate, and postbaccalaureate
students who are enrolled in an academy after all other financial gifts,
financial aid, and grants have been received by academy attendees enrolled in
an academy at eligible postsecondary institutions;
(2) Supporting academy attendees who are currently employed by a
public school district in the state;
(3) Conducting induction services for academy graduates; and
(4)(A) Implementing a marketing and promotion plan to recruit
and retain students and teachers in the academy with particular emphasis on:
(i) Prioritizing academy attendees who reflect the
diversity of the state's student and teacher population; and
(ii) Administering the academy.
(B) However, annual expenditures for funds expended under
subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section shall not exceed three percent (3%) of
moneys in the fund each fiscal year.
468 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year may be
used by an eligible postsecondary institution for academy costs in the next
fiscal year.

19-27-334. Teacher Minimum Salary and Raise Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund within the Public School Fund to be known as the “Teacher Minimum Salary
and Raise Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other moneys authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Education to maintain
and distribute revenue authorized under § 6-17-2403 for teacher minimum
salary levels and teacher raises.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-335. Merit Teacher Incentive Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund within the Public School Fund to be known as the “Merit Teacher
Incentive Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education to create and maintain the Merit Teacher Incentive Fund Program
moneys.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

469 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-27-336. Violent Crime Clearance Grant Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Violent Crime Clearance Grant Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of the Department of
Public Safety as provided in § 12-6-801 et seq. to fund grant awards.

19-27-337. Agri Scholarship Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Agri Scholarship Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture to create
and maintain the Agri Scholarship Program under § 25-38-212.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-338. Imagination Library of Arkansas Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Imagination Library of Arkansas Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts, or
donations that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Education to create
and maintain the Imagination Library of Arkansas Program under § 13-2-107.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
470 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-27-339. Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-
Supported Institutions of Higher Education Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-
Supported Institutions of Higher Education Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b) The Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-Supported
Institutions of Higher Education Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law;
(2) Funds transferred to it from the Development and Enhancement
Fund;
(3) Other funds, gifts, bequests, foundation grants and gifts,
the Governor's Emergency Fund or other emergency funds, federal grants and
matching funds, proceeds from bond issues, services charges or fees, and
interagency transfers of funds; and
(4) Funds received from state-supported institutions of higher
education to repay loans for the Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for
State-Supported Institutions of Higher Education, § 6-62-1201 et seq.
(c) The Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-Supported
Institutions of Higher Education Revolving Loan Fund shall be used to provide
loans to state-supported institutions of higher education for the program as
authorized under § 6-62-1201 et seq. and approved by the Arkansas Higher
Education Coordinating Board.

19-27-340. Fire Services Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Fire Services Fund”.
(b) The Fire Services Fund shall consist of:
(1) Special revenues collected under § 8-7-802;
(2) Special revenues from the license fee for fireworks under §§
20-22-701 — 20-22-715;
(3) Special revenues from the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund,
471 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
§ 19-43-256;
(4) Any other funds authorized or provided by law; and
(5) Any remaining fund balances carried forward from year to
year.
(c) The Fire Services Fund shall be used by the Division of Emergency
Management and the Office of Fire Protection Services to provide fire
protection services.
(d) Moneys remaining in the Fire Services Fund at the end of each
fiscal year shall carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated
in this section in the next fiscal year.

SUBTITLE 3 — REVENUE CLASSIFICATION LAW

CHAPTER 40. GENERAL PROVISIONS
CHAPTER 41. GENERAL REVENUES
CHAPTER 42. SPECIAL REVENUES
CHAPTER 43. SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS
CHAPTER 44. TRUST FUND INCOME
CHAPTER 45. FEDERAL GRANTS, AIDS, AND REIMBURSEMENTS
CHAPTER 46. NONREVENUE RECEIPTS
CHAPTERS 47 — 59. [RESERVED.]

CHAPTER 40
GENERAL PROVISIONS

19-40-101. Title.
This subtitle shall be referred to and may be cited as the “Revenue
Classification Law”.

19-40-102. Purpose.
Because of the many revenue laws of the state providing for the levying
and collecting of taxes, licenses, fees, permits, assessments, royalties,
leases, rents, fines, interest, and penalties for the support of the state
government and its agencies, institutions, boards, and commissions that have
been enacted by various General Assemblies, it is the policy of the General
Assembly with respect to all such revenues and other income, which are
472 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
required by law to be deposited into the State Treasury, to describe, define,
and classify all such revenues and other income and to provide for the
purposes, individually and collectively, that all such revenues and other
income may be used. It is the intent and purpose of this subtitle to comply
with the Arkansas Constitution, including Arkansas Constitution, Article 16,
§ 11.

19-40-103. Cash funds.
All taxes, licenses, fees, permits, or other income collected by any
board, agency, or commission under the authority of the State of Arkansas
that are designated by law to be deposited into a depository other than the
State Treasury are classified as “cash funds” and are declared to be revenues
of the state to be used as required and to be expended only for such purposes
and in such manner as determined by law.

19-40-104. Income required to be deposited into State Treasury.
All taxes, licenses, fees, permits, assessments, royalties, leases,
rents, fines, interest, penalties, and other income provided for by law for
the support of state government and its agencies, institutions, boards, and
commissions that are required by law to be deposited into the State Treasury
shall be handled and used in the manner and for the purposes provided for by
this subtitle.

19-40-105. Handling of collections.
All fines, fees, penalties, court costs, taxes, and other collections
that, by the laws of this state, are to be remitted directly to the Treasurer
of State for credit in the State Treasury to an account of a state agency
shall be remitted directly to the state agency to whose account the same is
to be credited. Upon receipt, the state agency shall transmit all collections
to the Treasurer of State, to be credited by him or her to the account of the
state agency depositing them.

19-40-106. Effect on general revenue statutes.
As to the taxes, licenses, fees, and other revenues classified as
general revenues, as set out in this subtitle, it is not the purpose of this
subtitle to levy or change the amount or rate of such taxes, licenses, fees,
473 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and other revenues but to state the purpose for which general revenues are to
be used. This subtitle shall not be construed as amending any of the
provisions of the law with respect to such taxes defined to be general
revenues except for the purpose of defining the purposes for which these
revenues are raised and collected.

19-40-107. Effect on special revenue statutes.
As to the special taxes, licenses, fees, and other revenues classified
as special revenues, as set out in this subtitle, it is not the purpose of
this subtitle to levy or change the amount or rate of such taxes, licenses,
fees, and other revenues, nor to change the purposes for which such special
revenues are to be used as provided for by law. This subtitle shall not be
construed as amending any of the provisions of law with respect to such taxes
defined to be special revenues except for the purpose of defining the
purposes for which these revenues are raised and collected, which also shall
include the services rendered by the constitutional and fiscal agencies in
the manner provided by law.

19-40-108. Classifications of revenue.
All taxes, licenses, fees, permits, assessments, royalties, leases,
rents, fines, interest, penalties, or other governmental income available to
the State of Arkansas, which are required by law to be deposited into the
State Treasury, shall be classified under one (1) or more of the following:
(1) General revenues;
(2) Special revenues;
(3) Trust fund income;
(4) Federal grants, aids, and reimbursements; and
(5) Nonrevenue receipts.

19-40-109. Miscellaneous revenue.
(a) All fines, penalties, interest, or court costs received in
connection with the collection of any revenue shall be classified the same as
the revenue for which the fines, penalties, interest, or court costs are
levied.
(b) Proceeds from rental of any real or personal property owned by the
State of Arkansas shall be classified as special revenues belonging to the
474 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fund or fund account from which the state agency to which the property
belongs receives its support unless otherwise specified by law.
(c) All nonrevenue receipts as defined in § 19-46-201 derived from
proceeds from the sale of property, income received on account of services
being provided by a state agency, or any other miscellaneous earnings of any
state agency shall be credited to the fund or fund account from which the
state agency draws its support unless specified otherwise by law.

19-40-110. Mixed funds.
If, at the close of any fiscal year, a balance remains in any State
Treasury fund, fund account, or account that is subject to transfer at the
close of a fiscal year, and into which both general revenues and either
special revenues, nonrevenue receipts, or federal reimbursements are
deposited and expended, the special revenue portion of the balance shall be
the proportion that the amount of special revenues credited to the fund or
the fund account is to total funds credited to the fund or the fund account
in each fiscal year. The special revenue portion of the balance shall be
carried forward to the next fiscal year and shall be used solely for the
purposes for which it was collected as provided by law.

CHAPTER 41
GENERAL REVENUES

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Enumeration of General Revenues

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Enumeration of General Revenues

19-41-201. General revenues enumerated.
The general revenues of the state, as provided by law, shall consist of
the following, as described by their commonly known titles:
(1) Sales taxes, as enacted by Acts 1941, No. 386, known as the
“Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941”, and all laws supplemental or
amendatory thereto, § 26-52-101 et seq.;
475 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Use taxes as enacted by Acts 1949, No. 487, known as the
“Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949”, Acts 1971, No. 222, and all laws
supplemental or amendatory thereto, § 26-53-101 et seq.;
(3) Corporation franchise taxes, as enacted by Acts 1979, No.
889, known as the “Arkansas Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 26-54-101 et seq.;
(4) Corporation income taxes, as enacted by Acts 1929, No. 118,
known as the “Income Tax Act of 1929”, Acts 1941, No. 129, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 26-51-101 et seq., with the exception of those
additional corporate income taxes set aside as special revenue by § 26-51-
205(c)(2);
(5) Individual income taxes, as enacted by Acts 1929, No. 118,
known as the “Income Tax Act of 1929”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-
51-101 et seq.;
(6) Cigarette taxes and permits and other tobacco products taxes
and permits, as enacted by Acts 1977, No. 546, known as the “Arkansas Tobacco
Products Tax Act of 1977”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-57-201 et
seq.;
(7) Escheat of unclaimed property, as enacted by Acts 1999, No.
850, known as the “Unclaimed Property Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§ 18-28-201 et seq.;
(8) [Repealed.]
(9) Seventy-five percent (75%) of all severance taxes, with the
exception of the taxes paid to sever timber and timber products, the
severance tax collected on natural gas, and those portions of severance taxes
designated as special revenues in § 19-42-201, as enacted by Acts 1947, No.
136, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 26-58-101 — 26-58-103, 26-58-106 —
26-58-111, 26-58-114 — 26-58-116, 26-58-118 — 26-58-120, 26-58-123, and 26-
58-124;
(10) Sand, gravel, oil, coal, and other mineral royalties, as
enacted by Acts 1975, No. 524, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 22-5-801 —
22-5-813;
(11) Oil and gas leases, as enacted by Acts 1975, No. 524, and
all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 22-5-801 — 22-5-813;
(12) Petroleum trade practices civil penalties, as enacted by
Acts 1993, No. 380;
476 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(13) Estate taxes, as enacted by Acts 1941, No. 136, known as
the “Estate Tax Law of Arkansas”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 26-59-
101 — 26-59-107, 26-59-109 — 26-59-114, 26-59-116 — 26-59-119, 26-59-121, and
26-59-122;
(14) Those portions of real estate transfer taxes, as enacted by
Acts 1971, No. 275, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 26-60-101 — 26-60-103
and 26-60-105 — 26-60-112;
(15) State Insurance Department Trust Fund moneys in excess of
an amount equal to one (1) fiscal year budget for the State Insurance
Department, § 23-61-710(c);
(16) Large truck speeding fines, § 27-50-311;
(17) Employment agency licenses, as enacted by Acts 1975, No.
493, known as the “Arkansas Private Employment Agency Act of 1975”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 11-11-201 et seq.;
(18) [Repealed.]
(19) Insurance premium taxes, as enacted by Acts 1959, No. 148,
known as the “Arkansas Insurance Code”, §§ 23-60-101 — 23-60-108, 23-60-110,
23-61-101 — 23-61-112, 23-61-201 — 23-61-206, 23-61-301 — 23-61-307, 23-61-
401, 23-61-402, 23-62-101 — 23-62-108, 23-62-201, 23-62-202, former § 23-62-
203, § 23-62-204, § 23-62-205, § 23-63-101 [repealed], §§ 23-63-102 — 23-63-
104, 23-63-201 — 23-63-216, 23-63-301, 23-63-302, §§ 23-63-401 — 23-63-404
[repealed], §§ 23-63-601 — 23-63-604, §§ 23-63-605 — 23-63-609 [repealed], §§
23-63-610 — 23-63-613, 23-63-701, 23-63-801 — 23-63-833, 23-63-835, 23-63-836
[as added by Acts 1983, No. 522], 23-63-837 [as added by Acts 1983, No. 522],
§ 23-63-838 [repealed], §§ 23-63-901 — 23-63-912, 23-63-1001 — 23-63-1004,
23-64-101 — 23-64-103, 23-64-201 — 23-64-205, § 23-64-206 [repealed], § 23-
64-207, § 23-64-208 [repealed], §§ 23-64-209, 23-64-210, §§ 23-64-211 — 23-
64-213 [repealed], §§ 23-64-214 — 23-64-221, § 23-64-222 [repealed], §§ 23-
64-223 — 23-64-227, 23-65-101 — 23-65-104, 23-65-201 — 23-65-205, 23-65-301 —
23-65-319, 23-66-201 — 23-66-213, § 23-66-214 [repealed], §§ 23-66-301 — 23-
66-306, 23-66-308 — 23-66-311, 23-66-313, 23-66-314, 23-68-101 — 23-68-113,
23-68-115 — 23-68-132, 23-69-101 — 23-69-103, 23-69-105 — 23-69-141, 23-69-
143, 23-69-149 — 23-69-156, 23-70-101 — 23-70-124, 23-71-101 — 23-71-116, 23-
72-101 — 23-72-122, 23-73-101 — 23-73-107, § 23-73-108 [repealed], § 23-73-
109 [repealed], §§ 23-73-110 — 23-73-116, former §§ 23-74-101 — 23-74-105, §§
23-74-106 — 23-74-141 [repealed], §§ 23-75-101 — 23-75-116, § 23-75-117
477 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
[repealed], §§ 23-75-118 — 23-75-120, 23-79-101 — 23-79-106, 23-79-109 — 23-
79-128, 23-79-131 — 23-79-134, 23-79-202 — 23-79-210, 23-81-101 — 23-81-117,
23-81-120 — 23-81-136, 23-81-201 — 23-81-213, 23-82-101 — 23-82-118, 23-84-
101 — 23-84-111, 23-85-101 — 23-85-131, 23-86-101 — 23-86-104, 23-86-106 —
23-86-109, 23-86-112, 23-87-101 — 23-87-119, 23-88-101, 23-89-101, 23-89-102,
26-57-601 — 26-57-605, 26-57-607, 26-57-608, and 26-57-610 and all laws
amendatory thereto, with the exception of those premium taxes set aside for
the various municipal firemen's pension and relief funds, for the various
police officers' pension and relief funds, and for the Workers' Compensation
Commission and, with the exception of those additional premium taxes set
aside for the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund under § 26-57-614, and
insurance premium taxes from domestic insurers not maintaining a home office
in this state as enacted by Acts 1979, No. 908, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 23-60-102, 26-57-601 — 26-57-605, and 26-57-607;
(20) Horse racing taxes and fees, including the portion of all
moneys wagered, as set out in Acts 1957, No. 46, § 23, as amended, §§ 23-110-
406, 23-110-407, § 23-110-408 [repealed], and §§ 23-110-409 and 23-110-410,
the annual license fee, ten percent (10%) of admissions or ten cents (10¢)
per admission, whichever sum is greater, one-third (⅓) of the unredeemed
pari-mutuel tickets, and the license fees of owners, trainers, jockeys, and
jockeys' agents, all as enacted by Acts 1957, No. 46, known as the “Arkansas
Horse Racing Law”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 23-110-101 — 23-110-
104, 23-110-201 — 23-110-205, 23-110-301 — 23-110-307, 23-110-401 — 23-110-
403, § 23-110-404 [repealed], §§ 23-110-405 — 23-110-407, § 23-110-408
[repealed], and §§ 23-110-409 — 23-110-415;
(21) Dog racing taxes and fees, including three percent (3%) of
all moneys wagered up to and including one hundred twenty-five million
dollars ($125,000,000) and seven percent (7%) of all moneys wagered in excess
of one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) per calendar year
at two hundred forty-four (244) days of racing, one-third (⅓) of the odd
cents or breaks, the daily operating license fee and fees paid by each
greyhound owner and trainer, simulcast taxes of two percent (2%) of all
moneys wagered up to and including three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000), three percent (3%) in excess of three hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($350,000) but less than or equal to five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000), and six percent (6%) in excess of five hundred thousand dollars
478 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
($500,000), per racing performance and ten percent (10%) of admissions or ten
cents (10¢) per admission, whichever sum is greater, as enacted by Acts 1957,
No. 191, known as the “Arkansas Greyhound Racing Law”, §§ 23-111-101 — 23-
111-104, 23-111-201 — 23-111-205, 23-111-301 — 23-111-308, 23-111-501, 23-
111-506, § 23-111-507 [repealed], and §§ 23-111-508 — 23-111-514, and all
laws amendatory thereto, and the additional four (4) of six (6) days of
racing authorized in § 23-111-504;
(22) Alcoholic beverages taxes, permits, licenses, and fees,
including the following:
(A) Liquor gallonage taxes and imported wine taxes, as
enacted by Acts 1935, No. 109, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-7-101 —
3-7-110;
(B) Permits and fees for manufacturer and dispensary
privileges, as enacted by Acts 1935, No. 108, known as the “Arkansas
Alcoholic Control Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-1-101 — 3-1-
103, 3-2-101, 3-2-205, 3-3-101 — 3-3-103, 3-3-212, 3-3-401, 3-3-404, 3-3-405,
3-4-101 — 3-4-103, 3-4-201, 3-4-202, 3-4-207 — 3-4-211, 3-4-213, 3-4-214, 3-
4-217, 3-4-219, 3-4-220, 3-4-301 — 3-4-303, 3-4-501, 3-4-503, 3-4-601 — 3-4-
605, 3-8-301, 3-8-303, 3-8-305 — 3-8-310, 3-8-313 — 3-8-317, 3-9-237, and 23-
12-708, but not including fees for grocery store wine permits authorized
under § 3-5-1802;
(C) Nonintoxicating beer and wine taxes, as enacted by
Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-5-201
— 3-5-207, 3-5-209 — 3-5-221, 3-5-223 — 3-5-225, and 3-8-401;
(D) Brandy taxes and fees, as enacted by Acts 1953, No.
163, known as the “Native Brandy Law”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 3-
6-101 et seq.;
(E) The additional taxes on native wine and beer and the
additional permits fees for retail liquor and beer permits and wholesale
liquor and beer permits, as enacted by Acts 1969, No. 271, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 3-7-111 and 3-7-506;
(F) The additional taxes on liquor and native wine, as
enacted by Acts 1949, No. 282, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-3-314
and 3-7-111;
(G) The special alcoholic beverage excise taxes, as
enacted by Acts 1951, No. 252, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-7-201
479 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and 3-7-205;
(H) Wholesale and retail permits and fees for the sale of
liquor and beer, as enacted by Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 3-5-201 — 3-5-207, 3-5-209 — 3-5-221, 3-5-223 — 3-5-
225, and 3-8-401;
(I) Restaurant wine permits, as enacted by Acts 1965, No.
120, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-9-301 — 3-9-303 and 3-9-305 — 3-9-
307;
(J) Permits and taxes on alcoholic beverages sold for on-
premises consumption, as enacted by Acts 1969, No. 132, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 3-9-201 — 3-9-214, 3-9-221 — 3-9-225, and 3-9-232 — 3-
9-237;
(K) Seventy cents (70¢) per gallon of the tax levied upon
native wine, permits and fees, as enacted by §§ 3-5-401 — 3-5-412 [repealed];
and
(L) Wine sales on-premise licenses, §§ 3-9-601 — 3-9-606;
(23) Sale of confiscated alcoholic beverages, as enacted by Acts
1947, No. 423, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-3-301 — 3-3-303, § 3-3-
304 [repealed], § 3-3-308 [repealed], and §§ 3-3-311 — 3-3-314;
(24) Fees collected by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division
for transcripts and fines for violations, as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 790,
and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 3-2-201, 3-2-217, 3-4-213, 3-4-401 — 3-4-
406, 3-4-502, 3-5-305, and 3-5-306;
(25) Any fines, penalties, or court costs received in connection
with the collection of any of the revenues enumerated in this section;
(26) Any other taxes, fees, license fees, and permits required
to be deposited into the State Treasury as provided by law and not otherwise
classified;
(27) Savings and loan associations' application fees, annual
fees, amendment fees, examination fees, broker's license fees, and other
miscellaneous fees, as enacted by Acts 1963, No. 227, §§ 23-37-101 — 23-37-
107, 23-37-201, 23-37-202, 23-37-204, 23-37-206 — 23-37-212, 23-37-214, 23-
37-301 — 23-37-315, 23-37-401, 23-37-403, 23-37-405, 23-37-406, 23-37-501 —
23-37-510, 23-37-512, 23-37-601, and 23-37-701 — 23-37-705;
(28) Credit union charter fees, annual supervision fees, and
examination fees, as enacted by Acts 1971, No. 132, § 23-35-101 et seq.;
480 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(29) Sale of checks, investigation fees, annual license fees,
semiannual reports filing fees, and examination fees, as enacted by Acts
1965, No. 124, known as the “Sale of Checks Act”, § 23-41-101 et seq.
[repealed];
(30) Securities division fees, including loan broker's licenses,
mortgage loan company licenses, broker-dealer licenses, agent licenses,
investment advisor licenses, agent examination fees, broker-dealer
examination fees, statement filing fees, quarterly reports, and proof of
exemption filing fees, all as enacted by Acts 1959, No. 254, known as the
“Arkansas Securities Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 23-42-101 —
23-42-110, 23-42-201 — 23-42-212, 23-42-301 — 23-42-308, 23-42-401 — 23-42-
405, and 23-42-501 — 23-42-507;
(31) Professional fundraiser and solicitor fees, as enacted by
§§ 4-28-401 — 4-28-416;
(32) Unclaimed security deposits, as enacted by Acts 1969, No.
296, as amended by Acts 1975, No. 1007, §§ 27-19-306, 27-19-408, 27-19-501,
27-19-503, 27-19-603, 27-19-609, 27-19-610, 27-19-612, 27-19-619 — 27-19-621,
and 27-19-706 — 27-19-708;
(33) Vending devices sales taxes, as enacted in § 26-57-1001 et
seq. and that portion of vending device decal fees and penalties provided in
the Vending Devices Decal Act of 1997, § 26-57-1201 et seq.;
(34) Anonymous campaign contributions of fifty dollars ($50.00)
or more, as enacted by Acts 1975, No. 788, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§§ 7-6-201 — 7-6-210, 7-6-211 [repealed], 7-6-212 [repealed], 7-6-213, and 7-
6-214;
(35) Telephonic sellers registration fees, § 4-99-104;
(36) [Repealed.]
(37) Arkansas Department of Transportation miscellaneous fees,
permits, penalties, and fines, as enacted by Acts 1955, No. 397, known as the
“Arkansas Motor Carrier Act, 1955”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 23-13-
201 et seq.;
(38) Radiation protection civil penalties, as enacted by Acts
1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 20-21-401 et
seq.;
(39) That portion of the reinstatement fees under § 5-65-
119(a)(2)(C), and that portion of the reinstatement fees under §§ 5-65-304(d)
481 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and 5-65-310(f);
(40) Short-term rental of tangible personal property tax, § 26-
63-301;
(41) Excess campaign contributions, as enacted by § 7-6-203;
(42) Retail pet store registration fees, as enacted by § 4-97-
104;
(43) Rental vehicle tax, § 26-63-302;
(44) Residential moving tax, § 26-63-303;
(45) Arkansas Quarry Operation, Reclamation, and Safe Closure
Act fees, fines, and bond forfeiture amounts, § 15-57-401 et seq.;
(46) [Repealed.]
(47) [Repealed.]
(48) Arkansas Feed Law of 1997 penalties, § 2-37-113;
(49) Election, voter registration law, and State Board of
Election Commissioners fines, § 7-4-118 [repealed];
(50) Remaining funds on dissolution of ballot question
committees or legislative question committees, § 7-9-404;
(51) Uniform Athlete Agents Act registration and renewal fees, §
17-16-109;
(52) Until July 1, 2011, moneys in excess of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in the State Securities Department Fund from collections of
securities agents initial or renewal registration filing fees and securities
registration statement filing fees, § 23-42-211(a)(4);
(53) Human cloning fines, § 20-16-1002;
(54) The first three dollars ($3.00) of each unregistered
vehicle temporary preprinted paper buyer's tag fee, § 27-14-1705;
(55) Electronic games of skill privilege fees and all permit or
license fees, penalties, and fines received by the Arkansas Racing
Commission, § 23-113-604;
(56) Prohibited employment of relatives civil penalties, § 25-
16-1001 et seq.;
(57) The first six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($675,000) of the five percent (5%) of the severance tax collected on natural
gas at the rates enacted by § 26-58-111(5);
(58) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of all taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs on taxes levied on the gross receipts or gross
482 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
proceeds derived from the sale of food and food ingredients, § 26-52-
317(c)(1)(A);
(59) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the tax,
interest, penalties, and costs received on excise taxes levied on the gross
receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of natural gas and
electricity to a manufacturer for use directly in the actual manufacturing
process, § 26-52-319(a)(1)(A);
(60) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the taxes,
interest, penalties, and costs received on taxes levied on the privilege of
storing, using, distributing, or using food and food ingredients, § 26-53-
145(c)(1)(A);
(61) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the tax,
interest, penalties, and costs received on excise taxes levied on the sales
price of natural gas and electricity purchased by a manufacturer for use
directly in the actual manufacturing process, § 26-53-148(a)(1)(A);
(62) Seventy-six and six-tenths percent (76.6%) of the excise
taxes levied on all dyed distillate special fuel sold, used, or utilized in
the state, § 26-56-224(c)(1);
(63) That portion of Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005,
Pub. L. No. 109-59, § 4301 et seq. — fines and penalties, § 23-13-605;
(64) Charitable bingo and raffle license fees and excise taxes
levied as enacted by §§ 23-114-302, 23-114-307, and 23-114-601;
(65) Additional tax on cigarettes and tobacco products other
than cigarettes, as enacted by Acts 2009, No. 180, and all laws amendatory
thereto, § 26-57-801 et seq.;
(66) Partial-birth abortion civil fines and penalties, as
enacted by Acts 2009, No. 196, and all laws amendatory thereto, the Partial-
Birth Abortion Ban Act, § 20-16-1201 et seq.;
(67) International student exchange visitor placement
organization registration fees, as enacted by Acts 2009, No. 966, and all
laws amendatory thereto, the International Student Exchange Visitor Placement
Organization Registration Act, § 6-18-1701 et seq.;
(68) [Repealed.]
(69) Certification of tobacco product manufacturers civil
penalties, § 26-57-1303(a)(11)(B);
(70) Sale, distribution, and stamping of tobacco products civil
483 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
penalties, § 26-57-1306(f)(1);
(71) Permit fees or taxes, label fees, penalties, fines,
proceeds of all forfeitures, special inspection fees and costs as enacted by
Acts 2013, No. 483, and all laws amendatory thereto, the Direct Shipment of
Vinous Liquor Act, § 3-5-1701 et seq.;
(72) The first four and one-half (4½) mills on gas assessments
levied each fiscal year until July 1, 2023, under § 15-71-107(b)(2)(A)(i);
(73) Fines received by the State Board of Election
Commissioners, § 7-4-120(h)(4); and
(74) Paid fantasy sports games tax, § 23-116-104.

CHAPTER 42
SPECIAL REVENUES

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Enumeration of Special Revenues

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Enumeration of Special Revenues

19-42-201. Special revenues enumerated.
The special revenues of the state, its agencies, departments,
institutions, commissions, and boards, as provided by law and as required by
law to be deposited into the State Treasury, shall consist of the following,
as described by their commonly known titles:
(1) The remainder of motor vehicle operator and chauffeur
licenses and penalties, as confirmed and enacted by § 12-8-301 et seq., known
as the “Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Leasing
Act”, which are not required for debt service requirements that are
authorized to be deposited into the State Treasury under §§ 12-8-307 — 12-8-
310;
(2) Motor vehicle registration and license fees, as enacted by
Acts 1929, No. 65, §§ 26-55-101, 27-14-305, 27-14-601, § 27-15-1501
[repealed], §§ 27-64-104, 27-65-101, 27-65-107, 27-65-110, 27-65-112, 27-65-
131 — 27-65-133, 27-67-101, 27-67-102, 27-67-201, 27-67-206 — 27-67-208, 27-
484 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
67-211, 27-67-214, and 27-67-218, and all laws amendatory thereto, Acts 1965,
No. 87, § 27-15-4001, Acts 1959, No. 122, § 27-15-2101 [repealed], Acts 1959,
No. 189, § 27-15-2003 [repealed], and Acts 1969, No. 36, §§ 27-15-401 — 27-
15-406 [repealed];
(3) Distillate special motor fuels taxes and liquefied gas
special motor fuels taxes and license and permit fees, as enacted by § 26-56-
101 et seq., known as the “Special Motor Fuels Tax Law”, and all laws
amendatory thereto, including the:
(A) Eight and one-half cent (8.5¢) tax on distillate
special motor fuels levied by § 26-56-201(a)(1)(A)(i) and the one cent (1¢)
tax on distillate special motor fuels levied by § 26-56-201(a)(1)(A)(ii);
(B) Seven and one-half cent (7.5¢) tax on liquefied gas
special motor fuels levied by § 26-56-301(a);
(C) Additional one cent (1¢) tax on distillate special
motor fuels levied by § 26-56-201(a)(2);
(D) Additional four cent (4¢) tax on liquefied gas special
motor fuels and the additional two cent (2¢) tax on distillate special motor
fuels levied by § 26-56-502(a);
(E) Additional four cent (4¢) tax on distillate special
motor fuels levied by § 26-56-201(d)(1);
(F) Additional five cent (5¢) tax on liquefied gas special
motor fuels and the additional two cent (2¢) tax on distillate special motor
fuels levied by § 26-55-1201(a) and § 26-56-601; and
(G) Additional liquefied gas special motor fuels user
permit fees levied in § 26-55-1002;
(4) Gasoline taxes, as enacted by the Motor Fuel Tax Law, § 26-
55-201 et seq., including the:
(A) Eight and one-half cent (8.5¢) tax on motor fuels
levied by § 26-55-205(a);
(B) Additional one cent (1¢) tax on motor fuels levied by
§ 26-55-205(b);
(C) Additional four cent (4¢) tax on motor fuels levied by
§ 26-55-1002(a);
(D) Additional five cent (5¢) tax on motor fuels levied by
§ 26-55-1201(a) and § 26-56-601; and
(E) Additional total of three cents (3¢) tax on motor
485 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fuels levied by § 26-55-1006;
(5) Fireworks licenses, as enacted by Acts 1961, No. 224, and
all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-22-701 — 20-22-715;
(6) Timberlands taxes, as enacted by Acts 1969, No. 354, known
as the “Forest Fire Protection Tax Act of 1969”, and all laws amendatory
thereto, § 26-61-101 et seq., state forests and nurseries management income
not deposited into the State Forestry Trust Fund, §§ 15-31-115 and 19-26-221;
law enforcement fine collections, §§ 15-31-113 and 15-31-114; and timber
management plan fees, § 15-31-111;
(7) Motor vehicle in-transit fees, as enacted by Acts 1935, No.
183, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 27-14-1801 — 27-14-1808;
(8) Motor vehicle drive-out licenses, as enacted by Acts 1955,
No. 111, §§ 27-14-2101 — 27-14-2105;
(9) Motor vehicle certificates of title and duplicates, noting
liens, transfer of registration and duplicate or substitute registration
certificates and license plates, § 27-14-602, in excess of and after the
amounts required to pay the principal and interest on loans and bonds have
been made under the 1995 New Revenue Division Building Act, Acts 1995, No.
725;
(10) Overweight and special permits for vehicles and overlength
crane permits, as enacted by Acts 1955, No. 98, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 27-35-201 — 27-35-203, 27-35-206 — 27-35-208, and 27-35-210; and,
overwidth or overlength mobile home permits, as enacted by Acts 1971, No.
264, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 27-35-211 and § 27-35-301 et seq.;
(11) Motor vehicle title registration fees and the noting of
liens fees, as enacted by Acts 1949, No. 142, known as the “Uniform Motor
Vehicle Administration, Certificate of Title, and Antitheft Act”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 27-14-101 et seq., § 27-14-201 et seq. [repealed],
§§ 27-14-301 — 27-14-304, 27-14-306 — 27-14-308, 27-14-310, 27-14-312, 27-14-
313, § 27-14-401 et seq., §§ 27-14-602, 27-14-604, 27-14-606, 27-14-701, 27-
14-703, 27-14-705, 27-14-707, 27-14-708, 27-14-710 — 27-14-716, 27-14-718 —
27-14-722, 27-14-801 — 27-14-804, 27-14-901 — 27-14-904, § 27-14-905
[repealed], §§ 27-14-906 — 27-14-913, § 27-14-1701 et seq., § 27-14-2001 et
seq., § 27-14-2203 [repealed], §§ 27-14-2204, 27-14-2205, 27-14-2207, 27-14-
2210, and 27-14-2211, which are in excess of the amount required by Acts 1961
(1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, known as the “Arkansas Revenue Department Building
486 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Act”, to be cash funds pledged for the principal and interest payments of the
Arkansas Revenue Department Building Commission revenue bonds;
(12) Soybean assessments, as enacted by Acts 1971, No. 259, §§
2-20-401, 2-20-403, 2-20-404, and 2-20-406 — 2-20-409;
(13) Paying patients' fees, excluding those received from
Medicare or Medicaid and the Social Security Administration, or from other
sources which cause a decrease in the monthly vendor payment, for services
provided by the appropriate Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health
Services of the Department of Human Services and Division of Developmental
Disabilities Services divisions and programs of the Department of Human
Services;
(14) Fees received by the Arkansas Crime Information Center for
driver's records and other informational services, as enacted by Acts 1971,
No. 286, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 12-12-201 — 12-12-203, 12-12-
206, 12-12-207, 12-12-209, and 12-12-211 — 12-12-213;
(15) Dog racing taxes derived from all revenues from the pari-
mutuel tax of fifteen (15) additional days of dog races authorized by §§ 23-
111-502 — 23-111-505, and all laws amendatory thereto;
(16) Dog racing taxes derived from two-thirds (⅔) of the net
proceeds of three (3) additional days of dog races at each meet, as
authorized by § 23-111-503(a)(2), and all laws amendatory thereto;
(17) Aviation sales and use taxes, as enacted by Acts 1967, No.
449, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 27-115-110;
(18) Revenue received from saw timber and timber products
severance taxes and twenty-five percent (25%) of all other severance taxes,
with the exception of the severance tax collected on natural gas, as enacted
by Acts 1947, No. 136, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 26-58-101 — 26-58-
103, 26-58-106 — 26-58-111, 26-58-114 — 26-58-116, 26-58-118 — 26-58-120, 26-
58-123, and 26-58-124;
(19) Motor fuel tax forms, including books and decals, as
enacted by Acts 1967, No. 376, § 26-55-713;
(20) Motor boat registration fees, as enacted by Acts 1959, No.
453, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 27-101-101 — 27-101-109, § 27-101-
201 et seq., §§ 27-101-301 — 27-101-306, and 27-101-308 — 27-101-312;
(21) Three percent (3%) municipal taxes, which are further
identified as the three percent (3%) collection cost of the one percent (1%)
487 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
gross receipts tax levied by a city having a population of not more than
thirty thousand (30,000) persons that has been designated as a model city, as
authorized by Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 26-75-501 — 26-75-507;
(22) Drivers' search fees, as enacted by Acts 1977, No. 465, and
all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 27-50-901 — 27-50-903, and 27-50-905 — 27-50-
909, § 27-50-910 [repealed], § 27-50-911, Acts 1989, No. 241, § 27-23-
118(b)(2) and § 27-23-118(c)(2);
(23) [Repealed.]
(24) Private career education school licenses and fees, as
enacted by Acts 1989, No. 906, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 6-51-601 —
6-51-617;
(25) Elevator safety board fees, as enacted by Acts 1963, No.
189, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-24-101 — 20-24-117, and 20-24-
119;
(26) Net proceeds derived from the sale of pine grown on state
highway rights-of-way or other highway-related areas, as enacted by Acts
1983, No. 696, § 22-5-101;
(27) Those insurance premium taxes set aside for firemen's and
police officers' pension and relief and related purposes, §§ 24-11-301 and
24-11-809, with the exception of those premium taxes set aside for transfer
to the State Police Retirement Fund under § 24-6-209(b);
(28) Bank department charter fees, assessments, and examination
fees, as enacted by Acts 1913, No. 113, and all laws amendatory thereto, §
16-110-406, § 23-30-101 [repealed], §§ 23-31-201 — 23-31-205 [repealed], §§
23-31-212 — 23-31-215 [repealed], § 23-32-102 [repealed], former §§ 23-32-201
— 23-32-204, former § 23-32-208, former § 23-32-210, § 23-32-216 [repealed],
§ 23-32-222 [repealed], § 23-32-224 [repealed], § 23-32-225 [repealed], § 23-
32-227 [repealed], § 23-32-228 [repealed], § 23-32-701 [repealed], §§ 23-32-
703 — 23-32-705 [repealed], § 23-32-710 [repealed], § 23-32-713 [repealed], §
23-32-716 [repealed], § 23-32-803 [repealed], § 23-32-905 [repealed], § 23-
32-1001 [repealed], § 23-32-1002 [repealed], § 23-32-1006 [repealed], § 23-
32-1008 [repealed], §§ 23-32-1101 — 23-32-1103 [repealed], § 23-32-1106
[repealed], §§ 23-32-1108 — 23-32-1111 [repealed], §§ 23-33-101 — 23-33-103
[repealed], § 23-33-105 [repealed], § 23-33-106 [repealed], §§ 23-33-201 —
23-33-207 [repealed], § 23-33-212 [repealed], § 23-33-213 [repealed], §§ 23-
488 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
33-301 — 23-33-308 [repealed], § 23-33-310 [repealed], § 23-34-101
[repealed], § 23-34-103 [repealed], § 23-34-105 [repealed], § 23-34-106
[repealed], § 23-34-108 [repealed], § 23-34-110 [repealed], and § 23-34-111
[repealed];
(29) Industrial loan institutions assessments and examination
fees, as enacted by Acts 1941, No. 111, §§ 23-36-101 — 23-36-117;
(30) Various asset forfeiture proceeds, § 5-64-505(f)(5)(B), §
5-64-505(h)(1)(A), and § 5-64-505(i);
(31) Fees recovered from ex-offenders on probation, parole, or
post-release supervision from a facility of the Division of Community
Correction, as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 70, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§ 16-93-104;
(32) Liquefied petroleum gas board filing fees, inspection fees,
registration fees, permits, and certificates of competency, as enacted by
Acts 1965, No. 31, known as the “Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board Act”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, §§ 15-75-101 — 15-75-108, 15-75-110, 15-75-201 — 15-
75-204, § 15-75-205 [repealed], §§ 15-75-206 — 15-75-209, 15-75-301 — 15-75-
321, and 15-75-401 — 15-75-405;
(33) Brand registration, sales of state brand books, and fees
for transfer of brand titles, as enacted by Acts 1959, No. 179, § 2-34-201, §
2-34-202 [repealed], § 2-34-203, § 2-34-204 [repealed], §§ 2-34-205 — 2-34-
212;
(34) Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission fees and revenues
as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 867, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-33-
113, consisting of:
(A) Income from the livestock spraying program, as enacted
by Acts 1969, No. 360, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-33-207 [repealed]
and § 2-33-208 [repealed];
(B) Poultry and egg grading fees as enacted by Acts 1969,
No. 220, known as the “Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969”, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 20-58-201 et seq.;
(C) Acts 1965, No. 49, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§
2-33-301 — 2-33-305, and 2-33-307;
(D) Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1216, and all
laws amendatory thereto, §§ 2-33-306 and 2-33-307;
(E) Carcass data information and feeder pig and feeder
489 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
calf grading fees, as enacted by Acts 1973, No. 454, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 2-33-201 — 2-33-206 [repealed];
(F) Livestock and poultry diagnostic service fees, § 2-33-
111;
(G) State, county, and district paid admission surcharges,
§ 2-33-115(a)(3) [repealed];
(H) Small animal testing fees, as enacted by Acts 1981,
No. 770, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-33-112 [repealed];
(I) Commercial bait and ornamental fish fees collected
under the Commercial Bait and Ornamental Fish Act, § 2-5-201 et seq.; and
(J) Catfish processor civil penalties collected under the
Arkansas Catfish Processor Fair Practices Act of 1987, § 2-6-101 et seq.;
(35) Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board assessments, §
2-20-507;
(36) Boiler inspection fees, certificates of competency,
permits, examination fees, and licenses, as enacted by Acts 1961, No. 494,
and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-23-101 — 20-23-105, § 20-23-201
[repealed], §§ 20-23-202, 20-23-203, 20-23-301 — 20-23-313, and 20-23-401 —
20-23-405;
(37) Motor vehicle registration reinstatement fees, § 27-22-
103(b)(4)(B), and motor vehicle insurance reporting penalties, § 27-22-107;
(38) Special motor-driven cycle and bicycle operators' licenses
and certificates, as enacted by §§ 27-20-101 — 27-20-116;
(39) Polygraph examiner's examination and license fees, as
enacted by Acts 1967, No. 413, known as the “Polygraph Examiners Licensing
Act”, §§ 17-39-101 — 17-39-107, § 17-39-108 [repealed], §§ 17-39-109, and 17-
39-201 — 17-39-214;
(40) Private investigator's application fees, agency fees, and
license fees and security guard fines and fees, as enacted by Acts 1977, No.
429, known as the “Private Security Agency, Private Investigator, and School
Security Licensing and Credentialing Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§§ 17-40-101 — 17-40-104, 17-40-204, 17-40-207 — 17-40-209, 17-40-301, 17-40-
302, 17-40-306 — 17-40-317, 17-40-329 — 17-40-332, 17-40-337, 17-40-339, 17-
40-340, 17-40-342 — 17-40-344, and 17-40-349 — 17-40-355;
(41) Cosmetology board examination, registration, license,
duplicate license, reinstatements, reciprocity, renewal and delinquent
490 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
licenses and fees, as enacted by Acts 1955, No. 358, known as the
“Cosmetology Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 17-26-101 — 17-26-105,
17-26-201, § 17-26-202 [repealed], § 17-26-203 [repealed], §§ 17-26-204 — 17-
26-210, § 17-26-301 [repealed], §§ 17-26-302 — 17-26-304, § 17-26-305
[repealed], § 17-26-306, § 17-26-307, § 17-26-308 [repealed], §§ 17-26-309 —
17-26-312, § 17-26-313 [repealed], §§ 17-26-314 — 17-26-319, § 17-26-320
[repealed], §§ 17-26-321, and 17-26-401 — 17-26-415, § 17-26-416 [repealed],
and §§ 17-26-417 and 17-26-418;
(42) That portion not declared to be “pledged revenues” for debt
service on any certificates of indebtedness issued under Acts 1983, No. 458,
§§ 22-3-1201 — 22-3-1214, § 22-3-1215 [repealed], and §§ 22-3-1216 — 22-3-
1219, and that portion not declared cash funds paid to the Arkansas
Development Finance Authority for deposit into the Correction Facilities
Privatization Account of the Correction Facilities Construction Fund, § 22-3-
1210(c)(1)(A), of the Division of Correction's income from its farm
operations, including sale of farm products and livestock, rental of farm
properties, and payments from agencies of the state or federal government in
connection with the farm operations, as enacted by Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.),
No. 50, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 12-27-101 — 12-27-105, 12-27-107
— 12-27-109, 12-27-112, 12-27-113, 12-27-115, 12-27-118, 12-27-120, 12-28-
102, 12-29-101, former 12-29-102, 12-29-103, 12-29-104, 12-29-107, 12-29-112,
12-29-401, 12-30-301, 12-30-306, 12-30-401, 12-30-403, 12-30-405 — 12-30-407,
§ 12-30-408 [repealed], §§ 16-93-101, 16-93-102, former § 16-93-201, §§ 16-
93-202 — 16-93-204, 16-93-601, 16-93-610, 16-93-701, 16-93-705, and 25-8-106;
(43) That portion not declared to be “pledged revenues” for debt
service on any certificates of indebtedness issued under Acts 1983, No. 458,
§§ 22-3-1201 — 22-3-1214, § 22-3-1215 [repealed], §§ 22-3-1216 — 22-3-1219,
of the Division of Correction's sales, or dispositions of articles and
products manufactured or produced by prison labor, as enacted by Acts 1967,
No. 473, known as the “Prison-Made Goods Act of 1967”, § 12-30-201 et seq.;
(44) [Repealed.]
(45) Interest on investments held in the University of Arkansas
Endowment Fund, as enacted by Acts 1945, No. 249, and all laws amendatory
thereto;
(46) Pest control service work examination fees, operators'
licenses, and agents' and solicitors' registration fees, as enacted by Acts
491 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
1975, No. 488, known as the “Arkansas Pest Control Law”, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 17-37-101 — 17-37-105, § 17-37-106 [repealed], §§ 17-
37-107, 17-37-201, and 17-37-203 — 17-37-221;
(47) Liming material registration fees and inspection fees, as
enacted by Acts 1969, No. 353, known as the “Arkansas Agricultural Liming
Materials Act”, §§ 2-19-301 — 2-19-308;
(48) Fertilizer registration fees for manufacturers, jobbers,
and manipulators of commercial fertilizers and fertilizer inspection fees, as
enacted by Acts 1951, No. 106, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 2-19-201 —
2-19-210;
(49) Nursery dealers, agents, and salesperson’s license fees, as
enacted by Acts 1919, No. 683, known as the “Arkansas Nursery Fraud Act of
1919”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 2-21-101 et seq.;
(50) Arkansas Feed Law of 1997 inspection fees, and registration
and license fees, § 2-37-101 et seq.;
(51) Pesticide registration fees, as enacted by Acts 1975, No.
410, known as the “Arkansas Pesticide Control Act”, and all laws amendatory
thereto, § 2-16-401 et seq.;
(52) Pesticide commercial, noncommercial, private and pilot
applicators' license fees, pesticide dealers' license fees, and inspection
and permit fees, as enacted by Acts 1975, No. 389, known as the “Arkansas
Pesticide Use and Application Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 20-20-
201 et seq.;
(53) Fees for seed inspection and certificate of inspection
tags, as enacted by Acts 1931, No. 73, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 2-
16-206 and 2-18-101 — 2-18-108;
(54) Agricultural products inspection fees and inspectors'
licenses, as enacted by Acts 1925, No. 218, known as the “Agricultural
Products Grading Act of 1925”, § 2-20-101 et seq.;
(55) Inspection, treatment, and certification fees for insect
pests and diseases, plants, planting seeds, noxious weeds, or other
substance, as enacted by Acts 1917, No. 414, known as the “Arkansas Plant Act
of 1917”, § 2-16-201 et seq., and Acts 1921, No. 519, known as the “Arkansas
Emergency Plant Act of 1921”, § 2-16-301 et seq.;
(56) Annual license fees, application investigation fees, and
fines from precious stones and precious metals buyers, as enacted by Acts
492 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
1981, No. 87, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 17-23-101 — 17-23-104, 17-
23-201 — 17-23-207, and § 17-23-208 [repealed];
(57) [Repealed.]
(58) Individual sewage disposal systems fees, as enacted by Acts
1977, No. 402, known as the “Arkansas Sewage Disposal Systems Act”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 14-236-101 et seq.;
(59) Hazardous waste transporter, generator, and management
facility fees, as enacted by Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5 [superseded],
and all laws amendatory thereto, and § 8-7-226;
(60) Nuclear planning and response fees collected from each
utility in the state which operates one (1) or more nuclear generating
facilities, as enacted by Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 20-21-401 — 20-21-405;
(61) Brine taxes imposed upon all brine produced in the state
for the purpose of bromine extraction, as enacted by Acts 1979, No. 759, and
all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-58-301;
(62) Oil and Gas Commission fees, including oil assessments, gas
assessments in excess of four and one-half (4½) mills each fiscal year until
July 1, 2023, under § 15-71-107(b)(2)(A)(i), drilling permits, permits for
plugging wells, and permits for each salt water well, all as enacted by Acts
1939, No. 105, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 15-71-101 — 15-71-112, 15-
72-101 — 15-72-110, 15-72-205, 15-72-212, 15-72-216, 15-72-301 — 15-72-324,
and 15-72-401 — 15-72-407, and the portion of taxes levied on salt water used
in bromine production, as enacted by Acts 1947, No. 136, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 26-58-111(9);
(63) Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission licenses, fees,
tags, permits, and fines, all as authorized by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 35, annual resident hunting and fishing licenses, §§ 15-42-104 and
15-42-110; all interest earned on Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission
funds, § 15-41-110; all fees, compensation, or royalties for mineral leases
or permits for lands held in the name of the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission, § 22-5-809(c)(4); all assessed fines as set out in § 15-41-209;
and forty-five percent (45%) of the additional one-eighth of one percent (⅛
of 1%) sales and use tax authorized by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75;
(64) Plumbers' licenses, examination fees, permits, and
registration fees, as enacted by Acts 1951, No. 200, and all laws amendatory
493 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
thereto, §§ 17-38-101 — 17-38-103, 17-38-201 — 17-38-205, and 17-38-301 — 17-
38-310;
(65) Fees for medical identification tags and bracelets, as
enacted by Acts 1965, No. 433, § 20-7-119;
(66) [Repealed.]
(67) Seventy-five percent (75%) of child passenger protection
act fines, as enacted by Acts 1983, No. 749, known as the “Child Passenger
Protection Act”, § 27-34-101 et seq.;
(68) Dairy products licenses, permits, and fees, as enacted by
Acts 1941, No. 114, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-59-201 — 20-59-
247;
(69) Department of Health vital statistics fees and other
specified fees, as set out in § 20-7-123;
(70) Arkansas Public Service Commission annual assessment fees,
as enacted by Acts 1945, No. 40, §§ 23-2-101, 23-2-103 — 23-2-105, 23-2-108,
23-2-109, 23-2-403, 23-2-406, 23-2-407, 23-2-409, 23-2-413, 23-2-418, 23-3-
109, and 23-3-110, and Acts 1935, No. 324, §§ 14-200-101, 14-200-103 — 14-
200-108, 14-200-111, 23-1-101 — 23-1-112, 23-2-301, 23-2-303 — 23-2-308, 23-
2-310, 23-2-312, 23-2-314 — 23-2-316, § 23-2-402, § 23-2-404 [repealed], §§
23-2-405, 23-2-408, 23-2-410 — 23-2-412, 23-2-414 — 23-2-421, 23-2-426, 23-2-
428, 23-2-429, 23-3-101 — 23-3-107, 23-3-112 — 23-3-115, 23-3-118, 23-3-119,
23-3-201 — 23-3-206, 23-4-102, 23-4-103, 23-4-105 — 23-4-109, 23-4-205, 23-4-
402 — 23-4-405, 23-4-407 — 23-4-418, 23-4-620 — 23-4-634, and 23-18-101, and
all laws amendatory thereto;
(71) Arkansas Public Service Commission miscellaneous fees, as
enacted by Acts 1935, No. 324, §§ 14-200-101, 14-200-103 — 14-200-108, 14-
200-111, 23-1-101 — 23-1-112, 23-2-301, 23-2-303 — 23-2-308, 23-2-310, 23-2-
312, 23-2-314 — 23-2-316, 23-2-402, § 23-2-404 [repealed], §§ 23-2-405, 23-2-
408, 23-2-410 — 23-2-412, 23-2-414 — 23-2-421, 23-2-426, 23-2-428, 23-2-429,
23-3-101 — 23-3-107, 23-3-112 — 23-3-115, 23-3-118, 23-3-119, 23-3-201 — 23-
3-206, 23-4-102, 23-4-103, 23-4-105 — 23-4-109, 23-4-205, 23-4-402 — 23-4-
405, 23-4-407 — 23-4-418, 23-4-620 — 23-4-634, and 23-18-101, and Acts 1949,
No. 262, §§ 23-3-109 and 23-16-101 — 23-16-106, and all laws amendatory
thereto;
(72) Board of Electrical Examiners of the State of Arkansas
examination, license, and penalty fees, as enacted by Acts 1979, No. 870, §
494 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
17-28-101 et seq., § 17-28-201 et seq., and § 17-28-301 et seq., and Acts
1981, No. 132, and all laws amendatory thereto;
(73) Milk inspection fees, as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 587, and
all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 20-59-401 — 20-59-406 and § 20-59-407
[repealed];
(74) Proceeds from sales of tax-forfeited lands, as enacted by
Acts 1929, No. 129, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-37-210;
(75) Redemption of tax-forfeited lands and quitclaim deed fees,
as enacted by Acts 1891, No. 151, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 26-37-
310 et seq.;
(76) The following fees:
(A) Commissioner of State Lands fees, including patent
fees, as enacted by Acts 1883, No. 117, § 21-6-203;
(B) Deed fees, as enacted by Acts 1931, No. 245, § 22-5-
408;
(C) Donation deed fees, as enacted by Acts 1883, No. 117,
§ 21-6-203;
(D) Field notes and plats fees, as enacted by Acts 1881,
No. 12, §§ 22-5-701 and 22-5-702;
(E) Certificate of donation to forfeited land fees, as
enacted by Acts 1883, No. 117, § 21-6-203; and
(F) Those fees as specified in Acts 1983, No. 886, § 21-6-
203;
(77) Proceeds from sales of islands, as enacted by Acts 1971,
No. 148, §§ 22-6-201 and 22-6-203;
(78) Insurance filing fees, renewal fees, amendment fees,
reinstatement fees, agents' licenses, brokers' licenses, solicitors'
licenses, examination fees, adjusters' licenses, copies of documents and
certificates of the Insurance Commissioner, all as enacted by Acts 1959, No.
148, known as the “Arkansas Insurance Code”, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§§ 23-60-101 — 23-60-108, 23-60-110, 23-61-101 — 23-61-112, 23-61-201 — 23-
61-206, 23-61-301 — 23-61-307, 23-61-401, 23-61-402, 23-62-101 — 23-62-108,
23-62-201, 23-62-202, former § 23-62-203, § 23-62-204, § 23-62-205, § 23-63-
101 [repealed], §§ 23-63-102 — 23-63-104, 23-63-201 — 23-63-216, 23-63-301,
23-63-302, §§ 23-63-401 — 23-63-404 [repealed], §§ 23-63-601 — 23-63-604, §§
23-63-605 — 23-63-609 [repealed], §§ 23-63-610 — 23-63-613, 23-63-701, 23-63-
495 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
801 — 23-63-833, 23-63-835, 23-63-836 [as added by Acts 1983, No. 522], 23-
63-837 [as added by Acts 1983, No. 522], § 23-63-838 [repealed], §§ 23-63-901
— 23-63-912, 23-63-1001 — 23-63-1004, 23-64-101 — 23-64-103, 23-64-201 — 23-
64-205, § 23-64-206 [repealed], § 23-64-207, § 23-64-208 [repealed], § 23-64-
209, § 23-64-210, §§ 23-64-211 — 23-64-213 [repealed], §§ 23-64-214 — 23-64-
221, § 23-64-222 [repealed], §§ 23-64-223 — 23-64-227, 23-65-101 — 23-65-104,
23-65-201 — 23-65-205, 23-65-301 — 23-65-319, 23-66-201 — 23-66-213, § 23-66-
214 [repealed], §§ 23-66-301 — 23-66-306, 23-66-308 — 23-66-311, 23-66-313,
23-66-314, 23-68-101 — 23-68-113, 23-68-115 — 23-68-132, 23-69-101 — 23-69-
103, 23-69-105 — 23-69-141, 23-69-143, 23-69-149 — 23-69-156, 23-70-101 — 23-
70-124, 23-71-101 — 23-71-116, 23-72-101 — 23-72-122, 23-73-101 — 23-73-107,
§ 23-73-108 [repealed], § 23-73-109 [repealed], §§ 23-73-110 — 23-73-116,
former §§ 23-74-101 — 23-74-105, §§ 23-74-106 — 23-74-141 [repealed], §§ 23-
75-101 — 23-75-116, § 23-75-117 [repealed], §§ 23-75-118 — 23-75-120, 23-79-
101 — 23-79-106, 23-79-109 — 23-79-128, 23-79-131 — 23-79-134, 23-79-202 —
23-79-210, 23-81-101 — 23-81-117, 23-81-120 — 23-81-136, 23-81-201 — 23-81-
213, 23-82-101 — 23-82-118, 23-84-101 — 23-84-111, 23-85-101 — 23-85-131, 23-
86-101 — 23-86-104, 23-86-106 — 23-86-109, 23-86-112, 23-87-101 — 23-87-119,
23-88-101, 23-89-101, 23-89-102, 26-57-601 — 26-57-605, 26-57-607, 26-57-608,
and 26-57-610;
(79) Trademark and service-mark registration and assignment
fees, as enacted by Acts 1967, No. 81, §§ 4-71-101 — 4-71-114 [repealed];
(80) Milk laboratory antibiotic drug testing program fees and
fines, § 20-59-701 et seq.;
(81) Commercial vehicle temporary registration tag fees, as
enacted by Acts 1975, (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1179, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 27-14-1306;
(82) Incorporation fees of railroads, street interurban, or
other transportation companies, express companies, sleeping car companies,
and private car companies, as enacted by Acts 1911, No. 87, § 23-11-102;
(83) Filing and recording fees for a charter of educational
institutions and for filing and recording a certificate for a change of name
or provisions of a charter, as enacted by Acts 1911, No. 375, §§ 6-2-101 — 6-
2-105, § 6-2-106 [repealed], §§ 6-2-107 — 6-2-109, 6-2-111, and 6-2-112;
(84) Fees for filing articles of incorporation and issuing a
certificate of incorporation of nonprofit corporations, filing an application
496 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in
this state and issuing a certificate of authority, and for other
administrative functions, as enacted by Acts 1963, No. 176, known as the
“Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act”, §§ 4-28-201 — 4-28-206 and 4-28-209 —
4-28-224;
(85) Articles of incorporation filing fees, articles of
amendment filing fees, fees for certified copies, other miscellaneous filing
fees and certificates, and for receiving service of process on behalf of a
corporation, both foreign and domestic, and all other fees, as enacted by
Acts 1965, No. 576, known as the “Arkansas Business Corporation Act”, § 4-26-
101 et seq.;
(86) Fees collected as authorized under Acts 1961, No. 185, as
amended, known as the “Uniform Commercial Code”, § 4-1-101 et seq.;
(87) Fees collected for filing articles of incorporation for
cooperative marketing associations, as enacted by Acts 1921, No. 116, as
amended, known as the “Cooperative Marketing Act”, § 2-2-401 et seq.;
(88) Fees collected from rural telephone cooperatives, as
enacted by Acts 1951, No. 51, as amended, known as the “Rural
Telecommunications Cooperative Act”, § 23-17-201 et seq.;
(89) Annual license fees collected from rural electrification
corporations, as enacted by Acts 1937, No. 342, as amended, known as the
“Electric Cooperative Corporation Act”, § 23-18-301 et seq.;
(90) Annual license fees collected from agricultural cooperative
associations, as enacted by Acts 1939, No. 153, as amended, §§ 2-2-101 — 2-2-
124;
(91) That portion of driver's license special fees for duplicate
and identification licenses, as enacted by Acts 1977, No. 311, and all laws
amendatory thereto, § 27-16-801, § 27-16-805, and § 27-16-806(a) and (b);
(92) Fees collected from mutual corporations, excepting
insurance companies, having no capital stock for the filing of articles of
incorporation, as enacted by Acts 1911, No. 87, § 4-26-1204;
(93) Abstracter's examining licenses and fees, as enacted by
Acts 1969, No. 109, as amended, known as the “Abstracters' Licensing Law of
1969”, § 17-11-101 et seq.;
(94) Driver education fees, as enacted by Acts 1965, No. 531, §§
27-18-101, 27-18-102, and 27-18-104 — 27-18-106;
497 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(95) Fees charged by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission for the various examinations, permits, licenses, and certificates
issued by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, as enacted by Acts
1975, No. 650, as amended, the Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Act, §
17-101-101 et seq.;
(96) Receipts from timber severed from state-owned lands and
rentals from trespassers on state lands, as enacted by Acts 1931, No. 125, §§
22-5-602 and 22-5-603;
(97) Annual license fees received from septic tank cleaning
businesses, as enacted by Acts 1973, No. 71, §§ 17-45-101 — 17-45-105;
(98) Environmental compatibility and public need certificate
initial filing fee, as enacted by Acts 1973, No. 164, and all laws amendatory
thereto, §§ 23-18-501 — 23-18-529;
(99) Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission license fees, as enacted
by Acts 1975, No. 388, known as the “Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Act”,
§§ 23-112-101 — 23-112-103, 23-112-105, 23-112-201 — 23-112-205, 23-112-301 —
23-112-311, § 23-112-401 [repealed], §§ 23-112-402 — 23-112-404, § 23-112-405
[repealed], §§ 23-112-406, and 23-112-501 — 23-112-509;
(100) Arkansas Public Service Commission inspection fees as
authorized by Acts 1971, No. 285, § 8, as amended, §§ 23-15-211, 23-15-214,
and 23-15-216, for operating the Pipeline Safety Division;
(101) The additional severance tax levied on oil produced in
this state, as enacted by Acts 1977, No. 310, § 4, and all laws amendatory
thereto, § 26-58-301;
(102) Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission registration fees
and salesperson's licenses, as enacted by Acts 1977, No. 419, known as the
“Arkansas Manufactured Homes Standards Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto,
§ 20-25-101 et seq.;
(103) [Repealed.]
(104) All Division of Environmental Quality fees, unless
otherwise provided by law, § 8-1-105, landfill operator license fees, § 8-6-
909, and that portion of new tire waste tire fees, § 8-9-404;
(105) Interstate fuel user marking fees, fines, and penalties,
as enacted by Acts 1979, No. 434, §§ 26-55-708 and 26-55-709, and all laws
amendatory thereto;
(106) Motor vehicle title application fees, fines, and
498 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
penalties, as enacted by Acts 1949, No. 142, § 33, as amended by Acts 1979,
No. 439, and Acts 1981, No. 40, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 27-14-705;
(107) Transfers from the Securities Reserve Fund of interest
earned on the balance of the Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund,
including all internal accounts and funds thereof, as enacted by Acts 1979,
No. 438, § 27-70-204, and all laws amendatory thereto;
(108) Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians examination,
license, and registration fees, as enacted by Acts 1981, No. 589, known as
the “Ophthalmic Dispensing Act”, and all laws amendatory thereto, § 17-89-101
et seq.;
(109) Arkansas State Board of Nursing examination and license
fees, as enacted by Acts 1971, No. 432, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§
17-87-101 — 17-87-105, 17-87-201 — 17-87-204, 17-87-301 — 17-87-309, and 17-
87-401;
(110) Social work examination and license fees, as enacted by
Acts 1999, No. 1122, known as the “Social Work Licensing Act”, § 17-103-101
et seq., and all laws amendatory thereto;
(111) Brine production assessments as enacted by Acts 1979, No.
937, § 3(d), as amended, § 15-76-306(d);
(112) Amusement attraction permits, as enacted by Acts 1983, No.
837, known as the “Amusement Ride and Amusement Attraction Safety Insurance
Act”, § 23-89-501 et seq.;
(113) Arkansas Beef Council cattle assessments, § 2-35-401 et
seq.;
(114) [Repealed.]
(115) Hazardous and toxic materials facility fees, § 12-84-106;
(116) The additional severance tax levied on coal, as enacted by
Acts 1983, No. 560, § 26-58-112;
(117) The additional severance tax levied on stone and crushed
stone, as enacted by Acts 1983, No. 761, § 26-58-113, and those portions of
real estate transfer taxes, as enacted by Acts 1971, No. 275, and all laws
amendatory thereto, §§ 26-60-105 and 26-60-112;
(118) Five percent (5%) of the gross proceeds collected through
set-off procedures from debtors who owe money to the State of Arkansas, as
enacted by Acts 1983, No. 372, §§ 26-36-301 — 26-36-320;
(119) The first designated portion of real estate transfer taxes
499 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for the continuing education of county and circuit clerks, as enacted by Acts
1971, No. 275, and all laws amendatory thereto, §§ 26-60-105 and 26-60-112;
(120) That portion of driver's license reinstatement fees for
the Office of Driver Services, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(B);
(121) [Repealed.]
(122) Agricultural consultant license fees, the Agricultural
Consultants Licensing Act of 1987, § 17-13-101 et seq.;
(123) [Repealed.]
(124) Three percent (3%) of local sales and use taxes, which are
further identified as the three percent (3%) collection cost of the local
sales and use taxes, imposed by a city under § 26-75-217, a county under §
26-74-214, and a city or county under § 26-82-111;
(125) [Repealed.]
(126) Those portions of vaccination fees imposed at livestock
markets, as enacted by Acts 1985, No. 150, and Acts 1985, No. 151, § 2-40-
206, and that portion of all fines and penalties resulting from arrests made
or citations issued by Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission enforcement
officers, § 2-33-113(b) [repealed];
(127) Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board assessments, as enacted by
Acts 1985, No. 283, §§ 2-20-601 — 2-20-609;
(128) [Repealed.]
(129) Local exchange carriers access line surcharges and
commercial mobile radio service provider telephone number surcharges, § 23-
17-119;
(130) Asbestos removal license fees, §§ 20-27-1001 — 20-27-1007;
(131) Mammography accreditation fees, § 20-15-1005;
(132) [Repealed.]
(133) Child care facility license fees, § 20-78-223;
(134) [Repealed.]
(135) Dog racing taxes derived from the net proceeds of two (2)
of the additional six (6) days of dog races, as authorized by § 23-111-504;
(136) Emergency medical services fees, § 20-13-211;
(137) Food service establishment and food salvager permits and
fees, §§ 20-57-102, 20-57-201, § 20-57-202 [repealed], § 20-57-203, and § 20-
57-204;
(138) Nursing home administrator license application and renewal
500 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fees, §§ 20-10-404 and 20-10-405;
(139) [Repealed.]
(140) Health maintenance organizations licenses and fees, § 23-
76-127;
(141) Ionizing radiation license and registration fees, § 20-21-
217;
(142) Public Water System Service Act fees, fines, and
penalties, § 20-28-101 et seq.;
(143) Swimming pools regulation fees and fines, §§ 20-30-102 and
20-30-106;
(144) Department of Health public health laboratory fees, § 20-
7-114;
(145) Additional real estate transfer tax, § 26-60-105(b);
(146) Two percent (2%) of gross receipts derived from the sale
or rental on certain items related to tourism, § 26-63-402;
(147) Breath testing instrument maintenance fees, § 20-7-128;
(148) That portion of commercial driver license application
fees, § 27-23-118(a)(1); driver search fees, § 27-23-118(b)(1) and § 27-23-
118(c)(1); and all fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected under § 27-23-
118(d) of the Arkansas Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, § 27-23-101 et
seq.;
(149) That portion of commercial driver license application
fees, § 27-23-118(a)(2);
(150) Commercial driver license examination fees, § 27-23-
110(d);
(151) Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board assessments, § 2-9-107;
(152) Turnpike project tolls, §§ 27-90-203 and 27-90-204;
(153) Regulated substance storage tank license fees and that
portion of annual registration fees, § 8-7-802(a)(2)(B); civil penalties
collected under § 8-7-806; and that portion of costs collected under § 8-7-
807;
(154) Landfill disposal and transportation fees, § 8-6-606;
(155) That portion of driver's license reinstatement fees for
the Office of Alcohol Testing, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(A), § 5-65-304(d), and § 5-
65-310(f);
(156) Medicaid Fraud False Claims Act penalties, § 20-77-903;
501 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(157) Child care facility fines and penalties, § 20-78-219;
(158) Fees for certifying blasters, § 20-27-1102;
(159) Pseudorabies control and eradication program fees, § 2-40-
1201;
(160) HVACR Licensing Board fees, § 17-33-204;
(161) [Repealed.]
(162) That portion of landfill disposal fees collected when a
private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill
solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry, § 8-6-607(b)(2);
(163) Those additional corporate income taxes as specified in §
26-51-205(c)(2);
(164) Those additional insurance premium taxes as specified in §
26-57-614, the portion of premium tax designated in § 26-57-603(d), and the
amount of insurance premium taxes transferred due to the provisions of §§ 24-
11-301 and 24-11-809;
(165) That portion of rim removal fees and import fees, § 8-9-
404;
(166) Commercial medical waste fees and fines, § 20-32-104;
(167) Additional landfill disposal and transportation fees, § 8-
6-1003 et seq.;
(168) That portion of annual registration fees for above-ground
storage tanks, § 8-7-802(a)(2)(C);
(169) Fees received by the State Plant Board for licensing and
regulation of public grain warehouses;
(170) Elder person or person with a disability enhanced civil
penalties, § 4-88-202;
(171) That portion of estate taxes collected in a calendar year
that exceeds ten percent (10%) of the average annual estate taxes collected
for a five-year period immediately preceding the calendar year or fifteen
million dollars ($15,000,000), whichever is greater, § 26-59-122(a);
(172) The following fees:
(A) The additional fees assessed or imposed upon insurers,
insurance agents, brokers, professional bail bond companies, and other
licensees or registrants, § 23-61-711;
(B) The additional professional bail bond company fees, §
17-19-111;
502 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) Health maintenance organization fees, § 23-76-127;
(D) Professional employer organization biennial license
fees, § 23-92-407; and
(E) Employer service assurance organization affidavit
fees, § 23-92-414;
(173) That portion of securities agents initial or renewal
registration filing fees, § 23-42-304(a)(2) and § 23-42-304(a)(4);
(174) That portion of securities registration statement filing
fees, § 23-42-404(b)(1);
(175) Background investigation fees, § 12-8-120;
(176) Criminal history information record search fees for
noncriminal justice purposes, § 12-12-1012;
(177) Alcohol and drug abuse treatment program application fees
and accreditation costs, § 20-64-906;
(178) Marine Sanitation Program fees, § 27-101-408;
(179) [Repealed.]
(180) Arkansas Conservation Corps fee-for-service project fees,
§ 11-13-105(c) [repealed];
(181) Transfers from general revenues for financial incentive
plans and incentive agreements under § 15-4-1607, § 26-51-506(c)(2)(B)(vii),
§ 26-51-506(c)(3)(D)(vi), and § 26-51-2704(c)(8)(A);
(182) Alternative fuels taxes, fees, penalties, and interest, as
enacted in § 26-62-101 et seq., known as the “Alternative Fuels Tax Law”, and
all laws amendatory thereto;
(183) Dog racing taxes derived from seventy-five percent (75%)
of the net proceeds of six (6) additional days of dog races during each
twelve-month period, § 23-111-515;
(184) Transporters of commercial medical waste vehicle
inspection fees, § 20-32-105;
(185) Motor vehicle accident report and records of traffic
violations photostatic or written copies fees, § 27-53-210;
(186) Motor vehicle liability insurance fines, § 27-22-103;
(187) Rail and other carriers fees, § 23-16-105;
(188) Life care provider application filing fees, § 23-93-206;
(189) Additional marriage license fees, § 9-30-109;
(190) Used motor vehicle dealer license fees, § 23-112-608, and
503 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
that portion of used motor vehicle dealer fines, § 23-112-603(c)(1);
(191) Criminal Investigation Division antifraud assessments and
penalties, §§ 23-100-104 and 23-100-105;
(192) Seventy-one percent (71%) of the additional cigarette and
tobacco products tax, § 26-57-1101 et seq., as determined by § 26-57-1106;
(193) One-eighth of one cent (⅛¢) gross receipts and
compensating taxes, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75;
(194) Waterworks operators fees, § 17-51-106;
(195) Equine Infectious Anemia Control and Eradication Program
fees, § 2-40-826;
(196) Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board
assessments, § 2-20-805;
(197) State Convicted Offender DNA Data Base Act fines, § 12-12-
1118;
(198) Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997 fines, § 12-12-910;
(199) [Repealed.]
(200) Thirty percent (30%) of parking fines and fees, § 27-15-
305(c);
(201) Twenty-nine percent (29%) of the additional cigarette and
tobacco products tax, § 26-57-1103;
(202) [Repealed.]
(203) Littering fines, § 8-6-404;
(204) Fees from investigations and inspections of various
boards' licensees, § 17-80-106;
(205) Body piercing, branding, and tattooing license fees and
penalties, § 20-27-1503 [repealed];
(206) [Repealed.]
(207) [Repealed.]
(208) [Repealed.]
(209) [Repealed.]
(210) Various Department of Health vital statistic fees, § 19-
43-267(b);
(211) [Repealed.]
(212) Revenue-generating technology system contract taxes and
fees, § 19-60-107(d);
(213) The first one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of
504 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fines collected under § 23-42-209, § 23-42-213(b), and § 23-42-308;
(214) The transfer of up to thirty-one and six-tenths percent
(31.6%) of amounts received in the Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, Acts 2002
(1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 19-90-108;
(215) Arkansas Biological Agent Registry Act civil penalties, §
20-36-104;
(216) Drug court program user fees, § 16-98-304, and specialty
court program user fees, § 16-10-701;
(217) Additional marriage license fees, § 16-20-407(b)(2);
(218) That portion of an operator's driver's license
reinstatement fees, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(D);
(219) That portion of suspended, revoked, or cancelled driver's
license reinstatement fees, § 27-16-508(b) and § 27-16-808(b)(2);
(220) That portion of driver license special fees for duplicate
and identification licenses, § 27-16-805 and § 27-16-806(c);
(221) Civil penalties and fines collected under the Arkansas
Catfish Marketing Act of 1975, § 20-61-201 et seq., and § 20-61-101;
(222) That portion of penalties collected for failure to pay
fees for registration and licensing of motor vehicles, § 27-14-601(e);
(223) Design-use contribution fees, § 27-15-4904;
(224) Mixed drink supplemental taxes on sales of alcoholic
beverages, § 3-9-213(c)(2)(A) and § 3-9-223(c)(2)(A);
(225) Arkansas Bureau of Standards lab tests or inspection fees,
§ 4-18-329(c);
(226) Auto auction fees for salvage-titled or parts-only titled
vehicles, § 23-112-614;
(227) Vehicle identification number verification fees, § 27-14-
725(d);
(228) Spyware monitoring fines and penalties, § 4-111-104;
(229) That portion of uniform filing fees collected in circuit
court under § 16-10-314 and § 21-6-403(b)(1);
(230) Forfeited bonds; fee assessments; reimbursements for well-
site plugging, repair, and restoration costs from well operators; and
proceeds from the sale of hydrocarbons and production equipment located at
the site of abandoned and orphaned wells, § 15-71-110(e) and § 15-71-116;
(231) County quorum court special license plate application
505 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fees, § 27-24-303(b)(2);
(232) Fees for diagnostic laboratory services of the Division of
Agriculture of the University of Arkansas, § 6-64-1013;
(233) That portion of uniform filing fees collected in circuit
court under § 16-10-313 and § 21-6-403(b)(1);
(234) Commercial motor vehicle driving offenses fines and
penalties, § 27-23-114(h)(2);
(235) Criminal History for Volunteers Act fees, § 12-12-1609;
(236) Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment
Act civil penalties, § 12-12-1706;
(237) Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act fees,
§§ 8-7-1301 — 8-7-1304, §§ 8-7-1305 — 8-7-1310 [repealed], and § 8-7-1311;
(238) Ninety-five percent (95%) of the severance tax collected
on natural gas at the rates enacted by § 26-58-111(5) and five percent (5%)
of the severance tax collected on natural gas under § 26-58-124(c)(2);
(239) Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-
59, § 4301 et seq., registration fees, § 23-13-604;
(240) Landfill disposal fees to support a computer and
electronic recycling program, §§ 8-6-612 [repealed] and 8-6-614 [repealed];
(241) Commercial Driver Alcohol and Drug Testing Database
penalties, § 27-23-209 [repealed];
(242) School-Age Children Eye and Vision Care Fund [repealed]
donations, grants of money, gifts and appropriations from private sources,
from municipal and county governments, from the state, and from the United
States Government, as created in uncodified § 1 of Acts 2007, No. 138;
(243) Arkansas retirement community eligibility application
fees, § 15-14-104;
(244) Annual fleet management fees, § 27-14-610(e)(2);
(245) Securities agents branch office registration filing fees,
§ 23-42-304(a)(5);
(246) The first designated portion of real estate transfer taxes
for the continuing education of county coroners under §§ 26-60-105 and 26-60-
112;
(247) Registration for nonprofit motor vehicle fleets management
fees, § 27-14-611(d)(1);
(248) Suspended registration reinstatement fees, § 27-22-
506 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
103(b)(4)(B)(i);
(249) Certificate of franchise authority fees, § 23-19-204;
(250) That portion of fees and fines collected under § 20-27-
1502 [repealed], § 20-27-1508 [repealed], § 20-27-1509 [repealed], and § 20-
27-1511 [repealed];
(251) That portion of license fees, renewal fees, and civil
penalties collected under § 17-55-101 et seq.;
(252) Voice stress analysis examiner's license fees, § 17-39-
305;
(253) Fees collected under § 12-12-1510(c);
(254) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq.;
(255) Fees collected under § 27-14-602(c);
(256) Driving monitoring program fees, § 27-50-912(f)(2);
(257) Permit fees paid under the Arkansas Industrial Hemp
Production Act, § 2-15-501 et seq.;
(258) All sales tax revenues collected by the Department of
Finance and Administration from the sale of usable marijuana under the
Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 98;
(259) That portion of notice filing fees and penalties, § 23-42-
509(a);
(260) Revenues collected under § 9-15-202(d);
(261) Revenues collected under § 16-10-305(h);
(262) Grocery store wine permit fees, § 3-5-1802;
(263) The wholesale sales tax on motor fuel levied under § 26-
64-101;
(264) The wholesale sales tax on distillate special fuel levied
under § 26-64-102;
(265) Additional registration fees for electric vehicles, hybrid
vehicles, and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles under § 27-14-614;
(266) Motorboat duplicate title, lien filing, lien notation, and
certificate of title fees set forth in the Arkansas Motorboat Registration
and Titling Act, § 27-101-1001 et seq.;
(267) Motorboat certificate of title with beneficiary processing
507 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fees and certificate of title application fees set forth in the Arkansas
Motorboat Registration and Titling Act, § 27-101-1001 et seq.;
(268) Ten percent (10%) of each booking and administration fee
collected under § 12-41-505;
(269) Expedited title processing fees collected under § 27-14-
705(e)(2);
(270) Driving record information fees collected under § 27-23-
117;
(271) Civil penalties collected under § 25-38-203;
(272) Fines collected under § 2-38-504;
(273) Fees collected under § 20-7-140;
(274) Processing fees collected under § 26-54-104(b)(1); and
(275) Digital asset mining business penalties under § 23-119-101
et seq.

CHAPTER 43
SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Enumeration of Special Revenue Funds
Subchapter 3. Enumeration of Special Revenue Funds, Continued

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Enumeration of Special Revenue Funds

19-43-201. Division of Aeronautics Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Division of Aeronautics Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(17).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Aeronautics for:
(1) Distributing grants-in-aid to qualifying airports of the
state as authorized by law;
(2) Distributing grants to qualifying applicants as determined
508 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
by the Director of the Division of Aeronautics and the Aeronautics Commission
for any purpose related to:
(A) The development of aeronautics;
(B) The promotion of aeronautics; or
(C) Aviation education;
(3) The maintenance, operation, and improvement required in
carrying out the functions, powers, and duties set out in § 27-114-101 et
seq.; or
(4) Carrying out other duties imposed by law upon the division,
including without limitation the duties set out in § 27-115-110.

19-43-202. Division of Correction Farm Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Division of Correction Farm Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those revenues as specified in § 19-42-
201(42).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Division of Correction's farming operations.
(d) Any surplus accruing in the fund, upon determination of that
surplus, shall be transferred to the Division of Correction Inmate Care and
Custody Fund Account.

19-43-203. Division of Arkansas State Police Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Division of Arkansas State Police Fund”.
(b) The Division of Arkansas State Police Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(1), (7),
(8), (38)-(40), (94), (150), (168), (175), (184)-(186), (190), (218)-(220),
(222), (226), (227), (234), (252), and (270);
(2) Moneys transferred or deposited from the State
Administration of Justice Fund;
(3) Those general revenues as may be provided by law, there to
be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Division of
Arkansas State Police in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties as
509 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
stated in § 12-8-106 or other duties imposed by law upon the division;
(4) Any revenues credited to the Division of Arkansas State
Police Fund under the Division of Arkansas State Police Headquarters
Facilities and Equipment Financing Act, § 12-8-601 et seq.; and
(5) Federal reimbursements received for eligible expenditures by
the various programs of the division made payable from the Division of
Arkansas State Police Fund.

19-43-204. Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund shall consist of:
(1) That part of the special revenues as specified in § 19-42-
201(2)-(4), (22), (81), (105)-(107), (182), and (256), known as “highway
revenue”, as distributed under the Arkansas Highway Revenue Distribution Law,
§ 27-70-201 et seq., and § 27-70-103 and § 27-72-301 et seq.;
(2) Those special revenues specified in § 19-42-201(10), (152),
(187), and (239);
(3) Fifty percent (50%) of § 19-42-201(26);
(4) That portion of § 19-42-201(2) as set out in § 27-14-
601(a)(3)(H)(ii)(f);
(5) That portion of § 19-42-201(222);
(6) Those designated revenues as set out in § 26-56-201(e)(1),
which consist of the additional total of four cents (4¢) distillate special
fuel taxes to be distributed as provided in the Arkansas Highway Financing
Act of 1999, § 27-64-201 et seq.;
(7) Federal revenue sharing funds as set out in § 19-27-205;
(8) The special revenues specified in § 26-64-103, which consist
of the wholesale sales taxes on motor fuel and distillate special fuel;
(9) The special revenues specified in § 27-14-614, which consist
of the additional registration fees on electric vehicles and hybrid vehicles;
and
(10) Any federal funds that may become available.
(c) The Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund shall be used for
the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the Arkansas
510 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Department of Transportation in carrying out the functions, powers, and
duties as set out in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 42, and §§ 27-65-102 —
27-65-107, 27-65-110, 27-65-122, and 27-65-124, and the other laws of this
state prescribing the powers and duties of the department and the State
Highway Commission.

19-43-205. Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(70), (71), and (98).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas Public Service Commission in carrying
out the functions, powers, and duties as set out in § 23-2-101 et seq., or
other duties imposed by law upon the commission.

19-43-206. Liquefied Petroleum Gas Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Liquefied Petroleum Gas Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(32).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties as set out in the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board
Act, § 15-75-101 et seq., or other duties imposed by law upon the board.

19-43-207. State Plant Board Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Plant Board Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(46),
(49)-(55), (122), (169), (221), and (225);
(2) Thirty-one cents (31¢) of the fertilizer inspection fees as
511 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
set out in § 19-42-201(48);
(3) All of those special revenues in § 19-42-201(47) with the
exception of ten cents (10¢) of the thirty cents (30¢) for tonnage reports;
(4) Nonrevenue receipts from the Fire Ant Poison Cost Sharing
Program, § 2-16-105;
(5) Fees and civil penalties collected under the Arkansas Rice
Certification Act, § 2-15-201 et seq.;
(6) Civil penalties collected under the Uniform Weights and
Measures Law, § 4-18-301 et seq.; and
(7) Those general revenues as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the State Plant Board in carrying out the functions,
powers, and duties as set out in the Arkansas Plant Act of 1917, § 2-16-201
et seq.

19-43-208. Poultry and Egg Grading Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Poultry and Egg Grading Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of that portion of those special revenues
derived from the poultry and egg industry as specified in § 19-42-201(34).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission poultry
and egg grading programs, in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties
as set out in § 2-33-101 et seq., or other duties imposed by law upon the
commission.

19-43-209. Oil and Gas Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Oil and Gas Commission Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(62), (111), and (275) and § 14-1-606.
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
Oil and Gas Commission in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties as
512 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
set out in § 15-72-101 et seq., § 23-119-101 et seq., and other applicable
law;
(2) Payment of expenses of the Office of the State Geologist
under § 15-71-107(b)(2)(B); or
(3) Other duties imposed by law upon the commission.

19-43-210. State Forestry Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Forestry Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(6) and
(18) excluding twenty-five percent (25%) of all other severance taxes as set
out in § 19-42-201(18);
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the special revenues set out in § 19-
42-201(26); and
(3) Such general revenues as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas Forestry Commission in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties as set out in § 15-31-101 et seq., or other
duties imposed by law upon the commission.

19-43-211. State Bank Department Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Bank Department Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as set out in §
19-42-201(28)-(30).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the State Bank Department in carrying out the
functions, powers, and duties as set out in §§ 23-46-201 — 23-46-207, or
other duties imposed by law upon the department.

19-43-212. State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
513 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(93).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors.

19-43-213. Department of Health Plumbers Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Department of Health Plumbers Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(64).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Plumbing Section of the Environmental Health
Services Division of the Department of Health in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties as set out in § 17-38-101 et seq., and for paying the
expenses of administering such funds as may be authorized by law.

19-43-214. Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management
Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Office of Hazardous Materials Emergency Management
Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(115).
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The operations of the State Office of Hazardous Materials
Emergency Management; and
(2) The enforcement of the Arkansas HAZMAT Emergency Management
Act, § 12-84-101 et seq.

19-43-215. Soybean Promotion Fund.
514 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Soybean Promotion Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(12).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement as required by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties as set out in § 2-20-401 et seq.

19-43-216. Game Protection Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Game Protection Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(63);
(2) Thirty-four percent (34%) of those special revenues as
specified in § 19-42-201(20);
(3) License plate design-use contribution fees collected under §
27-24-905(b)(2); and
(4) Any other revenue authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission in
carrying out the functions, powers, and duties as set out in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 35, and other laws enacted by the General Assembly.

19-43-217. Indigent Patient's Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Indigent Patient's Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(15).
(c) The fund shall be used:
(1) To defray the cost of hospitalization and medical services
provided to indigent Arkansas patients; and
(2) For such other purposes as may be authorized or appropriated
by law.
515 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-43-218. Division of Correction Prison Industry Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Division of Correction Prison Industry Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(43).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Division of Correction's prison industries activities.

19-43-219. Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(99).
(c) The fund shall be used for the operation, maintenance,
improvement, and motor vehicle education and training required by the
Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission in exercising the powers, functions, and
duties as set out in the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Act, § 23-112-101
et seq.

19-43-220. Arkansas Public Service Commission Utility Safety Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Public Service Commission Utility Safety
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(100).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Office of Pipeline Safety of the Arkansas Public Service
Commission in exercising the powers, functions, and duties as set out in the
Arkansas Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1971, § 23-15-201 et seq.

19-43-221. Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
516 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(61) and (101).
(c) The fund shall be used for the construction, maintenance,
operation, and improvement of the Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources in
exercising the powers, functions, and duties as set out in § 13-5-401 et
seq., and for paying the expenses of administering such funds by the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism as may be authorized by law.

19-43-222. Manufactured Home Standards Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Manufactured Home Standards Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in
§ 19-42-201(102).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission in exercising the
powers, functions, and duties as set out in the Arkansas Manufactured Homes
Standards Act, § 20-25-101 et seq.

19-43-223. Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(95).
(c) The fund shall be used:
(1) For the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission in exercising the powers,
functions, and duties as set out in the Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice
Act, § 17-101-101 et seq.; and
(2) To fund:
(A) The Agri Scholarship Program created under § 25-38-212
and administered by the Department of Agriculture, with deposits to the Agri
Scholarship Program Fund in the amount of up to thirty thousand dollars
517 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
($30,000) per year; and
(B) The Rural Veterinary Student Scholarship Program, §
17-101-205.

19-43-224. Community Correction Revolving Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Community Correction Revolving Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(31); and
(2) Fees and sanctions levied by the courts or authorized by the
Board of Corrections for participation in specified programs to be paid by
offenders on community correction.
(c) The fund shall be used for continuation and expansion of community
correction programs as established and approved by the board and as may be
provided by law.

19-43-225. Livestock and Poultry Equine Infectious Anemia Control
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Livestock and Poultry Equine Infectious Anemia
Control Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(195).
(c) The fund shall be used for the purpose of defraying the costs of
services performed in the Equine Infectious Anemia Control and Eradication
Program as provided in § 2-40-801 et seq.

19-43-226. Hazardous Waste Permit Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Hazardous Waste Permit Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(59) and (237).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality to
518 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
ensure the proper administration and enforcement of §§ 8-7-201 — 8-7-226 and
the Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act, § 8-7-1301 et seq.

19-43-227. Arkansas Nuclear Planning and Response Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Nuclear Planning and Response Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(60).
(c) The fund shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the
Nuclear Planning and Response Program, as provided in § 20-21-401 et seq.

19-43-228. Milk Inspection Fees Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Milk Inspection Fees Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(73); and
(2) Any other revenues as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of defraying
the cost of maintenance, operation, and improvement of the Grade “A” milk and
milk products inspection program.

19-43-229. Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians' Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians' Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(108).
(c) The fund shall be used for the administration, coordination, and
enforcement of the Ophthalmic Dispensing Act, § 17-89-101 et seq.

19-43-230. Arkansas State Board of Nursing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas State Board of Nursing Fund”.
519 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(109).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas State Board of Nursing in
exercising the powers, functions, and duties as provided in § 17-87-101 et
seq.

19-43-231. Social Work Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Social Work Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(110).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board
in exercising the powers, functions, and duties as set out in the Social Work
Licensing Act, § 17-103-101 et seq.

19-43-232. Arkansas Beef Council Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Beef Council Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(113).
(c) The fund shall be used in such manner as the Arkansas Beef Council
deems appropriate for Arkansas beef promotion and research and for the
operation and maintenance of the council office and payment of expenses of
the council members as set out in § 2-35-301 et seq.

19-43-233. County and Circuit Clerks Continuing Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “County and Circuit Clerks Continuing Education
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(119).
(c) The fund shall be used for defraying the expenses of training
seminars and other educational projects benefiting county and circuit clerks
520 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
in this state as set out in §§ 16-20-105 and 16-20-110 and § 26-60-101 et
seq.

19-43-234. Arkansas Child Passenger Protection Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Child Passenger Protection Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(67); and
(2) Other moneys that may be appropriated, allocated, or donated
to the fund.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Highway Safety Program for
the purchase of child passenger safety seats as provided in the Child
Passenger Protection Act, § 27-34-101 et seq.

19-43-235. Arkansas Wine Producers Council Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Wine Producers Council Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of all funds as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for promoting the Arkansas native wine
industry, as directed by the Arkansas Wine Producers Council and as provided
in § 3-5-701 et seq.

19-43-236. Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(196).
(c) The fund shall be used for administration, research, and extension
to promote the corn and grain sorghum industry, as provided in § 2-20-801 et
seq.

19-43-237. DNA Detection Fund.
521 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “DNA Detection Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(197).
(c) The fund shall be used for the administration of the State
Convicted Offender DNA Data Base Act, § 12-12-1101 et seq.

19-43-238. Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest
Control Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease
and Pest Control Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(126);
and
(2) Any funds authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used in order to fund or partially fund the
bovine disease control and eradication program as provided in § 2-40-206.

19-43-239. Arkansas Wheat Promotion Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Wheat Promotion Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(127),
(c) The fund shall be used for the operation of the Arkansas Wheat
Promotion Board as provided in §§ 2-20-601 — 2-20-609.

19-43-240. Individual Sewage Disposal Systems Improvement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Individual Sewage Disposal Systems Improvement
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of that portion of those special revenues
522 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
as specified in § 19-42-201(58).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Environmental Health
Protection of the Department of Health for, and in the manner recommended by,
the Individual Sewage Disposal Systems Advisory Committee for implementation
of the utilization and application of alternate and experimental individual
sewage disposal systems as provided in the Arkansas Sewage Disposal Systems
Act, § 14-236-101 et seq.

19-43-241. Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(35).
(c) The fund shall be used for the operation of the Arkansas Rice
Research and Promotion Board as provided in the Arkansas Rice Research and
Promotion Act of 1999, § 2-20-501 et seq.

19-43-242. Asbestos Control Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Asbestos Control Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the special revenues specified in § 19-
42-201(130) and any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used to administer and enforce a program for
licensing contractors engaged in the removal of friable asbestos materials
from facilities by the Division of Environmental Quality under §§ 20-27-1001
— 20-27-1007.

19-43-243. Boating Safety Account Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Boating Safety Account Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(20).
(c) The fund shall be distributed in the manner and to the various
523 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
funds as provided in § 27-101-111.

19-43-244. Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(27).
(c) The fund shall be used for distribution to the various qualified
city, town, or fire protection district police officers' pension and relief
funds and firemen's pension funds as provided in § 24-11-301.

19-43-245. Sex Offenders Registration Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Sex Offenders Registration Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(198).
(c) The fund shall be used for the administration of the Sex Offender
Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.

19-43-246. Nursing Home Personnel Training Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Nursing Home Personnel Training Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(138).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Office of Long-Term Care of the
Division of Medical Services of the Department of Human Services for
development and implementation of training programs as provided in § 20-10-
401 et seq.

19-43-247. Developmental Disabilities Services — Dog Track Special
Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
524 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Developmental Disabilities Services — Dog Track
Special Revenue Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(16).
(c) The fund shall be used for the sole benefit of community programs
of the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of
Human Services that are licensed by the division.

19-43-248. Commercial Driver License Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Commercial Driver License Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in:
(1) Section 19-42-201(148), to be used to establish and maintain
the Arkansas Commercial Driver License Program and for other related purposes
as required by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties of the Revenue Division of
the Department of Finance and Administration, as set out in the Arkansas
Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, § 27-23-101 et seq.;
(2) Section 19-42-201(255), to be used for system enhancements
to the Arkansas Motor Carrier System and for other related purposes as
required by the secretary in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties
of the division; and
(3) Section 19-42-201(266) and (267) and § 19-42-201(269).

19-43-249. Crime Lab Equipment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Crime Lab Equipment Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(30); and
(2) Other moneys as authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used only for the purchase of equipment,
constructing and equipping regional crime laboratories, and for the personal
services and operating expenses of regional crime laboratories as provided in
525 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
§ 12-12-323.

19-43-250. Private Career Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Private Career Education Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(24).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance and operations of the
Division of Higher Education concerning the State Board of Private Career
Education in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties as set out in §
6-51-601 et seq.

19-43-251. Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(153);
(2) Federal funds; and
(3) Any state matching funds as may be provided by the General
Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used for the administration of the regulated
substance storage tank program as provided in § 8-7-801 et seq.

19-43-252. Arkansas Catfish Promotion Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Catfish Promotion Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(151).
(c) The fund shall be used for Arkansas catfish promotion and research
and for the operation and maintenance of the Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board
office and payment of board member expenses, as provided in § 2-9-112.

19-43-253. Child Care Fund.
526 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Child Care Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(133) and
(157); and
(2) Moneys received from the Department of Human Services.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Child Care and Early
Childhood Education of the Department of Human Services exclusively to
provide grants to child care facilities for enhancement of the facility or
for training of personnel in child care facilities and to meet the costs of
conducting the statewide criminal records checks required under § 20-78-606,
all as provided in the Childcare Facility Licensing Act, § 20-78-201 et seq.

19-43-254. Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Swine Testing
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Swine
Testing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(159).
(c) The fund shall be used for the pseudorabies control and
eradication program as provided in § 2-40-1201.

19-43-255. Work Force 2000 Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Work Force 2000 Development Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(163); and
(2) All other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the authorized educational
activities of those entities as set out in § 26-51-205(d)(1)(A) and (B) and
as distributed under § 26-51-205(d)(2).

527 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-43-256. Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund”.
(b) The Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund shall consist of those
special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(164).
(c) The Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund shall be used for fire
protection services as provided in § 26-57-614 and § 14-284-401 et seq.
(d)(1) The Insurance Commissioner shall immediately deposit all moneys
collected under § 26-57-614 and § 14-284-401 et seq. into the Revenue Holding
Fund Account as provided in § 19-21-104.
(2) On the last business day of each quarter, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount of net special revenues to be
transferred to the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund by the Treasurer of
State.
(3) By the last business day of the quarter after July 1, 2023,
and by the last business day of each following quarter, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall:
(A) Determine the amount of collections deposited into the
Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund during the current quarter and the amount of
collections deposited into the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund during the
same quarter of the immediately preceding year;
(B) Certify the amount by which the collections deposited
into the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund for the current quarter exceed the
amount of collections deposited into the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund
during the same quarter of the immediately preceding year; and
(C) Transfer fifty percent (50%) of the amount certified
under subdivision (d)(3)(B) of this section to the Fire Services Fund.
(4) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall be the
disbursing officer for the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund, and shall
distribute the moneys as provided in § 26-57-614 and § 14-284-401 et seq.
(e)(1) The commissioner shall disburse any refunds that may be due
insurance carriers from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund after certifying to
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount to be refunded.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct that the
amount certified under subdivision (e)(1) of this section be transferred from
528 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Revenue Holding Fund Account to the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund as
provided in § 19-20-106(a)(3).
(f) Beginning January 1, 2024, any funds that remain unclaimed in the
Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund for over two (2) of the immediately prior
calendar years shall be transferred to a cash fund and deposited into the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to be
used exclusively by the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board for Fire
Protection Services grants.

19-43-257. HVACR Licensing Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “HVACR Licensing Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(160).
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement of the Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning, and Refrigeration
(HVACR) Licensing and Inspection program of the Department of Health as
provided in § 17-33-201 et seq.

19-43-258. Marketing Recyclables Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Marketing Recyclables Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(162).
(c) The fund shall be used by the Compliance Advisory Panel for the
Marketing Recyclables Program of the Compliance Advisory Panel for the
administration and performance of its duties, as administered by the Division
of Environmental Quality under § 8-9-201 et seq.

19-43-259. Elder Person and Person with a Disability Victims Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Elder Person and Person with a Disability Victims
Fund”.
529 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(170).
(c) The fund shall be used for the investigation and prosecution of
deceptive acts against elder persons and individuals with disabilities and
for consumer education initiatives directed toward elder persons and
individuals with disabilities, law enforcement officers, the judicial system,
social services professionals, and the general public on the provisions of
the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq., and related statutes.

19-43-260. State Police Equipment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Police Equipment Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of those special revenues as specified
in § 19-42-201(176) and (235); and
(2) Thirty-eight percent (38%) of the fees collected under § 12-
12-1510(c).
(c) The fund shall be used for:
(1) The acquisition, operation, and expansion of an automated
fingerprint identification system;
(2) Personal services and operating expenses for conducting
criminal background checks for noncriminal justice purposes;
(3) Those purposes as set out in § 12-12-1012(b) and § 12-12-
1609; and
(4) Personal services and operating expenses as provided by law.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

19-43-261. State Securities Department Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Securities Department Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The first two million five hundred thousand dollars
530 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
($2,500,000) of those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(173),
(174), (245), and (259); and
(2) Such other funds as may be provided by law or regulatory
action.
(c) The fund shall be used for maintenance, operation, support, and
improvement of the State Securities Department in carrying out its functions,
powers, and duties as set out by law and by rules not inconsistent with law,
as set out in § 23-42-211.

19-43-262. Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(200).
(c) The fund shall be used to fund activities of the Governor's
Commission on People with Disabilities, as set out in § 27-15-305.

19-43-263. Economic Development Incentive Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Economic Development Incentive Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(181).
(c) The fund shall be used for financial incentive plans to provide
businesses with an incentive to locate a new facility or expand an existing
facility in Arkansas and for the other purposes as set out in the Arkansas
Economic Development Incentive Act of 1993, § 15-4-1601 et seq.

19-43-264. Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund”.
(b) The Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund shall consist of
those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(33) and (34) and §§ 2-5-
531 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
204, 2-5-206, and 2-6-106 that are not required for support of the Arkansas
Livestock and Poultry Commission Poultry and Egg Grading Program.
(c) The Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund shall be used for
those purposes as set out by law.
(d) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission,
with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, may transfer
funds from the Livestock and Poultry Special Revenue Fund to the Livestock
and Poultry Fund Account.

19-43-265. Telecommunications Equipment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Telecommunications Equipment Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §
19-42-201(129).
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by Arkansas Rehabilitation
Services to fund an equipment distribution program for persons certified as
deaf, hard of hearing, deaf and blind, or speech-impaired as otherwise
provided in § 20-79-401 et seq.

19-43-266. Conservation Tax Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Conservation Tax Fund”.
(b) The Conservation Tax Fund shall consist of those special revenues
as specified in § 19-42-201(193), there to be distributed to the fund
accounts as set out below, which are created by this section unless
specifically created in other provisions of the Arkansas Code, and under the
following procedures:
(1) The Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall deposit the funds collected under the Arkansas Gross
Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., for gross receipts taxes and the
Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., for compensating
taxes into the State Treasury, there to be credited to the Revenue Holding
Fund Account;
(2)(A) On the last day of each month, the Chief Fiscal Officer
532 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of the State shall certify to the Treasurer of State the estimated amount of
gross receipts and compensating tax collections in the Revenue Holding Fund
Account that are a result of the changes by the passage of Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 75.
(B) The Treasurer of State shall then transfer the amount
so certified to the Special Revenue Fund Account as part of the gross special
revenues.
(C) After the deductions as set out in § 19-21-103 have
been made, the remaining amount shall be credited to the Conservation Tax
Fund.
(D) The remaining gross receipts and compensating tax
collections remaining in the Revenue Holding Fund Account shall be credited
to the General Revenue Fund Account, there to be distributed with the other
gross general revenue collections for that month in accordance with the
provisions of § 19-21-101 et seq.; and
(3) The Treasurer of State shall then make the following
transfers from the Conservation Tax Fund to the fund accounts set out below
at the end of each month:
(A) Forty-five percent (45%) to the Game Protection Fund
to be used exclusively by the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission as
appropriated by the General Assembly;
(B) Forty-five percent (45%) to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism Fund Account to be used by the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism for state park purposes as appropriated by the General
Assembly;
(C) Nine percent (9%) to the Arkansas Division of Heritage
Special Fund Account to be used exclusively by the Division of Arkansas
Heritage as appropriated by the General Assembly; and
(D)(i) One percent (1%) to the Keep Arkansas Beautiful
Fund Account to be used exclusively by the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission
as appropriated by the General Assembly.
(ii) The Keep Arkansas Beautiful Fund Account also
shall consist of the special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(203).

19-43-267. Department of Health Technology Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
533 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Department of Health Technology Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Three dollars ($3.00) of the five-dollar fee levied by § 20-
7-123(b)(1)(F);
(2) The four-dollar fee levied by § 20-7-123(b)(1)(G)(i);
(3) The one-dollar fee levied by § 20-7-123(b)(1)(G)(ii); and
(4) Three dollars ($3.00) of the five-dollar fee levied by § 20-
7-123(b)(1)(H)(i)(a).
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Department of Health for
the purchase of computer hardware and software, the conversion cost of
scanning data into its computer system, and related activities.

19-43-268. Catastrophic Reserve Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Catastrophic Reserve Fund”.
(b) The Catastrophic Reserve Fund shall consist of such funds as may
be provided by the General Assembly.
(c) The Catastrophic Reserve Fund shall be used to distribute moneys
to one (1) or more funds or fund accounts in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-20-101 et seq.
(d)(1) After determining the estimated amount of general revenue that
will be available for allocation to the state agencies under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., and after making the determination
required by § 19-27-283(c) and prior to making any transfers deemed necessary
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State in § 19-27-283(d), the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may transfer funds from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund in
the event a revenue shortfall exists to meet the state's financial obligation
to provide an adequate educational system for the state and to provide for
the effective operation of state government. In the event the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State determines that a revenue shortfall exists as defined as
a circumstance when the official forecast of gross general revenue certified
by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is projected to increase less than
three percent (3%) over and above the gross general revenue collections of
the previous fiscal year due to changes in economic conditions, the Chief
534 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Fiscal Officer of the State may then transfer funds from the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund, as approved by a vote of at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members
of the Legislative Council or at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members of the
Joint Budget Committee, to various funds and fund accounts, as deemed
necessary, in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., for the
purpose of meeting unanticipated shortfalls in state general revenue.
(2) Or the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer funds
from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund to the Economic Development Superprojects
Project Fund for projects authorized under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
82, as approved by the Governor and at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members of
the Legislative Council or at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members of the
Joint Budget Committee.
(3)(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may make a one-time
transfer of up to fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) from the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund or its successor fund or fund accounts to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund before March 31, 2022.
(B) A transfer under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section
is not subject to the procedures established in subsection (e) of this
section.
(e)(1) Upon recommendation by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
the Governor may determine that circumstances exist that meet the
requirements for the utilization of the Catastrophic Reserve Fund as set out
in this section, and the procedures under this section shall apply.
(2) When the Governor determines there is a need requiring
transfer from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund, he or she shall instruct the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to prepare and submit written documentation
to the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee. Such documentation
shall include:
(A) Sufficient financial data that will enable the
verification of the existence of an emergency and the amount necessary to
address the need for funds from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund;
(B) A proposed distribution of moneys from the
Catastrophic Reserve Fund to one (1) or more funds or fund accounts in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., or to the Economic
Development Superprojects Project Fund, or both; and
(C) A statement certifying that no other funds are
535 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
available that could be transferred in lieu of the funds in the Catastrophic
Reserve Fund.
(3) Documentation under subdivision (e)(2) of this section shall
be submitted to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee for
approval before the implementation of the proposed distribution.
(4)(A) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after having
sought and received prior approval of at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members
of the Legislative Council or at least two-thirds (⅔) of the members of the
Joint Budget Committee, shall cause the required transfers to be made on his
or her books and on the books of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of
State from the Catastrophic Reserve Fund to the appropriate funds and fund
accounts in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., or to the
Economic Development Superprojects Project Fund, or both.
(B) In no event shall the amounts transferred in any
fiscal year to the funds and fund accounts in the Revenue Stabilization Law,
§ 19-20-101 et seq., by this section cause the general revenues to exceed the
maximum allocations authorized in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101
et seq.
(f) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general
revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the
General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums
in the appropriation acts for a state agency and the general revenue
allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that creating the Catastrophic Reserve Fund and establishing
the procedures for the transfer of funds to various funds and fund accounts
in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-20-101 et seq., or to the Economic
Development Superprojects Project Fund, or both, provides for the efficient
and effective operation of state government if a revenue shortfall is
determined to exist. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the
General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section.
The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
536 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
void.

19-43-269. One Percent to Prevent Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “One Percent to Prevent Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any federal funds or private
foundation grants.
(c) The fund shall be exclusively used by the Department of Human
Services to prevent the children of prisoners from becoming future prisoners.

19-43-270. Specialty Court Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Specialty Court Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of the specialty court program user fees
under § 16-10-701 and any other moneys provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for:
(1) Treatment services provided by the Division of Community
Correction as defined by and distributed under § 16-98-305(1)(E);
(2) Treatment services provided by the Department of Human
Services as defined by and distributed under § 16-98-305(2)(C);
(3) The cost of the evaluation of specialty court programs by
the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee as required under § 16-10-139;
and
(4) Drug and mental health crisis intervention centers.

19-43-271. Marine Sanitation Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Marine Sanitation Fund”.
(b) The Marine Sanitation Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(178);
(2) Twenty-four percent (24%) of those special revenues as
537 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
specified in § 19-42-201(20);
(3) Any unexpended balances of fees and fines for the use of the
Marine Sanitation Program remaining in the Public Health Fund on June 30,
2003; and
(4) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The Marine Sanitation Fund shall be used by the Department of
Health as provided in § 27-101-401 et seq.

19-43-272. Domestic Peace Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Domestic Peace Fund”.
(b)(1) The moneys collected under § 16-20-407, as designated under §
16-20-407(b)(2), and § 16-10-305(g) shall be deposited into the State
Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenue.
(2) The fund also shall consist of:
(A) That portion of special revenues specified in § 19-42-
201(172)(B);
(B) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources
that are designated to be credited to the fund;
(C) Moneys collected under § 17-19-301(d)(1)(F)(ii); and
(D) Other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic
Violence Commission as provided under the Arkansas Domestic Peace Act, § 9-4-
101 et seq.

19-43-273. Public School Facilities Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Public School Facilities Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 70,
shall be deposited as follows:
(A) If designated in § 19-41-201 as general revenues, the
moneys shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund
as special revenues; and
(B) If designated in § 19-42-201 as special revenues, the
538 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
moneys shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to be
distributed as provided by law.
(2) The distribution of municipal and county taxes collected
under the tax amnesty program created by Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 70,
is not affected by this section.
(3) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for improvements, construction, or repair
of public school facilities.

19-43-274. Shared Benefit Payment Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Shared Benefit Payment Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 19-60-107 shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the state agencies to pay vendors for
contracts entered into under § 19-60-107.
(d) The fund shall consist of the amount of taxes or fees collected
for the relevant time period less the baseline amount stated in each
technology purchase contract entered into pursuant to § 19-60-107, which
difference is attributable to the implementation and use of the technology
systems as provided in the contract and approved under the provisions of §
19-60-107(c).
(e) As soon as practical after the close of each month, each agency
purchasing official who has a technology purchase contract shall determine
the difference between the amount of taxes or fees collected and the contract
baseline amount and report these findings to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.
(f) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall certify to the
Treasurer of State the following:
(1) The amounts determined in subsection (e) of this section for
transfer to the fund; and
(2) That portion of the amount determined in subsection (e) of
539 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this section which is currently required to be paid to each technology
contract vendor.
(g) The Treasurer of State shall make the transfer of the amount
determined in subdivision (f)(1) of this section, after making the deduction
required from the net special revenues as set out in § 19-21-103(b)(2)(A).

19-43-275. Investor Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Investor Education Fund”.
(b) The Investor Education Fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(213); and
(2) An initial transfer of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) from the State Securities Department Fund.
(c) The Investor Education Fund shall be used to inform and educate
the public regarding investments in securities and to pay for costs and
expenses associated with conducting a stock market game for educational
purposes in the state's public school system, as provided in § 23-42-213.

19-43-276. Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 27-24-1303(c)(2)(C) shall be
deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special
revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c)(1) The moneys deposited into the fund shall be used by the
Secretary of State to satisfy the fee requirements for placement,
improvements to, or replacement of the monument or memorial area under § 19-
26-302(c).
(2) All maintenance and costs shall be approved by the Arkansas
Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Board and the Capitol Arts and Grounds
Commission.

540 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-43-277. Arkansas Citizens First Responder Safety Enhancement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Arkansas Citizens First Responder Safety Enhancement Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) of the fines collected under § 27-22-
111(a); and
(2) The fines collected under § 27-22-103(c)(1).
(c) The fund shall be used as appropriated by the General Assembly as
follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the fund shall be used for emergency
medical services; and
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the fund shall be used for local law
enforcement.

19-43-278. Public Legal Aid Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Public Legal Aid Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be authorized by
law.
(c) The fund shall be used for providing financial support for public
legal aid organizations and distributed as follows:
(1) Forty-five percent (45%) of the fund shall be paid to Legal
Aid of Arkansas; and
(2) Fifty-five percent (55%) of the fund shall be paid to the
Center for Arkansas Legal Services.

19-43-279. Spyware Monitoring Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Spyware Monitoring Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(228); and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Attorney General to offset his or
541 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
her salary and administrative expenses directly related to the enforcement of
the Consumer Protection Against Computer Spyware Act, § 4-111-101 et seq.,
and administration of the website required by the Consumer Protection Against
Computer Spyware Act, § 4-111-101 et seq.

19-43-280. Abandoned and Orphaned Well Plugging Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Abandoned and Orphaned Well Plugging Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(230);
(2) Proceeds from the transfer of a well, well-site equipment,
or hydrocarbons from the well as established by § 15-72-217(b)(2);
(3) Grants;
(4) Gifts; and
(5) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Oil and Gas Commission to provide
security if an oil well operator or a gas well operator, or both, fails to
perform plugging responsibilities under § 15-72-217 or fails to correct well
conditions that create an imminent danger to the health or safety of the
public, or threaten significant environmental harm or damage to property.

19-43-281. In God We Trust License Plate Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “In God We Trust License Plate Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(223); and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services to provide
quarterly cash grants to each senior citizen center in a similar method as is
used in the state's current system for distributing United States Department
of Agriculture money to the senior citizen centers to purchase raw food, and
for purchasing food for use in a home-delivered meal program, as set out in §
27-15-4904.
542 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-43-282. Arkansas Research Infrastructure Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Research Infrastructure Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly;
and
(2) Any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Science and Technology
of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the purposes delineated
under the Arkansas Research Alliance Act, § 15-3-301 et seq.

19-43-283. Arkansas Alternative Fuels Development Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Alternative Fuels Development Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys appropriated for the fund shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture to provide
grants to support alternative fuels producers, feedstock processors, and
alternative fuels distributors in Arkansas as provided under the Arkansas
Alternative Fuels Development Act, § 15-13-101 et seq., or as otherwise
provided by law.

19-43-284. Wildlife Recreation Facilities Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Wildlife Recreation Facilities Fund” administered by
the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues and any other revenues authorized by
law;
543 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Any moneys appropriated to it by the General Assembly; and
(3) Any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources.
(c) The fund shall be used by the division to develop criteria to
establish and fund the development and maintenance of wildlife recreation
facilities.

19-43-285. Cigarette Fire Safety Standard Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Cigarette Fire Safety Standard Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All certification fees paid under § 20-27-2105;
(2) All moneys recovered as civil penalties under § 20-27-2107;
and
(3) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Director of Arkansas Tobacco Control
to support fire safety and prevention programs.

19-43-286. Military Funeral Honors Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Military Funeral Honors Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 27-24-209(d)(7) shall be deposited
into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Veterans Affairs to
assist with the cost of providing military funeral honors at veterans'
funerals.

19-43-287. Digital Product and Motion Picture Office Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Digital Product and Motion Picture Office Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of revenues as authorized by law.
544 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be used for providing additional funds for duties
and functions of the Arkansas Film Commission of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission.
(d)(1) The fund shall be administered in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration.
(2) The department shall consult with the Arkansas Film
Commission of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

19-43-288. Arkansas Retirement Community Program Fund Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Retirement Community Program Fund Account”.
(b) The Arkansas Retirement Community Program Fund Account shall
consist of:
(1) Those special revenues as specified in § 19-42-201(243); and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The Arkansas Retirement Community Program Fund Account shall be
used by the Arkansas Economic Development Institute for payment of
administrative and personnel costs and other costs of the Arkansas
Association of Development Organizations associated with administering the
Arkansas Retirement Community Program, as set out in the Arkansas Retirement
Community Program Act, § 15-14-101 et seq.

19-43-289. State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Revenues generated under § 12-17-106; and
(2) Any moneys authorized by the General Assembly.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Finance and
Administration for the purpose of funding state grant awards for multi-
jurisdictional drug crime task forces to investigate and prosecute drug
crimes within the State of Arkansas, as set out in § 12-17-101 et seq.

545 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-43-290. Wildlife Observation Trail Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Wildlife Observation Trail Fund” administered by the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Those special revenues and any other revenues as may be
authorized by law;
(2) Any moneys appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly;
and
(3) Any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources.
(c) The fund shall be used by the department to develop criteria to
establish and fund the development and maintenance of wildlife observation
trails.

19-43-291. Arkansas Video Service Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Video Service Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 23-19-204 shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of State to review and
issue certificates of franchise authority.
(d) The fund may be used by the Secretary of State to issue refunds
and reimbursements of fees collected in regard to the purpose of the fund.

19-43-292. Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates Program
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be authorized by
law.
546 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall be used for providing program support for local
offices of the Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates program.

19-43-293. County Coroners Continuing Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “County Coroners Continuing Education Fund”.
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of those special revenues as specified
in § 19-42-201(246).
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for defraying the expenses of training
seminars and other educational projects benefiting county coroners in this
state as set out in §§ 14-15-308, 16-20-105, 16-20-110, and § 26-60-101 et
seq.

19-43-294. Fallen Law Enforcement Officers' Beneficiary Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Fallen Law Enforcement Officers' Beneficiary Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be authorized by
law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Commission on Law
Enforcement Standards and Training to provide such support and assistance to
beneficiaries of fallen law enforcement officers as determined to be
appropriate by the commission.

19-43-295. Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Alcoholic Beverage Control Fund”.
(b)(1) The registration fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each brand
label and brand label size collected under § 3-2-403 shall be deposited into
the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
547 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall use the fund to:
(1) Educate alcoholic beverage servers and law enforcement
personnel regarding state law and the division's rules;
(2) Promote alcohol safety awareness; and
(3) Enforce state law and the division's rules regarding
underage drinking.

19-43-296. Commercial Truck Safety and Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Commercial Truck Safety and Education Fund”.
(b)(1) Beginning October 1, 2013, the first two million dollars
($2,000,000) of the fee charged under § 27-14-601(a)(3)(G)(ii) for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2014, shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the
credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2014, the first two million dollars
($2,000,000) per fiscal year of the fee charged under § 27-14-
601(a)(3)(G)(ii) shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of
the fund as special revenues.
(3) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues as may be
authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation to improve the safety of the commercial truck industry through
cooperative public-private programs that focus on increased enforcement,
regulatory compliance, industry training, and educational programs to ensure
the safe movement of goods on state highways.

19-43-297. Arkansas Sheriffs' Association Education Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Sheriffs' Association Education Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association
exclusively for the performance of its duties as the official agency of the
sheriffs of this state, including without limitation:
(1) Receiving and using funds for a continuing study of ways to
improve the administration of sheriffs' offices; and
548 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Developing and improving education programs designed for
sheriffs' offices in Arkansas.

19-43-298. Bail Bond Recovery Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Bail Bond Recovery Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 17-19-301(g) shall be deposited
into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the recovery of forfeited
professional bonds.
(d) The Professional Bail Bond Company and Professional Bail Bondsman
Licensing Board shall promulgate rules concerning the disbursements of the
fund.
(e)(1) The board shall promulgate rules to suspend, revoke, or take
disciplinary action for noncompliance in failure to remit or pay fees under
this section or for failure to report under this section.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration may pursue any
appropriate legal remedy for the collection of and remittance of the
delinquent fees and penalties owed under this section against any entity that
has a duty to collect or remit these fees.

19-43-299. Interpreters between Hearing Individuals and Individuals
who are Deaf, Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Interpreters between Hearing Individuals and
Individuals who are Deaf, Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf Fund”.
(b)(1) All moneys collected under § 20-14-801 et seq. shall be
deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund as special
revenues.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Health to pay costs
549 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
related to the Advisory Board for Interpreters between Hearing Individuals
and Individuals who are Deaf, Deafblind, Hard of Hearing, or Oral Deaf and
the licensure of licensed qualified interpreters under § 20-14-801 et seq.

Subchapter 3 — Enumeration of Special Revenue Funds, Continued

19-43-301. State Aid Street Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “State Aid Street Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of one cent (1¢) per gallon tax from
revenue distributed under the Arkansas Highway Revenue Distribution Law, §
27-70-201 et seq., from the proceeds derived from existing motor fuel taxes
and distillate fuel taxes.
(c) The fund shall be used for construction, reconstruction, and
improvements of the state aid street system under the State Aid Streets Law,
§ 27-72-401 et seq.
(d)(1) All revenues deposited into the fund shall be apportioned to
the municipalities as prescribed in § 27-72-413 for the distribution on the
state aid street system among the various municipalities.
(2) The apportioned funds shall remain for a period of two (2)
years from the date they are apportioned.
(3) Any unused funds shall be returned to the fund for
redistribution in accordance with § 27-72-413.
(4)(A) For a municipality to receive these funds, the
municipality shall be matched in the ratio of ninety percent (90%) of moneys
from the fund to not less than ten percent (10%) municipal matching funds for
all municipalities with a population in excess of twenty-five thousand
(25,000) residents.
(B) For all other municipalities, the state aid street
system shall be funded at one hundred percent (100%), and all municipalities
receiving moneys from the fund shall comply with the State Aid Streets Law, §
27-72-401 et seq.

19-43-302. Road and Bridge Repair, Maintenance, and Grants Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
550 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Road and Bridge Repair, Maintenance, and Grants
Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys collected under § 26-58-124, as designated under §
26-58-124(c)(2); and
(2) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used for the maintenance, operation, and
improvement required by the Arkansas Department of Transportation in carrying
out the functions, powers, and duties stated in Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 42, §§ 27-65-102 — 27-65-107, 27-65-110, 27-65-122, and 27-65-124,
and the other laws of this state prescribing the powers and duties of the
department and the State Highway Commission.

19-43-303. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund. [Effective until
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met.]
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to the
credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., and the Unfair
Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
551 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-43-303. Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund. [Effective if
contingency in Acts 2023, No. 629, § 17, is met.]
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of the State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special
revenue fund to be known as the “Arkansas Tobacco Control Revenue Fund”.
(b)(1) All permit and license fees received by Arkansas Tobacco
Control under the Arkansas Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et
seq., and § 20-56-401 et seq., shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
special revenues to the credit of the fund.
(2) The fund also shall consist of any other revenues authorized
by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be used for expenses incurred by Arkansas
Tobacco Control in the organization, maintenance, operation, and merchant
education and training with regard to enforcement of § 5-27-227, the Arkansas
Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1977, § 26-57-201 et seq., § 20-56-401 et seq.,
and the Unfair Cigarette Sales Act, § 4-75-701 et seq.
(2) Expenditures of moneys in the fund are subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., and other applicable fiscal
laws.
(3) The receipts and disbursements of Arkansas Tobacco Control
shall be audited annually by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

19-43-304. Arkansas Highway Transfer Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Highway Transfer Fund”.
(b) The Arkansas Highway Transfer Fund shall be used to provide
additional funding to the Arkansas Department of Transportation for use in
constructing and maintaining the highways of this state.
(c) In the event revenues to the department are insufficient to fully
address the highway construction and maintenance needs of the state, the
department may provide a written document to the Governor outlining the
reasons that additional funding is needed and requesting that the Governor
provide a recommendation to the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
552 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Committee for review and approval of the transfer of funds in the Arkansas
Highway Transfer Fund to the Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.
(d) Upon review and approval of the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may transfer funds
from the Arkansas Highway Transfer Fund to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund as deemed necessary to provide additional funding to
address the highway construction and maintenance needs of the state.
(e) The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.

19-43-305. Arkansas Division of Heritage Special Fund Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Division of Heritage Special Fund Account”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) That portion of moneys collected from the excise tax of one-
eighth of one percent (⅛ of 1%) levied by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
75, as set out in § 19-43-266(b)(3)(C); and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively by the Division of Arkansas
Heritage as appropriated by the General Assembly.

19-43-306. Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Fund Account.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism Fund
Account”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) That portion of moneys collected from the excise tax of one-
eighth of one percent (⅛ of 1%) levied by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
75, as set out in § 19-43-266(b)(3)(B); and
(2) Any other funds authorized or provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
553 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Tourism for state park purposes as appropriated by the General Assembly.

19-43-307. Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fees collected under the Arkansas Industrial Hemp Production
Act, § 2-15-501 et seq.;
(2) Gifts, grants, and other funds both public and private; and
(3) Other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) Any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be
invested in the fund, and any interest or other income earned from the
investments, along with the unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund,
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward for purposes of the fund and
made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the industrial hemp
production program under the Arkansas Industrial Hemp Production Act, § 2-15-
501 et seq.

19-43-308. Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations
Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and
Operations Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained pursuant to § 17 of the Arkansas Medical
Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, from
taxation of medical marijuana; and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used to pay expenses of state agencies incurred
due to the passage of the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016,
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, and for transfers of the distributions
as set out by the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98.

554 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-43-309. Medical Marijuana Commission Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Medical Marijuana Commission Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Funds distributed under § 17(b) of the Arkansas Medical
Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98; and
(2) Other revenues and funds authorized by law.
(c) The Medical Marijuana Commission shall use the fund for the
administration of the commission and other purposes under the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98.

19-43-310. Domestic Violence Shelter Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Domestic Violence Shelter Fund”.
(b) The fund shall be used to provide funding for statewide grants
awarded to a statewide domestic violence entity under the Arkansas Domestic
Violence Shelter Act, § 9-6-101 et seq.
(c) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The special revenues collected under § 9-15-202(d) and § 16-
10-305(h);
(2) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(3) Any other revenues authorized by law.

19-43-311. Arkansas Wine Grants Fund.
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Wine Grants Fund”.
(2) The Arkansas Wine Grants Fund shall consist of fees
collected from grocery store wine permits under § 3-5-1802 and shall be
administered by the Department of Finance and Administration.
(b) Fifty percent (50%) of fees that are deposited into the Arkansas
Wine Grants Fund under § 3-5-1802 shall be transferred to the Arkansas
Agricultural Marketing Grants Fund to be used to make payments of grants
555 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under the grant program in § 3-5-901 et seq.
(c) Fifty percent (50%) of fees that are deposited into the Arkansas
Wine Grants Fund under § 3-5-1802 shall be transferred to the Tourism
Development Trust Fund for the purpose of land acquisition, construction,
lease, equipment acquisition, improvements, renovation, major maintenance,
personal services, maintenance, operating and staffing a wine tourism
facility and office space for the Arkansas Wine Producers Council within the
tourism facility in Franklin County, Arkansas.
(d) Any unused or undesignated fees at the end of the fiscal year
shall be transferred to the Tourism Development Trust Fund.

19-43-312. Law Enforcement Training Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Law Enforcement Training Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as may be collected under
§ 12-41-505 or as otherwise authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Commission on Law
Enforcement Standards and Training to establish and conduct training for law
enforcement officers, personnel, jailers, 911 operators, or other persons
determined by the commission to qualify for the training.

19-43-313. Feral Hog Eradication Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Feral Hog Eradication Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fines collected under § 2-38-504; and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Department of Agriculture for
expenses associated with the eradication efforts to eliminate feral hogs.

19-43-314. Arkansas Cyber Initiative Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Cyber Initiative Fund”.
556 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) All moneys appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly;
and
(2) Any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission for the purposes set out in the Arkansas Cyber Initiative Act, §
25-26-301 et seq.

19-43-315. Breast Milk Bank Special Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Breast Milk Bank Special Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fees collected under § 20-7-140;
(2) Moneys obtained from federal grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund;
(3) Gifts, grants, and other moneys both public and private; and
(4) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences for expenses of the Arkansas Breast Milk Bank.

19-43-316. Secretary of State Business and Commercial Services
Electronic Filing System Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a special revenue
fund to be known as the “Secretary of State Business and Commercial Services
Electronic Filing System Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) The processing fees collected under § 26-54-104(b)(1); and
(2) Any other revenues as may be authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of State to pay for the
maintenance and support of the business and commercial services electronic
filing system of the Secretary of State.
(d) The fund may be used by the Secretary of State to issue refunds
and reimbursements of processing fees collected for the annual franchise tax.
557 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

CHAPTER 44
TRUST FUND INCOME

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Trust Fund Income — Sources — Uses

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Trust Fund Income — Sources — Uses

19-44-201. Trust fund income.
Trust fund income consists of any amounts deposited into the State
Treasury, with the exception of the proceeds of the sale or redemption of
securities. The amounts shall be deposited to the credit of any of the trust
funds that are dedicated by law for specific purposes, the sources of which
are not derived from general or special revenues. Trust fund income includes
ad valorem taxes collected by the state for the sole benefit of local
governmental units.

CHAPTER 45
FEDERAL GRANTS, AIDS, AND REIMBURSEMENTS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Federal Grants, Aids, and Reimbursements — Sources — Uses

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Federal Grants, Aids, and Reimbursements — Sources — Uses

19-45-201. Federal grants, aids, and reimbursements.
Federal grants, aids, and reimbursements consist of all funds granted
to this state or any of its agencies under acts of the United States Congress
or by any agency of the United States Government. The funds so received are
considered as revenue of the fiscal year in which they are received. However,
those moneys received during the month of July may be classified as revenues
558 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of the preceding fiscal year on the books of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State upon investigation and subsequent determination by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State that failure to do so would cause undue harm to the
state or any of its agencies.

CHAPTER 46
NONREVENUE RECEIPTS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions [Reserved.]
Subchapter 2. Nonrevenue Receipts — Sources — Uses

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Nonrevenue Receipts — Sources — Uses

19-46-201. Nonrevenue receipts.
(a) Nonrevenue receipts consists of:
(1) The repayment of the principal amount of loans;
(2) The proceeds of the sale and redemption of securities,
including premiums received thereon;
(3) The transfer of funds, by warrants, between funds or fund
accounts on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;
(4) Federal reimbursement received by state agencies on account
of eligible expenditures for specific programs and deposited into funds or
fund accounts in the State Treasury classified other than federal;
(5) Refunds to the state or state agencies, departments, or
institutions; and
(6) Funds collected from drug manufacturers as rebates according
to promulgated regulations of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 1396 et seq., as amended, and deposited into the Arkansas Medicaid Rebate
Program Revolving Fund. These funds are transferrable to the Department of
Human Services Medicaid Paying Accounts Account for disbursement in the
Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(b) Refunds to expenditures consist of:
(1) Proceeds received from insurance policies for casualty
559 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
losses by state agencies, departments, or institutions;
(2) Proceeds received from vendors on account of overpayment of
obligations remitted by state agencies, departments, or institutions;
(3) Refunds to state agencies for cash advances or over
allocations made to other state and local agencies for subgrants;
(4) Refunds to state agencies for the erroneous payment or
overpayment of salaries to state employees;
(5) Proceeds derived from the maturity or redemption of
investments;
(6) Reimbursements to institutions of higher education for cash
fund expenditures for salaries that are properly chargeable to funds in the
State Treasury;
(7) Deposits by the counties in the State Aid Road Fund and in
the County Supplement Fund Account in the State Treasury for matching funds
available in the state aid road construction program;
(8) Reimbursements to state agencies for cost-sharing purposes;
(9) Federal reimbursements of expenses paid in advance by the
state on behalf of the United States Government; and
(10) Reimbursements by vendors or their agents for warranties,
product rebates, and service adjustments.
(c) The first eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) received each
fiscal year by the State of Arkansas under the State and Local Fiscal
Assistance Act of 1972, 31 U.S.C. § 6701, commonly referred to as the
“Revenue Sharing Act”, shall be transferred by the Treasurer of State to the
Federal Revenue Sharing State Highway Trust Fund Account in the Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund.
(d) Income derived from the sale of miscellaneous and junk inventories
whose ownership is questionable or when excessive administrative accounting
is required shall be deposited into the State Treasury as a nonrevenue
receipt, there to be credited to the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.

SUBTITLE 4. PURCHASING AND CONTRACTS

CHAPTER 60. GENERAL PROVISIONS
CHAPTER 61. ARKANSAS PROCUREMENT LAW
CHAPTER 62. BIDDING — STATE INDUSTRY PRIORITY
560 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
CHAPTER 63. FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SURPLUS PROPERTY
CHAPTER 64. ETHICS
CHAPTER 65. PROCUREMENT OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES
CHAPTER 66. PURCHASES OF WORK CENTER PRODUCTS AND SERVICES
CHAPTER 67. PROFESSIONAL AND CONSULTANT SERVICES CONTRACTS
CHAPTER 68. GUARANTEED ENERGY COST SAVINGS ACT
CHAPTER 69. PARTIAL EQUITY OWNERSHIP AGREEMENT EXECUTED BY A STATE
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
CHAPTER 70. CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-GENERAL CONTRACTOR METHOD OF PROCUREMENT
PILOT PROGRAM
CHAPTERS 71 — 89 [RESERVED.]

CHAPTER 60
GENERAL PROVISIONS

19-60-101. Responsibility of disbursing officer — Maintenance of files
by Office of State Procurement.
(a) The disbursing officer of each agency, board, commission,
department, or institution shall be responsible for reviewing all invoices
prepared by commercial printers or suppliers holding commercial contracts to
make certain that the charges to the agency, board, commission, department,
or institution are proper under the terms of the contract.
(b) The Office of State Procurement shall maintain complete files that
shall be open to public inspection on all commercial term and one-time
contracts. The files shall contain:
(1) A copy of the contract;
(2) A list of all printing or duplicating done or commodities
ordered, as well as the name of the invoiced agency; and
(3) A copy of all correspondence regarding the contract or jobs
performed thereunder.

19-60-102. Use of soybean ink in state printing.
Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, all printing that is
chargeable to or that is paid for with funds appropriated wholly or in part
by the state, or any state department, division, bureau, board, commission,
or agency, shall be printed in soybean ink; provided, however, that the
561 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
soybean ink is comparable in price to other inks, and that it is equally
suitable for use.

19-60-103. Penalty for violation of law.
A person who is found by a court of law to have knowingly violated any
state law in conjunction with the performance or acquisition of a contract
with the state is ineligible to contract with the state for a period of three
(3) years.

19-60-104. Equal opportunity policy — Purpose.
(a) The purpose of this section is to require any entity or person
bidding on a state contract, responding to a request for proposals regarding
a state contract, responding to a request for qualifications regarding a
state contract, or negotiating a contract with the state for professional or
consulting services to submit to the Office of State Procurement the most
current equal opportunity policy of the entity or person.
(b) The office and a state agency shall require a copy of the most
current equal opportunity policy of an entity or person to be filed with the
office or state agency for public inspection as a condition precedent to:
(1) Accepting a letter of intent, bid, proposal, or statement of
qualification with regard to a state contract from the entity or person; or
(2) Entering negotiations with the entity or person for a
professional or consulting services contract with the state.

19-60-105. Illegal immigrants — Prohibition — Public contracts for
services — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Contractor” means a person having a public contract with a
state agency for professional services, technical and general services, or
any category of construction in which the total dollar value of the contract
is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or greater;
(2) “Exempt agency” means the constitutional departments of the
state, the elected constitutional offices of the state, the General Assembly,
including the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee and supporting agencies and bureaus thereof, the Supreme Court, the
Court of Appeals, circuit courts, prosecuting attorneys, and the
562 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Administrative Office of the Courts;
(3) “Illegal immigrant” means any person not a citizen of the
United States who has:
(A) Entered the United States in violation of the
Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. §1101 et seq., or regulations
issued under the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1101 et seq.;
(B) Legally entered the United States but without the
right to be employed in the United States; or
(C) Legally entered the United States subject to a time
limit but has remained illegally after expiration of the time limit;
(4) “Professional services contract” means a contract between a
state agency and a contractor in which:
(A) The relationship between the contractor and the state
agency is that of an independent contractor rather than that of an employee;
(B) The services to be rendered consist of the personal
services of an individual that are professional in nature;
(C) The state agency does not have direct managerial
control over the day-to-day activities of the individual providing the
services;
(D) The contract specifies the results expected from the
rendering of the services rather than detailing the manner in which the
services shall be rendered; and
(E) Services rendered under a professional services
contract are rendered to the state agency itself or to a third-party
beneficiary;
(5) “Public contract for services” means any type of agreement
between a state agency and a contractor for the procurement of services and
all categories of construction with a state agency in which the total dollar
value of that contract is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or greater;
(6)(A) “State agency” means any agency, institution, authority,
department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the state
supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, except an exempt agency
under subdivision (a)(7)(B) of this section.
(B) “State agency” includes an exempt agency when any
agency or exempt agency procures any item subject to Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 54; and
563 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(7)(A) “Technical and general services” means:
(i) Work accomplished by skilled individuals
involving time, labor, and a degree of expertise in which performance is
evaluated based upon the quality of the work and the results produced;
(ii) Work performed to meet a demand, including
without limitation work of a recurring nature that does not necessarily
require special skills or extensive training; or
(iii) The furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a
contractor or vendor, not involving the delivery of any specific end product
other than reports that are incidental to the required performance.
(B) “Technical and general services” does not include the
procurement of professional services under § 19-65-101 et seq.
(b) A state agency shall not enter into or renew a public contract for
services with a contractor who knows that the contractor or a subcontractor
employs or contracts with an illegal immigrant to perform work under the
contract.
(c) Before executing a public contract, each prospective contractor
shall certify in a manner that does not violate federal law in existence on
January 1, 2007, that the contractor at the time of the certification does
not employ or contract with an illegal immigrant.
(d)(1) If a contractor violates this section, the state shall require
the contractor to remedy the violation within sixty (60) days.
(2)(A) If the contractor does not remedy the violation within
the sixty (60) days specified under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the
state shall terminate the contract for breach of the contract.
(B) If the contract is terminated under subdivision
(d)(2)(A) of this section, the contractor shall be liable to the state for
actual damages.
(e)(1)(A) If a contractor uses a subcontractor at the time of
certification, the subcontractor shall certify in a manner that does not
violate federal law in existence on January 1, 2007, that the subcontractor
at that time of certification does not employ or contract with an illegal
immigrant.
(B) A subcontractor shall submit the certification
required under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section within thirty (30) days
after the execution of the subcontract.
564 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) The contractor shall maintain on file the certification of
the subcontractor throughout the duration of the term of the contract.
(3) If the contractor learns that a subcontractor is in
violation of this section, the contractor may terminate the contract with the
subcontractor, and the termination of the contract for a violation of this
section shall not be considered a breach of the contract by the contractor
and subcontractor.

19-60-106. Data company — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Contractor” means a person having a public contract with a
public entity for storage services or software services;
(2) “Data” means recorded information, regardless of form or
characteristic;
(3) “Data company” means a contractor that provides software and
stores data for a public entity or provides storage services for a public
entity;
(4) “Entity of the state” means a department, institution of
higher education, board, commission, agency, quasi-public organization,
official, office, or employee, or an agency, instrumentality, or function
thereof;
(5) “Political subdivision of the state” means a county,
municipality, quasi-public organization, district, official, office, or
employee, or an agency, instrumentality, or function thereof;
(6)(A) “Public contract” means an agreement for the purchase of
commodities and services by a public entity.
(B) “Public contract” includes supplemental agreements;
(7) “Public entity” means an entity of the state or a political
subdivision of the state or a school;
(8) “School” means a public school district, charter school, or
education service cooperative, or a publicly supported entity having
supervision over public educational entities; and
(9) “Storage services” means the storage of data of a public
entity.
(b)(1) Data that is stored by a data company for a public entity is
the property of the public entity.
565 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) A data company shall not sell, disclose, or otherwise use
the data that is stored for any other purpose without express authorization
from the public entity unless the data is:
(A) Considered open; or
(B) Released in the public domain by the public entity.
(3) A data company shall comply with the Arkansas Information
Systems Act of 1997, § 25-4-101 et seq.
(c)(1) Upon the expiration or termination of a public contract, a data
company shall return all data to the public entity in the format specified in
the public contract and in a secure manner.
(2)(A) If the public contract does not specify a format for
return of the data, as an express term of the public contract, the data
company shall return all data to the public entity in a secure common data
format specified by the public entity in writing and delivered to the data
company within thirty (30) days after the expiration or termination of the
public contract.
(B) Notwithstanding the requirement of a public entity to
specify in writing the secure common data format for return of the data and
to deliver the data in that format to a data company under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section, a data company shall return all data to a public
entity in a usable format within sixty (60) days after the expiration or
termination of a public contract unless there is a contractual agreement that
specifies what data can be kept, how long the data can be kept, and the
purposes for which the data can be used by the data company.
(d)(1) A data company shall provide for the destruction of data still
in its possession in a secure manner such that data cannot be reconstructed
with backups or duplicate copies of data.
(2) The data company shall provide a certificate of destruction
and describe the methods used for destruction.
(3) Destruction of the data shall be effected:
(A) Upon written approval by the public entity that
acknowledges destruction of the data; and
(B) No later than six (6) months after the expiration or
termination of the public contract.
(e) This section does not prevent a public entity and a data company
from negotiating a public contract to determine the type of data format that
566 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
is acceptable for transferring data from a data company or from negotiating a
public contract that expressly contemplates alternate terms with regard to
data return or data destruction, which alternate terms shall prevail over
this section.

19-60-107. Contracts.
(a) An agency procurement official or procurement agent may enter into
contracts to acquire technology systems for performing the revenue-generating
functions and duties of the agency, including without limitation
registration, processing, and collection functions.
(b) Any contract entered into under this section between an agency
procurement official or procurement agent and a vendor of technology systems
shall provide for:
(1) Payment of the technology systems on the basis of a
percentage of the increase in the amount of specific taxes or fees collected,
including interest and penalties thereon, for a fixed time period, which
increase exceeds revenues projected prior to the project and is attributable
to the implementation and use of the technology system; or
(2) Payment of the technology system on a fixed fee contract
basis, the fee to be paid from the increase in the amount of specific taxes
or fees collected, including interest and penalties thereon, which increase
exceeds revenues projected prior to the project and is attributable to the
implementation and use of the technology system.
(c)(1) All contracts authorized by this section shall be entered into
pursuant to the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq.
(2) Before execution of the contract, the following process
shall be followed:
(A) The requesting agency shall request approval from the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services to prepare
a request for proposal for a project authorized under this section;
(B) The request shall include the general nature of the
project, the anticipated revenues that will be enhanced, and the forecasted
revenues for the current biennium;
(C) Upon approval of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, the requesting agency shall prepare a
request to the Department of Finance and Administration for approval to
567 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
prepare a request for proposal for a technology project authorized under this
subchapter;
(D) The request shall include the revenue source or
sources that will be increased as a result of the project and the projected
revenues for the anticipated life of the project;
(E) The requesting agency shall prepare a request for
proposal, with advice and consultation from the Department of Finance and
Administration, for the purchase of technology systems on the basis of a
portion of the increase in the agency's revenues produced by the technology
system; and
(F)(i) The request for proposal may provide that the
agency and the vendor may negotiate an amount or baseline upon which the
increase in taxes or fees is measured.
(ii) A contract other than a fixed fee contract
shall include a factor in the baseline calculation to account for an increase
in taxes or fees due solely to economic factors and not to the use of the
technology.
(3) The agency procurement official or procurement agent and the
vendor shall negotiate the contract, with the oversight of the Department of
Finance and Administration to assist in negotiating an advantageous contract.
(4)(A) The agency director shall submit the proposed contract
and a request for new appropriation to the Governor or his or her designee.
(B) The accompanying information shall include the
methodology used to calculate the baseline amount proposed by the agency and
other justifications and information that detail the program and the expected
benefits of the agreement.
(C) The Governor or his or her designee shall study the
request and determine whether the appropriation requested and the terms of
the proposed contract are in strict compliance with this section.
(D)(i) The Governor may approve or modify the request for
new appropriation and the proposed contract.
(ii) Any modification of the proposed contract shall
be submitted to the vendor for approval.
(5)(A) Upon approval of the shared benefit agreement and new
appropriation request, the Governor shall seek the advice and recommendation
of the Legislative Council.
568 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Upon review of the Legislative Council, the Governor
shall forward a copy of his or her approvals to the agency director and the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(d) After receipt of the Governor's approvals, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall direct the Auditor of State and the Treasurer of
State to establish upon their books of record the necessary appropriation
accounts in accordance with the provisions as set out in this section from
the shared benefit holding appropriation.
(e) The requesting agency may utilize these appropriations to
implement the approved contract.
(f) This section does not prohibit an agency that enters into a
contract under this section from acquiring goods or services through
appropriations for a function or program of that agency not specifically
included in a contract entered into under this section.
(g) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may promulgate such rules, procedures, and guidelines as he or she
may deem necessary and proper in order to carry out this section.

CHAPTER 61
ARKANSAS PROCUREMENT LAW

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Office of State Procurement — State Procurement Director
Subchapter 3. State Agencies — Agency Procurement Officials
Subchapter 4. Vendors — Contractors — Bidders
Subchapter 5. Source Selection and Contract Formation
Subchapter 6. Commodity Management
Subchapter 7. Conflict Resolution — Debarment
Subchapter 8. Intergovernmental Relations

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-61-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be referred to as the “Arkansas
Procurement Law”.

569 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-61-102. Purposes and policies.
The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are to:
(1) Simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing
procurement by this state;
(2) Permit the continued development of procurement policies and
practices;
(3) Provide for increased public confidence in the procedures
followed in public procurement;
(4) Ensure the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who
deal with the procurement system of this state;
(5) Provide increased economy in state procurement activities by
fostering effective competition; and
(6) Provide safeguards for the maintenance of a procurement
system of quality and integrity.

19-61-103. Definitions generally.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Agency procurement official” means a person authorized
by a state agency to enter into and administer contracts and make written
determinations and findings with respect to contracts, in accordance with
procedures prescribed by this chapter and the rules promulgated under it.
(B) “Agency procurement official” includes an authorized
representative acting within the limits of authority;
(2) “Business” means a corporation, partnership, individual,
sole proprietorship, joint-stock company, joint venture, or other legal
entity;
(3)(A) “Capital improvement” means all lands, buildings,
structures, utilities, on-site and off-site improvements, and other
appurtenant improvements, existing or future, and all construction, repairs,
alterations, and renovations thereof that are undertaken, owned, operated, or
otherwise managed by a state agency.
(B) “Capital improvement” does not include:
(i) Construction and reconstruction of roads and
bridges in the state highway system by the State Highway Commission; or
(ii) A building, facility, plant, structure, or
other improvement constructed by, or in behalf of, the Arkansas Department of
570 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Transportation or the State Highway Commission;
(4)(A) “Commodities” means all personal property, including
without limitation:
(i) Goods, as defined in § 4-2-105;
(ii) Leases, as defined in § 4-2A-103; and
(iii) Insurance.
(B) “Commodities” does not include:
(i) A lease on real property or a permanent interest
in real property;
(ii) Exempt commodities and services; and
(iii) Capital improvements;
(5)(A) “Contract” means all types of state agreements,
regardless of what they may be called, for the purchase of commodities and
services and for the disposal of surplus commodities and services not
otherwise exempt.
(B)(i) “Contract” includes:
(a) Awards and notices of award;
(b) Contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-
plus-a-fixed-fee, or incentive type;
(c) Contracts providing for the issuance of
job or task orders;
(d) Leases;
(e) Letter contracts; and
(f) Purchase orders.
(ii) “Contract” also includes supplemental
agreements with respect to any of the items listed under subdivision
(5)(B)(i) of this section.
(iii) “Contract” does not include a partial equity
ownership agreement as defined under § 19-69-101 et seq.;
(6) “Contract modification” means any written alteration in
specifications, delivery point, rate of delivery, period of performance,
price, quantity, or other provisions of a contract accomplished by mutual
action of the parties to the contract;
(7) “Contractor” means a person having a contract with a state
agency;
(8) “Data” means recorded information, regardless of form or
571 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
characteristic;
(9) “Debarment” means the disqualification of a person to
receive invitations for bids or requests for proposals or the award of a
contract by the state for a specified period of time commensurate with the
seriousness of the offense or the failure or the inadequacy of performance;
(10) “Designee” means a duly authorized representative of a
person holding a superior position;
(11) “Electronic” means electrical, digital, magnetic, optical,
or any other similar technology;
(12) “Employee” means an individual drawing a salary from a
state agency, whether elected or not, and a nonsalaried individual performing
personal services for an agency;
(13) “Exempt agencies” means the constitutional departments of
the state, the elected constitutional offices of the state, the General
Assembly, including the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee and supporting agencies and bureaus of the General
Assembly, the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, circuit courts,
prosecuting attorneys, and the Administrative Office of the Courts;
(14) “Exempt commodities and services” means:
(A) Advertising in newspapers, periodicals, and related
publications and on television, radio, billboards, and electronic media;
(B) Animals procured for medical research;
(C)(i) Commodities and services for use in research,
education, and treatment for the diagnosis, cure, and prevention of disease,
which may be procured with administrative approval through a group purchasing
entity serving other public health institutions when substantial savings are
available.
(ii) A report shall be filed annually with Arkansas
Legislative Audit reflecting the justification of and the estimated savings
accruing due to the use of the exemption under this subdivision (14)(C);
(D)(i) Commodities procured for resale in cafeterias,
commissaries, bookstores, gift shops, canteens, and other similar
establishments.
(ii) However, commodities procured under subdivision
(14)(D)(i) of this section shall not be sold or transferred to an agency with
the intent of circumventing applicable procurement procedures;
572 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(E)(i) Contracts awarded by agencies for the construction
of buildings and facilities and for major repairs.
(ii) Contract exemptions under subdivision
(14)(E)(i) of this section shall not extend to the procurement of commodities
not otherwise exempt that are to be furnished by the agency under the
contract;
(F) Contracts awarded by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of roads
and bridges in the state highway system and for the county, rural road aid,
and city street aid programs;
(G)(i) Farm products procured or sold by a state agency
having an agency procurement official.
(ii) The current trade customs with respect to the
procurement or sale of cotton, cotton seed, rice, and other farm products
shall be followed when it is necessary to obtain the best price for the
commodities procured or sold;
(H) Fees, including medical fees and physician fees;
(I) Foster care maintenance services provided by foster
family homes or a community provider that is licensed as a family style
residential home or that provides a family home setting approved by the
Division of Children and Family Services for children whose placement and
care are the responsibility of the Division of Children and Family Services;
(J) Freight and storage charges and demurrage;
(K) Licenses required prior to performance of services;
(L)(i) Livestock procured by an agency having an official
experienced in selection and procurement of livestock.
(ii) A procurement under subdivision (14)(L)(i) of
this section shall be reported to the State Procurement Director, giving
details of the purchase;
(M) Livestock procured for breeding, research, or
experimental purposes;
(N) Maintenance on office machines and technical
equipment;
(O) Medical items specifically requested by a physician
for treatment or diagnosis of patients in his or her care, including
prosthetic devices, surgical instruments, heart valves, pacemakers,
573 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
radioisotopes, and catheters;
(P) Membership in professional, trade, and other similar
associations;
(Q) Perishable foodstuffs for immediate use or processing;
(R) Postage;
(S) Published books, manuals, maps, periodicals, films,
technical pamphlets, and copyrighted educational aids for use in libraries
and for other informational or instructional purposes in instances in which
other applicable law does not provide a restrictive means for the acquisition
of these materials;
(T) Services of visiting speakers, lecturers, and
performing artists;
(U) Taxes;
(V) Travel expense items such as room and board and
transportation charges;
(W) Utility services or equipment that is defined,
recognized, and regulated by the Arkansas Public Service Commission as a
monopoly offering;
(X) Works of art for museum and public display;
(Y) Capital improvements valued at less than the amount
stated in § 22-9-203, subject to minimum standards and criteria of the
Building Authority Division;
(Z) Services related to work force development, incumbent
work force training, or specialized business or industry training;
(AA) The following commodities and services relating to
proprietary software after the initial procurement:
(i) Technical support incidental to supporting the
continuous operation of proprietary software;
(ii) Renewals;
(iii) Additional copies; and
(iv) License upgrades;
(BB) Commodities and raw materials purchased by Arkansas
Correctional Industries intended for use in goods for resale;
(CC) Commodities purchased by the Division of Correction
for crop production, including without limitation fertilizers, seed,
seedlings, and agricultural-related chemicals;
574 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(DD) Repair services for hidden or unknown damages to
machinery already purchased;
(EE) Commodities and services purchased by an academic
medical center using revenue derived from and used for patient care and
hospital enterprises; and
(FF) Commodities procured by the State Parks Division to
furnish and supply overnight lodging facilities with amenities, linens,
furniture, and general décor;
(15)(A)(i) “Grant” means the furnishing by the state of
assistance, whether financial or otherwise, to a person to support a program
authorized by law.
(ii) “Grant” does not include an award the primary
purpose of which is to procure an end product, whether in the form of
commodities or services.
(B) A contract resulting from such an award is not a grant
but a procurement contract;
(16) “May” means the permissive;
(17) “Paper product” means an item manufactured from paper or
paperboard;
(18) “Person” means a business, individual, union, committee,
club, or other organization or group of individuals;
(19) “Political subdivisions” means counties, municipalities,
and school districts;
(20)(A) “Procurement” means the buying, purchasing, renting,
leasing, or otherwise obtaining of any commodities or services.
(B) “Procurement” includes all functions that pertain to
the obtaining of any public procurement, including description of
requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of
contract, disposal of commodities, and all phases of contract administration;
(21) “Procurement agency” means a state agency that is
authorized by this chapter, by implementing rules, or by way of delegation
from the State Procurement Director to contract on its own behalf rather than
through the central contracting authority of the State Procurement Director;
(22)(A) “Procurement agent” means a person authorized by a state
agency not having an agency procurement official to enter into and administer
contracts and make written determinations and findings with respect to
575 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
contracts, in accordance with procedures prescribed by this chapter.
(B) “Procurement agent” includes an authorized
representative acting within the limits of authority;
(23)(A) “Public funds” means all state-appropriated and cash
funds of state agencies, as defined by applicable law or official ruling.
(B) Without necessarily being limited thereto, “public
funds” does not include:
(i) Grants, donations, research contracts, and
revenues derived from self-supporting enterprises that are not operated as a
primary function of the agency, no part of which funds are deposited into the
State Treasury; and
(ii) Revenue derived from patient care and self-
supporting hospital enterprises of an academic medical center;
(24) “Public notice” means the distribution or dissemination of
information to interested parties using methods that are reasonably
available, including publication in newspapers of general circulation, use of
electronic or paper mailing lists, and use of websites designated by the
State of Arkansas and maintained for that purpose;
(25)(A) “Purchase request” means that document, written or
electronic, in which a using agency requests that a contract be obtained for
a specified need.
(B) “Purchase request” may include without limitation the
technical description of the requested item, delivery schedule,
transportation, criteria for evaluation of solicitees, suggested sources of
supply, and information supplied for the making of a written or electronic
determination and finding required by this chapter;
(26) “Recycled paper” means paper that contains recycled fiber
in a proportion specified by the State Procurement Director;
(27)(A) “Services” means the furnishing of labor, time, or
effort by a contractor that does not produce tangible commodities.
(B) “Services” includes without limitation:
(i) Consulting services;
(ii) Personal services;
(iii) Professional services;
(iv) Technical and general services; and
(v) The furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a
576 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
contractor for the generation, customization, configuration, or development
of software and other intangible property other than technical support
incidental to the procurement of proprietary software.
(C) “Services” does not include employment agreements,
collective bargaining agreements, exempt commodities and services, or
architectural or engineering contracts requiring approval of the Building
Authority Division or the Division of Higher Education;
(28) “Shall” means the imperative;
(29) “Signature” means a manual, an electronic, or a digital
method executed or adopted by a party with the intent to be bound by or to
authenticate a record that is:
(A) Unique to the person using it;
(B) Capable of verification;
(C) Under the sole control of the person using it; and
(D) Linked to data in such a manner that if the data are
changed, the electronic signature is invalidated;
(30)(A) “State agency” means an agency, institution, authority,
department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the state
supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, except an exempt agency
pursuant to subdivision (13) of this section.
(B) “State agency” includes an exempt agency when an
agency or exempt agency procures an item subject to Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 54;
(31)(A) “State contract” means a contract for the procurement of
commodities or services in volume, awarded by the State Procurement Director.
(B) The contract may apply to all or part of the state;
(32) “State Procurement Director” means the person holding the
position created in § 19-61-202, as the head of the Office of State
Procurement;
(33) “Suspension” means the disqualification of a person to
receive invitations for bids, requests for proposals, or the award of a
contract by the state for a temporary period pending the completion of an
investigation and legal proceedings that may ensue because a person is
suspected upon probable cause of engaging in criminal, fraudulent, or
seriously improper conduct or failure or inadequacy of performance, which may
lead to debarment;
577 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(34)(A) “Technical and general services” means:
(i) Work accomplished by skilled individuals
involving time, labor, and a degree of expertise, in which performance is
evaluated based upon the quality of the work and the results produced;
(ii) Work performed to meet a demand, including
without limitation work of a recurring nature that does not necessarily
require special skills or extensive training; or
(iii) The furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a
contractor or vendor, not involving the delivery of any specific end product
other than reports that are incidental to the required performance.
(B) “Technical and general services” does not include the
procurement of professional services under § 19-65-101 et seq.;
(35) “Using agency” means a state agency that utilizes any
commodities or services purchased under this chapter; and
(36) “Written” or “in writing” means the product of any method
of forming characters on paper, other materials, or viewable screens, which
can be read, retrieved, and reproduced, including information that is
electronically transmitted and stored.

19-61-104. Applicability.
(a)(1) This chapter applies to:
(A) Every expenditure of public funds by this state,
acting through a state agency, under any contract; and
(B) The disposal of state commodities.
(2) This chapter does not apply to:
(A) Either grants or contracts between the state and its
political subdivisions or other governments, except as provided in §§ 19-61-
801 — 19-61-811; or
(B) Contracts between agencies, except as provided in §§
19-61-801 — 19-61-811.
(b) This chapter does not preclude the acceptance of gifts and
donations in the manner authorized by law.

19-61-105. Exemptions.
(a) An out-of-state off of a state agency need not procure commodities
and services for the use of the out-of-state office through the Office of
578 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State Procurement.
(b) Commodities and services procured outside the Office of State
Procurement under subsection (a) of this section shall be procured subject to
the requirements of this chapter and the state procurement rules.

19-61-106. Construction — Preemption of other laws.
This chapter shall:
(1) Be construed liberally and applied to promote its underlying
purposes and policies; and
(2) Preempt any conflicting state statutes and principles of
common law or equity.

19-61-107. Operation of other laws.
Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the
principles of law and equity, including the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-
101 et seq., of this state, the law merchant, and law relative to capacity to
contract, agency, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, or
bankruptcy supplement this chapter.

19-61-108. Obligation of “good faith” — Definition.
(a) Every contract or duty within this chapter imposes an obligation
of good faith in its performance or enforcement.
(b) As used in this section, “good faith” means honesty in fact in the
conduct or transaction concerned and the observance of reasonable commercial
standards of fair dealing.

19-61-109. Existing contracts.
The administration of contracts in existence on July 1, 1979, are the
responsibility of the appropriate officials described in this chapter.

19-61-110. Federal assistance requirements.
If federal assistance requirements or federal contract requirements
conflict with this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, nothing
in this chapter or its rules shall prevent a state agency or political
subdivision from complying with the terms and conditions of the federal
assistance requirements or the federal contract requirements.
579 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-61-111. Determinations and findings.
Written determinations and findings required by this chapter shall be
retained in an official contract file by the Office of State Procurement or
by the state agency administering the contract for a period of five (5)
years.

19-61-112. Compliance reporting.
(a) Each report required under this chapter shall be copied to the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, who shall
review each report for compliance with the fiscal responsibility and
management laws of the state under the State Fiscal Management Responsibility
Act, § 19-1-501 et seq.
(b) If the secretary determines that a state agency, agency
procurement official, or state official or employee may be in violation of
the fiscal responsibility and management laws of the state under the State
Fiscal Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-501 et seq., the secretary shall
notify the chief executive officer of the relevant state agency.

19-61-113. Penalty for intentional violation.
A person who purposely violates state procurement laws, Arkansas Code
Title 19, Subtitle 4, upon conviction is guilty of a Class D felony.

19-61-114. Tracking requirements.
(a) The State Procurement Director, each agency procurement official,
and any state agency with procurement authority under a delegation order
shall track the following for the procurements they conduct and the contracts
they execute:
(1) Each protest received and the resolution of the protest;
(2) The outcome of any negotiations under this subtitle; and
(3) The anticipated procurement needs of the state agency based
on the contracts that:
(A) Are set to expire during the next twelve (12) months;
and
(B) Will require a new solicitation in the next twelve
(12) months.
580 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) Each agency procurement official and each state agency with
procurement authority under a delegation order shall report the information
obtained under subsection (a) of this section to the Office of State
Procurement.

19-61-115. Requests for information — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “request for information” means a
procedure for formally requesting information, data, comments, or reactions
from prospective bidders or offerors in contemplation of a possible
competitive sealed bidding procurement under § 19-61-505 or a competitive
sealed proposal procurement under § 19-61-506.
(b) The State Procurement Director, a head of a procurement agency, or
a designee of the director or of a head of a procurement agency, may issue or
authorize another person to issue a request for information.
(c) A request for information under this section shall be published in
the same manner and location as an invitation for bids, a request for
proposals, or a request for qualifications.
(d) A contract shall not be awarded directly from a request for
information.
(e) Information provided in response to a request for information
under this section is exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §
25-19-101 et seq., until:
(1) The bids for a competitive sealed bidding procurement are
opened publicly;
(2) The notice of anticipation to award is given for a
competitive sealed proposal procurement; or
(3) A decision is made not to pursue a procurement based on the
request for information.

19-61-116. Submission of contracts required — Definition.
(a)(1) Except for critical emergency procurements and as otherwise
provided in this section, a contract requiring the services of one (1) or
more persons shall be presented to the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, to the Joint Budget Committee, if the annual contract
amount is at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any one (1) contract
year or if the total projected contract amount, including any amendments or
581 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
possible extensions, is at least three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000).
(2) The Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee shall
provide the State Procurement Director with its review as to the propriety of
the contract within thirty (30) days after receipt of the proposed contract.
(3) The contract shall not be submitted to the Legislative
Council or to the Joint Budget Committee until the Office of State
Procurement has reviewed the contract and provided the Legislative Council or
the Joint Budget Committee with a recommendation regarding the legality of
the contract.
(4)(A)(i) A contract that does not have a material change upon
renewal or extension shall be included in the monthly report required under §
19-61-210 instead of being submitted to the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee for review under this subsection.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(4), “material
change” includes without limitation:
(a) An increase in the contract amount;
(b) An increase in the total projected
contract amount;
(c) A change in any of the essential terms of
the contract;
(d) A change in any performance-based
standards stated in the contract;
(e) The imposition of financial consequences
as the result of a failure to satisfy performance-based standards under § 19-
61-517 during the year preceding the renewal or extension of the contract;
and
(f) The submission of a vendor performance
report during the year preceding the renewal or extension of the contract.
(B) However, a state agency may elect to submit a contract
for review under this subsection if the state agency is uncertain whether the
contract has a material change.
(5) A contract that is submitted for review under this
subsection and that has a total projected contract amount of at least three
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) shall have a cover sheet that
provides the following information:
582 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) A description of the services being procured;
(B) A description of the procurement process followed,
including without limitation the method used for the procurement; and
(C) The outcome of any protests.
(b) The Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee may review
or exempt from review any contract or group of contracts contemplated by this
section.
(c) A contract that is procured by a state agency that has a state
agency procurement official or procurement authority under a delegation order
is subject to the presentment requirements under this section.
(d) It is a violation of state procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title
19, Subtitle 4, for a state agency official to procure services in an
incremental or split purchase arrangement to avoid the presentment
requirements of this section.

19-61-117. Rules.
(a)(1) The State Procurement Director shall adopt rules in accordance
with the applicable provisions of this chapter and of the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2) A rule promulgated by the director under this chapter is not
effective until the rule is:
(A) Submitted to and reviewed by the Review Subcommittee
of the Legislative Council; and
(B) Reviewed and approved by the Legislative Council under
§ 10-3-309.
(b) A rule shall not change any commitment, right, or obligation of
the state or of a contractor under a contract in existence on the effective
date of the rule.
(c)(1) A clause that is required by rule to be included is not
incorporated by operation of law in any state contract without the consent of
both parties to the contract to the incorporation.
(2) The parties to the contract may give such consent to
incorporation by reference at any time after the contract has been entered
into and without the necessity of consideration passing to either party.

Subchapter 2 — Office of State Procurement — State Procurement Director
583 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-61-201. Office of State Procurement.
(a) There is created within the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services the Office of State Procurement to be administered by the
State Procurement Director.
(b)(1) The Office of State Procurement shall be subject to the
supervision and management of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services.
(2) The rules authorized in this chapter shall be approved by
the secretary before the filing of the rules in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

19-61-202. State Procurement Director.
(a)(1) The executive head of the Office of State Procurement is
designated as the administrator of the Office of State Procurement, and as
such, he or she shall be known and designated as the “State Procurement
Director”.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services shall appoint the State Procurement Director.
(b) The director shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, of good
moral character, and of demonstrated ability or capacity in the field of
purchasing commodities and services.

19-61-203. Powers and duties of State Procurement Director.
(a) The State Procurement Director shall serve as the principal
procurement officer of the state.
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and upon the
approval of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services, the State Procurement Director shall have the authority and
responsibility to promulgate rules consistent with this chapter.
(2) In addition, consistent with this chapter, the director may
adopt rules governing the internal procedures of the Office of State
Procurement.
(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the
director, within the limitations of this chapter and the rules promulgated
under authority of this chapter:
584 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Shall procure or supervise the procurement of all
commodities and services for each state agency not having an agency
procurement official and, when requested to do so by such an official,
procure commodities and services not otherwise under state contract;
(2) Shall manage and establish internal procedures for the
office;
(3) Shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of surplus
commodities belonging to the state;
(4) May establish and maintain programs for the inspection,
testing, and acceptance of commodities and services;
(5) Shall establish and manage a list of vendors desiring
written notice of invitations for bid;
(6) May establish, by rule, a fee for receiving a written or
electronic notice of invitations for bid;
(7) Shall ensure compliance with this chapter and implementing
rules by reviewing and monitoring procurements conducted by any designee,
department, agency, or official delegated authority under this chapter;
(8) Shall create a roster of expiring contracts entered into by
a state agency for which there is no new requisition;
(9) Shall analyze information captured in state systems to
measure and track the contract routing process to identify stakeholders that
may be contributing to the elongation of the contracting process;
(10) Shall ensure that vendor performance reports are available
to and searchable by state agencies;
(11) Shall provide for enhanced training on the drafting of
specifications for procurements;
(12) Shall maintain records of bids and proposals that are
rejected by the office for failure to adhere to the mandatory requirements of
a solicitation;
(13) Upon the written request of a state agency or an actual or
prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor, may declare his or her
administrative interpretation of any provision of this chapter and issue an
advisory opinion regarding the construction and application of the provision;
and
(14) May negotiate and enter into a nonmandatory state contract
with retailers for special prices or rates for commodities or services, or
585 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
both, for the benefit of public procurement entities, independent of the
source selection methods in §§ 19-61-502 and 19-61-505, if the contractor
agrees to provide the commodities or services, or both, subject to the
contract at either the standard retail price or a discounted price.

19-61-204. Assistants and designees — Written delegation orders.
(a) Subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-
5-201 et seq., and the approval of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, the State Procurement Director may:
(1) Employ and supervise such assistants and other persons as
may be necessary and fix their compensation as provided by law; and
(2)(A) Delegate authority to designees or to a state agency by
issuing a written delegation order, within the limitations of state law and
the state procurement rules.
(B) A written delegation order issued under this section
shall:
(i) Include an expiration date for the written
delegation order;
(ii) Be publicly posted on the official website of
the Office of State Procurement;
(iii) Remain in effect under the original terms
unless the terms of the written delegation order are modified or rescinded in
writing by the director;
(iv) Not be issued for a term that exceeds two (2)
years; and
(v) Be narrowly tailored if the written delegation
order is based on the type of commodity or service being procured.
(C) The director shall maintain records of each written
delegation order issued under this section.
(D) A person who is to be given authority under a written
delegation order issued under this section shall complete training on state
procurement laws, as provided for in this chapter and in the rules adopted by
the director, before the written delegation order is issued.
(b) The director shall adopt rules to:
(1) Implement the requirements for written delegation orders
under this section; and
586 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Outline the procurement training required under this
section.

19-61-205. Legal counsel — Contract review.
(a) The Attorney General shall act as counsel for the State
Procurement Director in preparation of necessary contracts and in all legal
matters.
(b)(1) A contract that the director has designated as requiring review
shall be reviewed by a person employed as an attorney with a state agency.
(2) The review required under this subsection shall occur before
the contract is executed.
(c) The director shall adopt rules to implement this section,
including without limitation rules to:
(1) Designate contracts that require review under this section,
which may include without limitation contracts that:
(A) Exceed a certain dollar amount;
(B) Modify the standard state terms and conditions; and
(C) Are based on other stated criteria; and
(2) Identify the requirements for the attorneys who may review
contracts under this section, including without limitation:
(A) An attorney employed with the Office of State
Procurement, an institution of higher education, or the Office of the
Attorney General; and
(B) Any other attorney employed by the state and licensed
to practice law in Arkansas.

19-61-206. Exclusive jurisdiction over procurement — Definitions.
(a) The State Procurement Director has exclusive jurisdiction over the
procurement of:
(1) Items subject to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 54;
(2) Wholesale gasoline, oil, and related products;
(3) Tires;
(4)(A) Passenger motor vehicles and trucks, except highway
construction and highway maintenance equipment, any specialized type of
equipment used in highway construction, or a motor vehicle purchased under §
6-21-307, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
587 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) The director may issue a request for qualifications
for the procurement of passenger motor vehicles and trucks to compile a
qualified vendor list that includes vendors in multiple areas of the state;
(5) Paper products;
(6) New and used school buses for state agencies;
(7) A purchasing card program and travel card program to include
implementation and administration; and
(8) An electronic commerce procurement solution to include
planning and administration consistent with the established financial systems
of the state.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Printing” means the process of transferring images, by the
use of standard industrial type printer ink, upon documents such as
letterhead, envelopes, pamphlets, booklets, and forms;
(2) “Stationery” means imprinted letterhead and envelopes used
by the General Assembly and other departments of state government to identify
an individual department, agency, board, commission, etc.; and
(3) “Supplies” means paper and inks used to produce stationery.

19-61-207. Commodities, technical and general services, and
professional and consultant services under state contract.
(a)(1) In addition to establishing a state contract for those
commodities, technical and general services, and professional and consultant
services within the exclusive jurisdiction of the State Procurement Director
under § 19-61-206, the director may award a mandatory state contract for
other commodities, technical and general services, and professional and
consultant services when the director determines that combining the
collective purchasing power of the state would be beneficial to the state.
(2) The director shall submit a mandatory state contract that is
not for commodities or services within the exclusive jurisdiction of the
director to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
session, to the Joint Budget Committee, for review.
(b)(1) Unless an exemption is approved by the director under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a state agency that requires commodities,
technical and general services, and professional and consultant services that
are under a mandatory state contract shall procure these commodities,
588 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
technical and general services, and professional and consultant services
exclusively under the mandatory state contract.
(2)(A) Except as provided in § 19-61-508, the director may
approve an exemption from a mandatory state contract awarded under this
section only if the state agency demonstrates that substantial savings will
likely be effected by purchasing outside of the mandatory state contract.
(B)(i) Approval of an exemption from a mandatory state
contract under this section shall be in writing.
(ii) Denial of a request for an exemption from a
mandatory state contract under this section is not required to be in writing.
(c) All contracts concerning commodities, technical and general
services, and professional and consultant services shall disclose a projected
total cost, including without limitation expenditures that may be incurred
under all available periods of extension if the extensions were executed.
(d) The director shall:
(1) Identify and prioritize opportunities for awarding mandatory
state contracts under this section;
(2) Conduct mandatory state contract procurements under this
section that would produce savings for the state;
(3) Attempt to invite the participation of the potentially
affected state agencies in the development and evaluation of a mandatory
state contract procurement;
(4) Post notice of his or her intent to procure a mandatory
state contract on the official website of the Office of State Procurement;
and
(5)(A) Promote the use of mandatory state contracts among county
and city governments, including without limitation making information about
the mandatory state contracts readily available and searchable.
(B) The director shall adopt rules to include any
necessary conditions, reporting, or document retention standards related to
the director's duty to promote mandatory state contract use under this
subsection.

19-61-208. Recommendations.
(a) The State Procurement Director shall maintain a close and
cooperative relationship with the using agencies.
589 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b)(1) The director shall afford each using agency reasonable
opportunity to participate in and make recommendations with respect to
matters affecting the using agency.
(2) At any time, a using agency may make recommendations to the
director, and the director may make recommendations to a using agency.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may make recommendations to the director.

19-61-209. Statistical data.
The State Procurement Director and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services shall cooperate with the Division of
Budgets and Accounting in the preparation of statistical data concerning the
procurement and disposition of all commodities and services, unless otherwise
provided in this chapter.

19-61-210. Reporting requirements.
(a) The State Procurement Director shall compile a monthly report of
all executed contracts for services that have a total initial contract amount
or a total projected contract amount, including any amendments or possible
extensions, of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) but less than:
(1) An annual contract amount of fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) in any one (1) contract year; or
(2) A total projected contract amount, including any amendments
or possible extensions, of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000).
(b) A contract that is procured by a state agency that has a state
agency procurement official or procurement authority under a delegation order
is subject to the reporting requirements under this section.
(c) The State Procurement Director shall adopt rules to:
(1) Prescribe a cover sheet for the report required under this
section that sorts and identifies contracts within the report that may be
candidates for review;
(2) Create instructions for completing the cover sheet
prescribed under subdivision (c)(1) of this section; and
(3) Provide for the identification of any contracts included in
the report that may need to be reviewed under § 19-61-116.
(d) It is a violation of state procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title
590 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19, Subtitle 4, for a state agency official to procure services in an
incremental or split purchase arrangement to avoid the reporting requirements
of this section.

Subchapter 3 — State Agencies — Agency Procurement Officials

19-61-301. Agency procurement officials.
(a) In addition to any state agency authorized by rule to have an
agency procurement official, each of the following state agencies may elect
to have such an official for commodities, technical and general services, and
professional and consultant services, that are not within the exclusive
jurisdiction of the State Procurement Director and that are not under state
contract:
(1) Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(2) Arkansas State University-Beebe;
(3) Arkansas State University;
(4) Arkansas State University system;
(5) Arkansas Tech University;
(6) Henderson State University;
(7) Southern Arkansas University;
(8) University of Arkansas at Fayetteville;
(9) University of Arkansas Fund entities;
(10) University of Arkansas at Little Rock;
(11) University of Arkansas at Monticello;
(12) University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff;
(13) University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;
(14) University of Central Arkansas;
(15) Arkansas State University-Mountain Home;
(16) Arkansas State University-Newport;
(17) Black River Technical College;
(18) Cossatot Community College of the University of Arkansas;
(19) East Arkansas Community College;
(20) National Park College;
(21) Arkansas Northeastern College;
(22) Arkansas State University Mid-South;
(23) North Arkansas College;
591 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(24) Northwest Arkansas Community College;
(25) Arkansas State University Three Rivers;
(26) Ozarka College;
(27) Phillips Community College of the University of Arkansas;
(28) University of Arkansas Community College at Morrilton;
(29) University of Arkansas — Pulaski Technical College;
(30) University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain;
(31) SAU-Tech;
(32) Southeast Arkansas College;
(33) South Arkansas College;
(34) University of Arkansas Community College at Batesville;
(35) University of Arkansas Community College at Hope-Texarkana;
(36) University of Arkansas at Fort Smith; and
(37) Division of Higher Education.
(b)(1) Each official shall manage and establish internal procedures
for the procurement office of the state agency authorized to have the
official to ensure adequate administrative procedures and controls pursuant
to law and the procurement rules.
(2)(A) Approval by the Office of State Procurement of contracts
administered by the official shall not be required, unless a determination
has been made by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services that administrative procedures and controls are not adequate.
(B)(i) Such a determination shall result in notification
by the secretary of the specific deficiencies and the reasons therefor.
(ii) After the notification, approval of contracts
by the Office of State Procurement shall be required until the secretary
determines that the deficiencies have been corrected.
(c) Except for the promulgation by the director of rules authorized in
this chapter and the letting of state contracts, all rights and practices
granted in this chapter to the Office of State Procurement and the director
are granted to an official in the administration of contracts for the state
agency authorized to have the official.
(d) This section does not prohibit a state agency from utilizing the
Office of State Procurement in the same manner as state agencies not
authorized to have officials.

592 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-61-302. Agency procurement official for Division of Correction.
(a) In addition to those agencies, institutions, and departments of
state government enumerated in § 19-61-301 that may elect to have agency
procurement officials for commodities, technical and general services, and
professional and consultant services that are not within the exclusive
jurisdiction of the State Procurement Director, that are not under state
contract, and which are not procured in accordance with § 19-61-506, the
Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction may have such
officials for the sole purpose of procuring perishable food items, who shall
possess all powers, functions, and duties as authorized for agency
procurement officials under this chapter with respect to perishable food
items only.
(b)(1) The officials of the Division of Correction and the Division of
Community Correction have exclusive authority to procure perishable food
items in accordance with applicable administrative procedures and controls
established pursuant to this chapter and the procurement rules.
(2) Except as noted in this subsection and in subsection (c) of
this section, the officials of the Division of Correction and the Division of
Community Correction are subject to all other provisions and requirements of
this chapter and administrative procedures controls and procurement rules
provided in or promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
(c)(1)(A) The Board of Corrections, annually, and at more frequent
intervals if deemed necessary, shall make studies and determine whether it
would be in the best interest of the management of the farm croplands at the
farm units or at each of the separate farm units of the Division of
Correction to provide for the lease of farm machinery and equipment, or
certain items thereof, required for the production of farm crops, or whether
it would be in the better interest of the Division of Correction to acquire
such items of farm machinery and equipment by purchase.
(B)(i) Upon conclusion of the study, the board, by
resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board at a regular or
special meeting, may authorize the agency procurement official for the
Division of Correction to advertise for bids for the leasing of farm
equipment or for the purchase of the items of farm equipment noted in the
resolution.
(ii)(a) A lease of farm equipment shall not be for
593 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
more than two (2) years nor extend beyond June 30 of the fiscal biennium for
which current funds have been appropriated for the operation of the Division
of Correction.
(b) However, this section does not prohibit
the lease from including provisions, terms, or conditions upon which the
lease may be renewed for an additional period of time, not exceeding two (2)
years, at the option of the board.
(2)(A) If the board determines to provide for the leasing of
farm machinery or equipment necessary in the farming operations of the
Division of Correction, the official of the Division of Correction shall be
the exclusive purchasing agent for advertising of bids and awarding of
contracts for the leases, subject to the approval of the Director of the
Division of Correction and the board.
(B) In the advertising for bids and the awarding of
contracts, the state laws, procurement procedures, and rules shall be
complied with in awarding the contracts.
(C)(i) The board is not required to award the contract for
the furnishing of farm machinery and equipment under a lease agreement to the
lowest bidder, unless the board determines that the awarding of the contract
to the lowest bidder would be in the best interest of the farming operations
of the Division of Correction.
(ii) In that event, the board may award the contract
to the bidder whose bid proposal is deemed by the board to be in the better
interest of the farming operations of the Division of Correction.
(D) In making a determination under subdivision (c)(2)(C)
of this section, the board shall consider without limitation the following
factors:
(i) The type of equipment to be furnished;
(ii) Compatibility of the equipment with the
training and experience of the farm managers and employees of the Division of
Correction and the experience and skills of the inmates who will be using the
equipment;
(iii) Provisions contained in the bid proposal
providing for maintenance, repair, and service and upkeep of the equipment
during the lease period, availability of the service and repair facilities,
and source of replacement or repair parts;
594 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(iv) The age and condition of the equipment to be
leased; and
(v) Such other factors as the board deems essential
to performance under the contract and dependability and reliability of the
equipment to be furnished during the period of the lease.
(3)(A)(i) In determining the items of farm machinery and
equipment to be acquired by purchase, the board may designate, if the board
determines it to be within the better interest of the management of farm
croplands of the Division of Correction, those items of farm machinery and
equipment to be purchased.
(ii) The board may restrict the bid to equipment
produced by no fewer than two (2) manufacturers of each item of equipment.
(B) In making a determination under subdivision (c)(3)(A)
of this section, the board shall include without limitation a consideration
of the following factors:
(i) The types of farm machinery equipment now being
used by the Division of Correction and the experience gained by the Division
of Correction in the use of the equipment for the purposes for which it is
being purchased;
(ii) Availability of service and replacement and
spare parts for the equipment;
(iii) Familiarity with the equipment of the
employees or inmates responsible for the maintenance, repair, and upkeep
thereof;
(iv) Compatibility of the farm machinery and
equipment with repair and maintenance shop facilities available at the
Division of Correction;
(v) Access to the dealer responsible for warranty
service; and
(vi) Such additional factors as the board deems
pertinent to the better interests of the management and operation of the farm
crop lands of the Division of Correction.
(C)(i) All purchases of farm machinery and equipment shall
be in accordance with the applicable state procurement laws and rules
promulgated under the applicable state procurement laws.
(ii) Contracts for the providing or furnishing of
595 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
service, repair, and replacement parts of farm machinery and equipment may
include provision for the furnishing of a stated quantity of replacement and
spare parts to be stored at the Division of Correction or may include
contract prices for major or standard items of service or for the furnishing
of replacement and spare parts at stated prices, which shall be at a discount
from the published dealer price list, as the board may deem in the best
interest of the Division of Correction.
(iii) As an alternative, the board may elect to
authorize the official to acquire replacement and spare parts on a need basis
by following the applicable state procurement procedure in the acquisition of
each item thereof as needed.
(4)(A) The official of the Division of Correction acting under
the instruction and direction of the board and the Director of the Division
of Correction shall be the sole and exclusive purchasing agent for the
acquisition of:
(i) Farm machinery and equipment, whether by lease
or purchase;
(ii) Repair services for farm machinery and
equipment and repair and replacement parts for farm machinery and equipment
in the manner set forth in this section; and
(iii) Those items covered in subsection (b) of this
section.
(B) This section does not prohibit the Division of
Correction from requesting the State Procurement Director to make available
the services of the Office of State Procurement in the acquisition of any
item for which the official of the Division of Correction is the exclusive
purchasing agent under this section.

19-61-303. Interest and carrying charges.
State agencies, including exempt agencies, may enter into contracts
that contemplate the payment of interest and late charges, but only when such
late charges are incurred sixty (60) days after payment is due or carrying
charges under such rules as may be promulgated by the State Procurement
Director.

19-61-304. Training and certification of procurement personnel.
596 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) The State Procurement Director shall establish a training and
certification program to facilitate the training, continuing education, and
certification of state agency procurement personnel.
(b) As part of the training and certification program required under
this section, the director:
(1) Shall conduct procurement education and training for state
agency employees and other public employees;
(2)(A) Shall establish a tiered core curriculum that outlines
the minimum procurement-related training courses a state agency employee is
required to complete for certification.
(B) The tiered core curriculum required under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall:
(i) Be designed to develop procurement competency;
and
(ii) Create a uniform training approach for state
agency employees ranging from entry-level procurement personnel to agency
procurement officials;
(3) May charge a reasonable fee for each participant to cover
the cost of providing the training required under this section;
(4) May conduct, develop, and collaborate with established
training programs, if any, for the purpose of providing certifications of
proficiency to state agency employees who complete the training and
certification program;
(5) May conduct research into existing and new procurement
methods; and
(6) May establish and maintain a state procurement library.
(c)(1) A state agency employee shall not conduct a procurement under
this chapter unless the state agency employee is certified through the
training and certification program required under this section.
(2) To maintain certification under this section, a state agency
employee shall complete a reasonable number of hours of continuing education,
as provided for by rule by the director.
(d)(1) The director shall revoke the certification of a state agency
employee who is certified under this section and who is determined to have
knowingly violated state procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title 19, Subtitle
4.
597 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) The director shall adopt rules regarding the procedure for
revoking a state agency employee's certification under this section.

19-61-305. Solicitation conferences.
(a)(1) A state agency may hold a solicitation conference before or
after issuing an invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or a request
for qualifications under § 19-65-101 et seq.
(2) A solicitation conference may be held:
(A) In person; or
(B) Online or in another virtual format.
(b) Attendance by a vendor at a solicitation conference is not
required for that vendor's bid, proposal, or statement of qualifications to
be accepted unless the attendance requirement is:
(1) Explicitly stated in the invitation for bids, request for
proposals, or request for qualifications; and
(2) Approved by the State Procurement Director or the head of
the procurement agency.
(c) A state agency holding a solicitation conference shall:
(1) For an invitation for bids or a request for proposals,
include the date and time of the solicitation conference in the notice
required under § 19-61-505;
(2) Require vendors in attendance at a solicitation conference
to sign in at the solicitation conference or provide a registration record
for an online or other virtual solicitation conference, regardless of whether
attendance is required under the solicitation; and
(3) Maintain the sign-in sheet or registration records with the
other documents related to the solicitation.
(d) A statement made at a solicitation conference does not change the
invitation for bids, request for proposals, or request for qualifications
unless a change is made by written amendment to the invitation for bids,
request for proposals, or request for statements of qualifications.
(e) A state agency is encouraged to hold a solicitation conference for
a procurement that:
(1) Has a contract amount of at least:
(A) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for a single
contract year; or
598 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) for the
total anticipated term of the contract, including any extensions, based on
the previous contract for the same commodities or services or, if a previous
contract is not available, a contract for similar commodities or services; or
(2) Is of strategic importance to the state.

Subchapter 4 — Vendors — Contractors — Bidders

19-61-401. Responsibility of bidders and offerors.
(a)(1) A determination of nonresponsibility of a bidder or offeror
shall be made in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Procurement
Director.
(2) A reasonable inquiry to determine the responsibility of a
bidder or offeror may be conducted.
(3) The unreasonable failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly
supply information in connection with such an inquiry may be grounds for a
determination of nonresponsibility with respect to such bidder or offeror.
(4) If a bidder or offeror is determined to be nonresponsible,
the reasons therefor shall be included in the determination.
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, information furnished by a
bidder or offeror pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed outside of
the Office of State Procurement or the procurement agency without prior
written consent by the bidder or offeror.
(2) This section is not intended to prohibit the office from
disclosing such information to the Governor, the Attorney General, or the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services when any of
those officers deems it necessary.
(c) The director or the agency procurement official may require the
posting of a bid bond, a performance bond, or a similar assurance by any
actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor, under rules promulgated
under this chapter.

19-61-402. Prequalification of suppliers.
(a)(1) The State Procurement Director may provide for prequalification
of suppliers as responsible prospective contractors for particular types of
commodities, technical and general services, and professional and consultant
599 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
services.
(2) Solicitation mailing lists of potential contractors shall
include without limitation such prequalified suppliers.
(b) Prequalifications shall not foreclose a written determination:
(1) Between the time of the bid opening or receipt of offers and
making of an award that a prequalified supplier is not responsible; or
(2) That a supplier who is not prequalified at the time of bid
opening or receipt of offers is responsible.

19-61-403. Reporting of suspected collusion — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “collusion” means cooperation in the
restraint of free and open competition in a public procurement, including
without limitation:
(1) Price fixing;
(2) Bid rigging;
(3) Customer or market allocation;
(4) Misrepresenting the independence of the relationship between
colluding parties; and
(5) Exerting improper influence on public officials to obtain
advantage in a public procurement, including without limitation:
(A) Offering bribes or kickbacks;
(B) Extortion; and
(C) Fraudulent misrepresentation.
(b) When for any reason collusion is suspected among any bidders or
offerors, a written notice of the relevant facts shall be transmitted to the
Attorney General.
(c)(1) All documents involved in a procurement in which collusion is
suspected shall be retained until the Attorney General gives notice that they
may be destroyed.
(2) All retained documents shall be made available to the
Attorney General or a designee upon request and proper receipt of the
request.
(d) Collusion is cause for:
(1) Debarment from consideration for award of a contract under §
19-61-702; and
(2) Suspension from consideration for award of a contract if
600 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
there is probable cause for suspecting collusion as determined by the
Attorney General or the State Procurement Director.

19-61-404. Vendor training and polling.
The Office of State Procurement shall:
(1)(A) Develop and deliver vendor training to inform interested
vendors of how to do business with the state.
(B) The training required under subdivision (1)(A) of this
section shall:
(i) Be offered throughout the state; and
(ii) Be delivered as training sessions in person and
online or in another virtual format; and
(2) Periodically poll vendors that have been successful in
securing business with the state and vendors that have not been successful in
securing business with the state to solicit procurement feedback that can be
used to improve vendor training.

19-61-405. Submission of contracts with members of General Assembly
required.
(a) All contracts with a member of the General Assembly, his or her
spouse, or with any business in which a member of the General Assembly or his
or her spouse is an officer, a director, or a stockholder owning more than
ten percent (10%) of the stock in the business shall be presented to the
Legislative Council or to the Joint Budget Committee, if the General Assembly
is in session, before the execution date of the contract.
(b) The Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee shall
provide the State Procurement Director and the Director of the Arkansas
Ethics Commission with its review as to the propriety of the contract,
including without limitation whether the agency properly complied with the
procurement process and whether the contract represents an improper conflict
of interest between the member of the General Assembly and the agency, within
thirty (30) days after receipt of the proposed contract.
(c) The contract shall not be submitted to the Legislative Council or
to the Joint Budget Committee until the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services has reviewed the contract and provided the Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee with a recommendation regarding the
601 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
legality of the contract.

19-61-406. Vendor performance reporting.
(a)(1) A state agency shall report a vendor's performance under a
contract executed under this subtitle if the vendor fails to satisfy the
performance-based standards stated in the contract in a manner that
represents a material deviation.
(2) A state agency shall use a form prescribed by the State
Procurement Director and approved by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, to report a
vendor's performance under this section.
(b) The report required under this section shall be:
(1) Filed with the Office of State Procurement and maintained
for a minimum of three (3) years from the termination of the relevant
contract, including any extensions and amendments;
(2) Signed by the director of the state agency or his or her
designee; and
(3) Filed monthly until the vendor has performed satisfactorily
under the contract for a period of at least ninety (90) consecutive days.
(c) A state agency may report a vendor's performance in the manner
prescribed under this section for any contract that would not require
reporting of a vendor's performance under this section if the state agency
encounters an issue with the vendor's performance of a contract.
(d) A state agency may use a vendor performance report submitted under
this section to evaluate an offeror to the extent that the past performance
of an offeror may be considered under the law and the rules adopted by the
office.

19-61-407. Experience requirement — Findings.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(A) An invitation for bids, a request for proposals, and a
request for qualifications often require that bidders and offerors have a
certain amount of experience to qualify;
(B) These experience requirements often apply to the
business of the bidder or offeror rather than the key personnel of the bidder
or offeror;
602 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) As a result, new businesses with highly qualified
personnel often do not qualify to compete for state contracts even though the
executives and employees of the business have the experience required; and
(D) It is in the best interests of the state to encourage
new businesses and to seek out the most qualified people to provide products
and services to the state.
(2) The General Assembly intends for this section to:
(A) Encourage entrepreneurship;
(B) Level the playing field for new businesses to compete
for business opportunities; and
(C) Enable new businesses with highly qualified personnel
to compete for state contracts.
(b) If an invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or a request
for qualifications under this subtitle requires a certain amount of
experience or a certain number of years in existence for the bidder or
offeror, the requirement shall be satisfied by either:
(1)(A) The amount of experience of the bidder or offeror.
(B) A bidder or offeror may use the combined experience of
its owners or senior executive staff to satisfy the requirement under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section; or
(2) The combined amount of experience of the key personnel of
the bidder or offeror that will be responsible for satisfying the
requirements of the contract to be procured.
(c)(1) However, before the issuance of an invitation for bids, a
request for proposals, or a request for qualifications, the Office of State
Procurement or a procurement agency may determine in writing that the
combined experience of the key personnel of a bidder or offeror under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section would be insufficient to adequately
satisfy the requirements of the invitation for bids, request for proposals,
or request for qualifications.
(2) A written determination under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall include the following:
(A) A specific description of the products or services
that the Office of State Procurement or procurement agency seeks to procure;
and
(B) A detailed statement of the reasons the combined
603 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
experience of the key personnel of a bidder or offeror would be insufficient.

19-61-408. Procurements for services in designated positions and
designated financial and information technology positions.
A contract for services with a person employed or entity employing
persons in a designated position or designated financial or information
technology position as defined in § 21-15-101 shall require compliance with
the registry records check and criminal history records check laws under §
21-15-101 et seq.

19-61-409. Compliance.
(a) A contractor shall ensure, in cooperation with a state agency,
that the contract between the contractor and the state agency adheres to the
requirements of this subtitle, including without limitation the inclusion of
any mandatory language and the submission of the contract for any required
review.
(b) The signature of a contractor on a contract with a state agency
serves as an acknowledgement that the contractor is:
(1) Equally responsible with the state agency for adhering to
the requirements of this subtitle related to the content and review of the
contract; and
(2) Subject to the relevant ethical provisions of § 19-64-101 et
seq.

19-61-410. Cancellation of contract on entry of final business closure
order — Definition.
(a) As used in this chapter, “final business closure order” means a
business closure order for which a contractor has either:
(1) Waived further administrative review under § 26-18-1001 et
seq.; or
(2) Exhausted all remedies to appeal under § 26-18-1001 et seq.
(b) The Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall provide to the Office of State Procurement all final
business closure orders entered into against a contractor.
(c) Upon receipt of a final business closure order, the office shall,
as soon as reasonably practicable:
604 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Notify each state agency with which the contractor has a
contract that the:
(A) Contractor is subject to a final business closure
order; and
(B) Provision of any goods or services, or both, under a
contract with the contractor that is subject to a final business closure
order shall cease as soon as reasonably practicable; and
(2) Notify all state agencies that the contractor that is
subject to a final business closure order shall not be awarded or maintain a
contract with a state agency unless the office provides notice under
subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Upon receipt of information that a contractor has resolved a
business closure, the office shall notify all state agencies, as soon as
reasonably practicable, that:
(1) Any unexpired contracts with the contractor may continue if
the contract was not terminated, cancelled, suspended, or discontinued; and
(2) The contractor may be awarded or maintain a contract with a
state agency.

Subchapter 5 — Source Selection and Contract Formation

19-61-501. Definitions concerning source selection and contract
formation.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Competitive bidding” means a method of procurement that
requires obtaining bids by:
(A) Direct mail request to prospective bidders and obtaining
written bids;
(B) Telephone;
(C) Telegraph;
(D) Written form; or
(E) Electronic media;
(2) “Competitive sealed bidding” means a method of procurement
that requires:
(A) Issuance of an invitation for bids with a purchase
description and all contractual terms and conditions applicable to the
605 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
procurement;
(B) Public, contemporaneous opening of bids at a
predesignated time and place;
(C) Unconditional acceptance of a bid without alteration
or correction, except as authorized in §§ 19-61-401 — 19-61-403, 19-61-502 —
19-61-508, and 19-61-511 — 19-61-513;
(D) Award to the responsive and responsible bidder who has
submitted the lowest bid that meets the requirements and criteria set forth
in the invitation for bids; and
(E) Public notice;
(3) “Competitive sealed proposals” means a method of procurement
that involves without limitation:
(A) Solicitation of proposals through a request for
proposals;
(B) Submission of cost or pricing data from the offeror
where required;
(C) Discussions with responsible offerors whose proposals
have been determined to be reasonably susceptible to being selected for
award; and
(D) An award made to the responsible offeror whose
proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous considering
price and evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals;
(4) “Emergency procurement” means the acquisition of commodities
or services, that if not immediately initiated, will endanger human life or
health, state property, or the functional capability of a state agency;
(5) “Established catalogue price” means the price included in a
catalogue, price list, schedule, or other form that:
(A) Is regularly maintained by a manufacturer or
contractor;
(B) Is either published or otherwise available for
inspection by customers; and
(C) States prices at which sales are currently or were
last made to a significant number of buyers constituting the general buying
public for the commodities or services involved;
(6) “Invitation for bids” means all documents or electronic
media, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting
606 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
bids in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 19-61-505, which refers
to competitive sealed bidding;
(7) “Multiple award contracts” means a method of procurement
whereby an indefinite quantity contract is awarded to more than one (1)
supplier for furnishing a like item or category of items;
(8) “Purchase description” means specifications or any other
document or electronic media describing the commodities or services to be
procured;
(9) “Request for proposals” means all documents or electronic
media, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting
proposals in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 19-61-506, which
refers to competitive sealed proposals, § 19-61-503, which refers to small
procurements, § 19-61-507, which refers to proprietary or sole source
procurements, § 19-61-508, which refers to emergency procurements, or § 19-
61-504, which refers to competitive bidding;
(10)(A) “Request for qualifications” means a solicitation
document requiring submittal of qualifications or specialized expertise in
response to the scope of work or services required and does not require
pricing.
(B) Other than as provided in § 19-65-101 et seq., the
request for qualifications process may only be used when, under rules
promulgated by the State Procurement Director, the director determines in
writing that the request for qualifications process is warranted;
(11) “Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who has the
capability in all respects to perform fully the contract requirements and the
integrity and reliability that will assure good faith performance;
(12) “Responsive bidder” means a person who has submitted a bid
under § 19-61-505, which refers to competitive sealed bidding, that conforms
in all material respects to the invitation for bids, including the
specifications set forth in the invitation; and
(13)(A)(i) “Small procurements” means a procurement not
exceeding a purchase price of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(ii) Small procurements may be procured without
seeking competitive bids or competitive sealed bids.
(iii) However, competition should be used to the
maximum extent practicable.
607 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Items under state contract are excluded.

19-61-502. Methods of source selection.
Unless otherwise authorized by law, all contracts shall be awarded by
competitive sealed bidding, pursuant to § 19-61-505, which refers to
competitive sealed bidding, except as provided in:
(1) Section 19-61-506, which refers to competitive sealed
proposals;
(2) Section 19-61-503, which refers to small procurements;
(3) Section 19-61-507, which refers to proprietary or sole
source procurements;
(4) Section 19-61-508, which refers to emergency procurements;
(5) Section 19-61-504, which refers to competitive bidding;
(6) Section 19-61-509, which refers to multiple award contracts;
or
(7) Section 19-61-510, which refers to special procurements.

19-61-503. Small procurements.
(a) Any procurement not exceeding the amount under § 19-61-501(13),
which refers to small procurements, may be made in accordance with this
section and the small procurement procedures promulgated by the State
Procurement Director.
(b)(1) However, procurement requirements shall not be artificially
divided so as to constitute a small procurement under this section.
(2) The prohibition stated in subdivision (b)(1) of this section
includes without limitation purchasing commodities or services, or both, from
more than one (1) vendor owned by the same person or entity if the aggregate
amount of the purchases from the vendors owned by the same person or entity
exceeds the amount stated in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) A state agency shall not provide information to a vendor regarding
the amount the state agency is willing to pay for commodities or services, or
both, before receiving a quote from the vendor for the amount the vendor
would charge for the commodities or services, or both.

19-61-504. Competitive bidding.
(a) A competitive bid form authorized by the State Procurement
608 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Director shall be completed for competitive bidding.
(2) If three (3) competitive bids are not obtained on purchases
when competitive bids are required, the competitive bid form must show the
names of at least three (3) firms contacted in attempting to obtain
competition or show the reason three (3) firms were not contacted.
(3)(A) Only firms that sell the type of commodity or service to
be procured shall be contacted for competitive bidding.
(B) The purchase procedures outlined in this section shall
not apply to commodities, technical and general services, and professional
and consultant services under state contract.
(b)(1) Contracts in which the purchase price exceeds twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) and is less than or equal to seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000) may be awarded by use of competitive bidding procedures.
(2) However, in instances under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, competitive sealed bidding is permitted.
(c)(1)(A) All procurements under this section shall be awarded to the
responsive and responsible bidder who has submitted the lowest bid that meets
the requirements, criteria, and specifications.
(B) Delivery time required shall be reasonable and
consonant with current industry norms.
(2) Complete justification shall be given if an award is made to
a bidder other than the low bidder.
(d) Repeated small quantity procurements to circumvent the competitive
bid limits or failure to obtain competitive bids without justification shall
constitute a violation of competitive bidding procedures and shall result in
withdrawal of the state agency's competitive bid privileges.

19-61-505. Competitive sealed bidding.
(a)(1) Contracts exceeding an estimated purchase price of seventy-five
thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding
unless a determination is made in writing by the agency procurement official
or the State Procurement Director that this method is not practicable and
advantageous and specifically states the reasons that this method is not
practicable and advantageous.
(2) The director may provide by rule that it is not practicable
to procure specified types of commodities, technical and general services, or
609 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
professional and consultant services by competitive sealed bidding.
(3) Factors to be considered in determining whether competitive
sealed bidding is not practicable shall include whether:
(A) Purchase descriptions are suitable for award on the
basis of the lowest evaluated bid price; and
(B) The available sources, the time and place of
performance, and other relevant circumstances are appropriate for the use of
competitive sealed bidding.
(b) When it is considered impractical to initially prepare a purchase
description to support an award based on price, an invitation for bids may be
issued requesting the submission of unpriced technical proposals to be
followed by an invitation for bids limited to those bidders whose technical
proposals meet the requirements set forth in the first invitation for bids.
(c) Notice inviting bids shall:
(1) Be given not fewer than five (5) calendar days nor more than
ninety (90) calendar days preceding the date for the opening of bids by
publishing the notice at least one (1) time in at least one (1) newspaper
having general circulation in the state or posting by electronic media, but
in all instances, adequate notice shall be given;
(2) Include a general description of the commodities, technical
and general services, or professional and consultant services to be procured;
(3) State where invitations for bids may be obtained;
(4) State the date, time, and place of bid opening; and
(5) State the time, date, and place of the solicitation
conference if a solicitation conference is to be held before the opening of
bids to provide information to prospective bidders.
(d) Bids shall be opened publicly in the presence of one (1) or more
witnesses at the time and place designated in the invitation for bids. Each
bid, together with the name of the bidder, shall be recorded and open to
public inspection.
(e)(1)(A) Bids shall be evaluated based on the requirements set forth
in the invitation for bids.
(B) Requirements set forth in the invitation for bids may
include criteria to determine acceptability such as:
(i) Inspection;
(ii) Testing;
610 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(iii) Quality;
(iv) Workmanship;
(v) Delivery;
(vi) Past performance; and
(vii) Suitability for a particular purpose and
criteria affecting price such as life-cycle or total ownership costs.
(2)(A) The invitation for bids shall set forth the evaluation
criteria to be used.
(B) Criteria may not be used in bid evaluation that were
not set forth in the invitation for bids.
(3)(A) A time discount may be considered in the evaluation of a
bid only:
(i) If the state agency specifically solicits
pricing that requests a time discount; and
(ii) Under the structured terms of the invitation
for bids.
(B) If a bidder offers a time discount as part of its bid
without the solicitation of time discounts by the state agency, the state
agency shall not consider the time discount.
(f)(1) Correction of patent or provable errors in bids that do not
prejudice other bidders or withdrawal of bids may be allowed only to the
extent permitted under rules promulgated by the director and upon written
approval of the Attorney General or a designee of the Attorney General.
(2) An award shall not be made on the basis of a corrected bid,
if the corrected bid exceeds the next lowest bid of a responsible bidder.
(3)(A) The director or an agency procurement official may seek
the clarification of a submitted bid.
(B) A written response by a bidder under this subsection
shall only clarify the submitted bid and shall not add any substantive
language to the submitted bid or change the terms of the submitted bid.
(C) If the bidder fails or refuses to clarify any matter
questioned about the bidder's bid in writing by the deadline set by the
director or agency procurement official, the bid may be rejected.
(D) If the bidder clarifies the matter questioned under
this subsection in writing, the clarification shall be evaluated and become a
part of any contract awarded on the basis of the bidder's bid.
611 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(g)(1) The contract shall be awarded with reasonable promptness by
written notice to the lowest responsible bidder whose bid meets the
requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation for bids.
(2)(A) Except with respect to a contract being procured for a
construction project, the director or the head of a procurement agency may
negotiate a lower bid price, including changes in the bid requirements, with
the lowest responsive and responsible bidder if:
(i) All bids received from responsive and
responsible bidders exceed available funding as certified by the appropriate
fiscal officer of the procurement agency; or
(ii) It appears that additional savings to the state
may result from negotiation.
(B)(i)(a) If negotiations with the lowest responsive and
responsible bidder conducted under subdivision (g)(2)(A) of this section fail
to result in a lower bid price, the state may negotiate for a lower bid price
with the next lowest responsive and responsible bidder.
(b) If negotiations with the next lowest
responsive and responsible bidder under subdivision (g)(2)(B)(i)(a) of this
section fail to result in a lower bid price, the state may negotiate for a
lower bid price with the next lowest responsive and responsible bidder until
an acceptable lower bid price is negotiated or the state determines that
negotiations are no longer in the best interest of the state.
(ii) A bid price resulting from negotiations
conducted under this section shall not be higher than:
(a) The bid price originally submitted by the
lowest responsive and responsible bidder; or
(b) A price previously offered in negotiations
by a responsive and responsible bidder.
(iii) Negotiations conducted under this section do
not preclude the use of other methods of source selection or procurement
authority provided under this chapter.
(C)(i) Negotiations under this subsection shall be
conducted by a person who is trained and certified in negotiation and
procurement processes.
(ii)(a) The Office of State Procurement shall
provide for the training and certification required under this subsection.
612 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The training provided by the office shall
be specific to Arkansas law.
(3) All other bidders requesting to be notified of the award
decision shall be promptly notified of the decision.
(h)(1) An invitation for bids may be cancelled or any or all bids may
be rejected in writing by the director or the agency procurement official.
(2) Before the rejection of a bid by the director, the decision
to reject the bid may be validated with the state agency for which the
procurement is being conducted.
(3) A bid may be rejected for failure to adhere to mandatory
requirements.

19-61-506. Competitive sealed proposals.
(a) When the use of competitive sealed bidding is not practicable and
advantageous, a contract may be awarded by competitive sealed proposals.
(b) Public notice of the request for proposals shall be given in the
same manner as provided in § 19-61-505, which refers to public notice of
competitive sealed bidding.
(c)(1) The request for proposals shall indicate the relative
importance of price and other evaluation factors.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this
section, cost shall be weighted at least thirty percent (30%) of the total
evaluation score for a proposal submitted in response to the request for
proposals.
(B)(i) The State Procurement Director may approve that
cost be weighted at a lower percentage of the total evaluation score for a
proposal submitted in response to a request for proposals if the director
makes a written determination that the lower percentage is in the best
interest of the state.
(ii) A state agency's failure to obtain the approval
of the director under this subsection for a request for proposals with cost
weighted at a lower percentage than required under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of
this section is grounds for submitting a protest under § 19-61-701.
(C) The use of a lower percentage under subdivision
(c)(2)(B) of this section and the corresponding written determination by the
director shall be submitted to the Legislative Council or, if the General
613 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, for review before the
request for proposals is issued.
(3) The state's prior experience with an offeror may be
considered and scored as part of the offeror's proposal only:
(A) To the extent that the request for proposals requests
that all offerors provide references; and
(B) If the offeror's past performance with the state
occurred no more than three (3) years before the offeror submitted the
proposal.
(4) A state agency shall not include prior experience with the
state as a mandatory requirement for submitting a proposal under this
section.
(d)(1) As provided in the request for proposals and under rule,
discussions may be conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals
determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award for the
purpose of:
(A) Clarifying solicitation requirements to assure full
understanding of and responsiveness to the solicitation requirements; or
(B) Negotiating a contract that is more advantageous to
the state.
(2)(A) If discussions conducted after the deadline for the
receipt of proposals necessitate material revisions of proposals, each
offeror determined to be responsible and reasonably susceptible of being
awarded a contract shall be provided an opportunity to revise the offeror's
proposal for the purpose of submitting a best and final offer.
(B) An offeror may be permitted to revise the offeror's
original proposal as a result of discussions only after the original
submission deadline and before award for the purpose of providing a best and
final offer.
(C)(i) Before issuing the notice of award of a contract,
the director or the agency procurement official may request a best and final
offer from each responsible offeror that is reasonably susceptible of being
awarded the contract.
(ii) In responding to a request for a best and final
offer, an offeror may:
(a) Resubmit the offeror's original proposal
614 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
with lower pricing or additional benefits, or both, in accordance with the
specifications of the request for proposals; or
(b) Submit a written response that states that
the offeror's original proposal, including without limitation the pricing,
remains unchanged.
(iii) If a best and final offer is requested, the
director or the agency procurement official shall evaluate each proposal
submitted in response to the request for a best and final offer in
determining the proposal that is the most advantageous to the state.
(3) In conducting discussions, information derived from a
proposal submitted by a competing offeror shall not be disclosed until after
a notice of anticipation to award is announced.
(e)(1) The director or an agency procurement official may seek the
clarification of a submitted proposal.
(2) A written response by an offeror under this subsection shall
only clarify the submitted proposal and shall not add any substantive
language to the submitted proposal or change the terms of the submitted
proposal.
(3) If the offeror fails or refuses to clarify any matter
questioned about the offeror's proposal in writing by the deadline set by the
director or agency procurement official, the proposal may be rejected.
(4) If the offeror clarifies the matter questioned under this
subsection in writing, the clarification shall be evaluated and become a part
of any contract awarded on the basis of the offeror's proposal.
(f)(1) Award under this section shall be made to the responsible
offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous
to the state, taking into consideration price, the evaluation factors set
forth in the request for proposals, any best and final offers submitted, and
the results of any discussions conducted with responsible offerors.
(2) Factors or criteria that are not specified in subdivision
(f)(1) of this section shall not be used in the evaluation of a proposal.
(3) If it is determined that two (2) or more responsible
offerors have tied scores after the evaluation of the proposals, the award
under this section shall be made to the responsible offeror that had one (1)
of the tied scores and submitted the lowest price proposal.
(4) The director or the agency procurement official may enter
615 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
into negotiations with the responsible offeror whose proposal is determined
in writing to be the most advantageous to the state when the best interests
of the state would be served, including without limitation when the state can
obtain:
(A) A lower price without changes to the terms or
specifications of the request for proposals; or
(B) An improvement to the terms or specifications, or
both, of the request for proposals without increasing the price of the
proposal.
(g)(1) The Office of State Procurement shall:
(A) Encourage full discussion by the evaluators who are
evaluating proposals submitted in response to a request for proposals under
this section; and
(B) Develop tools and templates to be used in evaluating
proposals submitted in response to a request for proposals under this section
that optimize the number of material scored attributes and provide for a
limited range of possible scores for each attribute.
(2)(A) A state agency may use one (1) or more private evaluators
to evaluate proposals submitted in response to a request for proposals under
this section.
(B) A private evaluator used under this subsection shall
be:
(i) Held to the same requirements and prohibitions
regarding conflicts of interest as state employees;
(ii) A qualified volunteer, unless the state does
not have the necessary expertise to evaluate the proposals, in which case a
paid private evaluator may be used; and
(iii) Eligible for travel reimbursement if the state
agency decides to make travel reimbursement available.
(C) The use of a private evaluator is not required.
(D) If a state agency uses one (1) or more private
evaluators, the use of a private evaluator shall be disclosed in the
procurement file and in any information submitted to the Legislative Council
or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(h)(1) A competitive sealed proposal may be cancelled or any or all
proposals may be rejected in writing by the director or the agency
616 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
procurement official.
(2) Before the rejection of a proposal by the director, the
decision to reject the proposal may be validated with the evaluation
committee that evaluated the proposal.
(3) A proposal may be rejected for failure to adhere to
mandatory requirements.

19-61-507. Proprietary or sole source procurements.
(a) Under rules promulgated under this chapter, a contract may be
awarded for a required or designated commodity or service to a sole or
mandatory supplier when the State Procurement Director, the head of a
procurement agency, or a designee of either officer above the level of agency
procurement official determines in writing that it is not practicable to use
other than the required or designated commodity or service.
(b) Unless a written determination is made that there is only one (1)
source for the required or designated commodity or service, efforts shall be
made to obtain price competition.

19-61-508. Emergency procurements — Definition.
(a) The State Procurement Director, the head of a procurement agency,
or a designee of either officer may make or authorize others to make
emergency procurements as defined in § 19-61-501(4) and in accordance with
rules promulgated by the director.
(b)(1) A person or a state agency that makes an emergency procurement
under this section shall:
(A) Receive at least three (3) competitive bids unless the
emergency is a critical emergency; and
(B) Complete a quotation abstract that includes the:
(i) Names of the firms contacted;
(ii) Time that each firm was contacted;
(iii) Quoted price obtained from each contacted
firm; and
(iv) Method used for contacting each firm.
(2) As used in this subsection, “critical emergency” means an
emergency in which human life or health is imminently endangered.

617 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-61-509. Multiple award contracts.
(a)(1) Multiple award contracts may be made only if the State
Procurement Director or an agency procurement official determines in writing
that a single award is not advantageous to the State of Arkansas.
(2) The determination under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall state in writing a rationale and basis for the multiple award contract.
(3) Multiple award contracts shall be limited to the least
number of suppliers necessary to meet the requirements of the using agencies.
(b) If the director or agency procurement official anticipates that
multiple award contracts will be made, the invitation for bids shall include
a notification of the right of the Office of State Procurement or agency to
make such an award and the criteria upon which such an award will be based.

19-61-510. Special procurements.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the State
Procurement Director or the head of a procurement agency may initiate a
procurement above the competitive bid amount specified in § 19-61-504, when
the director or the head of a procurement agency determines that an unusual
or unique situation exists that makes the application of all requirements of
competitive bidding, competitive sealed bidding, or competitive sealed
proposals contrary to the public interest.
(b) A written determination under this section of the basis for the
procurement and for the selection of the particular contractor shall be
included by the director or the head of a procurement agency in the contract
file, and he or she shall file a monthly report with the Legislative Council
describing all written determinations under this section.

19-61-511. Cost-plus-a-percentage-of-cost and cost-plus-a-fixed-fee
contracts.
As used in this chapter, the cost-plus-a-percentage-of-cost and cost-
plus-a-fixed-fee system may be used under the authority of the State
Procurement Director when:
(1) There exists no other economically practicable price
arrangement to secure the commodity;
(2) A cost saving may be proved over the least expensive
alternative; or
618 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) The pricing schedule involved is tied to an industry
standard or other reliable system of cost prediction.

19-61-512. Multiyear contracts.
(a) Specified Period. Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract for
commodities or services may be entered into for periods of not more than
seven (7) years if funds for the first fiscal year of the contemplated
contract are available at the time of contracting. Payment and performance
obligations for succeeding fiscal years shall be subject to the availability
and appropriation of funds therefor.
(b) Determination Prior to Use. Prior to the utilization of a multiyear
contract, it shall be determined in writing that:
(1) Estimated requirements cover the period of the contract and
are reasonably firm and continuing;
(2) A multiyear contract will serve the best interests of the
state by encouraging effective competition or otherwise promoting economies
in state procurement; and
(3) In the event of termination of the multiyear contract for
any reason, the contract provides for cessation of services or surrender by
the state of the commodities and repayment to the state of any accrued
equity, or both cessation of services and surrender by the state of the
commodities and repayment to the state of any accrued equity.
(c) Termination Due to Unavailability of Funds in Succeeding Years.
(1) Original terms of a multiyear contract shall not exceed four
(4) years.
(2) When funds are not appropriated or otherwise made available
to support continuation of performance in a multiyear contract, the multiyear
contract shall be terminated and the contractor may be reimbursed for the
reasonable value of any nonrecurring costs incurred but not amortized in the
price of the commodities or services delivered under the multiyear contract.
(3) The cost of termination under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section may be paid from:
(A) Appropriations currently available for performance of
the multiyear contract;
(B) Appropriations currently available for procurement of
similar commodities or services and not otherwise obligated; or
619 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) Appropriations made specifically for the payment of
such termination costs.

19-61-513. Finality of determinations.
The following determinations are final and conclusive, unless they are
clearly erroneous, arbitrary, capricious, or contrary to law:
(1) The determinations required by § 19-61-505(g), which refers
to competitive sealed bidding, award;
(2) The determinations required by § 19-61-506(a), which refers
to competitive sealed proposals, conditions for use;
(3) The determinations required by § 19-61-506(f), which refers
to competitive sealed proposals, award;
(4) The determinations required by § 19-61-507, which refers to
proprietary or sole source procurements;
(5) The determinations required by § 19-61-508, which refers to
emergency procurements;
(6) The determinations required by § 19-61-504, which refers to
competitive bidding;
(7) The determinations required by § 19-61-401, which refers to
responsibility of bidders and offerors, determination of responsibility;
(8) The determinations required by § 19-61-512(b), which refers
to multiyear contracts, determination prior to use; and
(9) The determinations required by § 19-61-510, which refers to
special procurements.

19-61-514. Specifications — Definition.
(a) Definition.
(1) “Specification” means any technical or purchase description
or other description of the physical or functional characteristics, or of the
nature, of a commodity or service.
(2) “Specification” may include a description of any requirement
for inspecting, testing, or preparing a commodity or service for delivery.
(b) The State Procurement Director shall promulgate rules governing
the preparation, maintenance, and content of standard and nonstandard
specifications for commodities, technical and general services, and
professional and consultant services procured by the Office of State
620 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Procurement.
(c) Maximum Practicable Competition. All specifications under this
section shall be drafted so as to assure the maximum practicable competition
for the state's actual requirements.

19-61-515. Preferences among bidders — Conflicts with federal law —
Definitions.
(a) Definitions.
(1) The definitions in this subsection do not apply to other
sections of this chapter.
(2) As used in this section:
(A) “Commodities” means materials and equipment used in
the construction of public works projects;
(B) “Firm resident in Arkansas” means any individual,
partnership, association, or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, that:
(i) Maintains at least one (1) staffed office in
this state;
(ii) For not fewer than two (2) successive years
immediately before submitting a bid, has paid taxes under the Division of
Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq., unless exempt, and either the
Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., or the Arkansas
Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq., on property used or
intended to be used for or in connection with the firm's business; and
(iii) Within the two-year period, has paid taxes to
one (1) or more counties, school districts, or municipalities of the State of
Arkansas on either real or personal property used or intended to be used or
in connection with the firm's business;
(C) “Lowest qualified bid” means the lowest bid that
conforms to the specifications and request for bids;
(D) “Nonresident firm” means a firm that is not included
in the definition of a “firm resident in Arkansas”; and
(E) “Public agency” means all counties, municipalities,
and political subdivisions of the state.
(b)(1)(A) In the purchase of commodities by competitive bidding, a
public agency shall accept the lowest qualified bid from a firm resident in
Arkansas.
621 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) This bid shall be accepted only if the bid does not
exceed the lowest qualified bid from a nonresident firm by more than five
percent (5%) and if one (1) or more firms resident in Arkansas made written
claim for a preference at the time the bids were submitted.
(C)(i) In calculating the preference to be allowed, the
appropriate procurement officials, pursuant to this section and §§ 19-61-101
— 19-61-111, 19-61-117, 19-61-201 — 19-61-209, 19-61-301 — 19-61-303, 19-61-
401 — 19-61-403, 19-61-501 — 19-61-508, 19-61-511 — 19-61-514, 19-61-601 —
19-61-603, 19-61-701 — 19-61-705, and 19-61-801 — 19-61-811, shall take the
amount of each bid of the Arkansas dealers who claimed the preference and
deduct five percent (5%) from its total.
(ii) If after making the deduction under subdivision
(b)(1)(C)(i) of this section, the bid of an Arkansas bidder claiming the
preference is lower than the bid of the nonresident firm, then the award
shall be made to the Arkansas firm that submitted the lowest bid, whether or
not that particular Arkansas firm claimed the preference.
(2)(A) The preference provided for in this section applies only
in comparing bids when one (1) or more bids are by a firm resident in
Arkansas and the other bid or bids are by a nonresident firm.
(B) The preference provided for under this section does
not apply to competing bids if both bidders are firms resident in Arkansas,
as defined in this section.
(C)(i) All public agencies shall be responsible for
carrying out the spirit and intent of this section in their procurement
policies.
(ii) A public agency that, through an employee or
designated agent, is found guilty of violating this section or committing an
unlawful act under this section, is guilty of an unclassified misdemeanor.
(D) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law,
upon conviction that person is subject to imprisonment for not more than six
(6) months or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(E)(i) If a provision or condition of this chapter
conflicts with a provision of federal law or a rule or regulation made under
federal law pertaining to federal grants-in-aid programs or other federal aid
programs, the provision or condition does not apply to the federal-supported
contracts for the purchase of commodities to the extent that the conflict
622 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
exists.
(ii) However, all provisions or conditions of this
chapter with which there is no conflict apply to contracts to purchase
commodities to be paid, in whole or in part, from federal funds.
(c)(1)(A) This section applies only to projects designed to provide
utility needs of a county or municipality.
(B) Projects under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section
include without limitation pipeline installation, sanitary projects, and
waterline, sewage, and water works.
(2) To the extent that federal purchasing laws or bidding
preferences conflict, this chapter does not apply to projects related to
supplying water or wastewater utility services, operations, or maintenance to
a federal military installation by a municipality of the state.

19-61-516. High efficiency lighting — Preference — Definitions.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds:
(A) The expansion of state government makes it one of the
state's leading purchasers of lighting commodities;
(B) Recent technological developments have produced
energy-efficient devices that reduce energy costs through a reduction in
energy usage; and
(C) Prudent use of taxpayer dollars dictates that the
State of Arkansas should be at the forefront of implementing energy-efficient
devices in facilities operated with public funds.
(2) The intent of this section is to promote the use of high
efficiency lighting in facilities operated with public funds when feasible.
(b) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Fluorescent lamp” means a gas-discharge lamp that:
(i) Utilizes a magnetic, electronic, or other
ballast; and
(ii) Uses electricity to excite mercury vapor in
argon or neon gas resulting in a plasma that produces short-wave ultraviolet
light that causes a phosphor to fluoresce and produce visible light.
(B) “Fluorescent lamp” includes without limitation a
compact fluorescent lamp;
(2) “High efficiency lighting” means fluorescent lamp or solid
623 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
state lighting;
(3) “Solid state lighting” means a light device that utilizes
light-emitting diodes, organic light-emitting diodes, or polymer light-
emitting diodes as sources of illumination rather than electrical filaments
or gas; and
(4)(A) “State agency” means an agency, institution, authority,
department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the state
supported by appropriation of state or federal funds.
(B) “State agency” includes the constitutional departments
of the state, the elected constitutional offices of the state, the General
Assembly, including the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee and supporting agencies and bureaus of the General
Assembly, the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, circuit courts,
prosecuting attorneys, and the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) When a state agency purchases or requires a bid for the purchase
of an indoor lamp, a preference for high efficiency lighting shall be
exercised if the use of high efficiency lighting is technically feasible and
the price is competitive with consideration given to the long-term cost
effectiveness and savings of high efficiency lighting.
(d)(1) The goal of state agencies for the percentage of purchased
indoor lamps that are high efficiency lighting shall be one hundred percent
(100%).
(2) The Office of State Procurement shall prepare an annual
report to the Legislative Council of the state's progress in meeting the
goals for the purchase of high efficiency lighting.

19-61-517. Development and use of performance-based contracts —
Findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Performance-based contracts provide an effective and
efficient method of monitoring and evaluating the overall quality of services
provided; and
(2) The practice of including benchmark objectives that the
provider must attain at specific intervals during the term of the contract is
an essential requirement for measuring performance.
(b)(1) A state agency, board, commission, or institution of higher
624 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
education that enters into a contract under this subtitle to procure services
that has a contract amount of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in a
single contract year or a total projected contract amount, including any
amendments to or possible extensions of the contract, of at least seven
million dollars ($7,000,000) shall use performance-based standards in the
contract that are specifically tailored to the services being provided under
the contract.
(2) The performance-based standards used under this subsection
shall include performance measures based on objective factors.
(3) A state agency, board, commission, or institution of higher
education is encouraged to use performance-based standards that are based on
objective factors in any other contract in which it would serve the best
interest of the state.
(c) A state agency, board, commission, or institution of higher
education that enters into a contract with performance-based standards:
(1)(A) Shall monitor the vendor's performance and adherence to
the performance-based standards in the contract.
(B) For state contracts, the Office of State Procurement
is the state agency that monitors each vendor's performance under this
subdivision (c)(1); and
(2) May impose financial consequences, as identified in the
contract, on a vendor that is party to a contract with performance-based
standards for failure to satisfy the performance-based standards, including
without limitation withholding payment or pursuing liquidated damages to the
extent allowed by law.
(d)(1) The State Procurement Director shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement and administer this section.
(2) Rules promulgated under this subsection are subject to
approval by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Subchapter 6 — Commodity Management

19-61-601. Definitions concerning commodity management.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commodities” means commodities owned by the state and
625 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
includes commodities as defined in § 19-61-103;
(2) “Excess commodities” means any commodity, other than
expendable commodities, having a remaining useful life but which the using
agency in possession of the commodity has determined is no longer required by
the using agency;
(3) “Expendable commodities” means all tangible commodities
other than nonexpendable commodities;
(4) “Nonexpendable commodities” means all tangible commodities
having an original acquisition cost of more than two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) per unit and a useful life of more than one (1) year; and
(5)(A) “Surplus commodities” means any commodities, other than
expendable commodities, no longer having any use to the state.
(B) “Surplus commodities” includes obsolete commodities,
scrap materials, and nonexpendable commodities that have completed their
useful life cycle.

19-61-602. Commodity management rules.
The State Procurement Director shall promulgate rules governing:
(1)(A) The sale, lease, or disposal of surplus commodities by
public auction, competitive sealed bidding, or other appropriate method
designated by rule.
(B) An employee of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services or member of the employee's immediate family shall not be
entitled to purchase surplus commodities;
(2) The transfer of excess commodities within the state; and
(3) The sale, lease, or disposal of surplus commodities to not-
for-profit organizations under § 22-1-101.

19-61-603. Proceeds from surplus commodities.
The State Procurement Director shall promulgate rules for the
allocation of proceeds from the sale, lease, or disposal of surplus
commodities, to the extent practicable, to the using agency that had
possession of the surplus commodities.

Subchapter 7 — Conflict Resolution — Debarment

626 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-61-701. Resolution of protested solicitations and awards.
(a)(1) An actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor who is
aggrieved in connection with the solicitation of a contract may protest by
presenting a written notice at least seventy-two (72) hours before the filing
deadline for the solicitation response to the State Procurement Director or
the head of a procurement agency.
(2)(A) An actual bidder, offeror, or contractor who is aggrieved
in connection with the award of a contract may protest to the:
(i) Director; or
(ii) Head of a procurement agency.
(B) A person submitting a protest under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section shall give notice of the protest to the person
named in the anticipation to award a contract by sending the person a copy of
the protest by electronic mail and regular mail.
(3) The protest shall be submitted in writing within fourteen
(14) calendar days after the calendar day on which the contract is awarded or
the notice of anticipation to award the contract is posted, whichever occurs
first.
(4) A protest submitted by an aggrieved person under this
section shall:
(A) Be limited to one (1) or more of the following
grounds:
(i) The award of the contract exceeded the authority
of the director or the procurement agency;
(ii) The procurement process violated a
constitutional, statutory, or regulatory provision;
(iii) The director or the procurement agency failed
to adhere to the rules of the procurement as stated in the solicitation, and
the failure to adhere to the rules of the procurement materially affected the
contract award;
(iv) The procurement process involved responses that
were collusive, submitted in bad faith, or not arrived at independently
through open competition; or
(v) The award of the contract resulted from a
technical or mathematical error made during the evaluation process; and
(B) State facts that substantiate each ground on which the
627 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
protest is based.
(5)(A) A person named in an anticipation to award a contract
that is protested under this section may file a written response to the
protest.
(B) A response to a protest submitted under subdivision
(a)(5)(A) of this section shall be submitted in writing within five (5) days
of the date the person is given notice of the protest under subdivision
(a)(2)(B) of this section.
(b)(1)(A) The director, the head of a procurement agency, or a
designee of either officer may settle and resolve a protest concerning the
solicitation or award of a contract before rendering an administrative
protest determination.
(B)(i) A meeting in an attempt to settle or resolve a
protest is not a public meeting under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967,
§ 25-19-101 et seq.
(ii) However, a final settlement or resolution of a
protest made under this section shall not be kept secret, sealed, or withheld
from public disclosure.
(2) The authority to settle or resolve a protest under this
section shall be exercised in accordance with laws governing the Arkansas
State Claims Commission, which has exclusive jurisdiction over all claims
against the state in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract,
and the rules promulgated by the State Procurement Director.
(c)(1) If a protest is not settled or resolved by mutual agreement
under subsection (b) of this section, the director, the head of a procurement
agency, or a designee of either officer shall promptly issue an
administrative protest determination in writing.
(2) The administrative protest determination shall state the
reasons for the action taken.
(d) Within five (5) days after it is written, a copy of the decision
under subsection (c) of this section shall be mailed or otherwise furnished
to the protestor and any other party intervening.
(e) An administrative protest determination under subsection (c) of
this section is:
(1) Final and conclusive; and
(2) Not an order as defined in the Arkansas Administrative
628 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(f) In the event of a timely protest under subsection (a) of this
section, the state shall not execute a contract that is the result of the
protested solicitation or award unless the director or the head of the
relevant procurement agency makes a written determination that the execution
of the contract without delay is necessary to protect substantial interests
of the state.
(g) When the protest is sustained and the successfully protesting
bidder or offeror was denied the contract award, the protesting bidder or
offeror may be entitled to the reasonable costs incurred in connection with
the solicitation, including bid preparation costs, through the commission.
(h) An actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor who is
aggrieved by a protest submitted under this section that was without merit or
intended purely to delay the award of a contract may bring a private cause of
action for tortious interference with a business expectancy against the
person or entity that submitted the protest.

19-61-702. Debarment or suspension.
(a) Applicability. This section applies to debarment for cause from
consideration for award of contracts, or a suspension from such consideration
during an investigation, when there is probable cause for such a debarment.
(b)(1)(A)(i) After reasonable notice to the person involved and
reasonable opportunity for that person to have a hearing before a committee
according to rules promulgated by the State Procurement Director, the
director or the head of a procurement agency may debar a person for cause
from consideration for award of contracts, provided that doing so is in the
best interests of the state.
(ii) The debarment shall not be for a period of more
than three (3) years.
(B)(i) The same officer may suspend a person from
consideration for award of contracts, provided that doing so is in the best
interests of the state and there is probable cause for debarment.
(ii) The suspension shall not be for a period
exceeding three (3) months.
(2) The authority to debar or suspend shall be exercised in
accordance with rules promulgated by the State Procurement Director.
629 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The causes for debarment or suspension because of unsuitability
for award of a contract shall be set forth in rules promulgated by the
director.
(d) The director or the head of a procurement agency shall issue a
written decision to debar or suspend. The decision shall state the reasons
for the action taken.
(e) Notice of Decision. A copy of the decision under subsection (d) of
this section shall be mailed or otherwise furnished within five (5) days
after it is written to the debarred or suspended person and any other party
intervening.
(f) Finality of Decision. A decision under subsection (d) of this
section shall be final and conclusive.

19-61-703. Resolution of contract and breach of contract
controversies.
(a) Applicability. This section applies to controversies between the
state and a contractor that arise under or by virtue of a contract between
the state and a contractor, including without limitation controversies based
upon breach of contract, mistake, misrepresentation, or other cause for
contract modifications or rescission.
(b)(1) The State Procurement Director, the head of a procurement
agency, or a designee of either officer may settle and resolve a controversy
described in subsection (a) of this section before commencement of an action
in a court or any other action provided by law concerning the controversy.
(2) The authority under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
be exercised in accordance with the law governing the Arkansas State Claims
Commission and the rules promulgated by the State Procurement Director.
(c)(1) If a claim or controversy as described in this section is not
resolved by mutual agreement, and after reasonable notice to the contractor
and reasonable opportunity for the contractor to present the claim or
controversy in accordance with the rules promulgated by the director, then
the head of a procurement agency, the director, or the designee of either
officer shall promptly issue a decision in writing.
(2) The decision shall state the reasons for the action taken.
(d) A copy of the decision under subsection (c) of this section shall
be mailed or otherwise furnished immediately to the contractor.
630 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(e) A decision under subsection (c) of this section is final and
conclusive.
(f) If the director, the head of a procurement agency, or the designee
of either officer does not issue the written decision required under
subsection (c) of this section within one hundred twenty (120) days after
written request for a final decision, or within such longer period as may be
agreed upon by the parties, then the contractor may proceed as if an adverse
decision has been received.

19-61-704. Remedies for unlawful solicitation or award.
(a) This section applies when it is determined upon any review
provided by law that a solicitation or award of a contract is in violation of
law.
(b) If before an award it is determined that a solicitation or
proposed award of a contract is in violation of law, then the solicitation or
proposed award shall be:
(1) Cancelled; or
(2) Revised to comply with the law.
(c) If after an award it is determined that a solicitation or award of
a contract is in violation of law, then in addition to or in lieu of other
remedies provided by law:
(1) If the person awarded the contract has not acted
fraudulently or in bad faith:
(A) The contract may be ratified and affirmed if it is
determined that doing so is in the best interests of the state; or
(B) The contract may be terminated;
(2) If the person awarded the contract has acted fraudulently or
in bad faith:
(A) The contract may be declared null and void; or
(B) The person awarded the contract may be directed to
proceed with performance of the contract and pay such damages, if any, as may
be appropriate if such action shall be in the best interests of the state.
(d) Before a contract is ratified and affirmed under subdivision
(c)(1)(A) of this section, a contract shall be presented to the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, to the Joint Budget
Committee, for review if the contract is required to be submitted for review
631 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under § 19-61-116.

19-61-705. Finality of administrative determinations.
In a judicial action or other action provided by law, factual or legal
determinations by employees, agents, or other persons appointed by the state
have no finality and are not conclusive, notwithstanding any contract
provision or rule of law to the contrary, except to the extent provided in:
(1) Section 19-61-513, which refers to finality of
determinations;
(2) Section 19-61-701(e), which refers to resolution of
protested solicitations and awards, finality of decision;
(3) Section 19-61-702(f), which refers to debarment or
suspension, finality of decision; and
(4) Section 19-61-703(e), which refers to resolution of contract
and breach of contract controversies, finality of decision.

Subchapter 8 — Intergovernmental Relations

19-61-801. Definitions concerning intergovernmental relations.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Consumer Price Index” means the most recent Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers published by the United States Department of
Labor, or its successor;
(2) “Cooperative purchasing agreement” means an agreement
entered into as the result of a procurement conducted by, or on behalf of,
more than one (1) public procurement unit or by a public procurement unit
with an external procurement activity;
(3)(A) “External procurement activity” means any buying
organization not located in this state that, if located in this state, would
qualify as a public procurement unit.
(B) An agency of the United States Government is an
external procurement activity;
(4) “Local public procurement unit” means:
(A) A county, city, town, state agency, and any other
subdivision of the state or public agency of the state;
(B) A fire protection district;
632 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) A regional water distribution district;
(D) A rural development authority;
(E) A public authority;
(F) A public educational, health, or other institution;
(G) A nonprofit corporation during the time that it
contracts with the Department of Human Services to provide services to
individuals with developmental disabilities or for transportation services,
so long as the contract exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per
year;
(H) A nonprofit corporation providing fire protection
services to a rural area or providing drinking water to the public in a rural
area; and
(I) To the extent not prohibited by law, any other entity
that expends public funds for the acquisition or leasing of commodities and
services;
(5) “Public procurement unit” means either a local public
procurement unit or a state public procurement unit;
(6)(A) “Public school construction services” means services
procured by a public school district or open-enrollment public charter school
under a contract with a corresponding cooperative purchasing verification
letter providing for the making of repairs, alterations, erection, or other
permanent improvements to a public building, property, or structure that do
not exceed a total aggregate amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for a
public procurement unit in a fiscal year.
(B)(i) Annually on July 1, at the direction of the Office
of State Procurement and with the approval of the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, the amount
stated in subdivision (6)(A) of this section shall be adjusted by the
percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the current
calendar year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar
year, not to exceed three percent (3%).
(ii) The Consumer Price Index for a calendar year is
the average of the Consumer Price Index as of the close of the twelve-month
period ending on August 31 of that calendar year; and
(7) “State public procurement unit” means the Office of State
Procurement and any other procurement agency of this state.
633 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

19-61-802. Cooperative purchasing.
(a)(1) A public procurement unit may participate in, sponsor, conduct,
or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the acquisition of
public school construction services, commodities, or other services in
accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants.
(2)(A) A cooperative purchasing agreement is limited to public
school construction services, commodities, and other services for which the
public procurement unit may realize savings or material economic value, or
both.
(B)(i) For cooperative purchasing agreements entered into
by a state agency, the State Procurement Director shall consider the economic
justification for using a cooperative purchasing agreement when granting or
withholding approval for the cooperative purchasing agreement.
(ii) The director shall adopt rules to create a
review policy outlining how the economic justification required under this
section may be demonstrated, including without limitation a comparison of:
(a) Current state contract pricing and the
pricing under a cooperative purchasing agreement; or
(b) Information obtained from a request for
information and pricing under a cooperative purchasing agreement.
(C) The director and the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services shall submit any request for the Office of
State Procurement to participate in a cooperative purchasing agreement to the
Governor for approval.
(b)(1)(A) The director shall present an annual report of all purchases
made under cooperative purchasing agreements by a state agency without an
agency procurement official under this section to the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, to the Joint Budget Committee.
(B) A state agency that has an agency procurement official
shall present an annual report of all purchases made under cooperative
purchasing agreements under this section to the Legislative Council or, if
the General Assembly is in session, to the Joint Budget Committee.
(2) The reports required under this subsection shall be
submitted by July 1 in the format required by the Legislative Council and
shall include the following:
634 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) The name of the contractor;
(B) The name of the procuring agency;
(C) The contact information for the contractor and
procuring agency;
(D) The total cost of the contract, including all
available extensions;
(E) A description of the public school construction
services, goods, or other services procured; and
(F) Any other information requested by the Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee.
(c) A contractor shall cooperate with the director in providing
information necessary for the director to complete the report required under
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) If a public procurement unit needs to procure public school
construction services in excess of the amount provided in § 19-61-801(6), the
public procurement unit may submit a request for a waiver to the Executive
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

19-61-803. Sale, etc., of commodities.
A public procurement unit by agreement with another public procurement
unit may sell to, acquire from, or use any commodities belonging to or
produced by another public procurement unit or external procurement activity
independent of the requirements of:
(1) Sections 19-61-401 — 19-61-403, 19-61-501 — 19-61-508, and
19-61-510 — 19-61-513, which refer to source selection and contract
formation; and
(2) Sections 19-61-601 — 19-61-603, which refer to commodity
management.

19-61-804. Intergovernmental use of commodities or services.
A public procurement unit may enter into an agreement with any other
public procurement unit or external procurement activity for the
intergovernmental use of commodities, technical and general services, or
professional and consultant services under the terms agreed upon between the
parties and in accordance with the rules promulgated under this chapter,
independent of the requirements of:
635 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Sections 19-61-401 — 19-61-403, 19-61-501 — 19-61-508, and
19-61-510 — 19-61-513 that refer to source selection and contract formation;
and
(2) Sections 19-61-601 — 19-61-603 that refer to commodity
management.

19-61-805. Rules.
The State Procurement Director may promulgate reasonable rules
pertaining to the sale or acquisition of any commodities, technical and
general services, or professional and consultant services belonging to or
produced by another public procurement unit or external procurement activity
as authorized in this section and §§ 19-61-802 — 19-61-804 and 19-61-806 —
19-61-811.

19-61-806. Joint use of facilities.
A public procurement unit may enter into agreements for the common use
or lease of warehousing facilities, capital equipment, and other facilities
with another public procurement unit or an external procurement activity
under the terms agreed upon between the parties.

19-61-807. State information services.
(a) Upon request, the State Procurement Director may make available to
public procurement units the following services, among others:
(1) Standard forms;
(2) Printed manuals;
(3) Product specifications and standards;
(4) Quality assurance testing services and methods;
(5) Qualified products lists;
(6) Source information;
(7) Common use commodities listings;
(8) Supplier prequalification information;
(9) Supplier performance ratings;
(10) Debarred and suspended bidders lists;
(11) Forms for invitations for bids, requests for proposals,
instructions to bidders, general contract provisions, and other contract
forms; and
636 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(12) Contracts, or published summaries of contracts, including
price and time of delivery information.
(b) The director may enter into contractual arrangements and publish a
schedule of fees for the services provided under this section.

19-61-808. Use of payments received.
All payments from a public procurement unit or external procurement
activity received by a public procurement unit supplying services shall be
available to the supplying public procurement unit.

19-61-809. Compliance by public procurement units.
(a) Procurement in Accordance with Requirements. When the public
procurement unit or external procurement activity administering a cooperative
purchase complies with the requirements of this chapter, a public procurement
unit participating in the cooperative purchase shall be deemed to have
complied with this chapter.
(b) When a public procurement unit or external procurement activity
not subject to this chapter administers a cooperative purchase for a public
procurement unit subject to this chapter, then the State Procurement Director
shall determine in writing that the procurement system and remedies
procedures of the public procurement unit or external procurement activity
administering the procurement substantially meet the requirements of this
chapter.

19-61-810. Review of procurement requirements.
(a)(1) To the extent possible and consistent with efficiency, the
State Procurement Director shall collect information concerning the type,
cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used commodities or services being
procured or used by state public procurement units.
(2) The director may also collect such information from local
public procurement units.
(b) The director may make available all such information to any public
procurement unit upon request.

19-61-811. Contract controversies.
Under a cooperative purchasing agreement, controversies arising between
637 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
an administering public procurement unit and its bidders, offerors, or
contractors shall be resolved in accordance with §§ 19-61-701 — 19-61-705,
which refer to legal and contractual remedies, when the administering public
procurement unit is a state public procurement unit or otherwise subject to
§§ 19-61-701 — 19-61-705.

19-61-812. Cooperative purchase of paper products for local
governments.
(a)(1) All cities, counties, and school districts shall participate in
a cooperative purchasing program for the purchase of paper products.
(2) The program shall be administered by the State Procurement
Director.
(b)(1) The director shall promulgate rules for administration of the
program.
(2) The rules shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the committees.

19-61-813. Review of information technology plans.
The Office of State Procurement shall ensure that all required
information has been submitted to the Office of Intergovernmental Services
for review of proper planning and technical requirements before the execution
of:
(1) A contract issued under this chapter that procures
information technology products or services with a total projected contract
amount, including any amendments to or possible extensions of the contract,
of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(2) A purchase of information technology products or services
made under a cooperative purchase agreement under § 19-61-802.

CHAPTER 62
BIDDING — STATE INDUSTRY PRIORITY

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Bidding Priority

638 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-62-101. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to protect Arkansas private industries
which employ Arkansas taxpayers and citizens from the unfair advantage held
by certain out-of-state correctional institutions that utilize convict labor
and are exempt from minimum wage requirements, Occupational Safety and Health
Act of 1970 requirements, and other such standards which are imposed on
private industries and which increase the costs of products manufactured by
private industries. This advantage which is enjoyed by many out-of-state
correctional institutions allows the out-of-state correctional institutions
to often receive contracts under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et
seq., bidding process when Arkansas private industries also submit bids, thus
hindering a healthy competitive environment for the private industries of
this state.

19-62-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Bid” means a proposal submitted to the state for the sale
of products to the state;
(2) “Correctional institution” means a penitentiary, jail,
prison, reformatory, or other such establishment owned, operated, or funded
by a state or local government in which incarcerated criminals are kept;
(3) “Private industry” means a manufacturer, maker of products,
company, corporation, or firm that is not a department, division, or arm of
the federal, state, or local governments;
(4) “Private industry located within the State of Arkansas”
means private industry that is located in Arkansas, employing Arkansas
citizens and taxpayers as laborers in the process of manufacturing goods and
products within this state; and
(5) “State” means the government of the State of Arkansas and
all departments, branches, agencies, and subdivisions of the state.

19-62-103. Provisions controlling.
Where provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with provisions of
the current Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., the provisions in
639 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this chapter shall control.

Subchapter 2 — Bidding Priority

19-62-201. Priority for state industries.
In the bidding process for the sale of products for use by the state, a
bid submitted by a private industry located within the State of Arkansas and
employing Arkansas taxpayers shall be given priority over a bid submitted by
an out-of-state correctional institution employing convict labor.

19-62-202. Award to lowest state bidder — Exceptions.
Subject to any applicable bonding requirements, in all bidding
procedures involving a bid by one (1) or more out-of-state correctional
institutions and a bid by one (1) or more private industries located within
the State of Arkansas, the contract shall be awarded to the sole Arkansas
bidder or lowest Arkansas bidder if the Arkansas bidder is not underbid by
more than five percent (5%), as provided in § 19-61-515, by another
representative of private industry located outside the State of Arkansas or
by more than fifteen percent (15%) by an out-of-state correctional
institution.

19-62-203. Underbid by nonresident industry or correctional
institution.
Subject to any applicable bonding requirements, if a private Arkansas
bidder is underbid by more than five percent (5%), as provided in § 19-61-
515, by another representative of private industry located outside the State
of Arkansas or is underbid by more than fifteen percent (15%) by an out-of-
state correctional institution, the state contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder, whether that bidder is a correctional institution
or is a representative of private industry.

CHAPTER 63
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SURPLUS PROPERTY

19-63-101. Authority to transfer to state and local agencies.
(a) The Division of Emergency Management may cooperate with the United
640 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
States Government in the transfer of government surplus property to all
departments and agencies of state and local government and to all other
agencies eligible to receive surplus property under Pub. L. No. 81-152 and
Pub. L. No. 81-754, and all other statutory laws that may be enacted by the
United States Congress covering the disposal of United State Government
surplus property.
(b) The division may take all action necessary to the proper
administration of the federal Surplus Property Program in the acquisition of
and the distribution of government surplus properties to eligible claimants
in this state, distribution to be in accordance with the appropriate
controlling federal statutes.
(c) The division may add to the cost of the properties an amount
necessary to defray the expenses of service under this section.

19-63-102. Purchase for schools and school districts.
(a) The Division of Emergency Management may purchase surplus
commodities, materials, supplies, equipment, and other property from the
United States Government through any of its agencies for tax-supported
schools and for school districts in Arkansas. The division may cooperate with
the State Procurement Director in the purchase of school items.
(b) Schools and school districts desiring to obtain federal surplus
materials, equipment, and similar property, shall apply to the division on
blanks furnished by the division for that purpose.
(c) Schools and school districts applying to the division to purchase
surplus materials, equipment, and other property from the United States
Government shall pay cash for it by drawing a voucher or warrant in favor of
the United States Government for the purchase price of the surplus materials,
equipment, and other property.

19-63-103. Service charge.
(a) The Division of Emergency Management may add to the cost of
surplus properties secured by the State Agency for Surplus Property an amount
necessary to defray the expense of this service and to repay into the
Revolving Loan Fund loans made to the agency as provided in this section.
(b) The division may establish service charges in such amounts as may
be necessary to cover the expenses of the department in administering special
641 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
federal service programs for schools and agencies. These charges are to be
paid by the school, institution, or agency in the amount designated by the
division.
(c) The division shall take such action as is necessary to collect
such charges and may, in its discretion, withhold from any state moneys over
which the division has control funds necessary to pay the amounts owing by
such school districts and agencies.
(d) It is the intention of the General Assembly that the schools and
agencies shall pay for such services amounts sufficient to reimburse the
division for expenses incurred in the operation of the federal Surplus
Property Program and in the operation of special federal service programs.

19-63-104. Rural water associations.
Rural water associations are eligible to participate in the federal
Surplus Property Program operated under Pub. L. No. 81-152 and Pub. L. No.
81-754 as now administered by the Division of Emergency Management.

19-63-105. Authority to transfer excess military property to state and
local agencies — Service charge.
The Law Enforcement Support Office may:
(1) Cooperate with the United States Government under 10 U.S.C.
§ 2576a in the transfer of excess military property to state and local law
enforcement agencies:
(A) Whose primary function is the enforcement of
applicable federal, state, and local laws; and
(B) Whose compensated law enforcement officers have powers
of arrest and apprehension, including without limitation counter-drug and
counter-terrorism activities;
(2) Take any action necessary to the proper administration of
the acquisition and the distribution of excess military properties to
eligible claimants in this state, with distribution to be in accordance with
the appropriate controlling federal statutes;
(3) Establish service charges in an amount necessary to cover
the expenses of the Department of Public Safety incurred in administering
this section; and
(4) Take action as necessary to collect service charges and,
642 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
from any state moneys over which the department has control, withhold funds
necessary to pay an amount owing by a state or local law enforcement agency.

CHAPTER 64
ETHICS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Standards of Ethical Conduct
Subchapter 3. Remedies for Breach of Ethical Standards
Subchapter 4. Duties of Secretary of Department of Transformation and Shared
Services
Subchapter 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-64-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Blind trust” means an independently managed trust in which
the employee-beneficiary does not have management rights and in which the
employee-beneficiary is not given notice of alterations in or other
dispositions of the property subject to the trust;
(2) “Business” means a corporation, partnership, individual,
sole proprietorship, joint-stock company, joint venture, or any other legal
entity;
(3) “Commodities” means all property, including without
limitation:
(A) Equipment;
(B) Printing;
(C) Stationery;
(D) Supplies;
(E) Insurance; and
(F) Real property;
(4) “Confidential information” means information that is
available to an employee only because of the employee's status as an employee
of this state and is not a matter of public knowledge or available to the
public on request;
643 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(5) “Conspicuously” means written in such special or distinctive
format, print, or manner that a reasonable person against whom it is to
operate ought to have noticed it;
(6)(A) “Contract” means any type of state agreement, regardless
of what the state agreement is called, for the purchase or disposal of
commodities and services.
(B) “Contract” includes:
(i) An award and a notice of award;
(ii) A contract of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-
fixed-fee, or incentive type;
(iii) A contract providing for the issuance of job
or task orders;
(iv) A lease;
(v) A letter contract;
(vi) A purchase order; and
(vii) A supplemental agreement with respect to any
of the items under subdivisions (6)(B)(i)-(vi) of this section;
(7) “Contractor” means a person having a contract with a state
agency;
(8) “Employee” means an individual drawing a salary from a state
agency, whether elected or not, and a nonsalaried individual performing
personal services for a state agency;
(9) “Financial interest” means:
(A) Ownership of any interest or involvement in a
relationship from which, or as a result of which, a person within the past
year has received, or is presently or in the future entitled to receive, more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year, or its equivalent;
(B) Ownership of more than a five percent (5%) interest in
any business; or
(C) Holding a position in a business such as an officer,
director, trustee, partner, employee, or the like, or holding a position of
management;
(10) “Gratuity” means a payment, loan, subscription, advance,
deposit of money, services, or anything of more than nominal value, present
or promised, unless consideration of substantially equal or greater value is
received;
644 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(11) “Immediate family” means a spouse, child, parent, brother,
sister, and grandparent;
(12) “Official responsibility” means direct administrative or
operating authority, whether intermediate or final, either exercisable alone
or with others, either personally or through subordinates, to approve,
disapprove, or otherwise direct state action;
(13) “Person” means a business, individual, union, committee,
club, or other organization or group of individuals;
(14)(A) “Procurement” means the buying, purchasing, renting,
leasing, or otherwise obtaining of any commodities or services.
(B) “Procurement” includes all functions that pertain to
the obtaining of a public procurement, including description of requirements,
selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of contract, and
all phases of contract administration;
(15) “Services” means technical, professional, or other services
involving the furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a contractor; and
(16) “State agency” means an office, department, commission,
council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, agency,
government corporation, or other establishment or official of the executive,
judicial, or legislative branch of this state.

19-64-102. Penalties.
An employee or nonemployee who knowingly violates this chapter is
guilty of an unclassified felony and upon conviction shall be fined in any
sum not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or shall be imprisoned not
less than one (1) nor more than five (5) years, or shall be punished by both.

19-64-103. Statement of policy.
(a) Public employment is a public trust. It is the policy of the state
to promote and balance the objective of protecting government integrity and
the objective of facilitating the recruitment and retention of personnel
needed by the state. The policy is implemented by prescribing essential
restrictions against conflict of interest without creating unnecessary
obstacles to entering public service.
(b) Public employees must discharge their duties impartially so as to
assure fair competitive access to governmental procurement by responsible
645 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
contractors. Moreover, they should conduct themselves in such a manner as to
foster public confidence in the integrity of the state procurement
organization.
(c) To achieve the purpose of this chapter, it is essential that those
doing business with the state also observe the ethical standards prescribed
in this chapter.

Subchapter 2 — Standards of Ethical Conduct

19-64-201. General standards of ethical conduct.
(a) General Ethical Standards for Employees.
(1) Any attempt to realize personal gain through public
employment by conduct inconsistent with the proper discharge of the
employee's duties is a breach of a public trust.
(2) In order to fulfill this general prescribed standard, an
employee shall also meet the specific standards set forth in § 19-64-202,
which refers to employee conflict of interest; § 19-64-203, which refers to
employee disclosure requirements; § 19-64-204, which refers to gratuities and
kickbacks; § 19-64-205, which refers to prohibition against contingent fees;
§ 19-64-206, which refers to restrictions on employment of present and former
employees; and § 19-64-207, which refers to use of confidential information.
(b) General Ethical Standards for Nonemployees. Any effort to influence
a public employee to breach the standards of ethical conduct set forth in
this chapter is also a breach of ethical standards.

19-64-202. Employee conflict of interest.
(a) Conflict of Interest.
(1) It is a breach of ethical standards for an employee to
participate directly or indirectly in a proceeding or application, in a
request for ruling or other determination, in a claim or controversy, or in
any other particular matter pertaining to a contract or subcontract, and any
solicitation or proposal therefor, in which to the employee's knowledge:
(A) The employee or a member of the employee's immediate
family has a financial interest;
(B) A business or organization has a financial interest,
in which business or organization the employee, or a member of the employee's
646 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
immediate family, has a financial interest; or
(C) Any other person, business, or organization with whom
the employee or a member of the employee's immediate family is negotiating or
has an arrangement concerning prospective employment is a party.
(2) As used in this subsection, “participate directly or
indirectly” includes without limitation involvement through decision,
approval, disapproval, recommendation, preparation of any part of a
procurement request, influencing the content of any specification or
procurement standard, rendering of advice, investigation, auditing, or in any
other advisory capacity.
(b) Financial Interest in a Blind Trust. When an employee or a member
of the employee's immediate family holds a financial interest in a blind
trust, the employee shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest with
regard to matters pertaining to that financial interest if disclosure of the
existence of the blind trust has been made to the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services.
(c) Discovery of Conflict of Interest, Disqualification, and Waiver.
Upon discovery of a possible conflict of interest, an employee shall promptly
file a written statement of disqualification with the secretary and withdraw
from further participation in the transaction involved and, at the same time,
may apply to the secretary in accordance with § 19-64-402 for an advisory
opinion as to what further application, if any, the employee may have in the
transaction, or for a waiver in accordance with § 19-64-403.

19-64-203. Employee disclosure requirements.
(a) Disclosure of Benefit Received from Contract. An employee who has
or obtains a benefit from a state contract with a business in which the
employee has a financial interest shall report the benefit to the Secretary
of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services. However, this
section does not apply to a contract with a business when the employee's
interest in the business has been placed in a disclosed blind trust.
(b) Failure to Disclose Benefit Received. An employee who knows or
should have known of a benefit described in subsection (a) of this section
and fails to report the benefit to the secretary is in breach of the ethical
standards of this section.

647 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-64-204. Gratuities and kickbacks.
(a) Gratuities. It is a breach of ethical standards for a person to
offer, give, or agree to give an employee or former employee, or for an
employee or former employee to solicit, demand, accept, or agree to accept
from another person, a gratuity or an offer of employment in connection with
a decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, preparation of any part of
a purchase request, influencing the content of a specification or procurement
standard, rendering of advice, investigation, auditing, or in any other
advisory capacity in a proceeding or application, request for ruling,
determination, claim, or controversy, or other particular matter, pertaining
to a contract or subcontract and any solicitation or proposal therefor.
(b) Kickbacks. It is a breach of ethical standards for a payment,
gratuity, or offer of employment to be made by or on behalf of a
subcontractor under a contract to the prime contractor or higher tier
subcontractor, or a person associated therewith, as an inducement for the
award of a subcontract or order.

19-64-205. Prohibition against contingent fees.
(a) Contingent Fees. It is a breach of ethical standards for a person
to be retained, or to retain a person, to solicit or secure a state contract
upon an agreement or understanding for a commission, percentage, brokerage,
or contingent fee, except for retention of bona fide employees or bona fide
established commercial selling agencies maintained by the contractor for the
purpose of securing business.
(b)(1) Representation of Contractor. Before being awarded a state
contract other than by procedures set forth in the Arkansas Procurement Law,
§ 19-61-101 et seq., and rules promulgated under the Arkansas Procurement
Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., for small purchases, every person shall represent,
in writing, that the person has not retained anyone in violation of
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Failure to comply with this subsection is a breach of
ethical standards.
(c) Notice. The representation prescribed in subsection (b) of this
section shall be conspicuously set forth in all contracts and solicitations
for contracts.

648 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-64-206. Restrictions on employment of present and former employees
— Definition.
(a) Contemporaneous Employment Prohibited. It is a breach of ethical
standards for an employee who is involved in procurement to become or be,
while such an employee, the employee of a party contracting with the state
agency by which the employee is employed.
(b) Restrictions on Former Employees in Matters Connected with Their
Former Duties.
(1) Permanent Disqualification of Former Employee Personally
Involved in a Particular Matter. It is a breach of ethical standards for a
former employee knowingly to act as a principal or as an agent for anyone
other than the state in connection with any:
(A) Judicial or other proceeding, application, request for
a ruling, or other determination;
(B) Contract;
(C) Claim; or
(D) Charge or controversy,
in which the employee participated personally and substantially through
decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, rendering of advice,
investigation, or otherwise while an employee, when the state is a party or
has a direct and substantial interest.
(2) One-Year Representation Restriction Regarding Matters for
Which a Former Employee Was Officially Responsible. It is a breach of
ethical standards for any former employee, within one (1) year after
cessation of the former employee's official responsibility in connection with
any:
(A) Judicial or other proceeding, application, request for
a ruling, or other determination;
(B) Contract;
(C) Claim; or
(D) Charge or controversy,
knowingly to act as a principal or as an agent for anyone other than the
state in matters that were within the former employee's official
responsibility, when the state is a party or has a direct or substantial
interest.
(c) Disqualification of Partners.
649 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) When Partner Is a State Employee.
It is a breach of ethical standards for a person who is a partner
of an employee knowingly to act as a principal or as an agent for anyone
other than the state in connection with any:
(A) Judicial or other proceeding, application, request for
a ruling, or other determination;
(B) Contract;
(C) Claim; or
(D) Charge or controversy,
in which the employee either participates personally and substantially
through decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, the rendering of
advice, investigation, or otherwise, or which is the subject of the
employee's official responsibility, when the state is a party or has a direct
and substantial interest.
(2) When a Partner Is a Former State Employee. It is a breach
of ethical standards for a partner of a former employee knowingly to act as a
principal or as an agent for anyone other than the state when the former
employee is barred under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Selling to State After Termination of Employment Is Prohibited.
(1) It is a breach of ethical standards for a former employee,
unless the former employee's last annual salary based on the state fiscal
year did not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), to engage in selling
or attempting to sell commodities or services, including technical or
professional consultant services, to the state for one (1) year following the
date employment ceased.
(2) As used in this subsection, “selling or attempting to sell”
means:
(A) Signing a bid, proposal, or contract;
(B) Negotiating a contract;
(C) Contacting an employee for the purpose of obtaining,
negotiating, or discussing changes in specifications, price, cost allowances,
or other terms of a contract;
(D) Settling disputes concerning performance of a
contract; or
(E) Any other liaison activity with a view toward the
ultimate consummation of a sale although the actual contract for the sale is
650 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
subsequently negotiated by another person.
(e)(1) This section does not preclude a former employee from accepting
employment with private industry solely because his or her employer is a
contractor with this state.
(2) This section does not preclude an employee, a former
employee, or a partner of an employee or former employee from filing an
action as a taxpayer for alleged violations of this subchapter.

19-64-207. Use of confidential information.
It is a breach of ethical standards for an employee or former employee
knowingly to use confidential information for actual or anticipated personal
gain or for the actual or anticipated personal gain of any other person.

19-64-208. Public access to procurement information.
Procurement information is a public record to the extent provided in
the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., except as
otherwise provided in this chapter and the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-
101 et seq.

Subchapter 3 — Remedies for Breach of Ethical Standards

19-64-301. Civil and administrative remedies against employees who
breach ethical standards.
(a) Existing Remedies Not Impaired. Civil and administrative remedies
against employees that are in existence on July 1, 1979, shall not be
impaired.
(b) Supplemental Remedies. In addition to existing remedies for breach
of the ethical standards of this chapter, or rules promulgated under this
chapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may impose any one (1) or more of the following upon an employee:
(1) Oral or written warnings or reprimands;
(2) Forfeiture of pay without suspension;
(3) Suspension with or without pay for specified periods of
time; and
(4) Termination of employment.
(c) Right to Recover from Employee Value Received in Breach of Ethical
651 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Standards. The value of anything received by an employee in breach of the
ethical standards of this chapter, or rules promulgated under this chapter,
is recoverable by the state as provided in § 19-64-303, which refers to
recovery of value transferred or received in breach of ethical standards.
(d) Due Process. Notice and an opportunity for a hearing shall be
provided before imposition of any of the remedies set forth in subsection (b)
of this section.

19-64-302. Civil and administrative remedies against nonemployees who
breach ethical standards.
(a) Existing Remedies Not Impaired. Civil and administrative remedies
against nonemployees that are in existence on July 1, 1979, shall not be
impaired.
(b) Supplemental Remedies. In addition to the existing remedies for
breach of the ethical standards of this chapter, or rules promulgated under
this chapter, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services may impose any one (1) or more of the following upon a nonemployee:
(1) Oral or written warnings or reprimands;
(2) Termination of transactions; and
(3) Suspension or debarment from being a contractor or
subcontractor under state contracts.
(c) Right to Recover from Nonemployee Value Transferred in Breach of
Ethical Standards. The value of anything transferred in breach of the ethical
standards of this chapter, or rules promulgated under this chapter, by a
nonemployee is recoverable by the state from the nonemployee as provided in §
19-64-303, which refers to recovery of value transferred or received in
breach of ethical standards.
(d) Due Process. Notice and an opportunity for a hearing shall be
provided before imposition of any of the remedies set forth in subsection (b)
of this section.

19-64-303. Recovery of value transferred or received in breach of
ethical standards.
(a) General Provisions. The value of anything transferred or received
in breach of the ethical standards of this chapter, or rules promulgated
under this chapter, by an employee or a nonemployee may be recovered from
652 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
both the employee and the nonemployee.
(b) Recovery of Kickbacks by the State.
(1)(A) Upon a showing that a subcontractor made a kickback to a
prime contractor or a higher tier subcontractor in connection with the award
of a subcontract or order under a subcontract, it shall be conclusively
presumed that the amount of the kickback was included in the price of the
subcontract or order and ultimately borne by the state and is recoverable
under this chapter from the recipient.
(B) In addition, the amount of the kickback under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section may also be recovered from the
subcontractor making the kickback.
(2) Recovery from one (1) offending party under this section
does not preclude recovery from other offending parties.

Subchapter 4 — Duties of Secretary of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services

19-64-401. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services
shall promulgate rules to implement this chapter and shall do so in
accordance with this chapter and the applicable provisions of the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

19-64-402. Advisory opinions.
(a)(1) On written request of an employee or contractor and in
consultation with the Attorney General, the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services may render a written advisory opinion
regarding the appropriateness of the course of conduct to be followed in a
proposed transaction.
(2) A request and a written advisory opinion under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section may be published in the manner in which rules of this
state are published.
(b) Compliance with the requirements of a written advisory opinion of
the secretary rendered under this section constitutes compliance with the
ethical standards of this chapter.

653 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-64-403. Waiver.
(a) On written request of an employee, the Secretary of the Department
of Transformation and Shared Services may grant the employee a written waiver
from the application of § 19-64-202, which refers to employee conflict of
interest, and grant permission to proceed with the transaction to such extent
and upon such terms and conditions as may be specified.
(b) Waiver and permission under this section may be granted when the
interests of the state require the waiver or permission or when the ethical
conflict is insubstantial or remote.

Subchapter 5 — Miscellaneous Provisions

19-64-501. Participation in business incubators — Rules and
guidelines.
(a) This chapter does not apply to faculty or staff of state-supported
institutions of higher education participating in business incubators within
this state.
(b)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services shall promulgate rules pursuant to the procedure for adoption as
provided under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq., and under § 10-3-309 to implement a program allowing admittance to
business incubators by faculty or staff of state-supported institutions of
higher education or admittance by companies in which faculty or staff of
state-supported institutions of higher education may hold an ownership
interest.
(2) The program under this section may include guidelines
setting forth full disclosure requirements, any limitations on ownership
interests, maximum income amounts to be received, annual reporting to the
General Assembly, mandatory levels of student participation and such other
reasonable restrictions and requirements as are necessary to maintain the
public trust while encouraging the facilitation of commercialization of
university-generated technology or discovery.

19-64-502. Contracts or proposals between state-supported institution
of higher education and its employees or former employees.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, if,
654 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
in either of the events in subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (B) of this section,
the contract or subcontract, solicitation, or proposal involves patents,
copyrights, or other proprietary information in which a state-supported
institution of higher education and an employee or former employee of the
state-supported institution of higher education have rights or interests,
provided that a contract or subcontract shall be approved by the governing
board of the state-supported institution of higher education in a public
meeting, it shall not be a violation of § 19-64-206, a conflict of interest,
or a breach of ethical standards for:
(A) The state-supported institution of higher education to
contract with a person or firm in which an employee or former employee of the
state-supported institution of higher education has a financial interest; or
(B) The employee or former employee of the state-supported
institution of higher education to participate directly or indirectly in a
matter pertaining to a contract, subcontract, solicitation, or proposal for a
contract or subcontract between a state-supported institution of higher
education and a person or firm in which the employee or former employee has a
financial interest.
(2)(A) Within thirty (30) days of the approval by the governing
board of a state-supported institution of higher education of a contract,
subcontract, solicitation, or proposal executed under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, the state-supported institution of higher education shall file
a summary of the contract, subcontract, solicitation, or proposal with the
president of the state-supported institution of higher education.
(B) Failure to file the required summary with the
president of the state-supported institution of higher education as required
under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section renders the contract null and
void.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., and § 19-67-
101 et seq. do not prevent a state agency from contracting for goods or
services, including professional or consultant services, with an organization
that employs or contracts with a regular, full-time, or part-time employee of
a state-supported institution of higher education in situations in which the
employee of the state-supported institution of higher education will provide
some or all of the goods or services under the contract.
(2) An organization or state agency entering into a contract
655 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
described under this subsection shall comply with the Arkansas Procurement
Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., and § 19-67-101 et seq. to the extent that the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., and § 19-67-101 et seq. do not
conflict with this section.
(3) An employee of a state-supported institution of higher
education who provides goods or services to a state agency through his or her
association with an organization that has a contract with the state agency to
provide goods or services shall obtain the requisite approvals under the
policies of the state-supported institution of higher education by which he
or she is employed and comply with all provisions of this chapter.
(c)(1) No later than January 31 each year, an employee or former
employee contracting or receiving benefits under this section shall file with
the Secretary of State on a form provided by the Secretary of State a
disclosure of the type and amount of the contract or benefits received during
the previous year.
(2) Failure to file the required form with the Secretary of
State as required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section is a breach of
ethical standards.

19-64-503. Special state employees — Conflicts of interest —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Conflict of interest” means a special state employee's
direct or indirect pecuniary or other interest in a matter before a covered
board.
(B) “Conflict of interest” includes without limitation the
following:
(i) An offer of employment from an entity that is
involved in a procurement matter with the covered board or is involved in a
discussion of a procurement matter with the covered board;
(ii) Being an officer or employee of a business,
association, or nonprofit organization that is involved in a procurement
matter with the covered board or is involved in a discussion of a procurement
matter with the covered board; and
(iii) Receiving compensation from an entity that is
involved in a procurement matter or is involved in a discussion of a
656 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
procurement matter with the covered board;
(2)(A) “Covered board” means:
(i) A commission, board, bureau, office, or other
state instrumentality created within the executive branch; and
(ii) An entity that is created by rule, statute,
legislative direction, executive order, or other informal means if the entity
has decision-making authority over procurement criteria, contracts,
appointment of individuals to negotiate procurement directly or indirectly,
or the approval of procurements.
(B) “Covered board” does not include the following:
(i) The constitutional departments of the state;
(ii) The elected constitutional offices of the
state;
(iii) The General Assembly, including the
Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and supporting
agencies and bureaus of the General Assembly;
(iv) The Supreme Court;
(v) The Court of Appeals;
(vi) The circuit courts;
(vii) Prosecuting attorneys;
(viii) The Administrative Office of the Courts;
(ix) An institution of higher education;
(x) A municipal government;
(xi) A county government;
(xii) An interstate agency; or
(xiii) A legislative task force or committee if the
legislative task force or committee only advises the General Assembly; and
(3)(A) “Special state employee” means a person appointed to a
covered board, whether or not the person:
(i) Receives compensation for his or her services;
(ii) Receives reimbursement for travel expenses;
(iii) Receives per diem; or
(iv) Was appointed formally or informally.
(B) “Special state employee” does not include a
constitutional officeholder or an ex officio or nonvoting member of an entity
described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.
657 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) A special state employee shall disclose a conflict of interest in
a procurement matter before the covered board:
(1) Either:
(A) In writing to the head of the covered board; or
(B) Orally or in writing at a public meeting of the
covered board if the disclosure is included in the minutes of the public
meeting; and
(2) By filing a conflict of interest disclosure report with the
Secretary of State within five (5) business days of the date the special
state employee becomes aware of the conflict of interest.
(c) A special state employee shall not vote on, receive or read
confidential materials related to, participate in discussion of, or attempt
to influence the covered board's decision on a procurement matter if the
special state employee has a conflict of interest in the procurement matter.
(d) A special state employee who is a lobbyist registered under § 21-
8-601 shall recuse himself or herself from a procurement matter before the
covered board if:
(1) The special state employee receives compensation as a
lobbyist from an entity involved in the procurement matter; or
(2) The procurement matter involves a person or entity that is a
competitor of a lobbying client of the special state employee.
(e) A special state employee or former special state employee shall
not:
(1) Represent an entity other than the state in a matter in
which he or she participated in making a decision, rendering approval or
disapproval, making a recommendation, or rendering advice on behalf of the
covered board; or
(2) Assist or represent a party for contingent compensation in a
matter involving a covered board other than in a judicial, administrative, or
quasi-judicial proceeding.
(f) A former special state employee shall not lobby a member or the
staff of a covered board of which he or she is a former member for one (1)
year after the cessation of the special state employee's membership on the
covered board.
(g) A contract entered into by a covered board, including a renewal,
extension, or amendment of a contract entered into by a covered board, shall
658 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
include a statement that a special state employee has not been influenced by
the vendor in the course of the procurement.
(h)(1) A complaint about a violation of this section may be filed with
the Arkansas Ethics Commission.
(2) A violation of this section is grounds for discipline or
removal of the special state employee by the commission.
(i) The commission shall promulgate rules regarding disciplinary and
removal proceedings for special state employees.

CHAPTER 65
PROCUREMENT OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Certain Professional Services Procured by the State and
Political Subdivisions

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-65-101. Policy.
(a) It is the policy of the State of Arkansas that state agencies
shall follow the procedures stated in this section, except that competitive
bidding shall not be used for the procurement of legal, architectural,
engineering, construction management, and land surveying professional
consultant services if:
(1) State agencies not exempt from review and approval of the
Building Authority Division shall follow procedures established by the
division for the procurement of architectural, engineering, land surveying,
and construction management services; and
(2) Institutions of higher education exempt from review and
approval of the division shall follow procedures established by their
governing boards for the procurement of architectural, engineering, land
surveying, and construction management professional consultant services.
(b) It is the policy of the State of Arkansas and its political
subdivisions that political subdivisions shall follow the procedures stated
in this section, except that competitive bidding shall not be used for the
procurement of legal, financial advisory, architectural, engineering,
659 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
construction management, and land surveying professional consultant services.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, a political subdivision of the state
may elect not to use competitive bidding for other professional services not
listed in subsection (b) of this section with a two-thirds (⅔) vote of the
political subdivision's governing body.

19-65-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Construction management” means a project delivery method
based on an agreement in which a state agency, political subdivision, public
school district, or institution of higher education acquires from a
construction entity a series of services that include without limitation
design review, scheduling, cost control, value engineering, constructability
evaluation, preparation and coordination of bid packages, and construction
administration.
(B) “Construction management” includes without limitation:
(i)(a) “Agency construction management”, in which a
political subdivision selects a construction manager to serve as an agent for
the purpose of providing administration and management services.
(b) The construction manager shall not hold
subcontracts for the project or provide project bonding for the project;
(ii) “At-risk construction management”, in which the
construction entity, after providing agency services during the
preconstruction period, serves as the general contractor and the following
conditions are met:
(a) The construction manager provides a
maximum guaranteed price;
(b) The political subdivision holds all trade
contracts and purchase orders; and
(c) The portion of the project not covered by
the trade contracts is bonded and guaranteed by the construction manager; and
(iii)(a) “General contractor construction
management”, in which the construction entity, after providing agency
services during the preconstruction period, serves as the general contractor.
(b) The general contractor shall hold all
trade contracts and purchase orders and shall bond and guarantee the project;
660 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) “Political subdivision” means a county, school district,
city of the first class, city of the second class, incorporated town, and all
other bodies politic; and
(3) “Other professional services” means professional services
not listed in § 19-65-101(b) as defined by a political subdivision with a
two-thirds (⅔) vote of its governing body.

Subchapter 2 — Certain Professional Services Procured by the State and
Political Subdivisions

19-65-201. Annual statements of qualifications — Restrictions on
competitive bidding.
(a) In the procurement of professional services, a state agency or
political subdivision that utilizes the professional services may encourage
firms engaged in the lawful practice of professions offering professional
services to submit annual statements of qualifications to the state agency or
political subdivision or may request such information as needed for a
particular public project.
(b) The state agency or political subdivision shall evaluate current
statements of qualifications of firms on file or may request such information
as needed for a particular public project whenever a project requiring
professional services is proposed.
(c)(1) A political subdivision shall not use competitive bidding for
the procurement of legal, financial advisory, architectural, engineering,
construction management, and land surveying professional consulting services.
(2) A political subdivision shall not use competitive bidding
for the procurement of other professional services without a two-thirds (⅔)
vote of the political subdivision's governing body.
(d)(1) A public school district that utilizes construction management
services shall encourage construction management firms to submit to the
school district annual statements of qualifications or may request such
information as needed for a particular public project.
(2) The public school district shall evaluate current statements
of qualifications on file with the public school district or when submitted
as requested whenever a project requiring professional services of a
construction manager is proposed.
661 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) The public school district shall not use competitive bidding
for the procurement of professional services of a construction manager.
(e)(1) A request for qualifications under this section may be used for
certain procurements through a request for qualifications other than legal,
architectural, engineering, construction management, land surveying, and
interior design services if the:
(A) State Procurement Director approves the use of a
request for qualifications and determines that it is the most suitable method
of procurement; and
(B) Approval of the director under subdivision (e)(1)(A)
of this section is submitted to the Legislative Council for review.
(2) In determining whether a request for qualifications under
this subsection is the most suitable method of procurement, the director
shall consider, based on information submitted by the requesting state
agency:
(A) Why the request for qualifications is the most
suitable method of procurement;
(B) Why cost should not be considered in the procurement;
and
(C) How the cost of the contract will be controlled if
cost is not a factor in the procurement.

19-65-202. Evaluation of qualifications.
In evaluating the qualifications of each firm, the state agency or
political subdivision shall consider:
(1) The specialized experience and technical competence of the
firm with respect to the type of professional services required;
(2) The capacity and capability of the firm to perform the work
in question, including specialized services, within the time limitations
fixed for the completion of the project;
(3) The past record of performance of the firm with respect to
such factors as control of costs, quality of work, and ability to meet
schedules and deadlines; and
(4) The firm's proximity to and familiarity with the area in
which the project is located.

662 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-65-203. Selection.
(a) A state agency or political subdivision shall select three (3)
qualified firms under this chapter.
(b) The state agency or political subdivision shall then select the
firm considered the best-qualified and capable of performing the desired work
and negotiate a contract for the project with the firm selected.

19-65-204. Negotiation of contracts.
(a) For the basis of negotiations under this chapter, a state agency
or political subdivision and the selected firm shall jointly prepare a
detailed, written description of the scope of the proposed services.
(b)(1)(A) If a state agency or political subdivision is unable to
negotiate a satisfactory contract under this chapter with the firm selected,
negotiations with that firm shall be terminated.
(B) The state agency or political subdivision shall then
undertake negotiations with another of the qualified firms selected.
(2)(A) If there is a failing of accord with the second firm,
negotiations with the firm shall be terminated.
(B) The state agency or political subdivision shall then
undertake negotiations with the third qualified firm.
(c) If a state agency or political subdivision is unable to negotiate
a contract with any of the selected firms under this chapter, the state
agency or political subdivision shall reevaluate the necessary professional
services, including the scope and reasonable fee requirements, again compile
a list of qualified firms, and proceed in accordance with this chapter.
(d) When unable to negotiate a contract for construction management
under this chapter, a public school district also shall perform a
reevaluation of services in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

19-65-205. Design-build construction — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Design-build” means a project delivery method in which the
school district acquires both design and construction services in the same
contract from a single legal entity, referred to as the “design-builder”,
without competitive bidding;
(2)(A) “Design-builder” means any individual, partnership, joint
663 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
venture, corporation, or other legal entity that is appropriately licensed in
the State of Arkansas and that furnishes the necessary design services, in
addition to the construction of the work, whether by itself or through
subcontracts, including without limitation subcontracts for architectural
services, landscape architectural services, and engineering services.
(B) Architectural services, landscape architectural
services, and engineering services shall be performed by an architect,
landscape architect, or engineer licensed in the State of Arkansas.
(C) Construction contracting shall be performed by a
contractor qualified and licensed under Arkansas law; and
(3) “Design-build contract” means the contract between the
school district and a design-builder to furnish the architecture,
engineering, and related services as required and to furnish the labor,
materials, and other construction services for the same project.
(b)(1) A school district may use design-build construction as a
project delivery method for building, altering, repairing, improving,
maintaining, or demolishing any structure, or any improvement to real
property owned by the school district.
(2) The design-builder shall contract directly with
subcontractors and shall be responsible for the bonding of the project.
(3) A project using design-build construction shall comply with
state and federal law.
(c) The Division of Public School Academic Facilities and
Transportation shall develop and promulgate rules consistent with this
section concerning the use of design-build construction by school districts.

CHAPTER 66
PURCHASES OF WORK CENTER PRODUCTS AND SERVICES

19-66-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commodities” means all property, including without
limitation equipment, printing, stationery, supplies, and insurance, but
excluding real property, leases on real property, or a permanent interest in
real property;
(2) “Fiscal year” means July 1 of one (1) year through June 30
664 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of the next year;
(3) “Individuals with disabilities” means those persons who have
a medically or psychiatrically determined physical, mental, or developmental
disability constituting a substantial vocational handicap;
(4) “Ordering office” means a state department, independent
establishment, board, commission, bureau, service, or division of state
government and a wholly owned state corporation;
(5) “Products” means commodities or services for which the price
of the commodities includes at least twenty percent (20%) value added when
the work center is awarded a contract using the ten percent (10%) preference,
and in the case of services, that the services are performed by individuals
with disabilities;
(6)(A) “Services” means the furnishing of labor, time, or effort
by a contractor, not involving the delivery of a specific end product other
than reports that are merely incidental to the required performance.
(B) “Services” does not include employment agreements,
collective bargaining agreements, or architectural or engineering contracts
requiring approval of the Building Authority Division;
(7) “Sheltered workshop” means a work center that has:
(A) Certification from the United States Department of
Labor as a sheltered workshop; and
(B) Been licensed by the Division of Developmental
Disabilities Services or certified by Arkansas Rehabilitation Services;
(8)(A) “Work center” means a facility certified by Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services where any manufacture or handiwork is carried on and
that is operated for the primary purpose of providing evaluation, training,
and gainful employment to individuals with disabilities in Arkansas:
(i) As an interim step in the rehabilitation process
for those individuals with disabilities in Arkansas who cannot be readily
absorbed in the competitive labor market; or
(ii) During such time as employment opportunities
for the individuals with disabilities in Arkansas in the competitive labor
market do not exist.
(B) “Work center” includes without limitation:
(i) A sheltered work center; and
(ii) A work center for the blind; and
665 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(9) “Work center for the blind” means a facility certified by
the Division of State Services for the Blind where the manufacture,
handiwork, or provision of services is carried on and that is operated to
provide evaluation, training, and gainful employment to individuals in the
State of Arkansas eligible for services from the Division of State Services
for the Blind:
(A) As an interim step in the rehabilitation process for
those individuals in the State of Arkansas eligible for service from the
Division of State Services for the Blind who cannot be readily absorbed in
the competitive labor market;
(B) During such time as employment opportunities for
individuals in the State of Arkansas eligible for service from the Division
of State Services for the Blind in the competitive labor market do not exist;
or
(C) For whom such placement represents informed choice as
appropriate employment at a competitive wage.

19-66-102. Purchase required — Exception.
(a) All suitable commodities and services, including small purchases,
procured according to applicable state specifications by or for a state
department, institution, or agency shall be procured from nonprofit work
centers for individuals with disabilities in all cases when the commodities
and services are available within the period specified and at the fair market
price for the commodities and services so procured.
(b) Services offered by work centers shall be procured by competitive
sealed bidding as specified by § 19-61-505, competitive sealed proposals as
specified by § 19-61-506, or competitive bidding as specified by § 19-61-504,
subject to purchase exceptions set forth in § 19-66-103 — 19-66-105.
(c) This section does not apply in any cases in which commodities and
services are available for procurement from a state department, institution,
or agency, and procurement from the state department, institution, or agency
is required under a law in effect on or after March 1, 1991.

19-66-103. Purchase required — Schedule of commodities and services —
Failure by work center.
(a) All state agencies as defined in § 19-61-103 are required to
666 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
purchase their requirements of needed available and suitable products and
purchase suitable services from nonprofit work centers for individuals with
disabilities, unless such products and services are authorized by prior
legislation for production in another state agency, department, or
institution.
(b)(1) The Office of State Procurement shall issue to all state agency
purchasing agents a schedule of commodities and services made by work centers
and the conditions under which commodities and services are to be procured
from the work centers.
(2) The schedule shall include the commodity or service
description.
(c) When a commodity or service is identified in the schedule of work
center-made commodities and services as being available through the Office of
State Procurement, the commodity or service shall be obtained in accordance
with the requisitioning procedures of the supplying state agency.
(d)(1) An ordering office may purchase from a non-work-center source
commodities or services listed in the schedule of commodities and services
made by the work center in any of the following circumstances:
(A) Necessity requires delivery within the specified
period, and the work center cannot give assurance of positive availability;
or
(B) When commodities listed on the schedule of work-
center-made commodities can be purchased from a non-work-center source by the
state agency for a price more than ten percent (10%) lower than commodities
made by the work center included in the schedule.
(2) Services offered by any work center shall be procured by any
state agency in accordance with this section at a price not more than ten
percent (10%) above the lowest price submitted from a non-work-center source.
(e) Product commodities made by a work center shall be delivered in
accordance with the terms of the purchase order.
(f) When a work center fails to comply with the terms of a government
order, the ordering office shall make reasonable efforts to negotiate an
adjustment before taking action to cancel the government order.

19-66-104. Work center qualification.
(a) Arkansas Rehabilitation Services and the Division of State
667 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Services for the Blind shall undertake the inspection on a continuing basis
of the work centers certified by each respective state agency to determine
that the work centers operate in accordance with the requirements of this
chapter and the rules promulgated under this chapter.
(b)(1) In order to qualify for participation in the program as a work
center, an organization shall submit an application to the Office of State
Procurement.
(2) If required for all vendors, the organization shall include
in the application a list of the commodities and services offered for sale to
the state.
(c) A work center shall:
(1) Furnish commodities and services in strict accordance with
the allocation and government order;
(2) Maintain records of wages paid, hours of employment, and
sales;
(3) Make available pertinent books and records of the state
agency for inspection at any reasonable time to representatives of Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services or the Division of State Services for the Blind, as
applicable; and
(4)(A) Submit to Arkansas Rehabilitation Services or the
Division of State Services for the Blind, as applicable, by September 1 an
annual report for the preceding fiscal year.
(B) The annual report under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this
section shall include:
(i) Data on individuals with disabilities who are
workers;
(ii) Wages and wage supplements;
(iii) Hours of employment;
(iv) Sales;
(v) Whether the work center requires a facilities-
sheltered workshop certificate from the United States Department of Labor and
special minimum rates authorized where the certificate is held; and
(vi) Such other relevant information as may be
required.

19-66-105. Rules — Violations.
668 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) The Office of State Procurement shall promulgate rules governing
implementation of this chapter.
(b)(1) The office shall investigate an alleged violation of the rules
promulgated under this chapter.
(2) The office shall notify the work center concerned in the
investigation by the office under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and
afford the work center an opportunity to submit a statement of facts and
evidence.

CHAPTER 67
PROFESSIONAL AND CONSULTANT SERVICES CONTRACTS

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Procedural Requirements — Guidelines and Rules

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-67-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Consultant services contract” means a contract between a
state agency and an individual or organization in which:
(A) The service to be rendered to the state agency or to a
third-party beneficiary under the contract is primarily the giving of advice
by the contractor on a particular problem facing the state agency or the
third-party beneficiary;
(B) The contractor is an independent contractor with
respect to the state agency;
(C) The state agency does not exercise managerial control
over the day-to-day activities of the contractor; and
(D) The contract specifies the results expected from the
services to be rendered by the contractor and the advice or assistance to be
provided;
(2) “Contractor” means a person or organization that executes a
contract with a state agency under which the person or organization agrees to
provide professional services or consultant services to the state agency, and
the individuals performing the services are not state employees occupying
669 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
regular full-time or part-time or extra help positions provided by law;
(3)(A) “Design professional contract” means a contract that is
primarily for:
(i) Minor projects that are time-critical; and
(ii) Remodeling projects that do not exceed two
million dollars ($2,000,000) in cost.
(B) Design professional contracts are primarily for the
procurement of architectural, engineering, and professional services
competitively selected under §§ 19-65-101, 19-65-102, and 19-65-201 — 19-65-
205.
(C) Design professional contracts shall be reviewed by the
state agency or institution at least yearly and adjusted to reflect
historical expenditures.
(D)(i) A state agency shall follow applicable Building
Authority Division guidelines, procedures, and rules for the selection and
award of contracts.
(ii) However, a guideline, procedure, or rule of the
division shall not increase or decrease the:
(a) Dollar amount under subdivision (3)(A)(ii)
of this section; or
(b) Specified period under § 19-61-512(a).
(E) Institutions of higher education that are exempt from
review and approval of the division shall comply with this section;
(4) “Employee” means an individual drawing a salary from a state
agency, whether elected or not, and any nonsalaried individual performing
professional services for any state agency;
(5) “Professional services contract” means a contract between a
state agency and a contractor in which:
(A) The relationship between the contractor and the state
agency is that of an independent contractor rather than that of an employee;
(B) The services to be rendered consist of the personal
services of an individual that are professional in nature;
(C) The state agency does not have direct managerial
control over the day-to-day activities of the individual providing the
services;
(D) The contract specifies the results expected from the
670 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
rendering of the services rather than detailing the manner in which the
services shall be rendered; and
(E) Services rendered under a professional services
contract are rendered to the state agency itself or to a third-party
beneficiary; and
(6) “State agency” means a department, agency, board,
commission, or institution of higher education of the State of Arkansas.

19-67-102. Purpose of contracts.
The principal purpose of a professional services contract or a
consultant services contract is the procurement of services by the state
agency rather than the procurement of commodities.

19-67-103. Contracts exempted.
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) The contracts of the Arkansas Department of Transportation
that are covered by the technical work requirements and administrative
controls of the Federal Highway Administration;
(2) Contracts entered into by the department in which the costs
and fees are established by competitive bidding;
(3) Contracts of institutions of higher education that are for
services related to patents, copyrights, or trademarks; or
(4) Contracts created under federally approved state plans for
services reimbursed under Title V of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§
701 — 710, or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396 —
1396v, as they existed on January 1, 2001, if those contracts and services
conform to all applicable federal laws and rules, and to the ethical
standards provided for in § 19-64-201.

19-67-104. Restrictions on contracts.
(a) A contract under this chapter shall not be used to avoid the
purpose or the spirit of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law,
§ 19-4-101 et seq.
(b) A contract shall not be approved that would be in violation of §
19-4-701 et seq. relating to expenditures.
(c)(1) Except as provided in this subsection, a state agency shall not
671 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
engage in a professional services or consultant services contract with a
part-time or full-time employee who occupies a position authorized to be paid
from extra help or regular salaries for a state agency, except as provided in
§ 21-1-403.
(2) However, this subsection does not prohibit an institution of
higher education from executing a contract with a state agency under which
professional or consulting services will be performed by employees of the
institution of higher education.
(3) An employee of an institution of higher education performing
professional or consulting services to a state agency may receive additional
compensation if:
(A) The institution of higher education requests and
receives written approval from the Commissioner of the Division of Higher
Education concerning the amount of additional compensation to be paid to any
employee; and
(B) The total salary payments received from the employee's
regular salaried position and amounts received for services performed under a
professional services contract do not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent
(125%) of the maximum annual salary authorized by law for the employee's
position with the institution of higher education.
(d) A director or any other department head of a state agency shall
not receive additional compensation under this chapter.
(e)(1) A contract under which a state agency retains day-to-day
managerial control over the person performing the services or in which the
relationship between the contractor and the state agency is that of employer
and employee is not a professional services contract and is prohibited.
(2) However, the Division of Information Systems may employ
persons over whom they exercise day-to-day managerial control for those
services under § 25-4-112 for which professional services contracts may be
used.

Subchapter 2 — Procedural Requirements — Guidelines and Rules

19-67-201. General guidelines and rules.
The State Procurement Director, after soliciting suggestions from state
agencies and after seeking and receiving the advice of the Attorney General
672 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and review by the Legislative Council or by the Joint Budget Committee, if
the General Assembly is in session, shall publish general guidelines for the
procurement of professional and consultant services contracts and general
rules governing the use of each type of contract.

19-67-202. Certification by agency head.
The head of a state agency shall certify by his or her signature on
each contract entered into by that state agency that:
(1) All information required by law and by rule is supplied;
(2) The proper contracting form is utilized;
(3) All information contained in the contract is true and
correct to the best of his or her knowledge and belief;
(4) All general guidelines prescribed by the State Procurement
Director have been complied with;
(5) The services proposed to be provided under the contract are
necessary for operation of the state agency in fulfilling its legal
responsibilities and cannot be provided by any existing state agency;
(6) The contractor is fully qualified to perform the contract
and does not have a vested interest in the subject matter of the contract
that would constitute a conflict of interest and a bar to the contractor's
providing services of a professional and disinterested quality;
(7) The contract terms are reasonable and the benefits to be
derived are sufficient to warrant the expenditure of the funds called for in
the contract;
(8) Sufficient funds are available to pay the obligations when
the obligations become due; and
(9) A projected total cost of the contract is provided to
include expenditures that may be incurred under all available periods of
extension if the extensions were executed.

19-67-203. Approval or disapproval of contracts.
(a) The State Procurement Director may make whatever additional
inquiry he or she deems necessary and may require that additional information
be supplied if he or she has reason to believe that the contract should be
rejected because it does not comply with this chapter.
(b) The director shall return to the contracting state agency any
673 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
contract that fails to comply with the applicable laws and rules governing
the contract and shall approve any contract that complies with this chapter.
(c)(1) The director has final authority over the supervision and
approval of all contracts described in this chapter.
(2) However, the director shall seek review of the Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee before approving or disapproving any
contract or class or group of contracts authorized under this chapter, unless
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee specifically exempts the
contract or class or group of contracts by formal committee action.

19-67-204. Filing of contracts.
Service contracts filed with a state agency under § 19-4-1108 shall be
available for public inspection and auditing purposes.

19-67-205. Review requirement.
(a)(1) Every contract for professional consultant services covered by
this chapter that is executed using the professional and consultant services
contract form approved by the State Procurement Director shall be filed with
the Office of State Procurement.
(2) The execution date of all contracts shall be defined as the
date upon which performance of the services to be rendered under the contract
is to begin and not the date upon which the agreement was made.
(b)(1) A purchase order shall not be paid if a copy of the contract
under which the payment is being made has not previously been filed with the
Office of State Procurement.
(2) A payment shall not be made covering services rendered
before the execution date of the contract.
(c)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this section be
strictly construed and enforced.
(2) However, in the unusual event that an obligation for
services has been incurred by a state agency under a contractual agreement or
proposed contract before the approval of the contract, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State may approve payment for such services after having first
received the review of the Legislative Council.

19-67-206. Standard contract forms.
674 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a) The State Procurement Director shall prescribe standard forms to
be utilized by all state agencies.
(b) The standard contract form shall include the following items, plus
such additional items as the director shall deem desirable for the purposes
of this chapter:
(1) A section setting forth in reasonable detail the objectives
and scope of the contractual agreement and the methods to be used to
determine whether the objectives specified have been achieved;
(2) The rates of compensation, transportation, per diem,
subsistence, out-of-pocket allowances, and all other items of costs
contemplated to be paid the contractor by the state agency;
(3) The method by which the rate of compensation and the total
payment shall be calculated;
(4) The maximum number of dollars that the state agency may be
obligated to pay to the contractor under the terms of the contract, including
all expenses and other items of costs, and the source of funding to be
utilized;
(5) The term of the contract;
(6)(A) The names of all individuals who will be supplying
services to the state agency or to third-party beneficiaries under the terms
of the contract, so far as those names are known to the contractor at the
time of the execution of the contract.
(B) If the names of all individuals supplying services
under the contract are not available at the time of the execution of the
contract, the contract shall contain a provision requiring the contractor to
submit periodically the names of individuals supplying services as soon as
the identity of those individuals is known to the contractor;
(7) When the contractor is a business entity, the federal
identification number of the business entity shall be listed on the contract
form;
(8)(A) A certification signed by the contractor shall be
included as follows:
“_____________ (name) _____________ (title)
I _____________, certify under penalty of perjury
that, to the best of my knowledge and belief, no regular full-time or part-
time employee of any state agency of the State of Arkansas will receive any
675 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
personal, direct, or indirect monetary benefits which would be in violation
of the law as a result of the execution of this contract.”
(B) As used in subdivision (b)(8)(A) of this section, it
is understood that when the contractor is a widely held public corporation
“direct or indirect monetary benefit” does not apply to any regular corporate
dividends paid to a stockholder of the corporation who is also a state
employee and who owns less than ten percent (10%) of the total outstanding
stock of the contracting corporation;
(9)(A) For a contract in which the total compensation exclusive
of reimbursable expenses to be paid by the state agency does not exceed fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000), a purchase order may be utilized in lieu of the
standard form or forms prescribed by the director.
(B)(i) However, if the state agency enters into a
subsequent contract with the same individual or organization during the same
fiscal year, regardless of the nature of the contract, then the details of
the original contract that utilized a purchase order form and of all
subsequent contracts, regardless of amount or type, shall be promptly
reported to the director.
(ii) Reporting under subdivision (b)(9)(B)(i) of
this section shall be done to allow the director to determine whether the
state agency is utilizing a series of contracts to avoid the use of the
standard form and to avoid the application of appropriate rules;
(10) Standard contract forms in use by licensed practitioners
such as architects and engineers may be used to supplement the standard
contract forms; and
(11) All professional consultant services contracts shall
contain the following clause:
“In the event the State of Arkansas fails to appropriate
funds or make moneys available for any biennial period covered by the term of
this contract for the services to be provided by the contractor, this
contract shall be terminated on the last day of the last biennial period for
which funds were appropriated or moneys made available for such purposes.
“This provision shall not be construed to abridge any other
right of termination the agency may have.”
(c) For the purpose of reporting methods of finance, a state agency
shall disclose the total estimated project cost in addition to any other
676 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
reporting requirements of the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee.

19-67-207. Compliance reporting — Definition.
(a) Each report required under this chapter shall be copied to the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, who shall
review each report for compliance with the fiscal responsibility and
management laws of the state under the State Fiscal Management Responsibility
Act, § 19-1-501 et seq.
(b) If the secretary determines that a state agency, agency
procurement official, or state official or employee may be in violation of
the fiscal responsibility and management laws of the state under the State
Fiscal Management Responsibility Act, § 19-1-501 et seq., the secretary shall
notify the chief executive officer of the relevant state agency.

19-67-208. Cancellation of contract on entry of final business closure
order — Definition.
(a) As used in this chapter, “final business closure order” means a
business closure order for which a contractor has either:
(1) Waived further administrative review under § 26-18-1001 et
seq.; or
(2) Exhausted all remedies to appeal under § 26-18-1001 et seq.
(b) The Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall provide to the Office of State Procurement all final
business closure orders entered into against a contractor.
(c) Upon receipt of a final business closure order, the office shall,
as soon as reasonably practicable:
(1) Notify each state agency with which the contractor has a
contract that the:
(A) Contractor is subject to a final business closure
order; and
(B) Provision of any goods or services, or both, under a
contract with the contractor that is subject to a final business closure
order shall cease as soon as reasonably practicable; and
(2) Notify all state agencies that the contractor that is
subject to a final business closure order shall not be awarded or maintain a
677 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
contract with a state agency unless the office provides notice under
subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Upon receipt of information that a contractor has resolved a
business closure, the office shall notify all state agencies, as soon as
reasonably practicable, that:
(1) Any unexpired contracts with the contractor may continue if
the contract was not terminated, cancelled, suspended, or discontinued; and
(2) The contractor may be awarded or maintain a contract with a
state agency.

CHAPTER 68
GUARANTEED ENERGY COST SAVINGS ACT

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Authorization — Procedure — Requirements
Subchapter 3. Administration
Subchapter 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-68-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Guaranteed Energy
Cost Savings Act”.

19-68-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Energy cost savings measure” means:
(i) A new facility that is designed to reduce the
consumption of energy or natural resources or operating costs as a result of
changes that:
(a) Do not degrade the level of service or
working conditions;
(b) Are measurable and verifiable under the
International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol, as adopted
by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, in the rules
required under § 19-68-301; and
678 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) Are measured and verified by an audit
performed by a qualified provider; or
(ii) An existing facility alteration that is
designed to reduce the consumption of energy or natural resources or
operating costs as a result of changes that conform with subdivisions
(1)(A)(i)(a) and (b) of this section.
(B) “Energy cost savings measure” includes:
(i) Insulation and reduced air infiltration of the
building structure, including walls, ceilings, and roofs or systems within
the building;
(ii) Storm windows or doors, caulking or weather-
stripping, multi-glazed windows or doors, heat-absorbing or heat-reflective
glazed and coated window or door systems, additional glazing, reductions in
glass area, or other window and door system modifications that reduce energy
consumption;
(iii) Automated or computerized energy control
systems, including computer software and technical data licenses;
(iv) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning
system modifications or replacements;
(v) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures
to increase the energy efficiency of the lighting system without increasing
the overall illumination of a facility, unless an increase in illumination is
necessary to conform to the applicable state or local building code for the
lighting system after the proposed modifications are made;
(vi) Indoor air quality improvements;
(vii) Energy recovery systems;
(viii) Electric system improvements;
(ix) Life safety measures that provide long-term,
operating-cost reductions;
(x) Building operation programs that reduce
operating costs;
(xi) Other energy-conservation-related improvements
or equipment, including improvements or equipment related to renewable
energy;
(xii) Water and other natural resources
conservation; or
679 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(xiii) An alteration or measure identified through a
comprehensive audit or assessment of new or existing facilities;
(2) “Equipment warranty period” means the time following the
execution of a guaranteed energy cost savings contract in which a material
defect in an installed energy conservation measure is required to be replaced
or corrected by the manufacturer or an energy service company;
(3)(A) “Guaranteed energy cost savings contract” means a
contract for the implementation of one (1) or more energy cost savings
measures and services provided by a qualified provider in which the energy
and cost savings achieved by the installed energy project cover all project
costs, including financing, over a specified contract term.
(B) “Guaranteed energy cost savings contract” does not
include improvements or equipment that allow or cause water from any
condensing, cooling, or industrial process or any system of nonpotable usage
over which public water supply system officials do not have sanitary control
to be returned to the potable water supply;
(4) “Operational cost savings” means expenses eliminated and
future replacement expenditures avoided as a result of new equipment
installed or services performed;
(5) “Public notice” means the same as “public notice” is defined
in § 19-61-103;
(6) “Qualified provider” means a person or business, including
all subcontractors and employees of that person or business and third-party
financing companies, that:
(A) Is properly licensed in the State of Arkansas;
(B) Has been reviewed and certified by the office as a
qualified provider under this chapter;
(C) Is experienced in the design, implementation,
measurement, verification, and installation of energy cost savings measures;
(D) Has at least five (5) years of experience in the
analysis, design, implementation, installation, measurement, and verification
of energy efficiency and facility improvements;
(E) Has the ability to arrange or provide the necessary
financing to support a guaranteed energy cost savings contract; and
(F) Has the ability to perform under a contract that
requires the person or business to guarantee the work performed by one (1) or
680 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
more subcontractors;
(7) “State agency” means the same as “state agency” is defined
in § 19-61-103; and
(8) “Useful life” means the rated service life of an individual
energy conservation measure as defined by the:
(A) American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-
Conditioning Engineers;
(B) Illuminating Engineering Society; or
(C) Solar Energy Industries Association.

Subchapter 2 — Authorization — Procedure — Requirements

19-68-201. Energy cost savings measures authorized.
(a)(1) A state agency may enter into a guaranteed energy cost savings
contract in order to reduce energy consumption or operating costs of
government facilities in accordance with this chapter.
(2) A state agency or several state agencies together may enter
into an installment payment contract or lease purchase agreement with a
qualified provider for the purchase and installation of energy cost savings
measures in accordance with this chapter.
(b) All energy cost savings measures shall comply with current local,
state, and federal construction and environmental codes and regulations.
(c) The provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et
seq., shall control if there is any conflict with the Arkansas Procurement
Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., this chapter.

19-68-202. Method of solicitation.
A solicitation of a guaranteed energy cost savings contract by a state
agency shall be consistent with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et
seq.

19-68-203. Evaluation of responses to solicitations.
(a) In a state agency's evaluation of each qualified provider's
response to a solicitation under § 19-68-202, the state agency shall include
an analysis of:
(1) Whether the qualified provider meets the objectives of the
681 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
solicitation, including without limitation a reduction in the state agency's
energy consumption or operating costs resulting from a guaranteed energy cost
savings contract with the qualified provider;
(2) The qualifications and experience of the qualified provider;
(3) The technical approach to the energy cost savings measures;
(4) The financial aspects of the energy cost savings measures;
(5) The overall benefit to the state agency; and
(6) Any other relevant factors.
(b) After evaluating a response to a solicitation as required under
subsection (a) of this section, a state agency may:
(1) Reject the response; or
(2) Award a contract to a qualified provider to conduct an
energy audit to be used in developing the guaranteed energy cost savings
contract.

19-68-204. Guaranteed energy cost savings contract requirements.
(a) The following provisions are required in a guaranteed energy cost
savings contract:
(1) A statement that the state agency shall maintain and operate
the energy cost savings measures as defined in the guaranteed energy cost
savings contract; and
(2) A guarantee by the qualified provider that:
(A) The energy cost savings and operational cost savings
to be realized over the term of the guaranteed energy cost savings contract
meet or exceed the costs of the energy cost savings measures; and
(B) If the annual energy or operational cost savings fail
to meet or exceed the annual costs of the energy cost savings measure as
required by the guaranteed energy cost savings contract, the qualified
provider shall reimburse the state agency for any shortfall of guaranteed
energy cost savings over the term of the guaranteed energy cost savings
contract.
(b)(1) If a guaranteed energy cost savings contract includes energy
cost savings measures that possess either an active equipment warranty period
or a combined useful life in excess of twenty (20) years, a guaranteed energy
cost savings contract may be extended to the length of the:
(A) Equipment warranty period; or
682 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(B) Weighted useful life of the relevant energy cost
savings measures.
(2) A guaranteed energy cost savings contract shall not exceed
twenty (20) years without approval of the Arkansas Energy Office of the
Division of Environmental Quality.
(c) Before entering into a guaranteed energy cost savings contract,
the state agency shall require the qualified provider to file with the state
agency a payment and performance bond or similar assurance as provided under
§ 19-61-401.

Subchapter 3 — Administration

19-68-301. Administration of subchapter — Fees.
(a) The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental
Quality shall administer this chapter.
(b) The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may
promulgate rules for the administration of this chapter, including without
limitation:
(1) Standards for measuring and verifying the performance of
energy cost savings measures;
(2) A standard contract form for use by a state agency in
entering into a guaranteed energy cost savings contract;
(3) The adoption of the International Performance Measurement
and Verification Protocol as it existed on a specific date; and
(4) The establishment and collection of a reasonable fee to
cover the costs of administering this chapter.

Subchapter 4 — Miscellaneous Provisions

19-68-401. Use of maintenance and operation appropriations.
(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a state agency may
utilize maintenance and operations appropriations for the payment of
equipment and energy cost savings measures required by a guaranteed energy
cost savings contract.
(b) An energy cost savings measure shall be treated as an energy
efficiency project under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 89.
683 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

CHAPTER 69
PARTIAL EQUITY OWNERSHIP AGREEMENT EXECUTED BY A STATE RETIREMENT SYSTEM

19-69-101. Definition.
As used in this chapter, “partial equity ownership agreement” means an
agreement with a legal entity, including without limitation a partnership, a
limited partnership, a limited liability company, or similar legal entity
that:
(1) Includes a state retirement system as a partner, a limited
partner, or a partial owner;
(2) Creates an equity interest or ownership position for the
state retirement system; and
(3) Utilizes retirement trust funds that are not appropriated by
the General Assembly.

19-69-102. Review of partial equity ownership agreements.
(a) A partial equity ownership agreement is subject to review by
submission of the partial equity ownership agreement to the Office of State
Procurement and the Legislative Council under this section.
(b) Since the partial equity ownership agreement is fundamentally and
substantially different from a state contract for commodities, goods, and
services that are reviewed under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-61-101 et
seq., or other contract that is reviewed under this subtitle, and since the
partial equity ownership agreement is utilizing retirement trust funds that
are not appropriated by the General Assembly, the partial equity ownership
agreement is not subject to:
(1) A limitation of the term or duration of the partial equity
ownership agreement; or
(2) An annual renewal clause.
(c) When submitting a partial equity ownership agreement for review,
the state retirement system shall provide information that includes without
limitation:
(1) The managing parties to the partial equity ownership
agreement;
(2) The state retirement system's interest and ownership in the
684 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
partial equity ownership agreement;
(3) The reason for the formation of or entry into the partial
equity ownership agreement;
(4) Justification that the duration of the partial equity
ownership agreement is necessary to serve the best interests of the retirants
under the prudent investor rule as set out in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619;
(5) The anticipated date of implementation of the partial equity
ownership;
(6) The anticipated termination date of the partial equity
ownership agreement; and
(7) Other information regarding the terms of the partial equity
ownership agreement that the office or the Legislative Council may reasonably
require for an adequate review.

19-69-103. Imminent need to enter into partial equity ownership
agreement.
(a) In lieu of a review under § 19-69-102, a partial equity ownership
agreement that necessitates immediate formation shall be reviewed by the
Office of State Procurement and the Legislative Council under this section.
(b)(1) The board of trustees of a state retirement system may enter
into a partial equity ownership agreement or substantially alter the terms of
an existing partial equity ownership agreement if the board of trustees
passes a resolution that:
(A) Determines an imminent need to immediately form or
enter into the partial equity ownership agreement;
(B) Deems it financially appropriate to immediately form
or enter into a partial equity ownership agreement; and
(C) Concludes that to forego the opportunity to promptly
implement the board of trustees' investment directives under the prudent
investor rule as set out in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619 would be inconsistent with
the board of trustees' fiduciary duty of care to the retirants.
(2) The board of trustees of the state retirement system shall
provide the office and the Legislative Council with a copy of the resolution
under subsection (a) of this section within five (5) business days of the
passage of the resolution.
(c) For a partial equity ownership agreement reviewed under this
685 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
section, the state retirement system shall submit information to the office
and the Legislative Council within thirty (30) days of the passage of the
resolution that discloses:
(1) The managing parties to the partial equity ownership
agreement;
(2) The state retirement system's interest and ownership in the
partial equity ownership agreement;
(3) The reason for the immediate formation or entry into a
partial equity ownership agreement;
(4) Justification that the duration of the partial equity
ownership agreement is necessary to serve the best interests of the retirants
under the prudent investor rule as set out in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619;
(5) The anticipated date of implementation;
(6) The anticipated termination date of the partial equity
ownership agreement; and
(7) Other information regarding the terms of the partial equity
ownership agreement that the office or the Legislative Council may reasonably
require for an adequate review.
(d) As may be reasonably required by the Legislative Council, a member
of the board of trustees, the director of the respective state retirement
system, or the director's appointee shall appear at the next scheduled
meeting of the Legislative Council after the receipt of the information under
subsection (c) of this section to present the information and explain the
details of the partial equity ownership agreement.

19-69-104. Retrospective review of partial equity ownership agreement
to ensure disclosure.
(a) Before April 7, 2009, if a state retirement system has entered
into a partial equity ownership agreement that has not been submitted
previously for review under § 19-60-101 et seq., the Arkansas Procurement
Law, § 19-61-101 et seq., or § 19-65-101 et seq., then the partial equity
ownership agreement shall be reviewed retrospectively under this section.
(b) The board of trustees of a state retirement system shall submit
information that the Office of State Procurement or the Legislative Council
may reasonably require to allow a retrospective review of a partial equity
ownership agreement under this section.
686 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

CHAPTER 70
CONSTRUCTION MANAGER-GENERAL CONTRACTOR METHOD OF PROCUREMENT PILOT PROGRAM

Subchapter 1. General Provisions
Subchapter 2. Construction Manager-General Contractor Method of Procurement
Pilot Program — Creation — Procedure

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

19-70-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Construction
Manager-General Contractor Method of Procurement Pilot Program”.

19-70-102. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) An efficient transportation system is critical for
Arkansas's economy and the quality of life of the state's residents;
(2) Transportation projects are costly and the revenues
currently available for highways and local roads are inadequate to preserve
and maintain existing infrastructure and to provide funds for highway
improvements;
(3) The State Highway Commission has developed an alternative,
cost-effective, procurement procedure for transportation projects performed
by the commission and the Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(4) A construction manager-general contractor method allows the
commission to engage a construction manager:
(A) To assist during the design and development process of
the transportation project, including without limitation to provide input
concerning the transportation project's:
(i) Design;
(ii) Scheduling;
(iii) Pricing; and
(iv) Phasing; and
(B) Who may subsequently become the general contractor and
construct the transportation project if the parties agree on a guaranteed
687 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
maximum price; and
(5) The cost-effective benefits are achieved by shifting the
liability and risk for cost containment and transportation project scheduling
to the construction manager, which leads many states to call this method the
“construction manager at-risk method”.

19-70-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Authorized contingency” means a provision prepared and
submitted by the construction manager-general contractor as part of the
guaranteed maximum price that is designed to cover costs that may result
from:
(A) Incomplete design;
(B) Unforeseen and unpredictable conditions; or
(C) Uncertainties within the defined transportation
project scope that a prudent construction manager would not have reasonably
detected or anticipated during the discharge of his or her preconstruction
duties;
(2) “Construction manager-general contractor” means a business
firm or a legal entity selected by the Director of State Highways and
Transportation to act as a construction manager to provide preconstruction
services during the design and development phase of a transportation project;
(3) “Construction manager-general contractor method” means a
transportation project delivery method using a best value procurement process
in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction
services and may subsequently construct the whole transportation project or
any part of the transportation project as the general contractor if the
Arkansas Department of Transportation and the construction manager-general
contractor reach an agreement on a guaranteed maximum price;
(4) “Guaranteed maximum price” means:
(A) The total dollar amount agreed to by the construction
manager-general contractor to complete the construction of the transportation
project, including without limitation the construction manager-general
contractor's:
(i) Direct costs;
(ii) Overhead;
688 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(iii) Profit; and
(iv) Any authorized contingency; and
(B) Any dollar amount added to the total dollar amount of
the transportation project submitted under subdivision (4)(A) of this section
to cover additional costs arising from changes in the scope of work as the
department may subsequently direct in writing;
(5) “Preconstruction services” means work, labor, or services,
including services furnished in connection with the design and development of
a transportation project before the construction phase, including without
limitation:
(A) Cost estimates;
(B) Schedule analysis;
(C) Sequencing of work;
(D) Risk identification and mitigation;
(E) Constructability reviews;
(F) Evaluation of alternative construction options;
(G) Assistance with various permits;
(H) Coordination with public or private utility service
providers;
(I) Communication with third-party stakeholders or the
public; and
(J) Development of a guaranteed maximum price; and
(6) “Request for proposals” means a document or publication
soliciting proposals for a contract for construction of a transportation
project between a construction manager-general contractor and the department.

19-70-104. Rules.
The State Highway Commission and the Arkansas Department of
Transportation may promulgate rules to implement and administer this chapter.

Subchapter 2 — Construction Manager-General Contractor Method of Procurement
Pilot Program — Creation — Procedure

19-70-201. Construction Manager-General Contractor Method of
Procurement Pilot Program — Creation.
(a) The State Highway Commission may develop a Construction Manager-
689 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
General Contractor Method of Procurement Pilot Program to test the
utilization of the construction manager-general contractor method as a cost-
effective option for constructing transportation projects.
(b)(1)(A) For the first phase of the program, the commission may
select a total of five (5) transportation projects on which to utilize the
construction manager-general contractor method.
(B)(i) The sum of the construction cost estimates prepared
as required under § 19-70-204 of all five (5) construction manager-general
contractor method transportation projects selected under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section shall not exceed two hundred million dollars
($200,000,000).
(ii) A construction cost estimate of a construction
manager-general contractor method transportation project selected under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall not exceed one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(2)(A) For the second phase of the program, beginning on August
1, 2023, the commission may select a total of five (5) additional
transportation projects that are not currently in the procurement process on
which to utilize the construction manager-general contractor method.
(B)(i) The sum of the construction cost estimates prepared
as required under § 19-70-204 of all five (5) construction manager-general
contractor method transportation projects selected under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed five hundred million dollars
($500,000,000).
(ii) A construction cost estimate of a construction
manager-general contractor method transportation project selected under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed one hundred fifty
million dollars ($150,000,000).
(c) The Director of State Highways and Transportation shall send
written notice identifying the transportation project and the reasons for
deciding to apply the construction manager-general contractor method to that
specific transportation project to:
(1) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Transportation;
and
(2) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Transportation,
Technology, and Legislative Affairs.
690 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d) The program established under this chapter shall terminate no
later than June 30, 2026.

19-70-202. Project selection.
If the Arkansas Department of Transportation determines that a
construction manager-general contractor method of procurement is appropriate
for a transportation project, the department shall establish a procedure for
awarding the contract for construction of the construction manager-general
contractor method transportation project using the criteria listed in § 19-
70-203.

19-70-203. Request for proposals.
(a) A request for proposals under this chapter shall include without
limitation the following:
(1) The minimum qualifications of the construction manager-
general contractor;
(2) The procedures for submitting a proposal to the Arkansas
Department of Transportation, the criteria for the evaluation of and
selection of a construction manager-general contractor to perform
preconstruction services, and the relative weight assigned for each criteria
as indicated in a technical scoring matrix;
(3) The form of the contract to be awarded for preconstruction
services;
(4) A listing of the types and scope of the preconstruction
services that will be required;
(5) The scope of the intended contract;
(6) The budget limits for the transportation project and the
preconstruction services;
(7) The method of payment and structure of fees for the
preconstruction services;
(8) A requirement that the construction manager-general
contractor submit relevant information regarding any licenses, registration,
or credentials that may be required to construct the transportation project;
(9) A requirement that the construction manager-general
contractor provide evidence that establishes that the construction manager-
general contractor is capable of obtaining the required bonding and
691 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
insurance;
(10) A requirement that the construction manager-general
contractor submit information concerning the debarment or default from a
federal, state, or local government transportation project within the past
five (5) years;
(11) A requirement that the construction manager-general
contractor provide information concerning the bankruptcy or receivership of
any of its members, including information concerning any work completed by a
surety;
(12) A requirement that the construction manager-general
contractor provide evidence of competency, capability, and capacity to
complete a transportation project of similar size, scope, or complexity; and
(13) A prohibition that excludes a person or firm that has
received compensation for assisting the department in preparing the request
for proposals from submitting a proposal in response to the request for
proposals or participating as a construction manager-general contractor team
member.
(b) A request for proposals under this chapter shall not:
(1) Require that the construction manager-general contractor
have prior experience with any particular transportation project procurement
method as a condition for submitting a proposal; and
(2) Give any preference for any particular contract delivery
method in the scoring of a proposal.
(c) The department shall:
(1) Send a written notice of award to the best-evaluated
construction manager-general contractor; or
(2) Send to all the construction manager-general contractors
that submitted a proposal a written notice that all proposals have been
rejected.

19-70-204. Construction manager-general contractor selection.
(a) The Arkansas Department of Transportation shall:
(1) Prepare contract plans, specifications, special provisions,
and other requirements composing the contract for construction of a
transportation project elected for procurement using the construction
manager-general contract method authorized by this chapter;
692 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Prepare a detailed construction cost estimate to evaluate
the appropriate price for the construction of the transportation project;
(3) If requested by the Director of State Highways and
Transportation, have an independent third-party cost estimator prepare a
detailed construction cost estimate to confirm the appropriate price for the
construction of the transportation project;
(4) Include in the contract created by subdivision (a)(1) of
this section a requirement that the construction manager-general contractor
perform at least thirty percent (30%) of the total cost for construction, not
including the preconstruction work performed by the construction manager-
general contractor; and
(5)(A) Keep the construction cost estimates prepared under
subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section confidential and not subject to
public disclosure until after the contract has been awarded.
(B) Construction cost estimates prepared under
subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section are confidential and exempt from
public disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101
et seq., but only until after the contract has been awarded.
(b) A construction manager-general contractor shall submit to the
department a guaranteed maximum price for the construction of the
transportation project using the contract plans, specifications, special
provisions, and other requirements prepared by the department as required by
subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(c) The department may award the contract to a construction manager-
general contractor if the guaranteed maximum price does not exceed the cost
estimate provided by the department or independent third party by more than
ten percent (10%).
(d) If the director rejects the proposed guaranteed maximum price, the
department may:
(1) Work with the construction manager-general contractor to
find a guaranteed maximum price that is acceptable to both parties; or
(2) Request that the construction manager-general contractor
provide additional preconstruction services and submit a new guaranteed
maximum price as directed by this section.
(e) If the department does not award the contract to a construction
manager-general contractor, the department may proceed with the
693 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
transportation project using a procurement process authorized by law.

SUBTITLE 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 90
TOBACCO SETTLEMENT PROCEEDS ACT

Subchapter 1. Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act
Subchapter 2. Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds Act of 2006

Subchapter 1 — Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act

19-90-101 — 19-90-118 [Reserved.]

19-90-119. Use of funds for the Medicaid Expansion Program Account.
(a) In addition to the purposes enumerated in § 19-90-116 for the
Medicaid expansion program, the funds made available to the Medicaid
Expansion Program Account may also be used to supplement current general
revenues as approved by the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State for the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(b) None of the funds shall be used for this additional purpose if the
usage will reduce the funds made available by the General Assembly for the
Meals on Wheels America program and the senior prescription drug program.

Subchapter 2 — Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds Act of 2006

19-90-201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tobacco
Settlement Revenue Bonds Act of 2006”.

19-90-202. Legislative findings, intent, and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Cancer is one of the leading health problems and causes of
death in the state;
(2) There is an immediate need for additional facilities to
694 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
support research in the cause, treatment, and prevention of various types of
cancer;
(3) Because the Arkansas Cancer Research Center of the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences is engaged in education,
research, and clinical care addressing the causes, treatment, and prevention
of cancer, the General Assembly has recognized the center as the official
cancer institute of the State of Arkansas since its inception in 1984;
(4) It is appropriate that the center should be designated as a
capital improvement project relating to healthcare services, health
education, or health-related research under the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds
Act, § 19-90-101 et seq.; and
(5) This subchapter provides financial resources critical to the
development and construction of necessary medical facilities by authorizing
the issuance of an additional series of Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds in
support of the center.
(b) This subchapter is not intended to amend nor does it amend
Initiated Act 1 of 2000, the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-90-101 et
seq.
(c) The purpose of this subchapter is to designate an additional
capital improvement project as anticipated by § 19-90-106(b)(4) and to enact
implementation legislation necessary to authorize an additional series of
Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds to finance a portion of the additional
capital improvement project as provided under § 19-90-106(g).

19-90-203. Applicability of Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act.
The Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-90-101 et seq., is fully
applicable to this subchapter and any Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds issued
under this subchapter.

19-90-204. Arkansas Cancer Research Center designated as capital
improvement project.
As authorized by § 19-90-106(b)(4), the Arkansas Cancer Research Center
of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences is designated as a capital
improvement project relating to healthcare services, health education, or
health-related research.

695 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-90-205. Additional Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds authorized.
Additional Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds may be issued in connection
with the capital improvement project described in § 19-90-204 under the
following conditions:
(1) No more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the annual
transfer to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund shall be allocated in
any one (1) year to pay debt service requirements for the capital improvement
project;
(2) Annual transfers to the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund
allocated to the capital improvement project shall not commence until the
Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds issued in 2001 under the Tobacco Settlement
Proceeds Act, § 19-90-101 et seq., are no longer outstanding; and
(3) No more than forty million dollars ($40,000,000) in an
initial principal amount of Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds may be issued
for the capital improvement project.

19-90-206. Issuance of additional Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds by
Arkansas Development Finance Authority.
(a) If revenues in the Tobacco Settlement Debt Service Fund are
sufficient to meet Debt Services Requirements with regard to additional
Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds that may be issued in connection with the
capital improvement project described in § 19-90-204, then the Arkansas
Development Finance Authority shall issue additional Tobacco Settlement
Revenue Bonds in accordance with the limitations established in § 19-90-205
to be used for financing a portion of the capital improvement project
described in § 19-90-204.
(b) The additional Tobacco Settlement Revenue Bonds shall be issued as
set forth under the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-90-101 et seq., and
shall be entitled to the same rights and protections as the Tobacco
Settlement Revenue Bonds issued in 2001 under the Tobacco Settlement Proceeds
Act, § 19-90-101 et seq.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 1-2-303(b), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) In the commission's discretion and subject to the provisions and
696 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
requirements of § 19-4-1109 19-4-1108, the commission may enter into
contracts for professional services to the commission, which contracts may
include, but are not limited to, the purposes of:

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 2-1-306(b)(3)(C), concerning the civil
penalty for violation of the truth-in-labeling laws, is amended to read as
follows:
(C) A civil penalty collected under this section shall be
deposited into the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 2-15-204(c), concerning the duties of the
State Plant Board, is amended to read as follows:
(c) All moneys received by the board under this subchapter and the
rules adopted by the board shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund
to be used for carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 2-16-104(b) and (c), concerning the
disposition of funds collected by the State Plant Board, are amended to read
as follows:
(b) Upon receipt of the funds, the Treasurer of State shall, after
deducting therefrom the collection charge authorized by law, credit the net
amount to the credit of the State Plant Board Fund to be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of the board.
(c) All fees, fines, penalties, moneys, and funds arising from all
sources resulting from the enforcement, operation, investigation,
application, and administration of the laws under the jurisdiction of the
Arkansas Bureau of Standards of the State Plant Board Department of
Agriculture and the sale of property resulting from said purposes, and all
moneys, grants, and other sources of funding procured for the bureau, shall
be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund, or any successor fund, to be
used solely for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the bureau.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 2-16-105(c)(2), concerning the Fire Ant
Poison Cost Sharing Program, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The moneys generated from the sale of fire ant poison
chemicals and received by the board from the University of Arkansas
697 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Cooperative Extension Service shall be deposited into the State Treasury to
the credit of the State Plant Board Fund as a nonrevenue receipt refund to
expenditure, there to be used by the board to purchase additional fire ant
poison chemicals for distribution to the various counties of the state for
fire ant control.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 2-16-108(b)(1), concerning the State Plant
Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) There is created in accordance with §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-
4-805, and 19-4-806 19-4-801 — 19-4-805 and the Revenue Classification Law, §
19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq., a cash fund entitled the State Plant Board
Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, which shall be maintained in
such depository bank or banks as may be designated from time to time by the
board.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 2-16-108(b)(2)(A), concerning the State
Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, is amended to read
as follows:
(2)(A) The first two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in each
fiscal year of all fees, interest, penalities penalties, and costs collected
by the board that constitute the special revenues specified in § 19-6-301(51)
19-42-201(51) and all income, interest, and earnings thereof are declared to
be cash funds to be used solely for paying the cost of operations and
maintenance of the board and the financing of the acquisition, construction,
and maintenance of facilities for the board's operations, including any
additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, the renovation thereof, and
the equipping of such facilities.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 2-16-108(d), concerning the State Plant
Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) On July 30, 1999, all moneys then held in the State Plant Board
Fund created by § 19-6-408 19-43-207 that were derived from the special
revenues described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be
transferred to the State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction
698 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Fund, except that the amount transferred shall not exceed the maximum amount
provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 2-16-203(b)(4)(B)(i), concerning the
penalty for violations of the Arkansas Plant Act of 1917, is amended to read
as follows:
(B)(i) Except as provided under subsection (c) of this
section, sums collected under special revenue programs shall be deposited
into the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 2-17-238 is amended to read as follows:
2-17-238. Disposition of revenues.
All revenues collected under the provisions of this subchapter by the
State Plant Board shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund to be
used for the maintenance, operation, support, and improvement of the board.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 2-19-202(c)(1)(B), concerning fertilizer
brand registration and facility licensing fees, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) The fees shall be deposited into the State Plant Board
Fund of the State Treasury.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 2-19-206(b)(2), concerning the penalty for
deficiency from guaranteed analysis for fertilizer, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The value of the deficiencies, if any, exceeding the actual
shortages, and the actual value of the shortages when the consumer cannot be
found, shall be paid to the department within forty-five (45) days after the
date of notice from the department to the manufacturer or his or her agent
and shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 2-19-209(a)(2)(B)(i), concerning the
distribution of fees accompanying tonnage reports by manufacturers and
manipulators or agents, is amended to read as follows:
(i) Sixty-two cents (62¢) of the two-dollar-and-
forty-cent fee per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be deposited with
699 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Treasurer of State as special revenues and shall be credited to the State
Plant Board Fund to be used for the maintenance, operation, support, and
improvement of the State Plant Board programs; and

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 2-19-209(b)(3), concerning tonnage reports
by manufacturers and manipulators or agents, is amended to read as follows:
(3) For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount
sold, the tonnage fee on the late reported or unreported amount shall be
enhanced by ten percent (10%) if less than fifteen (15) days late, twenty
percent (20%) if less than thirty-one (31) days late, and doubled if more
than thirty (30) days late. Penalties shall be deposited into the State Plant
Board Fund; otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant
Board.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 2-19-305(b)(2), concerning the penalty for
deficiency from guaranteed analysis for liming material, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) The value of the deficiencies exceeding the actual shortages
and the actual value of the shortages when the consumer cannot be found shall
be paid to the board within forty-five (45) days after the date of notice
from the board to the manufacturer, importer, or guarantor and shall be
deposited into the State Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 2-19-307(b)(3), concerning the quarterly
tonnage reports for manufacturers, importers, and other guarantors, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount
sold, the tonnage fee on the late report or unreported amount shall be
doubled, and penalties shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund;
otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant Board.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 2-23-102(b)(2), concerning the filing fee
for defective seed claims, is amended to read as follows:
(2) This fee shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund
in the State Treasury and may be used by the director to offset expenses of
the investigation.
700 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 2-32-505(a), concerning the disposition of
fees and penalties collected in relation to livestock, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Fees paid and penalties collected under this subtitle shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues credited to the
Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 2-33-113 is amended to read as follows:
2-33-113. Disposition of fees and revenues.
All fees and revenues collected by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to
be credited to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest
Control Fund.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 2-37-104(b)(1), concerning registration
and licensing under the Arkansas Feed Law of 1997, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) A person who is required to obtain a license shall submit an
application on a form provided or approved by the State Plant Board
accompanied by a license fee of ten dollars ($10.00) paid to the board for
each facility. The board shall remit such license fees to the Treasurer of
State for deposit into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Plant
Board Fund for the sole use of the board.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 2-37-104(f), concerning registration and
licensing under the Arkansas Feed Law of 1997, is amended to read as follows:
(f) In order to be exempt from the provisions of this chapter,
integrated operators, as defined in § 2-37-103, shall submit an application
for exemption on a form provided or approved by the board accompanied by an
application fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each facility. The board shall
remit such application fees to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the
State Treasury to the credit of the State Plant Board Fund to be used solely
by the board.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 2-40-1201(c), concerning fees and the
701 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
disposition of funds related to the pseudorabies control and eradication
program, is amended to read as follows:
(c) After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the
Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the
remainder of funds so remitted to the secretary shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Arkansas Livestock and
Poultry Commission Swine Testing Fund.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 2-40-206(b)(2)(A) and (B), concerning
funding of the bovine disease program, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the
Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the
remainder of funds so remitted to the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special
revenues and credited to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Disease and Pest Control Fund.
(B) Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine the amount of funds which will remain at
the end of the fiscal year in the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
Disease and Pest Control Fund from fees collected under the provisions of
this section. He or she shall allow such funds to be carried forward and made
available for the same purposes in the next-succeeding fiscal year.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 3-3-314(d)(2), concerning the use of funds
derived from the sale of confiscated beverages, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Fifty percent (50%) thereof as general revenues in the State
Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. There the funds shall
be allocated and distributed to the various funds, fund accounts, and
accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to
each as provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set
forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 3-4-501(c)(2), concerning alcoholic
beverage permit and license fees, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the
702 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
amounts to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues
in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 3-5-224 is amended to read as follows:
3-5-224. Disposition of funds.
All permits or license fees or taxes, penalties, fines, proceeds of all
forfeitures, special inspection fees, and costs received by the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this
subchapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited in the State
Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of
State shall allocate and transfer those revenues to the various State
Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective
proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes
set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 3-5-908 is amended to read as follows:
3-5-908. Arkansas Agricultural Marketing Grants Fund.
There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the Arkansas
Agricultural Marketing Grants Fund, into which shall be paid the fees
specified by § 19-6-839(b) 19-43-311(b) and such moneys as may be provided by
law to be used for making payments of grants to eligible Arkansas wineries
under this subchapter.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1708(b), concerning the disposition of
funds received under the Direct Shipment of Vinous Liquor Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer those revenues
to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 3-6-106(b), concerning the collection of
703 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fees and taxes under the Native Brandy Law, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The permit fees and taxes shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund,
there to be allocated to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts
participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as
provided by law and be used for the respective purposes set forth in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 3-7-111(a)(4), concerning additional taxes
on alcoholic beverages, is amended to read as follows:
(4) All additional permit fees and taxes levied by subdivisions
(a)(1)(A)-(D) of this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
general revenues and credited to the State Apportionment Fund. These amounts
shall be allocated and transferred to the various funds, fund accounts, and
accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to
each as provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set
forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 3-7-111(b)(3), concerning additional taxes
on alcoholic beverages, is amended to read as follows:
(3) All taxes, penalties, fines, and costs received by the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under the
provisions of this subsection shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. There those
amounts shall be allocated to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts
participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as
provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set forth in
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 3-7-205 is amended to read as follows:
3-7-205. Disposition of funds.
All taxes, interest, penalties, and costs received by the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this
subchapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited in the State
Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of
State shall allocate and transfer the revenues to the various State Treasury
704 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each
as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 3-7-506(c), concerning native wines, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) All such gallonage tax shall continue to be general revenues and
shall be deposited into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the
respective funds and used for the respective purposes provided in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 3-9-237 is amended to read as follows:
3-9-237. Disposition of funds.
All permit fees and supplemental gross receipts taxes collected for the
state pursuant to this subchapter shall be remitted monthly to the Treasurer
of State as general revenues and be credited to the State Apportionment Fund.
There the fees and taxes shall be allocated and transferred to the various
funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by, and shall be used for the
respective purposes set forth in, the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 3-9-301(3)(C), concerning the definition
of "license" to be used in relation to the on-premises consumption of wine,
is amended to read as follows:
(C) All moneys derived from the annual fees shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the
State Apportionment Fund, to be allocated and transferred to the various
funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by law, and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.;

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 4-18-323(c)(3), concerning civil penalties
under the Uniform Weights and Measures Law, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Any civil penalty collected under this section shall be
705 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
transmitted to the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 4-18-329(c), concerning the fees for tests
or inspections under the Uniform Weights and Measures Law, is amended to read
as follows:
(c) Funds collected under this section shall be deposited into the
State Treasury as special revenue credited to the State Plant Board Fund to
be used exclusively for the maintenance of facilities and equipment of the
bureau.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 4-28-415 is amended to read as follows:
4-28-415. Disposition of fees.
All registration fees collected by the Secretary of State under this
subchapter shall be deposited into the State Treasury, and the Treasurer of
State shall credit them as general revenues to the various funds in the
respective amounts to each and to be used as provided in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code § 4-35-301(b)(3)(B), concerning the issuance
of bonds under the Water Authority Act, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The provisions of the Revenue Bond Act of 1987, § 19-
9-601 19-6-601 et seq., do not apply to this section.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 4-108-208(c)(3), concerning civil
penalties under the Engine Fuels, Petroleum Products, and Automotive
Lubricants Inspection Act of 2001, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Any civil penalty collected under this section shall be
transmitted to the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 5-4-617(m), concerning the method of
execution for capital murder, is amended to read as follows:
(m) Every person that procures, prepares, administers, monitors, or
supervises the injection of a drug or drugs under this section has immunity
under § 19-10-305 25-44-305.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 5-4-703(b)(1), concerning the additional
706 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
fine levied for committing an offense against a child or in the presence of a
child, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A fine assessed and collected under this section shall be
remitted on or before the fifteenth day of the following month to the
Arkansas Children's Advocacy Center Fund under § 19-5-1260 19-27-315.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 5-64-505(i)(2)(A)(iv), concerning the drug
control fund and the disposition of moneys received from the sale of property
subject to forfeiture, is amended to read as follows:
(iv) Moneys in the drug control fund are
appropriated on a continuing basis and are not subject to the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 5-64-505(i)(3)(C), concerning the Special
State Assets Forfeiture Fund and the disposition of moneys received from the
sale of property subject to forfeiture, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The Special State Assets Forfeiture Fund is not
subject to the provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-
101 et seq., or the Special Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment
Fund, § 19-5-203(b)(2)(A) 19-21-103(b)(2)(A).

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 5-65-119(a)(2)(C), concerning the
distribution of the fee for reinstating a driving privilege that was
suspended or revoked, is amended to read as follows:
(C) Ten percent (10%) of the revenues derived from this
fee shall be deposited into the State Treasury, and the Treasurer of State
shall credit them as general revenues to the various funds in the respective
amounts to each and to be used for the purposes as provided in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.; and

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 6-1-101(b), concerning the required audit
of a publicly funded educational institution, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Any statutorily required audit of an educational institution
performed by an independent accountant shall include, as a minimum and as an
integral part of the annual financial report, a review and comments on
substantial compliance with each of the following:
707 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Management letter for audit of political subdivisions, §§
14-75-101 — 14-75-104;
(2) Compliance with ethical guidelines and prohibitions for
board members, administrators, and employees, § 6-13-628 and § 6-24-101 et
seq.;
(3) School elections, § 6-14-118;
(4) Management of schools, §§ 6-13-617 — 6-13-620 and 6-13-701;
(5) Revolving Loan Fund, §§ 6-19-114, 6-20-801, and 6-20-802;
(6) School district finances, §§ 6-20-402 and 6-20-409;
(7) School district school bonds, §§ 6-20-1208 and 6-20-1210;
(8) Teachers and employees, §§ 6-17-201, 6-17-203 — 6-17-206, 6-
17-301, and 6-17-401;
(9) Teachers' salaries, §§ 6-17-803, 6-17-907, 6-17-908, 6-17-
911 — 6-17-913, 6-17-918, and 6-17-919, and the Public School Funding Act of
2003, § 6-20-2301 et seq.;
(10) Deposit of funds, §§ 19-8-104 and 19-8-106 19-5-104 and 19-
5-106;
(11) Investment of funds, § 19-1-504 19-1-404; and
(12) Improvement contracts, §§ 22-9-201 — 22-9-205.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 6-5-301(a)(2), concerning the creation and
funding of the Educational Excellence Trust Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) For each of the state's fiscal years, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall determine as an annual allocation for this fund an
amount based on the total net general revenues as enumerated in § 19-6-201(1)
and (2) 19-41-201(1) and (2), which were collected in the immediate past
year, times a factor of 0.1414.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 6-5-301(b)(2), concerning the creation and
funding of the Educational Excellence Trust Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The Treasurer of State shall make such transfer after making
the deductions required from the net general revenues as set out in § 19-5-
202(b)(2)(B)(i) 19-21-102(b)(2)(B)(i).

708 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1001 is amended to read as follows:
6-16-1001. Kids-For-Health program established.
The Department of Health shall use moneys from the Tobacco Settlement
Proceeds Act, § 19-12-101 19-90-101 et seq., to establish a Kids-For-Health
program.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 6-17-911(c)(1), concerning the effect of
failure to make records and settlements under The Arkansas Teachers' Salary
Law, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If such delinquent settlement is not made within two (2) weeks,
the Treasurer of State shall withhold the monthly distribution of county aid
provided for under § 19-5-602(b) 19-25-102(b) upon notification from the
secretary that the county has failed to make such settlement.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2307(c)(2)(B)(i), concerning the
duties of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall transmit all gifts, grants, or donations received under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section to the Treasurer of State, who shall credit the
received gifts, grants, or donations received by the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education to the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids
Academic Accountability Fund under § 19-5-1275 19-27-329.

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 6-20-225 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-225. Loan or transfer repayment.
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 19-5-501 19-24-101 et seq., or any
law to the contrary, up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) received by the
Public School Fund from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund either by loan or
transfer during the 1996-1997 fiscal year, shall be repaid from time to time
by transfer by the Treasurer of State from either the Public School Support
Fund [repealed] or the Public School Fund, or its appropriate fund account,
solely from revenues generated by the income tax surcharge levied by § 6-20-
312(c) [repealed] after the provisions of § 19-6-481(b) [repealed] have been
achieved.

709 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 6-20-405(a)(2)(A), concerning energy
savings contracts, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Qualified provider” means the same as defined in § 19-
11-1202 19-68-102.

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 6-20-405(f), concerning energy savings
contracts, is amended to read as follows:
(f) A school district may provide by resolution that the school
district shall comply with the rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission under the Guaranteed Energy Cost Savings Act,
§ 19-11-1201 19-68-101 et seq.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1017(c), concerning the purchase of
bonds and certificates by the Treasurer of State, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The moneys that the Treasurer of State may use in the purchase of
any revolving loan bonds or revolving loan certificates of indebtedness shall
be those funds available for investment under the provisions of the State
Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq.

SECTION 61. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 6-20-
2202(g)(1), concerning the budget and expenditure report required for school
districts, open-enrollment public charter schools, and education service
cooperatives, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The Treasurer of State shall withhold the monthly distribution
of county aid provided under § 19-5-602(c) 19-25-102(c) from any county whose
county official who is the preparer of the tax books fails to provide by
March 15 of each calendar year information concerning the annual abstract of
assessment that reflects the aggregate value of the real and personal
property for each school district located wholly or in part in the county as
follows:

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2602(6), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities Financing Act
of 2007, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “General revenues of the state” means the revenues described
710 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
and enumerated in § 19-6-201 19-41-201 of the Revenue Classification Law, §
19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq., or in any successor law;

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2603(c)(2)(A), concerning the duties
of the Governor upon receipt of the written plan submitted by the Commission
for Arkansas Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation before
issuing bonds, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Confer with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
concerning whether the annual amount of general revenue funds required to be
set aside from the general revenues of the state under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., for payment of debt service
requirements in connection with the bonds during either year of the fiscal
biennium in which the bonds are to be issued would require moneys from the
general revenues of the state that would work undue hardship upon any agency
or program supported from the general revenues of the state under the
provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.;
and

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 6-23-901 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-901. Open-Enrollment Public Charter School Facilities Loan Fund —
Established.
Beginning with the 2013-2014 school year, the Open-Enrollment Public
Charter School Facilities Loan Fund is established under § 19-5-1251 19-27-
306 to provide funding for safe and secure facilities in which to conduct
educational services and administrative activities for open-enrollment public
charter schools.

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 6-28-206(a), concerning immunity from suit
for state officials and state employees under the Arkansas Military Child
School Transitions Act of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(a) This chapter shall not affect the immunity from suit granted to
state officials and state employees under § 19-10-305 25-44-305 or to the
state and its official agencies under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20.

SECTION 66. Arkansas Code § 6-42-307(c), concerning the School for
Math, Sciences, and Arts Fund, is amended to read as follows:
711 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(c) The fund shall consist of moneys allocated and transferred from
the Educational Excellence Trust Fund, any general revenues as may be
provided by the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., and
any other moneys as may be authorized by law.

SECTION 67. Arkansas Code § 6-51-1103(a), concerning purchases by
Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Upon the vote of the Board of Directors of Crowley's Ridge
Technical Institute to merge with East Arkansas Community College under § 6-
51-1101(a)(1)(A) and before the effective date of a merger under § 6-51-
1101(a)(2):
(1) Purchases by Crowley's Ridge Technical Institute shall be
made under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.; and
(2) Purchases by East Arkansas Community College may continue to
be made under procedures that were applicable to East Arkansas Community
College.

SECTION 68. Arkansas Code § 6-53-207(a), concerning capital outlays of
institutions within the Arkansas Technical and Community College System, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Unless exempted under the provisions of § 19-4-522 19-4-513, any
expenditure of State Treasury funds for capital outlay expenses or
construction costs, as set forth in § 19-4-524 19-4-515, of an institution
within the Arkansas Technical and Community College system System shall be
subject to the prior approval of the General Assembly upon the recommendation
of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

SECTION 69. Arkansas Code § 6-59-111 is amended to read as follows:
6-59-111. Funding for salary equity.
In that funding for and achievement of salary equity among employees of
Arkansas Northeastern College is essential for the successful merger of
Cotton Boll Technical Institute into Arkansas Northeastern College, this
chapter declares the importance of the provision through the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., for salary equity in
addition to incremental funding increases comparable to other institutions of
higher education.
712 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 70. Arkansas Code § 6-62-314 is amended to read as follows:
6-62-314. Construction project exemption.
The following state-supported institutions of higher education shall be
exempt as allowed by § 19-4-1415(b)(5) 19-4-1413(b)(5) for construction
projects exceeding five million dollars ($5,000,000) if they have adopted
policies and procedures in compliance with state law involving the awarding
and oversight of the contracts for design and construction services:
(1) Henderson State University;
(2) Southern Arkansas University;
(3) University of Central Arkansas;
(4) National Park College;
(5) Northwest Arkansas Community College; and
(6) Arkansas Tech University.

SECTION 71. Arkansas Code § 6-62-709(b), concerning the duties of the
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the Arkansas Development
Finance Authority with respect to issuing bonds under the Arkansas College
Savings Bond Act of 1989, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon receipt thereof, the Governor shall confer with the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State concerning the amount available in the state
General Improvement Fund or its successor fund or fund accounts, including
the Development and Enhancement Fund, which funds shall be used to defray the
debt service requirements in amounts as are determined to be available. The
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall then determine whether the annual
amount of general revenue funds required to be set aside from the net general
revenue as defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq., for payment of the remaining debt service requirements in connection
with the bonds during either year of the fiscal biennium in which the bonds
are to be issued, would work undue hardship upon any agency or program
supported from general revenues under the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-
101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 72. Arkansas Code § 6-62-718(b), concerning general obligation
bonds under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of 1989, is amended to read
as follows:
713 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) The bonds shall be payable from the general revenues of the state
as such term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-
101 et seq., and such amount of general revenues as is necessary is hereby
pledged to the payment of debt service on the bonds and shall be and remain
pledged for such purposes.

SECTION 73. Arkansas Code § 6-62-719(a) and (b), concerning the
payment of bonds under the Arkansas College Savings Bond Act of 1989, are
amended to read as follows:
(a) On or before the commencement of each fiscal year, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the estimated amount required for
payment of all or a part of debt service on the bonds issued under this
subchapter during such fiscal year, after making deductions therefrom of
estimated moneys to be available to the authority from other sources therefor
and making the necessary transfer of such moneys, and shall certify such
estimated amount to the Treasurer of State, who shall make monthly transfers
from the State Apportionment Fund to the bond fund to provide for payment of
all or part of the debt service on the bonds issued under this subchapter, of
such amount of net general revenue as such term is defined in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., as shall be required to pay
the maturing debt service on bonds issued under this subchapter.
(b)(1) The Treasurer of State shall make such additional monthly
transfer or transfers of net general revenue as the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall certify to him or her as being required to enable the
Arkansas Deveopment Development Finance Authority to establish and thereafter
maintain a debt service reserve fund, to provide a reserve or reserves for
payment of debt service on the bonds.
(2)(A) The obligation to make monthly transfers of net general
revenue from the State Apportionment Fund to the bond fund and to the debt
service reserve fund shall constitute a first charge against said net general
revenue prior to all other uses to which said net general revenue are
devoted, either under present law or under any laws that may be enacted in
the future;
(B) Provided, however, that, to the extent other general
obligation bonds of the state may subsequently be incurred, all such general
obligation bonds shall rank on a priority of security with respect to payment
714 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
from net general revenue.

SECTION 74. Arkansas Code § 6-62-1103(6), concerning the definitions
used under the Arkansas Higher Education Technology and Facility Improvement
Act of 2005, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “General revenues” means the general revenues defined in §
19-6-201 19-41-201;

SECTION 75. Arkansas Code § 6-62-1104(b)(2), concerning the power and
duties of the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under the Arkansas
Higher Education Technology and Facility Improvement Act of 2005, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine
whether the annual amount of the net general revenues required to be set
aside from general revenues for payment of the remaining debt service
requirements in connection with the bonds to be issued under this subchapter
during either year of the fiscal biennium in which the bonds are to be issued
would work undue hardship upon any agency or program supported from general
revenues under the provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 76. Arkansas Code § 6-62-1202(a), concerning loans made under
the Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-Supported Institutions
of Higher Education, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Under the Sustainable Building Maintenance Program for State-
Supported Institutions of Higher Education, the Division of Higher Education
may authorize money to be loaned from the Sustainable Building Maintenance
Program for State-Supported Institutions of Higher Education Revolving Loan
Fund, § 19-5-1285 19-27-339, to a state-supported institution of higher
education.

SECTION 77. Arkansas Code § 6-63-302 is amended to read as follows:
6-63-302. Applicability of subchapter — Other fiscal laws not
superseded.
The provisions of this subchapter shall be applicable to all publicly
supported institutions of higher education in this state and shall not
715 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
supersede the provisions of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §
21-5-201 et seq., the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et
seq., or other fiscal control laws of this state, and their successors.

SECTION 78. Arkansas Code § 6-63-317(c)(1) and (2), concerning regular
salary procedures and restrictions under the Higher Education Expenditure
Restriction Act, are amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) New funding through the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq., that is determined by the Division of Higher Education to
have been for salary increases for the current fiscal year for institutions
of higher education shall be used exclusively for salary increases.
(2) New funding through the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-
101 19-20-101 et seq., that is actually received for salary increases shall
be spent exclusively for salary increases based upon the state general
revenue portion of total unrestricted educational and general revenue.

SECTION 79. Arkansas Code § 6-81-201(b)(2), concerning the
administration of student loan provisions of federal laws, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) The foundation is not a state agency and therefore is not
subject to the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., to
the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., or to other
enactments of the General Assembly which are applicable to state agencies.
Therefore, the foundation is not required to deposit into the State Treasury
any federal funds or other funds received by it.

SECTION 80. Arkansas Code § 6-82-2001(d), concerning the Graduate
Medical Education Residency Expansion Board, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The Division of Higher Education shall administer the Graduate
Medical Education Fund under § 19-5-1265 19-27-319 and disburse the funds at
the direction of the Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board
under this subchapter.

SECTION 81. Arkansas Code § 7-4-115 is amended to read as follows:
7-4-115. Legislative intent.
716 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Due to the United States Eighth Circuit Court of Appeals ruling in
Jones v. Conway County, Arkansas, 143 F.3d 417 (8th Cir. 1998), the status of
county election commissioners as either county officials or state officials
has become unclear. Because of this lack of clarity, there has been much
confusion as to whether or not county election commissioners should have been
or currently are immune from suit under the state's policy of tort immunity.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to clarify the official status of
county election commissioners. Prior to July 30, 1999, county election
commissioners were state officials and, as such, were immune from suit
pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20, and § 19-10-305 25-44-
305. Upon July 30, 1999, county election commissioners are hereby deemed to
be county officials and are immune from suit pursuant to § 21-9-301.

SECTION 82. Arkansas Code § 7-5-301(d)(2)(A) and (B), concerning the
acquisition, use, and cost of voting systems, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) The Secretary of State shall establish guidelines and
procedures for a grant program to distribute funds from the County Voting
System Grant Fund, § 19-5-1247 19-27-303.
(B) A grant provided to a county from the County Voting
System Grant Fund, § 19-5-1247 19-27-303, shall be paid into the county
treasury to the credit of the voting system grant fund.

SECTION 83. Arkansas Code § 7-6-217(g), concerning the creation of the
Arkansas Ethics Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(g) The commission shall have the authority to:
(1) Under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq., promulgate reasonable rules to implement and administer the
requirements of this subchapter, as well as § 7-1-114 [repealed]; the
Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to
Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718 19-64-503; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the
Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et
seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-
901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and Arkansas Constitution,
Article 19, §§ 28-30; and to govern procedures before the commission, matters
of commission operations, and all investigative and disciplinary procedures
and proceedings;
717 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Issue advisory opinions and guidelines on the requirements
of § 6-24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); § 7-1-114
[repealed]; this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives,
Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718
19-64-503; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and
Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq.,
and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 25-1-125;
and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30;
(3) After a citizen complaint has been submitted to the
commission, investigate alleged violations of § 6-24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-
103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); § 7-1-114 [repealed]; this subchapter; the
Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to
Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718 19-64-503; § 21-1-401 et seq.; § 21-8-
301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials,
§ 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et
seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and Arkansas
Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30; and render findings and disciplinary
action thereon;
(4) Pursuant to commission investigations, subpoena any person
or the books, records, or other documents being held by any person and take
sworn statements;
(5) Administer oaths for the purpose of taking sworn testimony
of witnesses and conduct hearings;
(6) Hire a staff and retain legal counsel;
(7) Approve forms prepared by the Secretary of State under this
subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and
Measures Referred to Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718 19-64-503; § 21-
8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local
Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and §
21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; and § 21-8-1001 et seq.; and

SECTION 84. Arkansas Code § 8-7-509(g)(1), concerning the Hazardous
Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 19-6-108 and 19-6-601 19-
40-108 and 19-45-201, grants to the state under the Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and the Comprehensive
718 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, Pub. L. No. 96-510,
as each may be amended from time to time, and otherwise from the United
States Environmental Protection Agency received by the Treasurer of State
from the United States Government are declared to be cash funds restricted in
their use and dedicated and are to be used solely as authorized in this
subchapter and the Arkansas Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund Act, § 15-5-1501
et seq.

SECTION 85. Arkansas Code § 8-7-1311(b), concerning fees under the
Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Consultant Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) All fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited into
the Hazardous Waste Permit Fund, § 19-6-434 19-43-226.

SECTION 86. Arkansas Code § 9-27-401(b)(2)(A), concerning the creation
of the Division of Dependency-Neglect Representation within the
Administrative Office of the Courts, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Before employing or entering into a contract or
contracts, the office shall consult with the judge or judges of the circuit
court designated to hear dependency-neglect cases in their district plan
under Supreme Court Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued April 6,
2001, in each judicial district in accordance with the provisions of § 19-11-
1001 19-67-101 et seq.

SECTION 87. Arkansas Code § 9-28-115(c), concerning immunity with
respect to child placement services, is amended to read as follows:
(c) An approved volunteer who performs home studies without
compensation shall have immunity from liability as provided for state
officers and employees under § 19-10-305 25-44-305. As used in this
subsection, “approved volunteer” means a volunteer approved by:
(1) The department; and
(2) Any organization operating under a memorandum of
understanding with the department for the completion of home studies.

SECTION 88. Arkansas Code § 9-28-1203(a)(2)(C)(ii), concerning
requirements for the reinvestment plan developed by the Division of Youth
719 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Services to redirect savings realized from a reduction in the number of
secure out-of-home placements, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) Describe the methods and procedures to redirect
savings in state costs from a reduction in the number of secure out-of-home
placements through the reallocation of resources under § 19-4-522 19-4-513;

SECTION 89. Arkansas Code Title 10, Chapter 2, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-1-
701 and 19-1-702:
10-2-135. Fiscal impact statements required for rules — Definition.
(a) As used in this subchapter, “fiscal impact statement” means a
realistic statement of the purpose of a proposed law, or a rule promulgated
under a law, and the estimated financial cost to the state or any local
school district of implementing or complying with the proposed law or rule.
(b) A fiscal impact statement shall be developed with the guidance of
the Office of Economic and Tax Policy of the Bureau of Legislative Research
and with the approval of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(c) Thirty-five (35) days prior to the adoption of any rule or other
proposal that will impose a new or increased cost obligation for education on
the state or any local school district, the board, commission, agency,
department, officer, or other authority, excepting the General Assembly and
the courts, shall give notice of such rule or proposal and shall file a
fiscal impact statement with the Secretary of State and the House Committee
on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

SECTION 90. Arkansas Code § 10-3-1404(a)(1), concerning the forecast
of general revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) On or before the third Wednesday in May before the beginning of
each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall submit to the
Joint Committee on Economic and Tax Policy the following forecasts of general
revenues to be available under the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-
20-101 et seq.:
(A) The official forecast for the upcoming fiscal year,
including any revisions necessitated by the revised forecast required under
subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section; and
(B) A revised forecast for the current fiscal year.
720 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 91. Arkansas Code § 10-4-304(16)-(18), concerning the fiscal
management laws within purview of the Arkansas Governmental Compliance Act,
are amended to read as follows:
(16) Sections 19-1-401 — 19-1-405 19-1-301 — 19-1-305;
(17) Sections 19-4-101 — 19-4-2004 19-4-101 — 19-4-1904;
(18) Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11 Subtitle 4;

SECTION 92. Arkansas Code § 10-4-410(b)(1), concerning audit costs
incurred by Arkansas Legislative Audit, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The administrative cost of auditing political subdivisions of
the state shall be paid from the Ad Valorem Tax Fund as prescribed by § 19-5-
906 19-26-204.

SECTION 93. Arkansas Code § 10-4-412(a)(2), concerning the definitions
used with respect to audits of counties and municipalities, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) “Turnback funds” means:
(A) General revenue turnback funds, as defined in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.; and
(B) Highway revenue turnback funds, as distributed under §
27-70-207.

SECTION 94. Arkansas Code § 11-9-102(11)(A)(iv), resulting from
Initiated Acts 1948, No. 4, § 2, and concerning exceptions to the definition
of "employment" under the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(iv) The State of Arkansas and each of the political
subdivisions thereof except as provided by §§ 6-17-1401 — 6-17-1405, 14-26-
101 — 14-26-104, 14-60-101 — 14-60-104, 19-10-101 — 19-10-103, 19-10-202 —
19-10-210, 19-10-401 — 19-10-406 11-17-202 — 11-17-208, 25-44-102 — 25-44-
104, 25-44-202 — 25-44-210, and 21-5-601 — 21-5-610;

SECTION 95. Arkansas Code § 11-9-301(d), resulting from Initiated Acts
1948, No. 4, § 47, concerning funds established under the Workers'
Compensation Law, is amended to read as follows:
721 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d) All incomes derived through investment of the Workers'
Compensation Fund, the Second Injury Trust Fund, and the Death and Permanent
Total Disability Trust Fund shall be credited, as investment income, to the
fund that participated in the investment. For the purpose of investment,
Workers' Compensation Fund moneys shall be invested in accordance with the
State Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq.

SECTION 96. Arkansas Code § 11-10-310(f), concerning the Director of
the Division of Workforce Services and additional personnel of the Division
of Workforce Services, is amended to read as follows:
(f) If the division requests continuation of a growth pool position as
established under this subsection and subsection (e) of this section, the
position shall be requested as a new position in the division's next budget
request. Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount
of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal
year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished
by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act or acts for a state
agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund
account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101
et seq. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the division may
operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the division
authorizing broad powers under this subsection and subsection (e) of this
section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this subsection and
subsection (e) of this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
subsection and subsection (e) of this section. If the requirement of approval
by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire subsection
and subsection (e) of this section are void.

SECTION 97. Arkansas Code § 11-10-532(a)(3)(C), concerning penalties
on fraudulent overpayments under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is
amended to read as follows:
(C) The portion of the penalty assessed under subdivision
722 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a)(3)(A) of this section in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the
overpayment shall be deposited into a subaccount of the Division of Workforce
Services Special Fund under § 19-5-984 19-26-268, to be entitled the “UI
Integrity Fund” that shall be used exclusively for integrity-related
activities arising under this chapter.

SECTION 98. Arkansas Code § 11-10-708(a)(1)(C), concerning the advance
interest tax under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to read
as follows:
(C) The tax is effective the first month of the quarter
following the state's obtaining an interest-bearing advance and shall remain
until the quarter immediately following the repayment of the advancement and
the Employment Security Advance Interest Trust Fund, § 19-5-935 19-26-227,
attains a balance of five million dollars ($5,000,000).

SECTION 99. Arkansas Code § 11-10-716(b)(1)(A), concerning the
collection of and interest on past due contributions under the Division of
Workforce Services Law, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) At the end of each month, deposits in the Unemployment
Compensation Fund Clearing Account which have been established as interest
and penalty payments collected pursuant to §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-723 shall be
paid over to the Treasurer of State and credited by him or her to the
Division of Workforce Services Special Fund, § 19-5-984 19-26-268, created
and established in the State Treasury.

SECTION 100. Arkansas Code § 11-10-802(b)(1)(C), concerning accounts
and deposits under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to read
as follows:
(C) All moneys received in the clearing account as
proceeds of § 11-10-706(c) shall be deposited and credited to the Division of
Workforce Services Special Fund, § 19-5-984 19-26-268, pursuant to § 11-10-
716.

SECTION 101. Arkansas Code Title 11 is amended to add additional
chapters to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-5-701 — 19-5-705, §§ 19-5-707 —
19-5-710, §§ 19-5-801 — 19-5-804, §§ 19-5-806 — 19-5 809, § 19-10-102(b), §
723 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-10-103, § 19-10-105(1)-(3), § 19-10-401, § 19-10-402, and §§ 19-10-404 —
19-10-406:
CHAPTER 16
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

Subchapter 2 — Reimbursement of Unemployment Compensation Benefits

11-16-201. Purpose.
It is the purpose of this subchapter that all programs, regardless of
their funding source, contribute equally to the cost of unemployment
compensation benefits charged to the state agencies operating such programs.
It is not the intent of this subchapter that the State of Arkansas relinquish
its status as a nontaxable reimbursable employer under the Division of
Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq.

11-16-202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Contribution” means a percentage of payroll expenditures
paid to the Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund by a state agency in
order to provide current and timely reimbursements of benefits paid by the
Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et seq., for unemployment
benefits charged to the agency;
(2) “Experience rate” means the process of adjustment in a
future period of the contribution rate of an agency based on the difference
of the amounts paid to the revolving fund for a fiscal year compared to the
amounts of unemployment benefits charged to the agency for a fiscal year in
order to recover deficits and refund surpluses;
(3) “Payroll” means the gross total amount expended for a
payroll period for regular salaries, extra help, and authorized overtime
payments; and
(4) “State agency” means any state agency, board, commission,
department, institution, college, university, and community junior college
receiving an appropriation for regular salaries, extra help, and authorized
overtime payable from funds deposited into the State Treasury or depositories
724 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
other than the State Treasury by the General Assembly.

11-16-203. Applicability.
The provisions and applicability of this subchapter shall be in
conjunction with other state laws governing the unemployment compensation of
state employees. Employee coverage shall be in conformity with state and
federal laws applicable to state employees' unemployment compensation.
Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be applicable or construed to be
applicable to laws regulating unemployment compensation for municipal or
county employees.

11-16-204. Administration.
(a) This subchapter shall be administered by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State.
(b) Upon certification to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the
Division of Workforce Services of unemployment compensation benefits paid
during a benefit period and charged to a state agency, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall direct that reimbursement be made to the division
from the Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund for such amounts as are
properly certified.
(c) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall have the authority to
make such rules as are necessary to enforce the provisions of this
subchapter.

11-16-205. Benefits claims investigations.
The Department of Workforce Services shall investigate all claims for
benefits filed by state employees whether or not the employing state agency
lodges a protest to the payment of such benefits. Such investigation shall
result in a determination of the eligibility of the employee for benefit
payments.

11-16-206. Contributions generally.
(a) Each state agency shall make contributions to the Unemployment
Compensation Revolving Fund using the experience rate determined in
accordance with § 11-10-704 from personal services matching costs funds
within fourteen (14) calendar days following the end of each calendar
725 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
quarter. The experience rate for each even-numbered fiscal year will be used
to fix the rate for the next even-numbered fiscal year. Each odd-numbered
fiscal year's experience rate will be used to fix the next odd-numbered
fiscal year rate.
(b) If during any fiscal year the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
determines that the contribution rate for any agency will result in a
significant surplus or deficit for that fiscal year, then he or she shall
have the authority to adjust the agency contribution rate to reduce such
surplus or recover any such deficit, subject to the provisions of § 11-16-
207.

11-16-207. Maximum contributions.
In no event shall any experience rate result in a state agency making
contributions of more than three percent (3%) of its gross payroll
expenditures. In the event that an agency builds a deficit which would
require a contribution rate greater than three percent (3%), then that agency
shall continue to make contributions at the rate of three percent (3%), even
though eligible for an experience rate reduction, until any deficit owed the
fund is repaid. Only then shall the actual experience rate be used to compute
such agency contributions.

11-16-208. Loans.
(a) In the event that the Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund
does not have sufficient funds available from contributions by state agencies
to make reimbursement to the Division of Workforce Services for benefits
paid, loans may be made from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to make such
payments.
(b) Any loans made to the Unemployment Compensation Revolving Fund
shall be repaid by June 30 of the first fiscal year after the fiscal year in
which such loans were made.

11-16-209. Financing.
Financing for the provisions of this subchapter shall be provided
within the appropriations and financing authority authorized by the General
Assembly for personal services matching costs.

726 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
CHAPTER 17
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' WORKERS' COMPENSATION

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

Subchapter 2 — Workers' Compensation Commission

11-17-201. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “General Assembly” means the appropriate subcommittee of the
Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee that is assigned to hear
appealed claims or claims requiring approval before being considered by the
Legislative Council, the Joint Budget Committee, or the full General
Assembly;
(2) “Insurer” means a person engaged as indemnitor, surety, or
contractor in the business of entering into contracts of insurance; and
(3) “State agency” means a department, office, board,
commission, or institution of this state, including a state-supported
institution of higher education.

11-17-202. Legal representative for state agencies.
Legal representation for a public employer before the Workers'
Compensation Commission shall be in the manner prescribed in § 21-5-606.

11-17-203. State employee not to represent claimant.
The following shall not appear before the Workers' Compensation
Commission as an attorney or representative for a claimant in the
presentation or prosecution of a claim filed under this subchapter:
(1) A full-time employee of:
(A) The State of Arkansas; or
(B) A state agency; or
(2) A member of a state agency.

11-17-204. Reports of personal injury or death.
All state officers, heads of agencies, departments, and institutions
shall file a report with the Workers' Compensation Commission, within ten
727 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(10) days after knowledge of any personal injury or death of any employee of
the state or any of its agencies, departments, or institutions. This report
shall be made on forms approved by the commission and shall give the date,
place, and time of day of any such injury or death, briefly stating the
circumstances and extent thereof, the name of the injured or deceased person,
and the names of any and all witnesses.

11-17-205. Jurisdiction and procedure.
(a)(1) The Workers' Compensation Commission shall have exclusive
jurisdiction, as limited in this subchapter, of all claims against the State
of Arkansas and its several agencies, departments, and institutions for
personal injuries and deaths of employees and officers of the State of
Arkansas and its agencies, departments, and institutions arising out of and
in the course of employment or service.
(2)(A) Awards for these injuries and deaths shall be made by the
commission in the same amounts and on the same terms and conditions as if
such injuries and deaths had arisen out of and in the course of private
employment covered by the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.
(B) The procedure to be followed in the presentation,
hearing, and determination of claims shall, in all respects, be the same as
in claims for compensation for injuries and deaths arising out of and in the
course of private employment covered by the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-
9-101 et seq.
(b) The General Assembly shall at each session appropriate, from such
sources as it may see fit, a sum sufficient to satisfy such claims as are or
probably will be payable during the following fiscal year under awards made
under this section. The commission shall direct the distributions of this
fund and make disbursements upon the vouchers issued against it.

11-17-206. State deemed self-insurer.
For the purposes of this subchapter, the State of Arkansas shall be
considered a self-insurer and shall be exempt from all fees and tax as such.

11-17-207. Awards and expenses.
In the event an award is made, the Workers' Compensation Commission
shall immediately take the necessary steps to pay the award and all expenses
728 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
incidental to the claim from any funds previously made available by the
General Assembly for such purpose.

11-17-208. Report of findings.
Upon the allowance or disallowance of any claim, the Workers'
Compensation Commission shall immediately transmit a copy of its findings to
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and interested
parties.

Subchapter 3 — Reimbursement of Workers' Compensation Benefits

11-17-301. Purpose.
It is the purpose of this subchapter that all programs, regardless of
their funding source, contribute equally to the cost of workers' compensation
benefits charged to the state agencies operating such programs.

11-17-302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Contribution” means a percentage of payroll expenditures
paid to the Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund by a state agency in order
to provide current and timely reimbursements of benefits paid by the Workers'
Compensation Commission for workers' compensation benefits charged to the
agency;
(2) “Experience rate” means the process of adjustment in a
future period of the contribution rate of a state agency based on the
difference of the amounts paid to the Workers’ Compensation Revolving Fund
for a fiscal year compared to the amounts of workers' compensation benefits
charged to the agency for a fiscal year in order to recover deficits and
refund surpluses;
(3) “Payroll” means the gross total amount expended for a
payroll period for regular salaries, extra help, and authorized overtime
payments; and
(4) “State agency” means any state agency, board, commission,
department, institution, college, university, and community junior college
receiving appropriation for regular salaries, extra help, and authorized
overtime payable from funds deposited into the State Treasury or depositories
729 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
other than the State Treasury by the General Assembly.

11-17-303. Applicability.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of the
workers' compensation laws contained in § 11-9-502 apply to state agencies
and that “employer” as used in that statute includes state agencies.

11-17-304. Administration.
This subchapter shall be administered by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall have the authority to
establish procedures and to make such rules as are necessary to enforce the
provisions of this subchapter.

11-17-305. Contributions generally.
(a) Each state agency shall make contributions to the Workers'
Compensation Revolving Fund, using the experience rate determined in
accordance with this section, from personal services matching costs funds
within fourteen (14) calendar days following the end of each calendar
quarter. The experience rate for each even-numbered fiscal year will be used
to fix the rate for the next even-numbered fiscal year. Each odd-numbered
fiscal year's experience rate will be used to fix the next odd-numbered
fiscal year's rate.
(b) If during any fiscal year the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
determines that the contribution rate for any agency will result in a
significant surplus or deficit for that fiscal year, he or she shall have the
authority to adjust the agency contribution rate to reduce such surplus or
recover any such deficit, subject to the provisions of § 11-17-306.

11-17-306. Maximum contributions.
In the event a state agency builds a deficit which would require a
contribution rate greater than two percent (2%), the agency shall continue to
make contributions at the rate of two percent (2%) until any deficit owed the
fund is repaid. In the event an agency's experience rate exceeds two percent
(2%) for one (1) full fiscal year, their contribution rate shall be adjusted
to equal their experience rate, not to exceed a maximum of five percent (5%).
Their contributions shall remain at that level until their experience rate
730 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
decreases and their accumulated deficit is repaid.

11-17-307. Loans.
If the Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund does not have sufficient
funds available from contributions by state agencies for paying awarded
workers' compensation benefits to state employees, loans may be made from the
Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to make such payments. Any loans made to the
Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund shall be repaid by June 30 of the first
fiscal year after the fiscal year in which such loans were made.

11-17-308. Financing.
Financing the provisions of this subchapter shall be provided within
the appropriations and financing authority as authorized by the General
Assembly for personal services matching costs.

SECTION 102. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-1-
301 and 19-1-302:
14-1-111. Fiscal impact before adoption of rule, etc. — Definition.
(a) As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires,
“fiscal impact statement” means a realistic statement of the estimated
financial cost of implementing or complying with the proposed law, rule,
policy, order, or administrative law upon municipalities or counties to which
the proposed law, rule, policy, order, or administrative law applies.
(b) No rule, policy, order, or administrative law which would have a
fiscal impact on any municipality or county in this state shall be valid
unless, thirty (30) days prior to its adoption by a board, commission,
agency, department, officer, or other authority of the government of the
State of Arkansas, excepting the General Assembly, the courts, and the
Governor, the board, commission, agency, department, officer, or other
authority has filed a fiscal impact statement with the Secretary of State.
(c) Any municipality or county which will be affected by the proposed
rule, policy, order, or administrative law upon request shall immediately be
furnished with a copy of the fiscal impact statement by the board,
commission, agency, department, officer, or other authority.

731 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 103. Arkansas Code § 12-6-802(e), concerning grant funding for
violent crime clearance, is amended to read as follows:
(e) The secretary and the department shall only be obligated to comply
with this section in years in which the Violent Crime Clearance Grant Fund, §
19-5-1282 19-27-336, receives at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) in
funding.

SECTION 104. Arkansas Code § 12-6-803(b)(3), concerning the powers of
the Department of Public Safety to carry out the additional duties of the
Department of Public Safety, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Spend up to five percent (5%) of funds in the Violent Crime
Clearance Grant Fund, § 19-5-1282 19-27-336, on the necessary costs of
administering this subchapter, including without limitation the costs
described in this section.

SECTION 105. Arkansas Code § 12-9-104(17), concerning the powers of
the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, is amended
to read as follows:
(17) Adopt rules to implement §§ 14-15-309 and 19-6-821 19-43-
293; and

SECTION 106. Arkansas Code § 12-9-111(a), concerning uniforms for
students and law enforcement officers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training
is exempt from § 19-6-109(c) 19-40-109(c) for the purpose of buying uniforms
for students and law enforcement officers employed by the Division of Law
Enforcement Standards and Training.

SECTION 107. Arkansas Code § 12-10-318(g)(4)(B), concerning the
deposit of the public safety charge into the Arkansas Public Safety Trust
Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund shall provide
disbursements as provided by § 19-5-1152 19-26-325.

SECTION 108. Arkansas Code § 12-12-910(c), concerning the fine imposed
under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, is amended to read as
732 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
follows:
(c)(1) The fine provided in subsection (a) of this section and
collected in circuit court, district court, or city court shall be remitted
by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section
of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and
Administration on a form provided by that office for deposit into the Sex and
Child Offenders Registration Fund as established by § 12-12-911.
(2) The fee provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be
collected by the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the person's
sex offender verification and shall be remitted by the tenth day of each
month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of
Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a
form provided by that office for deposit into the Sex and Child Offenders
Registration Fund as established by § 12-12-911.

SECTION 109. Arkansas Code § 12-12-911(a), concerning the Sex and
Child Offenders Registration Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund”.

SECTION 110. Arkansas Code § 12-27-122(b), concerning debt service
accounts of the Division of Correction, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Payments made by the division from the work-release cash funds,
Construction Fund Deficiency Account, Prisoner Housing Contract Account, and
the Regional Facilities Operations Account which are made for bonded
indebtedness or leases of regional correction facilities, or both, are
specifically exempt from §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-4-805, and 19-4-806 19-4-
801 — 19-4-805.

SECTION 111. Arkansas Code § 12-27-128(a), concerning the Division of
Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) There is created in accordance with §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-4-
804 [repealed], 19-4-805, 19-4-806 19-4-801 — 19-4-805, and the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq., a cash fund entitled the
Division of Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund to consist of receipts
733 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for telephone calls from coinless telephones located on Division of
Correction grounds, and from other nontax receipts not previously identified
to a fund of deposit.

SECTION 112. Arkansas Code § 12-27-133 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-133. Community Correction Revolving Fund.
There is created and established on the books of the Treasurer of
State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund
to be known as the “Community Correction Revolving Fund”, which shall consist
of those special revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(31) 19-42-201(31) and
fees and sanctions levied by the courts or authorized by the Board of
Corrections for participation in specified programs to be paid by offenders
on community correction, there to be used for continuation and expansion of
community correction programs as established and approved by the board and as
may be provided by law.

SECTION 113. Arkansas Code § 12-27-142(b), concerning the medical
services contract for the Division of Correction and Division of Community
Correction, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the
professional services contracts for medical services shall comply with all
other provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et
seq., and rules promulgated under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201
19-61-101 et seq.

SECTION 114. Arkansas Code § 12-29-602 is amended to read as follows:
12-29-602. Immunity not affected.
The provisions of this subchapter are not intended to in any way affect
the immunity from suit granted to state officials and employees under § 19-
10-305 25-44-305 or to the state and its official agencies under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 20.

SECTION 115. Arkansas Code § 12-62-305 is amended to read as follows:
12-62-305. Pay and care — Service injury or disability.
Members of the Arkansas National Guard or militia, during the period in
which they are in the active service of the state pursuant to orders of the
734 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Governor as provided by law, shall be entitled to coverage and benefits of
the workers' compensation law for state employees, §§ 19-10-101 — 19-10-103,
19-10-202 — 19-10-210, and 19-10-401 — 19-10-406 11-17-202 — 11-17-208, 25-
44-102 — 25-44-104, 25-44-202 — 25-44-210.

SECTION 116. Arkansas Code § 13-5-315(b), concerning debt service and
the pledge of revenues and earnings from admission charges under the Arkansas
Museum and Cultural Center Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) As additional security, the payment of debt service may be secured
by a pledge of earnings to the extent specified in this section derived from
the investment of state funds pursuant to the State Treasury Management Law,
§ 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq., known as the “investment earnings”.

SECTION 117. Arkansas Code § 14-1-606(f), concerning the prohibition
on ownership of a digital asset mining business by a prohibited foreign-
party-controlled business, is amended to read as follows:
(f) Civil penalties and damages received by the Attorney General under
this section shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) to the Oil and Gas Commission Fund, §
19-6-410 19-43-209; and
(2) Fifty percent (50%) to the Attorney General to be used in
the same manner as provided in § 25-16-718.

SECTION 118. Arkansas Code § 14-16-116(d), concerning the exchange or
transfer of property by counties, is amended to read as follows:
(d) A transfer made under this section is exempt from §§ 14-16-105 and
14-16-106, § 14-22-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201
19-61-101 et seq.

SECTION 119. Arkansas Code § 14-58-101(b)(5) and (6), concerning the
requirement that an audit of a municipality by an independent accountant
include a review and comments on substantial compliance with certain laws,
are amended to read as follows:
(5) Investment of public funds, § 19-1-501 19-1-401 et seq.; and
(6) Deposit of public funds, §§ 19-8-101 — 19-8-107 19-5-101 —
19-5-107.
735 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 120. Arkansas Code § 14-58-105(d), concerning the purchase of
commodities or services by municipalities through competitive bidding, is
amended to read as follows:
(d) When circumstances arise to which this section and § 19-11-259 19-
61-515 apply, both the preference provided under this section and the
preference provided under § 19-11-259 19-61-515 also apply.

SECTION 121. Arkansas Code § 14-58-1001(f)(2), concerning the
requirements for municipal projects exceeding two million dollars, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary,
the provisions of §§ 19-11-801 19-65-101, 19-65-102, 22-9-101, 22-9-103, 22-
9-104, and 22-9-213, § 22-9-301 et seq. [repealed], § 22-9-401 et seq., § 22-
9-501 et seq., § 22-9-601 et seq., § 22-9-701 et seq., and all competitive
bidding statutes shall remain in full force and effect and not be affected
hereby.

SECTION 122. Arkansas Code § 14-62-103(b), concerning the surrender
and repeal of a municipal charter, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Until a final order of dissolution is entered under § 14-62-114,
the receiver appointed under § 14-62-104 shall continue to collect the share
of:
(1) General revenue turnback funds, as defined in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.;
(2) County and state taxes that were being paid to the municipal
corporation; and
(3) Any other funds, revenues, or fees as otherwise provided
under this chapter.

SECTION 123. Arkansas Code § 14-62-105(c)(2)(A), concerning reports
and collections by a receiver for an extinct municipal corporation, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) At least one (1) time per month, the receiver shall pay
into a bank approved under § 19-8-105 19-5-105 the whole sum collected and
received from any nontax revenue sources.
736 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 124. Arkansas Code § 14-77-102(2)(D)(viii), concerning the
laws applicable to political subdivisions under the definition of "fiscal
responsibility and management laws" used under the Local Fiscal Management
Responsibility Act, is amended to read as follows:

(viii) Depositories for Public Funds, § 19-8-101 19-
5-101 et seq.;

SECTION 125. Arkansas Code § 14-78-103(g), concerning authorization
for municipalities and counties to issue obligations, is amended to read as
follows:
(g) The obligations shall be signed by the chief executive officer of
the issuer and shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq.

SECTION 126. Arkansas Code Title 14, Subtitle 4, is amended to add an
additional chapter to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-8-301 — 19-8-311:
CHAPTER 79
LOCAL GOVERNMENT JOINT INVESTMENT TRUST ACT

14-79-101. Title.
This subchapter may be cited as the “Local Government Joint Investment
Trust Act”.

14-79-102. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to permit local governments in
Arkansas to join together to establish trusts for joint investment of moneys
not currently needed so as to enhance their investment opportunities and
increase investment earnings. This subchapter shall be deemed to provide an
additional and alternative method of investment for local governments. It is
supplemental to existing investment authority.

14-79-103. Definitions.
For purposes of this subchapter:
(1) “Local government” shall mean:
737 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(A) Any city, county, school district, or community
college district of this state;
(B) Any department, instrumentality, or agency of these
entities, including local fire and police pension and relief funds; and
(C) Any department, instrumentality, or agency of these
entities, including a local government association;
(2) “Local government association” shall mean the Arkansas
Municipal League, the Association of Arkansas Counties, the Arkansas School
Boards Association, or any similar organization whose membership is composed
of local governments or their elected officials;
(3) “Participant” shall mean a local government which is a party
to a trust agreement;
(4) “Private agency” shall mean any individual or any form of
business organization authorized under the laws of this or any other state;
and
(5) “Trust agreement” shall mean the agreement, indenture, or
other instrument creating a trust pursuant to this subchapter, together with
any supplements thereto.

14-79-104. Creation of trusts.
(a) Ten (10) or more local governments may create a trust under this
subchapter by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise pursuant to law of their
governing bodies to provide for the joint investment of moneys not currently
needed by the local governments creating the trust and by other local
governments that become parties to the trust.
(b) Each trust shall be created by trust agreement.
(c) Following the creation of a trust agreement, other local
governments may become parties to the trust agreement with appropriate action
taken by the local depository board, board of directors of a school district,
or other authorized party responsible for decisions related to bank deposits
and investments.

14-79-105. Terms of trust agreement.
(a) Each trust agreement shall specify the following:
(1) Its duration;
(2)(A) The number, qualifications, method of election, and terms
738 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of the trustees who shall serve as the governing body of the trust.
(B)(i) Each trust shall have a minimum of seven (7)
trustees.
(ii) Only current elected officials and active or
retired employees of a local government or of a local government association
may serve as trustees.
(iii) A majority of the trustees must be officials
or employees of participants.
(C)(i) Each trustee shall be elected by the participants
for a term not to exceed three (3) years.
(ii) The terms of office shall be staggered so that
at least one-third (⅓) of the trustees are elected each year.
(D) Each participant shall be entitled to one (1) vote in
each election of trustees;
(3) The qualifications, terms, and conditions necessary for
additional local governments to become parties to the trust;
(4) The terms and conditions under which local governments may
withdraw as parties to the trust; provided, that any party shall have the
unconditional right to withdraw upon not more than ninety (90) days' notice;
(5) The permissible methods for acquiring, holding, and
disposing of real and personal property used in the operation of the trust;
(6) The maximum amount of funds of participants the trust may
accept for investment;
(7) The permissible methods to be employed in accomplishing the
partial or complete termination of the trust and for disposing of property
upon the partial or complete termination;
(8) The terms and conditions under which the trust agreement may
be amended and supplemented; and
(9) Any other necessary and proper matters.
(b) Each addition of a local government as a party to a trust, each
withdrawal of a local government as a party to a trust, and each amendment or
supplement to a trust agreement shall be evidenced by a written supplement to
the trust agreement.

14-79-106. Filing of trust agreement and supplements thereto.
No trust agreement or supplement to a trust agreement shall be
739 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
effective until it is filed with the Secretary of State.

14-79-107. Common trust funds — Individual investment accounts.
(a) Each trust created pursuant to this subchapter shall establish one
(1) or more common trust funds. Moneys held for the credit of a common trust
fund shall be invested only in authorized common trust fund investments.
(b) Assets held for the credit of a common trust fund shall be divided
into units of participation, and each participant who invests in the common
trust fund shall be the owner of such units in proportion to the amount of
its investment. Such units shall be authorized investments for participants.
(c) If authorized by its trust agreement, and notwithstanding any
other provision of state law, a trust may also act as trustee of individual
investment accounts of participants. Moneys held for the credit of an
individual investment account shall be invested only in obligations which
are, at the time of investment, authorized investments for the participant
under applicable law, excluding this subchapter.

14-79-108. Authorized common trust fund investments.
A trust created under this subchapter may invest moneys held for the
credit of a common trust fund in the same manner as cities under §§ 19-1-404
and 19-1-405 and according to the investment policy adopted by the board of
directors of the trust.

14-79-109. Power to own property and contract.
(a) A trust created under this subchapter shall, subject to any
limitations in the trust agreement, have power to own real and personal
property necessary to carry out its functions and to contract with local
government associations and private agencies for necessary services in
carrying out its functions.
(b) Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, a trust may be
authorized to employ an investment advisor, a trust administrator, a
custodian of investments, and a person or firm to market trust investment
programs.

14-79-110. Records.
(a) Each trust shall cause proper books of account and records to be
740 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
kept in which complete and correct entries shall be made of all transactions
relating to its operations.
(b) Such books shall be available for inspection by each participant
at reasonable times.
(c) Each trust shall have the records audited by the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee or by a certified public accountant one (1) time each
year.
(d) A copy of the audit shall be furnished to each participant and a
copy shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

14-79-111. Direct deposits by State of Arkansas into local government
cash management trust account.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following funds
remitted to municipalities by the State of Arkansas may be deposited directly
into a municipality's Arkansas local government cash management trust
account, established pursuant to this subchapter:
(1) The Municipal Aid Fund, as described in § 19-25-101;
(2) The special highway revenues made available by the Arkansas
Highway Revenue Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.; and
(3) The special revenues listed in the Revenue Classification
Law, § 19-41-201 et seq., including, but not limited to, those generated by
the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq.
(b)(1) Upon receipt of a resolution enacted by the governing body of a
municipality, the officials responsible for the transmittal of funds to the
municipality shall directly deposit the funds into the municipality's local
government cash management trust account.
(2) The resolution shall state the following:
(A) The name of the municipality;
(B) The funds to be transmitted; and
(C) The municipality's local government cash management
trust account number.
(c)(1) Direct deposits as provided in this section shall continue to
be made until the state official or officials responsible for transmitting
the funds receive a copy of a resolution enacted by the governing body of the
municipality requesting the termination of the deposits.
(2) Upon receipt, the funds shall be transmitted as provided by
741 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
this section.

SECTION 127. Arkansas Code § 14-116-402(a)(13)(B), concerning the
powers of a water district to issue obligations under The Regional Water
Distribution District Act, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The obligations may be in the form of negotiable bonds
but may be registered as public obligations under the Registered Public
Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq., may be issued in
one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such
times, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, may bear
interest at rate or rates, may be in such form, may be executed in such
manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be payable at such
place or places, within or without the State of Arkansas, may be subject to
such terms of redemption, and may contain such terms, covenants, and
conditions as the resolution of the board authorizing the bonds may provide.

SECTION 128. Arkansas Code § 14-142-214 is amended to read as follows:
14-142-214. Bonds generally — Execution.
The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq., as that
subchapter may be amended.

SECTION 129. Arkansas Code § 14-143-130(a), concerning funding for
regional intermodal facilities, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Department of Transportation shall distribute the
first five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($525,000) of interest income
received under § 27-70-204 each year from the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund. The
moneys shall be:
(1) Equally distributed to each authority;
(2) Deposited into a bank as the authority may direct under §
14-143-124(a)(1); and
(3) Used for the purposes and the implementation of the powers
authorized under this chapter.

SECTION 130. Arkansas Code § 14-164-314 is amended to read as follows:
742 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
14-164-314. Bonds generally — Execution.
The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq., as that act
may be amended.

SECTION 131. Arkansas Code § 14-164-402(12)(A), concerning the
facilities included in the definition of "performance-based efficiency
project" to be used under the Local Government Capital Improvement Revenue
Bond Act of 1985, is amended to read as follows:
(A) A new facility that is designed to reduce the
consumption of energy or natural resources or results in operating cost
savings as a result of changes that:
(i) Do not degrade the level of service or working
conditions;
(ii) Are measurable and verifiable under the
International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol, promulgated
by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission in the rules
required under § 19-11-1207 19-68-301; and
(iii) Are measured and verified by an audit
performed by an independent engineer or by a qualified efficiency engineering
company, including the vendor providing the performance-based efficiency
project; or

SECTION 132. Arkansas Code § 14-164-410 is amended to read as follows:
14-164-410. Bonds — Execution.
The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq., as that act
may be amended.

SECTION 133. Arkansas Code § 14-164-419 is amended to read as follows:
14-164-419. Contract requirements.
(a) All services provided by a qualified efficiency engineer in
completing a performance-based efficiency project pursuant to a qualified
efficiency contract, including, but not limited to, the procurement of any
goods and services in connection with the performance-based efficiency
project, shall be considered professional services under § 19-11-801 19-65-
743 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
101 et seq.
(b) An issuer's engagement of a qualified efficiency engineering
company and execution of a qualified efficiency contract in favor of a
qualified efficiency engineering company shall be subject to § 19-11-801 19-
65-101 et seq., but shall be exempt from all competitive bidding statutes,
including, but not limited to, § 14-43-601 et seq., § 14-47-101 et seq., §
14-48-101 et seq., § 14-54-301 et seq., § 14-54-401 et seq., § 14-58-301 et
seq., § 14-141-101 et seq., the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., § 19-11-101 19-60-101 et seq., § 22-1-201 et seq.,
the Building Authority Division Act, § 22-2-101 et seq., § 22-3-202 et seq.,
§ 22-4-101 et seq., § 22-5-101 et seq., § 22-6-101 et seq., § 22-7-101 et
seq., § 22-8-101 et seq., and § 22-9-101 et seq.

SECTION 134. Arkansas Code § 14-164-514(b), concerning the execution
of bonds and coupons under the Economic and Industrial Development Revenue
Bond Law of 1985, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the
Registered Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq.,
as that act may be amended.

SECTION 135. Arkansas Code § 14-164-803(4)(A), concerning the
facilities included in the definition of "energy efficiency project" to be
used under the Local Government Energy Efficiency Project Bond Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(A) A new facility that is designed to reduce the
consumption of energy or natural resources or result in operating cost
savings as a result of changes that:
(i) Do not degrade the level of service or working
conditions;
(ii) Are measurable and verifiable under the
International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol, promulgated
by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission in the rules
required under § 19-11-1207 19-68-301; and
(iii) Are measured and verified by an audit
performed by an independent engineer or by a qualified provider, including
the vendor providing the energy efficiency project; or
744 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 136. Arkansas Code § 14-164-803(11), concerning the
definitions to be used under the Local Government Energy Efficiency Project
Bond Act, is amended to read as follows:
(11) “Qualified provider” means the same as defined in § 19-11-
1202 19-68-102.

SECTION 137. Arkansas Code § 14-164-812 is amended to read as follows:
14-164-812. Bonds — Execution.
Bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered Public
Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq.

SECTION 138. Arkansas Code § 14-164-821 is amended to read as follows:
14-164-821. Rules.
A municipality or county may provide by ordinance that the municipality
or county shall comply with the rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission under § 19-11-1207 19-68-301.

SECTION 139. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 168, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-7-901 — 19-7-910:
Subchapter 4 — Resettlement or Rural Rehabilitation Projects

14-168-401. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Agreement” means a contract and shall include renewals and
alterations of the contract;
(2) “County judge” means the county judge of any county in this
state;
(3) “Fund” means, unless otherwise expressed, the government
project fund established pursuant to § 14-168-406;
(4) “Governing body” means the board, body, or persons in which
the powers of a political subdivision as body corporate, or otherwise, are
vested;
(5) “Political subdivision” means any agency or unit of this
state which is authorized to levy taxes or empowered to cause taxes to be
levied;
745 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(6) “Project” means any resettlement project or rural
rehabilitation project for resettlement purposes of the United States located
within a political subdivision and shall include the persons inhabiting such
a project; and
(7) “Service” means such public and municipal functions
performed for property in and persons residing within a political
subdivision.

14-168-402. Agreements for payments by United States in lieu of taxes.
(a) The county judge of any county in this state is authorized and
empowered to make requests of the United States, for and on behalf of the
county and the political subdivisions whose jurisdictional limits are within
or coextensive with the limits of the county, for the payment of such sums in
lieu of taxes as the United States may agree to pay. The county judge may
enter into agreements with the United States in the name of the county for
the performance of services by the county and such political subdivisions for
the benefit of the project and for the payment by the United States to the
county, in one (1) or more installments, of such sums in lieu of taxes.
(b) Each political subdivision shall participate in such funds in
proportion to the prevailing local tax involved on such property.

14-168-403. Determination of payment amounts.
The amount of any payment of sums in lieu of taxes may be based on the
estimated cost to each political subdivision, for and on whose behalf the
agreement is entered into, of performing services for the benefit of a
project during the period of the agreement after taking into consideration
the benefits to be derived by the subdivision from the project. However,
these sums shall not be in excess of the taxes which would result to the
subdivision for the period if the real property of the project within the
subdivision were taxable.

14-168-404. Contents of agreement.
Each agreement entered into pursuant to § 14-168-402 shall contain the
names of the political subdivisions with respect to which it is consummated
and a statement of the proportionate share of the payment by the United
States to which each subdivision shall be entitled.
746 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

14-168-405. Duplicate copies of agreement.
(a) The county judge shall prepare duplicate copies of each agreement
for payment of sums in lieu of taxes and file one (1) with the county
treasurer and one (1) with the clerk of the county court.
(b) The clerk of the county court shall notify each political
subdivision, for and on whose behalf the agreement is executed, that it has
been consummated and shall state the share of the payment due under it to
which the subdivision is entitled.
(c) On or before the date on which any payment of sums in lieu of
taxes is due, the county treasurer shall present a bill to the United States,
in the name of the county, in the amount of such payment. The county
treasurer shall give to the United States a receipt in the name of the county
for all payments of sums in lieu of taxes.

14-168-406. Government project fund of county.
(a) The county treasurer shall establish a fund in the county treasury
to be known as the “government project fund”. The fund shall contain an
account with each political subdivision which is entitled to a share of a
payment in lieu of taxes.
(b) Whenever payment is received, the county treasurer shall, without
any deduction, apportion it to the several accounts in the fund pursuant to
the agreement under which the payment is made.

14-168-407. Statement of apportionment — Distribution of funds.
(a) After apportioning any payments to the several accounts, as
provided in § 14-168-406, the county treasurer shall prepare, in duplicate, a
complete itemized statement of the apportionment, one (1) copy of which shall
be filed with the county judge and the other filed with the clerk of the
county court.
(b)(1) The county judge, by appropriate resolution, shall order the
distribution of each subdivision's share of sums in lieu of taxes to the
several subdivisions entitled to a share.
(2) The clerk of the county court shall thereupon draw warrants
upon the county treasurer to the order of the political subdivisions entitled
to a share of such payment of sums in lieu of taxes.
747 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) Whenever such warrant is presented to the county treasurer,
he or she shall debit the proper account in the fund and shall pay
immediately the amount of such warrant in full, without any deduction, to the
political subdivision presenting it, notwithstanding any law providing the
order in which warrants shall be paid.
(4) The county treasurer shall not honor such warrant unless it
is countersigned by the presiding officer of the governing body of the
political subdivision.
(c)(1) The acceptance by a political subdivision of any warrant
delivered pursuant to this section shall be considered as an approval of the
agreement under which the payment was received.
(2) If any governing body of a political subdivision shall
refuse to receive any warrant delivered pursuant to this section, the amount
thereof shall be refunded by the county to the United States.

14-168-408. Right of political subdivision to request payment.
(a) If the United States declines to deal with a county judge with
respect to any political subdivision whose jurisdictional limits are within
or coextensive with the limits of the county, or in the event the
jurisdictional limits of a political subdivision lie in more than one (1)
county, then that subdivision is authorized to make request of the United
States for the payment of such sums in lieu of taxes as the United States may
agree to pay. The subdivision is empowered to enter into agreements with the
United States for the performance by the subdivision of services for the
benefit of a project, and for the payment by the United States to the
subdivision, in one (1) or more installments, of sums in lieu of taxes.
(b) The amount of the payment may be based upon the cost of performing
the services during the period of the agreement, after taking into
consideration the benefits to be derived by the subdivision from the project,
but shall not be in excess of the taxes which would result to the political
subdivision during the period if the real property of the project within the
political subdivision were taxable.
(c) Whenever any payment is received by a subdivision under an
agreement entered into pursuant to this section, the governing body of the
subdivision shall issue a receipt of the payment to the United States.

748 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
14-168-409. Disposition of funds.
(a) All moneys received by a political subdivision pursuant to § 14-
168-407 or § 14-168-408 shall be deposited into such funds or items of a fund
as may be designated in the agreement.
(b) If the agreement does not make such designation, the moneys shall
be deposited into such funds or items of a fund as the governing body of the
subdivision shall, by appropriate resolution, direct.

14-168-410. Services of subdivision not to be denied.
In the absence of an agreement for payment of sums in lieu of taxes by
the United States as provided in this subchapter, no provision of this
subchapter shall be construed to relieve any political subdivision of this
state of the duty of furnishing for the benefit of a project all services
which the subdivision usually furnishes for the property in, and persons
residing within, the subdivision without a payment of sums in lieu of taxes.

SECTION 140. Arkansas Code § 14-217-113 is amended to read as follows:
14-217-113. Refunding bonds.
Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under
this chapter. Refunding bonds may be either sold or delivered in exchange for
the bonds being refunded. If sold, the proceeds may be either applied to
payment of the bonds being refunded or deposited in trust and applied as
provided by § 19-9-301 19-6-301.

SECTION 141. Arkansas Code § 14-233-109(b)(3)(B), concerning bonds
issued and sold under the Joint County and Municipal Solid Waste Disposal
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The provisions of the Revenue Bond Act of 1987, § 19-
9-601 19-6-601 et seq., do not apply to this section.

SECTION 142. Arkansas Code § 14-234-120(a), concerning the filing of
the audit report required for entities receiving fees from customers for
providing sewage services, is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “turnback funds” means:
(1) General revenue turnback funds, as defined in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.; and
749 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Highway revenue turnback funds, as distributed under § 27-
70-207.

SECTION 143. Arkansas Code § 14-262-104(i), concerning the county
health officer, is amended to read as follows:
(i) When performing official duties, a county health officer is immune
from civil suit and liability in the same manner officers and employees of
the State of Arkansas are immune under § 19-10-305 25-44-305 and Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 20.

SECTION 144. Arkansas Code § 14-284-403(a)(1), concerning the
apportionment of funds derived from insurance premium taxes, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) These premium tax moneys are assessed for disbursement from the
Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund, § 19-6-468 19-43-256, by the Department of
Finance and Administration to the counties in the following percentages:
Arkansas County — 0.78%, Ashley County — 1.39%, Baxter
County — 1.78%, Benton County — 3.86%, Boone County — 1.46%, Bradley County —
0.52%, Calhoun County — 0.51%, Carroll County — 0.97%, Chicot County — 0.51%,
Clark County — 1.13%, Clay County — 1.10%, Cleburne County — 1.11%, Cleveland
County — 0.66%, Columbia County — 1.24%, Conway County — 1.04%, Craighead
County — 2.91%, Crawford County — 1.98%, Crittenden County — 1.32%, Cross
County — 0.84%, Dallas County — 0.45%, Desha County — 0.71%, Drew County —
0.80%, Faulkner County — 2.30%, Franklin County — 0.97%, Fulton County —
0.84%, Garland County — 3.12%, Grant County — 1.13%, Greene County — 1.39%,
Hempstead County — 1.89%, Hot Spring County — 1.46%, Howard County — 0.75%,
Independence County — 1.90%, Izard County — 0.91%, Jackson County — 0.95%,
Jefferson County — 2.32%, Johnson County — 1.05%, Lafayette County — 0.71%,
Lawrence County — 0.96%, Lee County — 0.73%, Lincoln County — 1.12%, Little
River County — 0.77%, Logan County — 1.06%, Lonoke County — 1.70%, Madison
County — 0.95%, Marion County — 1.00%, Miller County — 1.44%, Mississippi
County — 1.77%, Monroe County — 0.53%, Montgomery County — 0.66%, Nevada
County — 0.58%, Newton County — 0.67%, Ouachita County — 1.37%, Perry County
— 0.62%, Phillips County — 1.12%, Pike County — 0.87%, Poinsett County —
1.14%, Polk County — 1.01%, Pope County — 1.73%, Prairie County — 0.83%,
Pulaski County — 5.99%, Randolph County — 0.96%, St. Francis County — 1.45%,
750 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Saline County — 3.00%, Scott County — 0.59%, Searcy County — 0.73%, Sebastian
County — 2.06%, Sevier County — 0.82%, Sharp County — 1.30%, Stone County —
0.77%, Union County — 2.01%, Van Buren County — 1.18%, Washington County —
3.46%, White County — 2.71%, Woodruff County — 0.47%, and Yell County —
1.11%.

SECTION 145. Arkansas Code § 15-3-503(b)(2), concerning advice and
recommendations provided by the Board of Directors of the Division of Science
and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) For funds in or allocated to the Arkansas Acceleration Fund,
§ 19-5-1243 19-27-298, the board shall make recommendations to the commission
regarding the allocation or reallocation of funds and moneys for programs and
initiatives authorized by the:
(A) Arkansas Research Alliance Act, § 15-3-301 et seq.;
(B) Innovate Arkansas Fund, § 19-5-1237 19-27-292;
(C) Venture Capital Investment Act of 2001, § 15-5-1401 et
seq.;
(D) Supplemental science, technology, engineering, and
math fund grants under § 6-17-2701 et seq.;
(E) Existing programs of the commission authorized under §
15-3-101 et seq., § 15-3-201 et seq., and § 15-3-401 et seq.;
(F) [Repealed.]
(G) Any other programs or activities aimed at the creation
of knowledge-based and high-technology jobs;
(H) Arkansas Business and Technology Accelerator Act, §
15-3-601 et seq.; and
(I) Arkansas Small Business Innovation Research Matching
Grant Program, § 15-3-701 et seq.

SECTION 146. Arkansas Code § 15-4-219(1)(A), concerning the
information required to be included in the annual report by the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission on the commission's work, is amended to read
as follows:
(A) Each project that was offered incentives in the
previous calendar year, including without limitation:
751 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(i) The number of jobs proposed by each project;
(ii) For each job creation project that receives
funds from the Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund under
§ 19-5-1231 19-27-287, an indication of whether each project contains a
repayment requirement;
(iii)(a) Each project that received funds from the
Economic Development Incentive Quick Action Closing Fund under § 19-5-1231
19-27-287.
(b) The information reported in subdivision
(1)(A)(iii)(a) of this section and any other related information shall be
made available to the Office of Economic and Tax Policy upon request;
(iv) The location of each project; and
(v) The specific incentives offered by the
commission;

SECTION 147. Arkansas Code § 15-4-315 is amended to read as follows:
15-4-315. Small procurements.
To assist the state in ensuring that the percentages of the total
amount expended in state-funded and state-directed public construction
programs and procurement of commodities and services for the state each
fiscal year under § 15-4-302 are paid to minority business enterprises and
women-owned business enterprises under this subchapter, a procurement that
does not exceed two (2) times the amount stated in § 19-11-204(13) 19-61-
501(13) may be procured without seeking competitive bids or competitive
sealed bids if the procurement is with a certified minority business
enterprise or certified women-owned business enterprise.

SECTION 148. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3003(7), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Arkansas General Obligation Economic Development
Superprojects Bond and Project Funding Act, is amended to read as follows:
(7) “General revenues” means the revenues described and
enumerated in § 19-6-201 19-41-201 et seq., or in any successor law;

SECTION 149. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3003(20), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Arkansas General Obligation Economic Development
Superprojects Bond and Project Funding Act, is amended to read as follows:
752 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(20) “State Apportionment Fund” means the fund by that name
created by § 19-5-201 19-21-101 or any successor law; and

SECTION 150. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3005(e)(1), concerning the State of
Arkansas Economic Development General Obligation Bonds, is amended to read as
follows:
(e)(1) Upon receipt of the plan, the Governor shall confer with the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State concerning whether, after utilization of
the balance in the Economic Development Superprojects Project Fund, any
amount of general revenues will be required to be set aside for payment of
debt service requirements in connection with the bonds during either year of
the fiscal biennium in which the bonds are to be issued and, if any general
funds are required to be used, whether such a use would cause an undue
hardship upon any agency or program supported from the general revenues under
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 151. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3202(10), concerning the definitions
to be used under the Arkansas Amendment 82 Implementation Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(10) “General revenues” means the revenues of the state
described and enumerated in § 19-6-201 19-41-201 or in any successor law;

SECTION 152. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3203(e), concerning Amendment 82
project qualification, is amended to read as follows:
(e) If the authority's initial assessment is that Amendment 82 bond
financing for the proposed project is feasible, the authority shall notify
the commission, and the commission shall refer the proposal and the findings
of the commission and the authority to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
for review of the impact of the proposed Amendment 82 bond financing on any
agency or program supported from the general revenues under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 153. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3224(d), concerning the public
reporting requirements under the Arkansas Amendment 82 Implementation Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(d) While Amendment 82 bonds are outstanding, the Arkansas Development
753 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Finance Authority shall provide a report to the Legislative Council, no less
frequently than annually, with respect to the status of the Amendment 82
bonds. The report shall contain the information required by § 19-9-502 19-6-
502.

SECTION 154. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3609(a), concerning the refundable
performance fee under the New Markets Jobs Act of 2013, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) A qualified community development entity that seeks to have an
equity investment or long-term debt security designated as a qualified equity
investment eligible for a tax credit under this subchapter shall pay a fee in
the amount one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the amount of the equity
investment or long-term debt security requested to be designated as a
qualified equity investment to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
for deposit into the New Markets Performance Guarantee Fund, § 19-5-1254 19-
27-309.

SECTION 155. Arkansas Code § 15-5-905(b), concerning federal grants
deposited into the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 19-6-108 and 19-6-601 19-40-
108 and 19-45-201, grants received by the Treasurer of State from the federal
government United States Government for deposit into the fund are declared to
be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and are to be used solely
as authorized in this subchapter.

SECTION 156. Arkansas Code § 15-5-908 is amended to read as follows:
15-5-908. Withholding general revenue turnback.
(a) Should any city, town, county, or political subdivision receiving
general revenue turnback funds, as defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law,
§ 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., fail, neglect, or refuse to pay any installment
of principal, interest, or financing fee for a period of more than ninety
(90) calendar days past the due date in accordance with the written
instrument for the repayment of its bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness purchased with moneys in the Construction Assistance Revolving
Loan Fund Account, the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, after
754 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
notification to the city, town, county, or political subdivision, may certify
to the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State the name of the city, town, county, or political subdivision,
the amount of deficiencies ninety (90) days or more past due.
(b) Upon certification, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State,
and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State are directed to withhold from the
city's, town's, county's, or other political subdivision's share of general
revenue turnback, as the share is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the amount certified as due and to transfer the
amount to the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund Account and the
Construction Assistance Administrative Account as follows:
(1) Amounts withheld as fees shall be transferred to the
Construction Assistance Administrative Account; and
(2) Amounts withheld as principal and interest shall be
transferred to the Construction Assistance Revolving Loan Fund Account.

SECTION 157. Arkansas Code § 15-5-1507(b), concerning the allocation
from the Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund by the Treasurer of State, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 19-6-108 and 19-6-601 19-40-
108 and 19-45-201, federal or state grants received by the Treasurer of State
for purposes authorized under this subchapter are declared to be cash funds
to be used solely as authorized under this subchapter.

SECTION 158. Arkansas Code § 15-11-803(e)(2)(A), concerning
eligibility for the Arkansas Great Places Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(B) of this
section, as a condition of participating in the program, an eligible
organization shall pledge matching funds from nongovernmental sources in the
following amounts:
(i) An eligible organization located in a county
with a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) residents shall
pledge at least ten percent (10%) of the total amount of funding requested
from the Arkansas Great Places Program Fund, § 19-5-1245 19-27-301;
(ii) An eligible organization located in a county
755 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
with a population of at least twenty thousand (20,000) but less than fifty
thousand (50,000) residents shall pledge at least twenty percent (20%) of the
total amount of funding requested from the fund; and
(iii) An eligible organization located in a county
with a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more residents shall pledge
at least thirty percent (30%) of the total amount of funding requested from
the fund.

SECTION 159. Arkansas Code § 15-20-208(a), concerning the failure to
repay a loan or fee due to the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) Should any city, town, county, or political subdivision receiving
general revenue turnback funds, as defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law,
§ 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., fail, neglect, or refuse to pay for a period of
more than ninety (90) days past the due date of any loan payment or fee due
the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, pursuant to:
(1) Any or all of the following statutes:
(A) The Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 1987, § 15-22-701 et seq.;
(B) The Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Finance Act, §
15-22-801 et seq.;
(C) The Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981,
§ 15-22-601 et seq.;
(D) The Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste Management Systems
Finance Act of 1975, § 14-230-101 et seq.; and
(E) The Arkansas Water Development Fund, § 15-22-507;
(2) Rules promulgated or agreements entered pursuant to any of
the statutes referred to in subdivision (a)(1) of this section; or
(3) Fail to negotiate repayment of loans made pursuant to the
statutes referred to in subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
the commission, after notification to the city, town, county, or
political subdivision, may certify that amount of deficiencies to the
Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State.

SECTION 160. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1302(8), concerning the definitions
756 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
to be used under the Arkansas Water, Waste Disposal, and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 2007, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “General revenues of the state” means the revenues described
and enumerated in § 19-6-201 19-41-201 of the Revenue Classification Law, §
19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq., or in any successor law;

SECTION 161. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1303(c)(2)(A), concerning the
Governor's duties upon receipt of the written plan required to be submitted
by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission before the commission issues
bonds, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Confer with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
concerning whether the annual amount of general revenue funds required to be
set aside from the general revenues of the state under the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., for payment of debt service
requirements in connection with the bonds during either year of the fiscal
biennium in which the bonds are to be issued would require moneys from the
general revenues of the state that would work undue hardship upon any agency
or program supported from the general revenues of the state under the
provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.;
and

SECTION 162. Arkansas Code § 15-21-504(j)(2)(A), concerning the
duties, responsibilities, and authority of the Arkansas Geographic
Information Systems Board, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Agreements will be interagency service agreements and are
exempt from the provisions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-
61-101 et seq., and rules.

SECTION 163. Arkansas Code § 15-21-506(a), concerning the procurement
procedure to be used by the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office
with respect to procuring services related to framework data, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “technical and general services” means
the same as defined in § 19-11-203 19-61-103.

SECTION 164. Arkansas Code § 15-22-607(b), concerning bonds issued by
757 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission under the Arkansas Water Resources
Development Act of 1981, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon receipt of the plan, the Governor shall confer with the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State concerning whether the annual amount of general
revenue funds required to be set aside from the general revenues, as such a
term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq., for payment of debt service requirements in connection with the bonds
during either year of the fiscal biennium in which the bonds are to be
issued, would require moneys from the general revenues for allocation that
would work undue hardship upon any agency or program supported from general
revenues under the provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 165. Arkansas Code § 15-22-615(b), concerning bonds issued
under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The bonds shall be payable from the general revenues of the state
as that term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law of Arkansas, § 19-5-
101 19-20-101 et seq., and the amount of general revenues as is necessary is
pledged to the payment of debt service on the bonds, and shall be and remain
pledged for those purposes.

SECTION 166. Arkansas Code § 15-22-616(a)(2), concerning the payment
of debt service under the Arkansas Water Resources Development Act of 1981,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Treasurer of State shall make monthly transfers from the
State Apportionment Fund to the Water Resources Development Bond Fund to
provide for payment of all or part of the debt service on the bonds issued
under this subchapter, of that amount of general revenues for allocation, as
such a term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101
et seq., as shall be required to pay the maturing debt service on bonds
issued under this subchapter.

SECTION 167. Arkansas Code § 15-22-707(b), concerning bonds issued
under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Financing Act of 1987, is amended to read as follows:
758 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(b) Upon receipt of the written plan, the Governor shall confer with
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State concerning whether the annual amount of
general revenue funds required to be set aside from the general revenues, as
that term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101
et seq., for payment of debt service requirements in connection with the
bonds during either year of the fiscal biennium in which the bonds are to be
issued would require moneys from the general revenues for allocation that
would work undue hardship upon any agency or program supported from general
revenues under the provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 168. Arkansas Code § 15-22-714(b), concerning bonds issued
under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement Facilities
Financing Act of 1987, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The bonds shall be payable from the general revenues of the state
as that term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-
101 et seq., and such amount of general revenues as is necessary is pledged
to the payment of debt service on the bonds and shall be and remain pledged
for that purpose.

SECTION 169. Arkansas Code § 15-22-715(a)(2), concerning the payment
of debt service under the Arkansas Waste Disposal and Pollution Abatement
Facilities Financing Act of 1987, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The Treasurer of State shall then make monthly transfers
from the State Apportionment Fund to the Waste Disposal and Pollution
Abatement Facilities Bond Fund of such amount of general revenues for
allocation, as that term is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-
101 19-20-101 et seq., as shall be required to pay the maturing debt service
on bonds issued under this subchapter.

SECTION 170. Arkansas Code § 15-22-808(a), concerning the Arkansas
Water Resources Cost Share Revolving Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas Water Resources Cost Share Revolving Fund created
under § 19-5-1042 19-27-233 is a depository for funds which may be
appropriated or otherwise secured for cost-sharing with the federal
government United States Government in local water resources development
759 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
projects under this subchapter.

SECTION 171. Arkansas Code § 15-22-1108(a), concerning federal grants
deposited into the Safe Drinking Water Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 19-6-108 and 19-6-601 19-40-
108 and 19-45-201, grants to the state received by the Treasurer of State
from the federal government United States Government for deposit into the
Safe Drinking Water Fund are declared to be cash funds restricted in their
use and dedicated to be used solely as authorized in this subchapter.

SECTION 172. Arkansas Code § 15-22-1110 is amended to read as follows:
15-22-1110. Withholding general revenue turnback.
(a) Should any city, town, county, or political subdivision receiving
general revenue turnback funds as defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., fail, neglect, or refuse to pay any installment
of principal, interest, or financing fee for a period of more than ninety
(90) days past the due date in accordance with the written instrument for the
repayment of its bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness purchased
with moneys in the Drinking Water State Revolving Loan Fund Account, the
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission after notification to the city, town,
county, or political subdivision may certify to the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the name of the
city, town, county, or political subdivision and the amount of deficiencies
ninety (90) days or more past due.
(b) Upon certification, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State,
and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State are directed to withhold from the
city's, town's, county's, or other political subdivision's share of general
revenue turnback as the share is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the amount so certified as due and to transfer
the amount to the Drinking Water State Revolving Loan Fund Account and the
Drinking Water State Administrative Account as follows:
(1) Amounts withheld as fees shall be transferred to the
Drinking Water State Administrative Account; and
(2) Amounts withheld as principal and interest shall be
transferred to the Drinking Water State Revolving Loan Fund Account.

760 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 173. Arkansas Code § 15-22-1301(1)(D), concerning revenue
bonds issued by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission to provide moneys
for certain funds, is amended to read as follows:
(D) Water, Sewer, and Solid Waste Systems Revolving Fund
established by § 19-5-310 19-22-108; and

SECTION 174. Arkansas Code § 15-22-1313 is amended to read as follows:
15-22-1313. Withholding general revenue turnback.
(a) Should any city, town, county, or political subdivision receiving
general revenue turnback funds as defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., fail, neglect, or refuse to pay any installment
of principal, interest, or financing fee for a period of more than ninety
(90) days past the due date in accordance with the written instrument for the
repayment of its bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness purchased
by the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission with proceeds of the
commission's bonds issued under this subchapter, after notification to the
city, town, county, or political subdivision, the commission may certify to
the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State the:
(1) Name of the city, town, county, or political subdivision;
and
(2) Amount of deficiencies ninety (90) days or more past due.
(b) Upon certification, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State,
and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State are directed to withhold from the
city's, town's, county's, or other political subdivision's share of general
revenue turnback as the share is defined in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the amount so certified as due the commission and
to transfer the amount as directed by the commission for use as provided by
law.

SECTION 175. Arkansas Code § 15-31-115 is amended to read as follows:
15-31-115. Classification of revenues.
Income derived from management of state forests by the Arkansas
Forestry Commission and income derived from management of state nurseries by
the commission shall be classified as special revenues under the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq.
761 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 176. Arkansas Code § 15-41-110(a), concerning interest earned
on game and fish funds, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Treasurer of State shall on the second business day that the
State Treasury is open after the twenty-fifth day of the month compute the
balance of the Game Protection Fund or any other funds administered by the
Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission during the preceding month. The
Treasurer of State shall transfer on that day to the Game Protection Fund
interest on the balances to be computed as authorized under § 19-3-518(d)(4)
19-3-318(d)(4).

SECTION 177. Arkansas Code § 16-10-143(a), concerning contracts by the
Administrative Office of the Courts with qualified attorneys, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “qualified attorney” means an attorney
who:
(1) Has previously been employed as an attorney by the state
regardless of the limitation provided under § 19-11-709(d) 19-64-206(d); or
(2) Is currently serving as a part-time public defender or is
otherwise employed by the state as an attorney on a part-time basis.

SECTION 178. Arkansas Code § 16-10-305(g), concerning court costs, is
amended to read as follows:
(g) For each conviction for an offense under § 5-26-301 et seq., an
additional court cost of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be assessed and
remitted to the Administration of Justice Funds Section by the court clerk
for deposit into the Domestic Peace Fund, § 19-6-491 19-43-272.

SECTION 179. Arkansas Code § 16-10-313 is amended to read as follows:
16-10-313. Support for State Crime Laboratory.
Notwithstanding §§ 16-10-306, 16-10-307, 16-10-603, 16-10-604, and 19-
5-993 19-26-275 or any other law to the contrary, twenty-five dollars
($25.00) of the uniform filing fee collected in circuit court under § 21-6-
403(b)(1) shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to
the credit of the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, there to be used
solely for the operations and support of the State Crime Laboratory. These
762 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
moneys shall be in addition to all other sources of funding for the State
Crime Laboratory and shall not be used to supplant any other source of
funding for the State Crime Laboratory.

SECTION 180. Arkansas Code § 16-10-314(a), concerning support for
Arkansas publicly funded law schools, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding §§ 16-10-306, 16-10-307, 16-10-603, 16-10-604, and
19-5-993 19-26-275 or any other law to the contrary, fifteen dollars ($15.00)
of the uniform filing fee collected in circuit court under § 21-6-403(b)(1)
shall be deposited as follows:

SECTION 181. Arkansas Code § 16-13-501(b), concerning court reporters
as state employees, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The Administrative Office of the Courts may employ or contract
with a court reporter previously employed by the state for services provided
at any time after his or her separation from state employment, regardless of
a limitation otherwise provided under § 19-11-709(d) 19-64-206(d).

SECTION 182. Arkansas Code § 16-17-108(a)(50)(D), concerning salaries
of personnel and other requirements of Sebastian County District Court, is
amended to read as follows:
(D) The Sebastian County District Court Judge — Greenwood
District shall be bonded in accordance with §§ 19-1-401 — 19-1-403 19-1-301 —
19-1-303;

SECTION 183. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1104(b), concerning the salaries of
state district court judges, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The salaries of the state district court judges are uniform and
shall be paid with moneys appropriated from the Constitutional Officers Fund,
§ 19-5-205 19-21-105, by the General Assembly.

SECTION 184. Arkansas Code § 17-12-502(h), concerning continuing
education requirements for certified public accountants, is amended to read
as follows:
(h) The board in its discretion may require licensees to provide
evidence of compliance with the requirements of this section and may
763 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
investigate licensees to verify compliance with this section. All persons
acting on behalf of the board in connection with such investigations shall be
considered officers or employees of the State of Arkansas for purposes of:
(1) Immunity from civil liability pursuant to § 19-10-301 25-44-
301 et seq.; and
(2) Payment of actual damages on behalf of state officers or
employees pursuant to § 21-9-201 et seq.

SECTION 185. Arkansas Code § 17-12-507(d), concerning the quality
review by the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy of each practice
unit, is amended to read as follows:
(d) All persons acting on behalf of the board in a quality review
program under this section shall be considered officers or employees of the
State of Arkansas for purposes of:
(1) Immunity from civil liability pursuant to § 19-10-301 25-44-
301 et seq.; and
(2) Payment of actual damages on behalf of state officers or
employees pursuant to § 21-9-201 et seq.

SECTION 186. Arkansas Code § 17-13-110 is amended to read as follows:
17-13-110. Disposition of fees.
All fees collected by the State Plant Board under this chapter shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the
State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 187. Arkansas Code § 17-19-301(e)(3)(B)(ii), concerning the
nonrefundable fee collected by sheriffs for the Arkansas Public Defender
Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) The Arkansas Public Defender Commission shall
remit quarterly to each county treasurer the county's portion of the fee
collected under this section using the formula for the County Aid Fund under
§ 19-5-602 19-25-102.

SECTION 188. Arkansas Code § 17-87-808(a), concerning liability under
the Alternative to Discipline Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person acting on behalf of the Arkansas State Board of Nursing
764 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
in the alternative to discipline program under this section is considered an
officer or employee of the State of Arkansas for purposes of:
(1) Immunity from civil liability under § 19-10-301 25-44-301 et
seq.; and
(2) Payment of actual damages on behalf of state officers or
employees under § 21-9-201 et seq.

SECTION 189. Arkansas Code § 17-89-204(c), concerning financial
reporting and the disposition of funds by the Arkansas Board of Dispensing
Opticians, is amended to read as follows:
(c) There is created the Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians Fund
on the books of the Treasurer of State. All moneys collected by the board
shall be deposited as special revenues to the credit of that fund.

SECTION 190. Arkansas Code § 17-89-205 is amended to read as follows:
17-89-205. Refund to expenditure.
Fines collected by the Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians shall be
deposited into the Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians Fund in the State
Treasury as a refund to expenditure for the year in which the deposit is
made.

SECTION 191. Arkansas Code § 17-92-707(a), concerning liability under
the program for pharmacists impaired by chemical dependency, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) All persons acting on behalf of the Arkansas State Board of
Pharmacy in the impaired pharmacist program under this section shall be
considered officers or employees of the State of Arkansas for purposes of:
(1) Immunity from civil liability pursuant to § 19-10-301 25-44-
301 et seq.; and
(2) Payment of actual damages on behalf of state officers or
employees pursuant to § 21-9-201 et seq.

SECTION 192. Arkansas Code § 20-7-408(a)(2), concerning the
disposition of certain fees under the Department of Health Public Health
Laboratory Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(2) So long as the loan is outstanding, all moneys in the State
765 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Board of Health Laboratory Revenue Fund shall not be subject to the
provisions of §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, § 19-4-804 [repealed], § 19-4-805, and
§ 19-4-806 19-4-801 — 19-4-805 and shall be deposited, handled, and disbursed
as set forth in this subchapter.

SECTION 193. Arkansas Code § 20-7-410(b), concerning the investment of
funds under the Department of Health Public Health Laboratory Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) All moneys held in the State Board of Health Laboratory Revenue
Loan Fund shall be invested and reinvested to the extent feasible, as
directed by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, in securities which
are eligible for the securing of public deposits under § 19-8-203 19-5-203,
subject in all cases to the term of the loan and of bonds issued by the
authority.

SECTION 194. Arkansas Code § 20-8-302(a), concerning the use of funds
under the Great Strides Grant Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Health shall use funds from the Tobacco
Settlement Proceeds Act, § 19-12-101 19-90-101 et seq., to establish the
Great Strides Grant Program.

SECTION 195. Arkansas Code § 20-8-1002(a)(2)(A), concerning the
administration of the Life Choices Lifeline Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) The procurement of one (1) or more vendors to serve as
organizations shall be done through the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201
19-61-101 et seq., by the Office of State Procurement.

SECTION 196. Arkansas Code § 20-8-1003(a)(3), concerning the Continuum
of Care Program, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The procurement of a vendor shall be done through the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., by the Office of
State Procurement.

SECTION 197. Arkansas Code § 20-16-2405(a)(1), concerning the duties
of the Department of Human Services upon the effective date of the section
766 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
under the Every Mom Matters Act, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Contract with a number of agencies sufficient to ensure
that each pregnant woman seeking an abortion in Arkansas receives a resource
access assistance offer and has the opportunity to receive care plan
coordination services and healthy pregnancy program services.
(B) The procurement of a vendor to serve as an agency
shall be done through the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et
seq., by the Office of State Procurement;

SECTION 198. Arkansas Code § 20-20-225 is amended to read as follows:
20-20-225. Disposition of funds.
All moneys received by the State Plant Board under the provisions of
this subchapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter shall be
deposited into the State Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury and be used
for carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 199. Arkansas Code § 20-29-103(e)(2), concerning the
disposition of funds under the Arkansas Manufactured Home Recovery Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) For the purposes of investment, moneys invested and interest
earned thereon shall be administered as trust funds pursuant to the State
Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq.

SECTION 200. Arkansas Code § 20-45-202(a), concerning the duty of a
mental health services provider to take precautions against threatened
patient violence, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A mental health services provider, hospital, facility, community
mental health center, or clinic is not subject to liability, suit, or a claim
under § 19-10-204 25-44-204 on grounds that a mental health services provider
did not prevent harm to an individual or to property caused by a patient if:
(1) The patient communicates to the mental health services
provider an explicit and imminent threat to kill or seriously injure a
clearly or reasonably identifiable potential victim or to commit a specific
violent act or to destroy property under circumstances that could easily lead
to serious personal injury or death and the patient has an apparent intent
and ability to carry out the threat; and
767 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) The mental health services provider takes the precautions
specified in subsection (b) of this section in an attempt to prevent the
threatened harm.

SECTION 201. Arkansas Code § 20-45-202(d), concerning the duty of a
mental health services provider to take precautions against threatened
patient violence, is amended to read as follows:
(d) A mental health services provider, hospital, facility, community
mental health center, or clinic is not subject to liability, suit, or claim
under § 19-10-204 25-44-204 for disclosing a confidential communication made
by or relating to a patient if the patient has explicitly threatened to cause
serious harm to an individual or to property under circumstances that could
easily lead to serious personal injury or death or if the provider has a
reasonable belief that the patient poses a credible threat of serious harm to
an individual or to property.

SECTION 202. Arkansas Code § 20-46-302(c)(2), concerning the powers of
the Department of Human Services with respect to the regulation of community
mental health centers, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The restrictions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-
201 19-61-101 et seq.; the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §
19-4-101 et seq.; the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq.; and other fiscal control laws of the state, where applicable, and rules
promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by
law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of the funds.

SECTION 203. Arkansas Code § 20-61-101(d)(4)(C), concerning the
prohibition on the sale of foreign fish, is amended to read as follows:
(C) Any civil penalty collected under this section shall
be transmitted to the State Plant Board Fund.

SECTION 204. Arkansas Code § 20-61-203(a)(5)(C), concerning penalties
and injunctive relief under the Arkansas Catfish Marketing Act of 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
(C) Any civil penalty collected under this section shall
be transmitted to the State Plant Board Fund.
768 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 205. Arkansas Code § 20-76-303(2), concerning the powers and
duties of the State Department for Social Security Administration Disability
Determination and the Director of the State Department for Social Security
Administration Disability Determination, is amended to read as follows:
(2) To accept and deposit into the State Treasury any funds from
whatever source received and to withdraw therefrom such funds as may be
required to carry out its functions, powers, and duties and, with respect
thereto, to comply fully with the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-
101 et seq., and, where more restrictive, with the terms of any agreement
entered into with the secretary in relation to the use of any funds made
available to the State Department for Social Security Administration
Disability Determination by the United States, or by any department or agency
thereof. However, the State Department for Social Security Administration
Disability Determination shall not have the authority to commit this state,
either directly or indirectly, to the expenditure of any state funds in the
absence of specific authority granted by the General Assembly; and

SECTION 206. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-7-701 — 19-7-708:
Subchapter 9 — Title XX Social Security Funds

20-76-901. Contract services — Advance payment.
(a) In order to provide effective purchased services to the needy
citizens of Arkansas, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services is
authorized to pay one-twelfth (1/12) of the total amount of a Title XX
contract to the service provider on the effective date of the contract. The
amount of the advance payment shall be adjusted out of the reimbursement
actually earned by the provider during the contract period.
(b) This section will be used only after the secretary has conducted a
study of the financial condition of the contracting agency to determine if an
advance payment is necessary. If the advance is necessary, the secretary
shall forward his or her request and the reasons therefor to the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State for approval.
(c)(1) If the request is approved, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
769 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State shall loan the necessary amount to the appropriate fund accounts within
the Department of Human Services from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund.
(2) However, the balance of any loans made under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section during the course of a fiscal year shall be recovered
by the department and repaid to the fund by June 30 of that fiscal year.

20-76-902. Minimum program standards.
(a) In order to unify and consolidate standards for services of
clients under programs funded by Title XX Social Security funds, the
Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall establish, by July 1,
1980, minimum program standards for the services provided by all government
or private agencies under Title XX.
(b) In developing these standards, the secretary will consult with
such other agencies, organizations, or individuals as may be appropriate.
(c) These standards may be amended by the secretary from time to time,
provided that the terms of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., are complied with.

20-76-903. Loan provision.
(a) It is found and determined that the continued operations of the
Title XX Services Program of the Department of Human Services, in accordance
with the approved annual operations plan, are, from time to time, seriously
impaired by either administrative oversights and delays by the United States
Office of Grants Management or by the processes of federal fiscal year
conversion. It is further found and determined that such delays in the proper
preparation and transmittal of federal grant award authorizations and letter
of credit instruments have created unnecessary hardships on the providers of
services and the needy citizens of this state. Therefore, upon certification
of the pending availability of federal funding by the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may grant
temporary advances, the maximum amount not to exceed five million dollars
($5,000,000), from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the appropriate
account of the Department of Human Services so affected by such delays.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall recover within a
period of twenty (20) days such temporary advances upon receipt of the grant
award authorizations or letter of credit instruments.
770 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

20-76-904. Deduction of tax withholding for individual contract
providers.
(a) It is found and determined that certain rules and regulations of
the Social Security Administration and the Internal Revenue Service require
the deduction of Federal Insurance Contributions Act and federal income tax
withholding from persons providing services under individual purchase-of-
service contracts, who are in fact independent contractors, or employees of
the person receiving the service, and that there is presently no provision
for payment of Federal Insurance Contributions Act and federal income tax
withholding for these individuals. It is further found and determined that
the use of individual contracts is necessary to the operation of the Title
XIX and Title XX programs, particularly in the areas of day care and services
to the elderly. Therefore, whenever the regulations of the Social Security
Administration or the Internal Revenue Service require the deduction of
Federal Insurance Contributions Act or federal income tax withholding for an
individual providing services under a Title XX individual purchase-of-service
contract, the Department of Human Services may pay the necessary Federal
Insurance Contributions Act tax out of federal funds and state or local
donated matching funds and may collect the necessary Federal Insurance
Contributions Act and federal income tax withholding as agent for the client
receiving the services.
(b) Individuals for whom Federal Insurance Contributions Act tax is
paid and Federal Insurance Contributions Act and federal income tax
withholding is deducted under this section shall not be considered as
employees of the state for the purposes of determining eligibility for
unemployment compensation or workers' compensation, for the purpose of state
income tax withholding, or for any other purposes.

20-76-905. Use of funds.
The Secretary of the Department of Human Services is authorized to use
funds earned through service fees, audit settlements, or federal program
settlements for operation of the Title XX service program. Any unanticipated
federal funding received under this provision will be handled in accordance
with the terms of the Miscellaneous Federal Grant Act, § 19-7-301 et seq.

771 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
20-76-906. Transfer of funds and appropriations.
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, in
accordance with rules established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
shall have the authority to transfer funds and appropriations from the
appropriate division of the Department of Human Services to the various
agencies of the department which receive allotments of Title XX funds. These
transfers shall be limited to the allotment of funds available to each agency
within the department.
(2)(A) In the event that funds and appropriations transferred
under this section are not fully utilized, they will be available for
transfer back to the appropriate division of the department for reallocation.
(B) It is further intended that if transfer of
appropriations among line items appropriated to the appropriate division of
the department becomes necessary for effective operation of the program,
these shall be made in accordance with rules established by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State. However, no such transfer will be used to increase
authorization for regular salaries.
(b) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the secretary shall
cooperate to establish such fund accounts for deposit and disbursement of
federal and local Title XX funds as are necessary for the orderly operation
of a Title XX services program. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the
secretary shall establish procedures for the transfers of funds necessary to
make reimbursement to providers or to agency fund accounts in payment for
eligible services. These procedures will include provision for use of state
matching funds where appropriated by law.

20-76-907. Transfer of retirement benefits.
Any employee who is now a member of any retirement system shall not
lose any retirement benefits accrued in the system by the reorganization of
the Title XX service program. An employee so affected shall have the option
of continuing as a member of the retirement system of which the employee is a
member at the time of transfer or to join the retirement system for which the
transfer makes the employee eligible. However, the affected employee shall
make his or her election within six (6) months from the date of transfer.

20-76-908. Personnel transfers.
772 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
No employee transferred as a result of the reorganization of the Office
of Title XX Services shall lose status under the Arkansas Rules for Merit
Systems Administration as a result of transfer.

SECTION 207. Arkansas Code § 20-78-504(a)(1), concerning moneys for
the Arkansas Child Care Facilities Loan Guarantee Trust Fund, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) After providing for the exclusion of the interest income
classified as special revenues as authorized by §§ 15-41-110 and 27-70-204,
and for the first two million dollars ($2,000,000) of interest income
received each fiscal year by the Treasurer of State as authorized in § 15-5-
422, the next one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of interest income
received each fiscal year in the State Treasury beginning with the fiscal
year commencing July 1, 1989, and continuing as set forth in subsection (b)
of this section from the investment of state funds as authorized by the State
Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq., is declared to
constitute cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated to be used solely
as authorized in § 20-78-503.

SECTION 208. Arkansas Code § 21-1-402(a)(2)(B), concerning
restrictions on other employment by constitutional officers, is amended to
read as follows:
(B) Employment under this subdivision (a)(2) shall not be
approved if the employment will violate §§ 19-11-701 — 19-11-709 19-64-101 —
19-64-103 and §§ 19-64-201 — 19-64-206.

SECTION 209. Arkansas Code § 21-1-403(c), concerning restrictions on
lease agreements, contracts, and grants by constitutional officers, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Constitutional officers shall not enter into professional and
consultant services contracts with state agencies subject to §§ 19-11-1001 —
19-11-1011 19-67-101 — 19-67-104 and §§ 19-67-201 — 19-67-205.
(2) Any professional and consultant services contracts obtained
by constitutional officers or their spouses with any state agency exempt from
§§ 19-11-1001 — 19-11-1011 19-67-101 — 19-67-104 and §§ 19-67-201 — 19-67-205
must receive prior review of the Joint Budget Committee during legislative
773 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
sessions and the Legislative Council between legislative sessions.

SECTION 210. Arkansas Code § 21-1-610(e)(1), concerning the reward to
a state employee when communication of waste or violation results in the
savings of state funds, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) A state employee may appeal to the Arkansas State Claims
Commission in the same manner for filing a claim under § 19-10-208 25-44-208
if the state employee believes that:
(A) A report under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section
does not accurately reflect the savings attributable to the changes made
based on the communication under § 21-1-603; or
(B) The state employer did not accurately assess the
determination of a reward under this section, including without limitation
denying a reward to the state employee.

SECTION 211. Arkansas Code § 21-2-711(c)(1)(C), concerning the Self-
Insured Fidelity Bond Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(C) For the purposes of investment, fund moneys invested
and interest earned on fund moneys invested shall be administered as trust
funds under § 19-3-518 19-3-318.

SECTION 212. Arkansas Code § 21-5-224(a)(3), concerning extra help
positions under the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) Extra help employees of state agencies shall not exceed one
thousand five hundred (1,500) hours per fiscal year as set out in § 19-4-521
19-4-512.

SECTION 213. Arkansas Code § 21-5-404(10)(A), concerning the powers,
functions, and duties of the State Board of Finance, is amended to read as
follows:
(10)(A) To direct the office to contract with qualified vendors,
as defined by the board, offering the plan options under the program as
prescribed by the board without regard to § 19-11-228 19-61-502 or other
statutes requiring competitive bidding.

774 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 214. Arkansas Code § 21-5-423(a)(2), concerning the Public
School Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) An appointee under this section who has a conflict of
interest as described in § 19-11-718 19-64-503 is disqualified from serving
on the commission.

SECTION 215. Arkansas Code § 21-5-424(a)(2), concerning the State
Employee Health Benefit Advisory Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(2) An appointee under this section who has a conflict of
interest as described in § 19-11-718 19-64-503 is disqualified from serving
on the commission.

SECTION 216. Arkansas Code § 21-5-704(b)(2)(A), concerning the payment
of a claim to covered public employees, their designated beneficiaries, or
their survivors, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the funds shall not be reimbursed by transfer or charging the funds
against any state funds allocated for turnback to cities or counties or
distributed to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund or distributed to any Division of
Correction fund account or any other state department agency fund account
other than the Arkansas State Claims Commission fund accounts and the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund or state funds levied for firefighters, police
officers, employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation, and
employees of the Division of Correction for pension purposes.

SECTION 217. Arkansas Code § 21-6-302(b), concerning county
treasurers, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Unless otherwise provided under subdivision (f)(1) of this section
or subsection (g) of this section or under § 6-13-701, § 6-17-908, § 6-20-
221, § 8-15-111, § 14-90-913, § 14-174-109, § 14-284-403, or § 19-5-1096 19-
27-268, the county treasurers shall collect, as a treasurer's commission, two
percent (2%) on all funds coming into their hands as treasurers and to be
paid out of the respective funds.

775 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 218. Arkansas Code § 22-1-101(a)(1), concerning the
definitions used in relation to the sale of surplus commodities to not-for-
profit organizations, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Commodities” means commodities under § 19-11-203 19-61-103;
and

SECTION 219. Arkansas Code § 22-2-115(c), concerning lease-purchase
agreements under the Building Authority Division Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et
seq., the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., and other applicable
fiscal laws of this state shall be strictly complied with regarding this
section.

SECTION 220. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1212(a)(1), concerning certificates
of indebtedness under the Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983, is amended
to read as follows:
(a)(1) The state funds which may be used by the State Board of Finance
in making the purchases of the certificates of indebtedness are those
specifically referred to under the provisions of the State Treasury
Management Law, § 19-3-501 19-3-301 et seq.

SECTION 221. Arkansas Code § 22-3-1225(b)(1), concerning the Prison
Construction Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall pay from the
Prison Construction Trust Fund into the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund
created by §§ 19-5-932 19-26-224 and 22-3-1210 the amount necessary, when
added to other funds listed in § 22-3-1210, to pay the next-succeeding
principal and interest payment for the certificates of indebtedness, but not
to exceed twenty-five cents (25¢) times the number of annual license plate
validation decals sold by the Department of Finance and Administration in
each six-month period.

SECTION 222. Arkansas Code § 22-5-101(e), concerning the program for
growing pine on highway rights-of-way and the disposition of the proceeds, is
776 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
amended to read as follows:
(e) When a program authorized by this section is initiated, the net
proceeds derived from the sale of pine grown on the state highway rights-of-
way or other highway-related areas owned by the state or the department shall
be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues. Fifty percent (50%)
thereof shall be credited to the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, and fifty percent (50%) thereof
shall be credited to the State Forestry Fund.

SECTION 223. Arkansas Code § 22-6-601(j), concerning the sale
procedure for the sale of state lands, is amended to read as follows:
(j) Upon receipt thereof, the proceeds of the sale, including any
liquidated damages, shall be deposited into the State Treasury, as a
nonrevenue receipt, to the credit of the fund from which the state agency is
operated. Any unexpended balance of such proceeds remaining at the end of
each fiscal year as certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the
state agency director may be carried forward until the end of the biennium
following the biennium in which collected, after which any remaining balances
shall be subject to § 19-5-1004 19-27-204.

SECTION 224. Arkansas Code § 22-8-102(a)(3), concerning the
definitions used in relation to the leasing and renting of vehicles by state
agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “State agency” means the same as defined in § 19-11-203 19-
61-103.

SECTION 225. Arkansas Code § 22-8-102(e), concerning the leasing and
renting of vehicles by state agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(e) It is a violation of state procurement laws, Arkansas Code Title
19, Chapter 11 Subtitle 4, for a state agency official to conduct multiple
rentals of a motor vehicle to avoid the approval and review requirements of
this section.

SECTION 226. Arkansas Code § 22-8-203(5), concerning the definitions
used under the Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the State of
Arkansas, is amended to read as follows:
777 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(5) “State agency” means a state agency, board, commission,
department, or institution of higher education which derives any financial
support from the fund accounts enumerated in §§ 19-5-302 — 19-5-304, 19-5-
306, 19-5-307, 19-5-1011, 19-6-404, 19-6-411 19-22-102 — 19-22-104, 19-22-
106, 19-22-107, 19-27-211, 19-43-203, 19-43-210, and 25-4-117;

SECTION 227. Arkansas Code § 22-8-206(c)(1), concerning the purchase
of automobiles under the Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the
State of Arkansas, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund shall be financed
by its proportionate share of moneys made available from:
(A) The allocation of general revenues as authorized by
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.;
(B) Moneys made available upon the disposal of used
vehicles, which moneys shall be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle
Acquisition Revolving Fund rather than being deposited to the owning state
agency's fund;
(C) Deposits of moneys from benefitting state agencies;
and
(D) Transfers from other State Treasury funds and fund
accounts of benefitting state agencies.

SECTION 228. Arkansas Code § 22-8-207 is amended to read as follows:
22-8-207. Purchase from qualified vendors.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall
have the authority to purchase new or used vehicles from qualified vendors in
accordance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.

SECTION 229. Arkansas Code § 22-8-210(a), concerning motor vehicle
renovation under the Automobile and Pickup Truck Acquisition Act for the
State of Arkansas, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Funds deposited into the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund
created by § 19-5-1002(a) 19-27-202 and § 22-8-206(b), which may be made
available for the purchase of motor vehicles for the Division of Arkansas
State Police, may in addition be made available and used for expenses
associated with the renovation of state police motor vehicles.
778 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 230. Arkansas Code § 22-9-202(b)(2), concerning the
construction of certain statutes related to the award of contracts for public
works, is amended to read as follows:
(2) This section and §§ 22-9-203 and 22-9-204 do not prevent a
county government from separately procuring:
(A) Commodities in accordance with § 14-22-101 et seq.;
(B) Professional services in accordance with § 19-11-801
19-65-101 et seq.; or
(C) Construction work from one (1) or more separate
contractors under separate contract or invoice so that the work is not
included in calculating the bid requirement threshold of fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000).

SECTION 231. Arkansas Code § 22-9-904(e)(2), concerning the Public
Works Committee, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The individual members of the committee are immune to the
same extent as state employees under § 19-10-305 25-44-305.

SECTION 232. Arkansas Code § 22-9-906(a)(1), concerning the selection
of vendors under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Office of State Procurement shall select three (3) vendors
using the procedures for the procurement of professional services under § 19-
11-801 19-65-101 et seq.

SECTION 233. Arkansas Code § 22-9-909 is amended to read as follows:
22-9-909. Multiyear contracts.
A contract with a vendor under this subchapter is subject to the
restrictions of § 19-11-238 19-61-512.

SECTION 234. Arkansas Code § 22-10-301(b), concerning the procurement
requirements under the Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) In selecting a qualified respondent:
(1) Sections 19-11-801 19-65-101 et seq. apply;
779 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) Competitive bidding shall not be used; and
(3) The responsible public entity shall follow the procedure
established for the selection of a qualified respondent in the rules
promulgated under this chapter.

SECTION 235. Arkansas Code § 22-10-501(b)(2), concerning review and
approval of projects under the Partnership for Public Facilities and
Infrastructure Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Before execution of a comprehensive agreement, the
responsible public entity shall:
(A) Conduct a public hearing in accordance with the
requirements of § 19-9-607 19-6-607;
(B) Satisfy any requirements established by the rules
promulgated under this chapter; and
(C) After conducting a public hearing under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section and receiving approval of the proposed
comprehensive agreement under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section,
authorize the execution of the comprehensive agreement by order, ordinance,
or resolution at a public meeting that complies with § 25-19-106.

SECTION 236. Arkansas Code § 23-1-103(b)(4), concerning compliance
with Acts 1935, No. 324, and rules of Arkansas Public Service Commission and
penalties for noncompliance, is amended to read as follows:
(4) The proceeds from the civil sanctions imposed under this
subsection shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and
credited to the Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund.

SECTION 237. Arkansas Code § 23-1-114(c), concerning civil sanctions
for violation of Acts 1919, No. 571, and Acts 1921, No. 124, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) The proceeds from the civil sanctions imposed under this section
shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and credited
to the Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund.

SECTION 238. Arkansas Code § 23-4-202(c)(4), concerning rate schedules
for water, gas, or electricity, is amended to read as follows:
780 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(4) The proceeds from the civil sanctions imposed under this
section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and
credited to the Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund.

SECTION 239. Arkansas Code § 23-4-203(b)(4), concerning water, gas, or
electricity utility bills, is amended to read as follows:
(4) The proceeds from the civil sanctions imposed under this
section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and
credited to the Arkansas Public Service Commission Fund.

SECTION 240. Arkansas Code § 23-12-1005(b), concerning action on a
complaint for inadequate action or unreasonable refusal under the Railroad
Safety and Regulatory Act of 1993, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) If the state owns the highway where the questioned crossing is
located, all moneys recovered under the provisions of this section shall be
placed into the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund.
(2) All other moneys recovered under this section shall be
divided equally between the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund and the general, road, or highway
fund of the county or municipality which owns the highway, road, or street
where the questioned crossing is located.

SECTION 241. Arkansas Code § 23-12-1008(c), concerning action on a
complaint for unlawful delay under the Railroad Safety and Regulatory Act of
1993, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If the crossing where a violation occurs is located within the
boundaries of a city or town, one-half (½) of the moneys recovered under the
provisions of this section and §§ 23-12-1006 and 23-12-1007 shall be placed
in the general fund or street fund of the municipality and one-half (½) of
the funds shall be placed in the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.
(2) All other moneys recovered under the provisions of this
section shall be divided equally between the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund and the general road
fund of the county in which the violation occurred.
781 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 242. Arkansas Code § 23-13-265(g), concerning the requirement
that an exempt motor carrier possess an annual receipt, is amended to read as
follows:
(g) All fees received by the commission pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State and classified as
general revenues for distribution and usage as provided by the laws of this
state; provided, one and one-half percent (1.5%) of all the funds so
deposited shall be classified as special revenues and transferred by the
Treasurer of State on the last business day of each month in which they are
deposited to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund to be utilized by the Arkansas Department
of Transportation for the purpose of administering this subchapter.

SECTION 243. Arkansas Code § 23-13-604(b), concerning registration
fees for motor carriers engaged in interstate commerce, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) Upon receipt of the funds and if not prohibited by the Unified
Carrier Registration Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-59, § 4301 et seq., the
Treasurer of State shall:
(1) Deduct three percent (3%) of the funds as a charge by the
state for its services as specified in this section; and
(2) Credit the three percent (3%) to the Constitutional Officers
Fund and the State Central Services Fund, as defined in the Revenue
Classification Law, § 19-6-101 19-40-101 et seq., or to any successor State
Treasury fund or funds established by law to replace the Constitutional
Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund.

SECTION 244. Arkansas Code § 23-13-604(c)(1), concerning the
distribution of the net amount of registration fees for motor carriers
engaged in interstate commerce, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Transferred by the Treasurer of State on the last business
day of each month to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund; and

SECTION 245. Arkansas Code § 23-15-216 is amended to read as follows:
782 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
23-15-216. Disposition of funds.
On receipt of the fees, charges, and penalties provided for in this
subchapter, the secretary of the Arkansas Public Service Commission shall pay
the fees, charges, and penalties into the State Treasury. The amounts
received by the Treasurer of State shall be credited by him or her as special
revenues and designated as the “Arkansas Public Service Commission Utility
Safety Fund”, which will be a separate fund account established by the
Treasurer of State.

SECTION 246. Arkansas Code § 23-16-105(c), concerning the statement of
fees due from rail carriers and related charges and penalties, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) On receipt of the fees and charges provided for in this
subchapter, the department shall deposit the fees and charges with the
Treasurer of State, and the amount so received by the Treasurer of State
shall be classified by the Treasurer of State as special revenues and
transferred, by the Treasurer of State on the last business day of the month
such amounts are deposited, to the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, there, notwithstanding
the provisions of any law to the contrary, to be utilized by the department
for the purposes of administering the laws of this state which the State
Highway Commission and the department are responsible for administering with
regard to rail carriers and for the construction, reconstruction, and
maintenance of highways and bridges in the state highway system.

SECTION 247. Arkansas Code § 23-18-1205(a)(2), concerning the Rural
Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund Grant Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The investment of funds under this section is exempt from §
19-3-518(a)(2)(B)(i)(b) and (c) 19-3-318(a)(2)(B)(i)(b) and (c).

SECTION 248. Arkansas Code § 23-18-1205(b), concerning the Rural
Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund Grant Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) Moneys in the Rural Broadband I.D. Expenses Trust Fund may be
invested in any instrument that is:
783 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(1) Listed in § 19-3-518(b)(1)(B) 19-3-318(b)(1)(B); and
(2) Approved under the guidelines established by the State
Treasury investment policy approved by the State Board of Finance.

SECTION 249. Arkansas Code § 23-42-211(a), concerning the disposition
of fees under the Arkansas Securities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created on the books of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, the Auditor of State, and the Treasurer of State a fund to be
known as the “State Securities Department Fund”.
(2) The State Securities Department Fund shall be used for the
maintenance, operation, support, and improvement of the State Securities
Department in carrying out its functions, powers, and duties as set out by
law and by rule not inconsistent with law.
(3) The State Securities Department Fund shall consist of those
portions of fees designated for deposit into the State Securities Department
Fund under § 23-42-304(a)(2), (a)(4), and (a)(5), § 23-42-404(b)(1), and §
23-42-509(a).
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(3) of this section, at the
end of each fiscal year, the Securities Commissioner shall transfer into the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund any moneys in
the State Securities Department Fund that exceed the amount of the
department's next fiscal-year budget.

SECTION 250. Arkansas Code § 23-42-304(a), concerning filing fees
under the Arkansas Securities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Every applicant for initial or renewal registration, every person
making a notice filing as required by § 23-42-301, every exempt reporting
adviser, and every investment adviser to a private fund shall pay a filing
fee of:
(1) Three hundred dollars ($300) in the case of a broker-dealer;
(2) Seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in the case of an agent, of
which twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be designated as special revenues
and shall be deposited into the State Securities Department Fund;
(3) Three hundred dollars ($300) in the case of an investment
adviser;
(4) Seventy-five dollars ($75.00) in the case of a
784 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
representative, of which twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be designated as
special revenues and shall be deposited into the State Securities Department
Fund;
(5) Fifty dollars ($50.00) in the case of a branch office, of
which the entire amount shall be designated as special revenues and deposited
into the State Securities Department Fund; and
(6) Three hundred dollars ($300) in the case of an exempt
reporting adviser or investment adviser to a private fund that complies with
exemption requirements.

SECTION 251. Arkansas Code § 23-42-404(b)(1), concerning registration
statements under the Arkansas Securities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Every person filing a registration statement shall pay a filing
fee of one-tenth percent (0.1%) of the maximum aggregate offering price at
which the registered securities are to be offered in this state, but the fee
shall in no case be less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than
two thousand dollars ($2,000). Any portion of the fee in excess of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be designated as special revenues and shall
be deposited into the State Securities Department Fund. When a registration
statement is withdrawn before the effective date or a preeffective stop order
is entered under § 23-42-405, the Securities Commissioner shall retain one
hundred fifty dollars ($150) of the filing fee.

SECTION 252. Arkansas Code § 23-42-509(a)(1)(A), concerning
information required to be in a notice filing for a covered security under
the Arkansas Securities Act, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) Prior to the initial offering of such a covered security
in this state, all documents that are part of a current federal registration
statement filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission
under the Securities Act of 1933, together with a consent to service of
process signed by the issuer and with a fee in the amount of one-tenth
percent (0.1%) of the maximum aggregate offering price at which the covered
securities are to be offered in this state, but the fee shall in no case be
less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than two thousand dollars
($2,000). Any portion of the fee in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000)
shall be designated as special revenues and shall be deposited into the State
785 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Securities Department Fund. When a notice filing is withdrawn before the
effective date, the commissioner shall retain one hundred fifty dollars
($150) of the filing fee.

SECTION 253. Arkansas Code § 23-46-209(b), concerning the disposition
of funds collected by the State Bank Department, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) All fees and other revenues received by the department shall be
deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the
State Bank Department Fund to be used solely for the payment of the expenses
of the department pursuant to the appropriations therefor.

SECTION 254. Arkansas Code § 23-48-907(d), concerning examinations,
periodic reports, cooperative agreements, and fees related to interstate bank
mergers and branching, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank
supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a state bank or an
out-of-state state-chartered bank operating a branch in this state pursuant
to this subchapter to engage the services of the agency's examiners at a
reasonable rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the
commissioner's examiners to the agency at a reasonable rate of compensation.
Any such contract shall be deemed a sole source contract under § 19-11-232
19-61-507.

SECTION 255. Arkansas Code § 23-51-181(d), concerning examinations,
periodic reports, cooperative agreements, and the assessment of fees under
the Arkansas Trust Institutions Act, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank
supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a state trust
institution or an out-of-state trust institution maintaining an office in
this state to engage the services of the agency's examiners at a reasonable
rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the commissioner's
examiners to the agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. Any such
contract shall be deemed a sole source contract under § 19-11-232 19-61-507.

SECTION 256. Arkansas Code § 23-61-606(a), concerning the procurement
786 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of insurance or surety bonding, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The State Procurement Director shall procure insurance or surety
bonding in accordance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-
101 et seq., unless the risk manager determines that it is in the best
interest of the state for the director to procure insurance or surety bonding
by negotiation, or for any state agency to procure all or part of its own
insurance or surety bonding.

SECTION 257. Arkansas Code § 23-79-504(b)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Except to the extent defined in this subchapter, the pool
will be exempt from:
(A) All state, county, and local taxes;
(B) The Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et
seq.;
(C) The Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et
seq.; and
(D) The Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq.

SECTION 258. Arkansas Code § 23-102-104(b), concerning the
establishment of the Arkansas Earthquake Authority, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The authority shall be exempt from all state, county, and local
taxes, including insurance premium taxes, the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-
11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq., except to the extent defined in this chapter.

SECTION 259. Arkansas Code § 23-110-104(b), concerning the disposition
of license fees and fines under the Arkansas Horse Racing Law, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the general
revenues referred to in subsection (a) of this section to the various State
Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective
proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes
set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.
787 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 260. Arkansas Code § 23-111-104(b), concerning the disposition
of funds under the Arkansas Greyhound Racing Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the money to
the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by, and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in, the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 261. Arkansas Code § 23-112-205(a) and (b), concerning the
disposition of funds under the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Act, are
amended to read as follows:
(a) All funds received by the Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission shall
be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of a
special fund to be known as the “Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission Fund”.
(b) All expenses incurred in the organization, maintenance, operation,
and motor vehicle education and training of the commission shall be paid from
the special fund, and the expenditure of all funds shall be subject to the
General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and other applicable
fiscal laws.

SECTION 262. Arkansas Code § 23-115-206(a)(10)(B)(v), concerning the
information required to be contained in the estimated annual operating budget
required to be submitted by the Office of the Arkansas Lottery to the
Legislative Council under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(v) Contain a schedule of the total amounts of
regular salaries, extra help compensation, overtime compensation, and
personal services matching as defined in § 19-4-521 19-4-512; and

SECTION 263. Arkansas Code § 23-115-208(d), concerning sovereign
immunity under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivisions (d)(2)-(4) of this
788 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
section, appeals of claims in contract or in tort against the office or its
employees shall be conducted by the commission in the same manner as a claim
under § 19-10-201 25-44-201 et seq.
(B) The commission shall consider an appeal de novo.
(2) A decision of the commission relating to a claim in contract
or in tort against the office or its employees shall not be appealed to the
General Assembly.
(3)(A) A valid claim in any amount against the office shall not
be referred to the General Assembly for an appropriation.
(B) The Clerk of the Arkansas State Claims Commission
shall notify the office of the amount of the valid claim.
(C) Upon receipt of notification from the clerk, the
office shall deliver a check to the clerk, who shall deposit the sum as a
nonrevenue receipt into the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund from which he or she
shall disburse the amount of the claim to the claimant.
(4) Written reports under § 19-10-212 25-44-212 shall be filed
with the Legislative Council.

SECTION 264. Arkansas Code § 23-115-211(1)-(3), concerning the
provisions of the law that are inapplicable to the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, are amended to read as
follows:
(1) Section 19-1-301 et seq. 14-1-111;
(2) Section 19-4-1802 19-4-1702;
(3) Section 19-5-206 19-21-106;

SECTION 265. Arkansas Code § 23-115-303(d)(2), concerning prohibitions
on employees of the Office of the Arkansas Lottery, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section is supplemental to §
19-11-701 19-64-101 et seq.
(B) If any provision of § 19-11-701 19-64-101 et seq.
would impose a restriction on a specific employee greater than the
restrictions under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the provision of § 19-
11-701 19-64-101 et seq. shall apply.

789 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 266. Arkansas Code § 23-115-701(b), concerning procurements by
the Office of the Arkansas Lottery, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the
office shall comply with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101
et seq.

SECTION 267. Arkansas Code § 23-115-1101(c)(1), concerning the duties
of the Legislative Council under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) During a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session of the
General Assembly, the Joint Budget Committee shall perform the functions
assigned to the Legislative Council under:
(A) This chapter;
(B) Section 6-60-902;
(C) Section 6-60-903;
(D) Section 6-85-205;
(E) Section 6-85-212;
(F) Section 6-85-216;
(G) Section 6-85-219;
(H) Section 6-85-220; and
(I) Section 19-10-212 25-44-212.

SECTION 268. Arkansas Code § 24-2-618(f)(1), concerning the delegation
of investment and management functions by trustees of state retirement
systems, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) Notwithstanding the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-
61-101 et seq., the boards of trustees of the respective state retirement
systems shall promptly implement their investment directives consistent with
the duty of care required of a fiduciary under the prudent investor rules in
this chapter.

SECTION 269. Arkansas Code § 24-2-618(g)(1), concerning the delegation
of investment and management functions by trustees of state retirement
systems, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The length of a contract or other investment agreement and any
renewal or extension of the contract or other investment agreement may be
790 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
agreed upon by a state retirement system and the other party to the contract
or other investment agreement and is exempt from the mandatory expiration
provisions under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.,
if the contract or other investment agreement is procured under the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and the purpose of the
contract or other investment agreement is to:
(A) Invest and manage a system's trust assets under § 24-
2-610;
(B) Provide actuarial services to determine the
liabilities and financial status of a state retirement plan;
(C) Retain custody of a system's trust assets; or
(D) Protect and recover trust assets of a system.

SECTION 270. Arkansas Code § 24-2-618(g)(3) and (4), concerning the
delegation of investment and management functions by trustees of state
retirement systems, are amended to read as follows:
(3) The board of trustees of a state retirement system shall
submit information requested by the Legislative Council concerning a contract
or other investment agreement procured under the Arkansas Procurement Law, §
19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.
(4) A partial equity ownership agreement between a state
retirement system and another party shall be reviewed under § 19-11-1301 19-
69-101 et seq.

SECTION 271. Arkansas Code § 24-4-202(e)(4), concerning the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(4) If the interest penalty or delinquent moneys are not
received by the system by the last business day of the month in which the
moneys were originally due, then the system shall cause the sums of moneys,
including interest, to be transferred from any moneys due the participating
public employer from the office of the Treasurer of State or the Department
of Education as approved in § 19-5-106(a)(5) 19-20-106(a)(4).

SECTION 272. Arkansas Code § 24-4-202(f)(3), concerning the penalty
for a participating public employer failing to file with the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
791 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) If the penalty is not received by the last business day of
the month in which the report was due, then the system shall cause the amount
to be transferred from any moneys due the participating public employer from
the office of the Treasurer of State or the Department of Education as
provided in § 19-5-106(a)(5) 19-20-106(a)(4).

SECTION 273. Arkansas Code § 24-5-106(b), concerning the establishment
of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System Fund, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) The employer shall draw vouchers or cause vouchers to be drawn
upon the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund for deposit into the Arkansas State Highway Employees'
Retirement System Fund for such sums of money as are provided in § 24-5-109
to match employee contributions as certified by the Executive Secretary of
the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement
System:
(1) In accordance with the provisions of this section and §§ 24-
5-101 — 24-5-105, 24-5-107 — 24-5-109, and 24-5-112 — 24-5-118; or
(2) As provided under § 24-5-137.

SECTION 274. Arkansas Code § 24-6-209(b)(1), concerning the employer's
contribution under the State Police Retirement System, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) At the request of the Executive Secretary of the State Police
Retirement System, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall make annual transfers on each June 30 to the system from
the remainder of insurance premium taxes enumerated in § 19-6-301(27) 19-42-
201(27) before those taxes are transferred to general revenues enumerated in
§ 19-6-201(19) 19-41-201(19) the amounts of money necessary to amortize the
unfunded liabilities over a period not to exceed thirty (30) years.

SECTION 275. Arkansas Code § 24-7-411(a)(3), concerning the compelling
of payment upon the delinquency of an employer under the Arkansas Teacher
Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(3) If the interest penalty or delinquent moneys are not
received by the system by the last business day of the month in which the
792 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
moneys were originally due, then the system may transfer the sums of moneys,
including the interest penalty, from any moneys due the employer from the
Treasurer of State and the Department of Education as provided in § 19-5-
106(a)(5) 19-20-106(a)(4).

SECTION 276. Arkansas Code § 24-7-411(b)(3), concerning the compelling
of payment upon the delinquency of an employer under the Arkansas Teacher
Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(3) If the penalty is not received by the last business
day of the month in which the report was due, then the system may transfer
the penalty amount from any moneys due the employer from the Treasurer of
State and the Department of Education as provided in § 19-5-106(a)(5) 19-20-
106(a)(4).

SECTION 277. Arkansas Code § 24-11-410(a), concerning the investment
of local police pension and relief funds, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund
shall have the power to draw sums from its treasury, only upon warrants
signed by the chair of the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and
relief fund and countersigned by the policemen's pension and relief fund, to
invest in the name of the board in interest-bearing bonds of the United
States, of the State of Arkansas, or of the city in which the board is
located, in a local government joint investment trust pursuant to the Local
Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 19-8-301 14-79-101 et seq., in the
Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, or in savings and loan
associations duly established and authorized to do business in this state.

SECTION 278. Arkansas Code § 24-11-805(b), concerning the investment
of local firemen's pension and relief funds, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund
shall have the power with the consent of a majority of the firefighters at
the time employed, expressed in writing and filed with the city clerk, to
authorize the treasurer to draw sums from its treasury to invest in the name
of the board in interest-bearing bonds of the United States, of the State of
Arkansas, or of the city where the board is located, in a local government
joint investment trust pursuant to the Local Government Joint Investment
793 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Trust Act, § 19-8-301 14-79-101 et seq., the Arkansas Local Police and Fire
Retirement System, in certificates of deposit or time deposits in banks duly
established and authorized to do business in this state, or in savings and
loan associations duly established and authorized to do business in this
state.

SECTION 279. Arkansas Code § 24-12-109(a), concerning the investment
of local officer and employee funds, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid
nonuniformed employees shall have the power to draw sums from its treasury to
invest in the name of the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund
for paid nonuniformed employees in interest-bearing bonds of the United
States, of the State of Arkansas, or of the city in which the board is
located or in a local government joint investment trust pursuant to the Local
Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 19-8-301 14-79-101 et seq.

SECTION 280. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1202(2), concerning the definitions
to be used with respect to prohibited contracts by state agencies, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) “Contract” means the same as defined in the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-203(5) 19-61-103(5);

SECTION 281. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1202(4), concerning the definitions
to be used with respect to prohibited contracts by state agencies, is amended
to read as follows:
(4) “State agency” means the same as defined in the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-203(30) 19-61-103(30).

SECTION 282. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-7-201 — 19-7-204:
Subchapter 13 — Office of State-Federal Relations

25-1-1301. Purpose.
It is the intent of this subchapter to establish mechanisms through
which the legislative and executive branches of state government can work
together with Arkansas's congressional delegation to strengthen and support
794 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the state's relationship with the federal government and to ensure that the
state receives all benefits and aid to which it is entitled.

25-1-1302. Creation.
(a) There is created within the Governor's office an Office of State-
Federal Relations for the State of Arkansas, to be located in Washington,
D.C.
(b) The executive head of the office shall be the Director of the
Office of State-Federal Relations. The director shall be appointed by the
Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the Governor.
(c) All budgeting, purchasing, and related management functions shall
be performed under the direction and supervision of the director. The
director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to personnel
within the office as the director shall deem desirable and necessary for the
effective and efficient operation of the office.

25-1-1303. Duties.
The duties of the Office of State-Federal Relations shall include, but
not be limited to, the following:
(1) Federal Grants:
(A) Monitor opportunities for discretionary grants;
(B) Identify and comment upon proposed changes in funding
formulas; and
(C) Keep the Governor's office and state agencies informed
on the availability of grants;
(2) Federal Regulations:
(A) Monitor regulatory developments affecting state
government;
(B) Support existing and proposed legislation and
regulations favoring the interests of the state; and
(C) Support the public policy of this state as expressed
by the Governor's office, the General Assembly, and agencies, as appropriate;
(3) Federal Legislation:
(A) Keep the Governor's office, agencies, and the General
Assembly informed about proposed legislative developments of critical
795 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
significance to state government; and
(B) Support Arkansas's congressional delegation in efforts
to influence federal governmental decisions and policies as they apply to
Arkansas;
(4) Interstate Cooperation: Facilitate cooperation with other
states on issues of mutual concern;
(5) Information Clearinghouse: Coordinate the flow of
information between state and federal governments;
(6) Reporting: Provide regular performance reports to the
Governor, the Legislative Council, and the General Assembly to enable
evaluation of the effectiveness of the Washington, D.C. office; and
(7) Nongovernmental Funding Sources, Programs, etc:
(A) Discover information on all available additional
funding and other resources and direct it to the appropriate state agency or
person within the state; and
(B) Take advantage of all resources available on a
nationwide basis that can be beneficial to the state and its citizens.

25-1-1304. Fund.
There is created within the Governor's office the Office of State-
Federal Relations Fund.

SECTION 283. Arkansas Code § 25-4-111(d), concerning information
technology plans, is amended to read as follows:
(d) All state agencies shall comply with the provisions of the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and applicable
provisions of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101
et seq., in the acquisition, purchase, contracting for the purchase of, and
leasing of information technology.

SECTION 284. Arkansas Code § 25-4-114(c), concerning contracts and
agreements for information technology, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Contracts for the provision of information technology are
interagency agreements and are exempt from the provisions of the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and the General Accounting
and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., nor are they required to be
796 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
submitted to the Legislative Council for advice.

SECTION 285. Arkansas Code § 25-4-121(e), concerning the Division of
Information Systems Revolving Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State upon written application of the division and review by the Legislative
Council, the Director of the Division of Information Systems shall have the
authority to transfer funds between the Information Technology Reserve Fund
established by §§ 19-5-1056 19-27-244 and 25-4-123 and the Division of
Information Systems Revolving Fund established under this section for cash
management purposes.

SECTION 286. Arkansas Code § 25-8-102(b), concerning the authority of
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) The secretary shall have authority to install any recordkeeping
and other procedures in his or her office and in other offices and
departments of the state which he or she shall deem necessary or advisable to
carry out his or her functions and duties. However, nothing in this section
shall be construed to grant the secretary any authority to establish
recordkeeping or other procedures, or rules with respect to the elected
constitutional officers of the state, the General Assembly and its
committees, or other agencies who are exempt from all or a part of the
procedures set forth in the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101
et seq., and the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101
et seq.

SECTION 287. Arkansas Code § 25-8-106(f), concerning marketing and
redistribution of state personal property, is amended to read as follows:
(f) The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules, not inconsistent with
law, for compliance with the provisions of this section, the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., and the sale of surplus
commodities to not-for-profit organizations under § 22-1-101.

797 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 288. Arkansas Code § 25-10-108(4), concerning the requirements
the Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall impose on units of
the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Coordinate, with each institution and its administrator
under the control and direction of the Department of Human Services State
Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities
Services within the department, the purchasing policies and procedures of the
department as promulgated by the secretary thereof to assure that all those
institutions comply with the uniform purchasing practices and policies of the
department and with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et
seq., and the rules promulgated thereunder by the State Procurement Director.
(B) However, each of the various institutions under the
control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board
and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the department is
authorized to have institutional purchasing officials who shall be authorized
to make purchases in behalf of those institutions which are not within the
exclusive jurisdiction of the State Procurement Director, but all such
purchases shall be made in compliance with the uniform purchasing practices
and policies promulgated by the secretary to be applicable to all divisions,
offices, sections, or units of the department and shall be in conformance
with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., and rules
promulgated by the State Procurement Director; and

SECTION 289. Arkansas Code § 25-18-205(d)(2), concerning volumes of
the acts of the General Assembly, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Volume I shall contain only appropriation acts and the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., and amendments
relative thereto and may be printed in two (2) books if the Secretary of
State considers it mechanically expedient.

SECTION 290. Arkansas Code § 25-19-107(e)(2)(B), concerning appeals
from a denial of rights and attorney's fees under the Freedom of Information
Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A claim for reasonable attorney's fees and litigation
expenses reasonably incurred in an action against the State of Arkansas or a
department, agency, or institution of the state shall be filed with the
798 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
commission pursuant to § 19-10-201 25-44-201 et seq. within sixty (60) days
of the final disposition of the appeal under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 291. Arkansas Code § 25-20-306(a)(17), concerning the general
powers of a public body under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(17) Purchase professional services under § 19-11-801 19-65-101
et seq. or by any method of competitive bidding including without limitation
reverse auctions.

SECTION 292. Arkansas Code § 25-20-310(j)(3)(B), concerning financing
improvements with bonds under the Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(B) The provisions of the Revenue Bond Act of 1987, § 19-
9-601 19-6-601 et seq., do not apply to this section and revenue bonds or
interim financing issued hereunder.

SECTION 293. Arkansas Code § 25-20-408(j), concerning financing under
the Arkansas Municipal Electric Utility Interlocal Cooperation Act of 2003,
is amended to read as follows:
(j) The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided for by the
Registered Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq.

SECTION 294. Arkansas Code § 25-26-305(b), concerning contracts on
behalf of the Arkansas Cyber Initiative, is amended to read as follows:
(b) When contracting with a person or an entity under this subchapter,
the commission shall not be bound by the provisions of the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., requiring competitive bids if
compliance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.,
creates a security risk.

SECTION 295. Arkansas Code § 25-28-105 is amended to read as follows:
25-28-105. Compliance with other laws.
Disbursement of funds authorized by this chapter shall be limited to
the appropriation for the agency being transferred and funds made available
by law for the support of such appropriations. The restrictions of the
799 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq., the General
Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, §§ 19-4-1601 and 21-5-101, or their
successors, and other fiscal control laws of this state, where applicable,
and rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as
authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of those
funds.

SECTION 296. Arkansas Code § 25-29-109 is amended to read as follows:
25-29-109. Purchase of telecommunications services.
The purchase of telecommunications services by the Arkansas Deaf and
Hard of Hearing Telecommunications Services Corporation shall be by
competitive bid using procedures substantially similar to the Arkansas
Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.

SECTION 297. Arkansas Code § 25-34-108(2), concerning the disbursement
of revenues under the Arkansas Computer and Electronic Solid Waste Management
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) If the sale of surplus computer or electronic equipment is
outside the agency and conducted by the Marketing and Redistribution Section:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be returned
to the owning agency;
(B) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be
deposited with the Marketing and Redistribution Section; and
(C) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be
deposited into the fund established by this chapter and § 19-5-1217 19-27-
278.

SECTION 298. Arkansas Code § 25-35-105(b)(2), concerning the powers of
the risk manager for the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) Purchase insurance and reinsurance in accordance with the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.;

SECTION 299. Arkansas Code § 25-38-203(b)(3)(B), concerning the powers
800 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
of the Department of Agriculture to assess civil penalties, is amended to
read as follows:
(B) A civil penalty assessed and collected under
subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be deposited into the State Plant
Board Fund.

SECTION 300. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(26), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is amended to read as
follows:
(26) The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission, created under §
19-12-117 19-90-117;

SECTION 301. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(47), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is amended to read as
follows:
(47) The Tobacco Prevention and Cessation Program, created under
§ 19-12-113 19-90-113; and

SECTION 302. Arkansas Code § 25-43-811(c)(7)(E), concerning the duty
of the Office of Health Information Technology to establish fees for the use
of the State Health Alliance for Records Exchange, is amended to read as
follows:
(E) Revenue generated by the fees or charges under
subdivision (c)(7)(A) of this section shall be deposited into the Health
Information Technology Fund, § 19-5-1244 19-27-299.

SECTION 303. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1402(a)(11), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Public Safety, is amended to read
as follows:
(11) The Law Enforcement Support Office, referenced under § 19-
11-605 19-63-105;

SECTION 304. Arkansas Code § 25-43-1502(a)(8), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services,
is amended to read as follows:
(8) The Office of State Procurement, created under § 19-11-215
801 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
19-61-201.

SECTION 305. Arkansas Code Title 25 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows to reenact §§ 19-10-101 — 19-10-306:
CHAPTER 44
CLAIMS AGAINST THE STATE

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

25-44-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “General Assembly” means the appropriate subcommittee of the
Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee that is assigned to hear
appealed claims or claims requiring approval before being considered by the
Legislative Council, the Joint Budget Committee, or the full General
Assembly;
(2) “Insurer” means a person engaged as indemnitor, surety, or
contractor in the business of entering into contracts of insurance;
(3) “State agency” means a department, office, board,
commission, or institution of this state, including a state-supported
institution of higher education; and
(4) “Subrogation claim” means a claim filed with the Arkansas
State Claims Commission by an insurer or by its insured, or both, to recover
money paid or owed by an insurer to an individual under a contract of
insurance.

25-44-102. Investigatory powers.
(a)(1) As soon as the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration learns of facts from which the secretary concludes that a
claim may be filed under this chapter against the state or a state agency,
the secretary shall investigate and take evidence concerning the claim.
(2) The secretary's duty under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section applies whether or not the claim has already been filed at the time
the secretary learns the relevant facts upon which the secretary bases his or
her conclusion.
(3) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to a claim
802 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
for personal injury or death of a state employee.
(b) To carry out his or her duties under this section, the secretary
may exercise all necessary investigatory powers conferred upon him or her by
this chapter.
(c) All information acquired by the secretary under this section shall
be made available to the Arkansas State Claims Commission before the hearing
and determination of the claim.

25-44-103. Legal representative for state agencies.
(a) An attorney for a state agency against which a claim is filed
shall represent his or her respective state agency before the Arkansas State
Claims Commission.
(b) The Attorney General shall represent all state agencies that have
no special legal representatives before the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

25-44-104. State employee not to represent claimant.
The following shall not appear before the Arkansas State Claims
Commission as an attorney or representative for a claimant in the
presentation or prosecution of a claim filed under this chapter:
(1) A full-time employee of:
(A) The State of Arkansas; or
(B) A state agency; or
(2) A member of a state agency.

25-44-105. Claims for late or lost warrants.
Before approving a claim for reissuance of a state warrant that has
been lost or presented for payment after expiration of the legal date for
redemption, the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall request proof from the
Auditor of State that:
(1) The original warrant was legally canceled because of late
redemption presentation; or
(2) In the case of a lost warrant, an official warrant
cancellation procedure has been exercised.

Subchapter 2 — Arkansas State Claims Commission

803 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
25-44-201. Creation of commission — Members — Salary and expense
reimbursement.
(a)(1)(A) There is created a commission to be known as the “Arkansas
State Claims Commission”.
(B) The commission shall consist of five (5) members to be
known as “commissioners”.
(C) All commissioners shall be public-spirited persons of
recognized standing, and at least two (2) commissioners shall be attorneys
licensed to practice law in the State of Arkansas.
(2)(A)(i) The commissioners shall be appointed by the Governor
and confirmed by the Senate.
(ii) The commissioners shall serve for terms of five
(5) years and thereafter until a successor has been appointed and qualified.
(iii) A vacancy in the office of commissioner shall
be filled by the Governor, and that appointee shall hold office during the
unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurred.
(B) Commissioners may be appointed to and may serve
successive terms.
(b) Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each
commissioner shall take the constitutional oath of office.
(c)(1) A commissioner shall not hear or participate in the
consideration of a claim in which he or she is interested personally, either
directly or indirectly.
(2) If for reason of conflict of interest a commissioner
disqualifies himself or herself or is absent for any reason from hearing a
particular claim and if there are no other commissioners available to hear
the claim or action, the interested parties may request that a special
commissioner be appointed by the Governor to hear the specific claim or
action.
(d) The commission shall elect from its membership a chair or two (2)
cochairs.
(e)(1)(A) Each commissioner shall receive a salary as may be
prescribed by law and appropriated by the General Assembly.
(B) The salary shall be paid in the manner as are salaries
of other state officials and employees.
(2) In addition to salary, each commissioner may receive expense
804 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(f) The commission is considered an adjudicatory body when the
commission applies or interprets:
(1) A substantive procedural rule; or
(2) Case law from an appellate court with jurisdiction to a
pending claim or action.

25-44-202. Director — Personnel.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall be
designated by the Arkansas State Claims Commission and shall serve as both
the Executive Secretary for the Arkansas State Claims Commission and the
Clerk of the Arkansas State Claims Commission.
(b) The commission may appoint other personnel as may be necessary to
effectuate the operations of the commission and as may be authorized by
biennial appropriation of the General Assembly.

25-44-203. Duties of director.
(a)(1) The duties of the Director of the Arkansas State Claims
Commission shall include maintaining a system of filing and adjudicating of
claims or actions against the state.
(2) The director shall keep a docket of all claims or actions
filed and shall present them to the Arkansas State Claims Commission in the
chronological order of filing.
(3) The director is responsible for maintenance and custody of
the docket, files, and records of the commission, including the transcripts
of testimony and exhibits, with all papers and requests filed in proceedings,
the minutes of all actions taken, and all of the commission's findings,
determinations, opinions, reports, orders, and rules.
(4) The director shall prepare the docket of claims or actions
to be considered by the commission and shall notify all parties of record of
the time, date, and place of hearing in advance when a claim or action will
be docketed for hearing before the commission.
(5) The director shall be responsible for hiring personnel in
the administration of the commission.
(b) The commission shall authorize the director to sign or
authenticate all orders and other actions of the commission.
805 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

25-44-204. Jurisdiction.
(a) The Arkansas State Claims Commission has jurisdiction over:
(1) A claim or action that is barred by the doctrine of
sovereign immunity under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20, from being
litigated in a court of general jurisdiction, except as otherwise provided by
law;
(2) A claim or action that solely addresses the receipting,
processing, and reissuance of child support payments through the Arkansas
Child Support Clearinghouse;
(3) A claim or action to contest eligibility, qualification, or
election to serve as a member of the House of Representatives for the purpose
of making a nonbinding recommendation on the claim or action to that chamber
of the General Assembly; and
(4) A claim or action to recover reasonable attorney's fees and
other litigation expenses reasonably incurred by a plaintiff who
substantially prevails in an action under § 25-19-107 against the State of
Arkansas or a state agency under the standard described in § 25-19-107(d)(1).
(b) The commission has no jurisdiction over a claim or action:
(1) Against a municipality, county, school district, or any
other political subdivision of the state;
(2) Arising under:
(A) The Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.;
(B) The Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et
seq.;
(C) The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, Acts 1973,
No. 427;
(D) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Act,
Acts 1957, No. 177;
(E) The State Police Retirement System Act, § 24-6-201 et
seq.; or
(F) Laws providing for old age assistance grants, child
welfare grants, blind pensions, or any laws of a similar nature;
(3) Against the state for repayment of child support, except in
cases in which the underlying support order is set aside as void ab initio by
the court and the child support paid was retained by the state as
806 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
reimbursement for public assistance paid on behalf of a child;
(4) Brought by a member of the uniformed armed services against
the Department of the Military, the State Militia, or any subdivision of the
State Militia, if the claim or action arises out of the performance of the
claimant's military duty;
(5) Brought against the Division of Community Correction for
acts committed by a person while that person is subject to conditions of
parole, post-release supervision, or probation under Arkansas law;
(6) Brought against the Division of Correction for acts
committed by inmates while on authorized release from the Division of
Correction;
(7) Brought against the Division of Youth Services for acts
committed by juveniles released by the Division of Youth Services, whether or
not the juvenile is subject to conditions of aftercare or probation; or
(8) For state tax refunds under § 26-18-507, a claim or action
challenging tax assessments under § 26-18-406, or a claim or action
challenging tax laws under Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 13.
(c) The commission shall not make an award for a claim or action that,
as a matter of law, would be dismissed from a court of law for reasons other
than sovereign immunity.

25-44-205. Rulemaking authority.
The Arkansas State Claims Commission may make and alter or amend all
rules governing the procedure before the commission that may be necessary and
expedient for the orderly discharge of the commission's duties and that are
not inconsistent with this subchapter or other laws.

25-44-206. Meetings.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall meet at the time and
place designated by the Chair of the Arkansas State Claims Commission, the
cochairs of the Arkansas State Claims Commission, or the Director of the
Arkansas State Claims Commission.
(2) General meetings of the commission for the purpose of
hearing testimony and taking evidence shall be held each month unless
scheduled differently by the chair, the cochairs, or the director.
(b) The commission may hold a special meeting of the commission upon
807 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
request by the interested parties.
(c) The commission shall meet in Little Rock but may conduct hearings
elsewhere in the state if the commission determines that a hearing is
relevant to business before the commission.
(d)(1) A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum, and
the concurrence of two (2) members of the commission shall be necessary for
the allowance or disallowance of any claims.
(2) A vacancy does not impair the right of the remaining two (2)
commissioners assigned to a particular hearing to exercise all powers of the
full commission.

25-44-207. Power to examine.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission or a
commissioner of the Arkansas State Claims Commission has the authority to
administer oaths, to subpoena witnesses, to examine any books, documents, or
records that may be relevant to any proceeding before the commission, and to
require the production of any such materials.
(b) In an action to contest the election of a member of the House of
Representatives, the commission's general authority to subpoena witnesses and
documents shall specifically include the authority to subpoena election
officers and to subpoena any ballots cast or other election records in the
election at issue.
(c) If a claimant or witness to whom an oath has been administered as
provided under this section swears falsely to a fact material to the
investigation of a claim, the false swearing shall constitute perjury, and
the person swearing falsely shall be subject to prosecution.
(d)(1)(A) If a person or entity fails or refuses to obey a commission
subpoena or order or refuses to testify or produce any books, papers, or
other documents, the commission may present its petition setting forth the
facts to any court of record.
(B) After being presented with a petition under this
subsection, the court of record shall issue its subpoena to the person or
entity, requiring his or her or its attendance before the court of record to
testify or produce the books, papers, or documents as may be deemed necessary
and pertinent.
(C) A person or entity failing or refusing to obey the
808 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
subpoena or order of the court of record may be proceeded against in the same
manner as for refusal to obey any other subpoena, as provided by the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2) The commission may use the Attorney General and the services
of the prosecuting attorneys for the county and district in which the
enforcement of a subpoena under this subsection is required.

25-44-208. Complaints.
(a)(1) A proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced by a
verified complaint, of which the original and three (3) copies shall be filed
with the Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission.
(2) The party filing the claim or action shall be designated as
the claimant, and the State of Arkansas, state agency, or applicable agent of
the state shall be designated as the respondent.
(b) Unless otherwise provided for under this section, the complaint
shall state concisely the facts upon which the claim or action is based and
shall set forth:
(1) The address of the claimant and the claimant's attorney, if
any;
(2) The time and place of the circumstances giving rise to the
claim or action;
(3) The state agency whose action or inaction led to the
origination of the claim or action;
(4) The amount claimed or relief sought; and
(5) All averments of fact necessary to state a cause of action
against the state under this subchapter.
(c) If the claim or action is based upon a contract or other
instrument in writing, a copy of the contract or instrument in writing shall
be attached to the complaint and the copies filed with the director.
(d)(1) The claimant shall state in the complaint whether he or she has
received any payment on account of the claim or action and, if so, the amount
received.
(2)(A) The claimant also shall state whether another person or
business entity has an absolute or contingent interest in his or her claim or
action.
(B) If a person or corporation is interested in the claim,
809 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the claimant shall state the name and address of that person or corporation
having the interest, the nature of the interest, and how and when it was
acquired.
(e) If the claimant is an executor, administrator, guardian, or other
representative acting under judicial appointment, a duly certified copy of
the record of appointment shall be filed with the complaint.
(f)(1) A claimant who is an inmate in the Division of Correction or
the Division of Community Correction at the time the claim or action is filed
is limited to no more than:
(A) Five (5) pages of written factual allegations and
legal argument in his or her complaint; and
(B) Five (5) additional pages of exhibits to accompany his
or her complaint.
(2)(A) An inmate filing a claim or action may file a motion to
allow him or her to file additional pages of factual allegations, argument,
or exhibits in excess of the limitations under subdivision (f)(1) of this
section.
(B) A motion filed under this subdivision (f)(2) may be
granted only if the commissioners of the Arkansas State Claims Commission
find that the inmate needs the additional pages to fully explain his or her
claim or action or if the claim or action is sufficiently complex to warrant
additional pages.
(3)(A) If an inmate files a claim or action that exceeds the
page limitations under this subsection, the commission shall:
(i) Assign the inmate's claim a docket number; and
(ii) Consider the inmate's claim filed, but mail the
inmate's complaint and any attached exhibits back to him or her and give the
inmate forty-five (45) days to:
(a) Resubmit his or her complaint and any
attached exhibits in compliance with this subsection; or
(b) File a motion requesting permission to
file a complaint and accompanying exhibits that exceed the page limitations
under this subsection.
(B) The forty-five-day time period under this subsection
is excludable time in calculating the statute of limitations for the inmate's
claim or action.
810 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(C) The commission may dismiss an inmate's complaint
without prejudice if the inmate fails to:
(i) Resubmit a complaint and attached exhibits that
meet the page limitation requirements of this subsection; or
(ii) File a motion requesting permission to file a
complaint and attached exhibits that exceed the page limitation requirements
of this subsection.
(D)(i) If the commission grants a motion for a complaint
and accompanying exhibits that exceed the page limitation requirements of
this subsection, the commission shall set out in the order granting the
motion the revised timeline for the inmate to file his or her complaint and
accompanying exhibits.
(ii) The commission may set a revised limit on the
number of pages an inmate's complaint and accompanying exhibits may be.

25-44-209. Time for filing.
The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall not consider or allow a
claim or action unless the claim or action has been filed with the Director
of the Arkansas State Claims Commission as provided by this subchapter within
the period allowed by law for the commencement of an action for the
enforcement of the same type of claim or action.

25-44-210. Notice and hearings.
(a)(1) The Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall
notify each claimant and also the head of each state agency against which a
claim or action is filed of the time and place set for a hearing on the claim
or action, if a hearing on the matter is set by the Arkansas State Claims
Commission.
(2) A party to a claim or action is not entitled to a hearing as
a matter of law but may request a hearing before the commission.
(b)(1) The commission is not bound by the formal rules of evidence and
shall conduct all hearings publicly and in a fair and impartial manner,
giving the parties full opportunity for presentation of evidence, cross-
examination of witnesses, and argument.
(2) To the extent practicable, the commission shall adopt the
procedure used by the circuit courts, and a hearing before the commission
811 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
shall be conducted in a judicial manner.
(c) Hearings on a motion filed by a party shall be set:
(1) Upon request of one (1) of the parties; and
(2) If the commission finds that oral argument or witness
testimony, or both, will benefit the commission in deciding on the motion.

25-44-211. Appeals of decisions — Jurisdiction — Time periods to file.
(a)(1) Within forty (40) days after the Arkansas State Claims
Commission transmits a final order on a claim or action before the
commission, a party to the claim or action may file with the commission a:
(A) Notice of appeal of the final order to the General
Assembly; or
(B)(i) Motion requesting that the commission reconsider
its final order.
(ii)(a) If a motion for reconsideration is denied, a
party may file with the commission a notice of appeal of the claim to the
General Assembly within twenty (20) days of the commission's transmitting the
order denying the motion for reconsideration.
(b) Subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this
section applies only if the commission's reconsideration constitutes a final
order.
(2) The commission shall advise parties of the right of appeal
under this section when the commission notifies the parties of the
commission's final order.
(3) The General Assembly has exclusive jurisdiction to hear
appeals under this section.
(b)(1)(A) The commission shall timely notify the General Assembly and
all parties to the claim or action when a notice of appeal to the General
Assembly is filed with the commission within the number of days permitted to
file a notice of appeal.
(B) If a notice of appeal is submitted outside the number
of days permitted to file a notice of appeal, the commission shall not:
(i) Accept the notice of appeal for filing; or
(ii) Transmit the notice of appeal to the General
Assembly for consideration.
(C) If an untimely notice of appeal is submitted under
812 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, the commission shall notify all
parties to the claim or action that the notice of appeal:
(i) Was submitted outside the number of days
permitted to file a notice of appeal; and
(ii) Will not be transmitted to the General Assembly
for consideration.
(2)(A) Notice provided to the General Assembly under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section terminates the commission's jurisdiction over the
claim or action.
(B) Unless ordered to do so by the General Assembly, the
commission is prohibited from doing anything further on the claim or action
aside from ordinary ministerial duties.
(3) The commission shall regain jurisdiction over the claim or
action if, in consideration of an appeal of a final order, the General
Assembly sends the claim or action back to the commission:
(A) For further proceedings consistent with any order of
the General Assembly; or
(B) To notify the claimant that the award has been upheld,
reversed, or amended.

25-44-212. Reports of state agency liability.
(a) When a state agency admits liability to a claim filed with the
Arkansas State Claims Commission, the state agency shall file a written
report of the claim with the Litigation Reports Oversight Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council if the claim:
(1) Involves a contract with the state agency; or
(2) Exceeds fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
(b) The state agency shall include in its report a concise statement
of facts with an explanation of the state agency's liability.
(c) The state agency shall file its report within thirty (30) days
after the claim or action has been adjudicated and a final order has been
issued by the commission.

25-44-213. State agency to pay claim — Employment compensation claims
— Director disbursing officer.
(a)(1) When a claim or action is determined to be a valid claim or
813 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
action against the state under this chapter and the claim or action is to be
paid from funds not in the State Treasury, the Director of the Arkansas State
Claims Commission shall notify the state agency against which the claim or
action is to be charged of the amount of the claim or action.
(2) Upon receipt of the notification under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, the state agency shall deliver a check to the director who
shall deposit the funds as a nonrevenue receipt into the Miscellaneous
Revolving Fund from which the director shall disburse the amount of the claim
or action to the claimant.
(b)(1) The director shall distribute a warrant for the payment of a
valid claim against the state for employment compensation claims in the
manner provided by this subsection.
(2) If an employment compensation claim is determined to be a
valid claim against the state, the director shall notify the state agency
against which the claim is to be charged and the Office of Personnel
Management of the amount of the claim.
(3) Upon receipt of the notification under this subsection, the
state agency against which the claim is charged shall process the award
through the state mechanized payroll system.
(c)(1) The director shall be the disbursing officer for the funds
appropriated for expense reimbursements for the Firefighter Benefit Review
Panel.
(2) Expense reimbursements under this subsection shall be paid
to the panel as certified in writing to the Arkansas State Claims Commission
by the Chair of the Firefighter Benefit Review Panel.
(3) The commission may pay expense reimbursements for all unpaid
meetings in prior state fiscal years.

25-44-214. Effect on liens.
(a) Arkansas State Claims Commission awards are state property and
therefore:
(1) Liens do not attach to commission awards; and
(2) A commission award is not assignable.
(b)(1) If the commission and the General Assembly approve appeals or
claims or actions above fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and name as
payees, in addition to the claimant, other individuals or entities who would
814 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
normally have liens in a court of law, other than insurance company
subrogation claims, then the commission may deposit the amount approved into
the registry of the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(2) After reasonable notice to the claimant and any named
payees, the court shall establish the validity and priority to the moneys
upon petition of the claimant or any named payee.

25-44-215. Restrictions on awards.
(a) With the exception of death and disability benefit claims paid
under § 21-5-701 et seq., the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall not pay
an award in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
(b) If an award is greater than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000),
the commission shall refer the claim or action to the General Assembly for
approval and, if approved, an appropriation.

25-44-216. Final orders — Findings of fact and conclusions of law
required.
(a)(1) When the Arkansas State Claims Commission dismisses a claim or
action with a final order or issues a final order of a claim or action on the
merits, the commission shall set forth specific findings of fact and
conclusions of law to support its decision.
(2) Citations to a party's motion or argument do not fulfill the
requirements of this subsection unless otherwise supported by an explanation,
with particularity, as to why the party's motion or argument is determinative
to the outcome of the claim or action.
(3) When the commission bases its decision on a specific rule of
civil procedure, rule of evidence, statute, or controlling appellate court
decision, the commission shall cite the rule, statute, or appellate court
decision.
(4) The General Assembly shall not accept a claim or action on
appeal when the claim or action has as its final adjudication findings of
fact and conclusions of law that do not comply with this section.
(b) Failure to comply with this section shall result in the General
Assembly's sending the claim or action back to the commission for further
action until the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are met.
(c) A claim or action filed by a person who at the time of filing is
815 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
an inmate of the Division of Correction is exempted from the requirements of
this section.
(d) The findings of fact and conclusions of law contained in a final
order under this section are presumed to be correct for the purposes of
review by or appeal to the General Assembly.

25-44-217. Motions — Grounds required to preserve for appeal.
(a) If the Arkansas State Claims Commission denies a motion, the party
whose interests were adversely affected by the commission's denial may appeal
the denial under § 25-44-211 so long as the legal issue or factual issue in
dispute was preserved for appeal with a specific ruling, in writing, by the
commission.
(b)(1)(A) It is the responsibility of the party whose interests were
adversely affected by the commission's ruling on the motion to ask the
commission to file a written order denying the motion if the commission had
previously denied the motion and has not already filed a written order on the
motion before the commission issues its final order.
(B) If a party requests that the commission file a written
order denying a motion under this subsection, the commission shall do so
before issuing a final order.
(2) If the basis of a ground for appeal by a party is that a
motion was erroneously granted, a filed written order by the commission is
not necessary.

25-44-218. Interlocutory appeals prohibited.
(a) A party shall not file, and the Arkansas State Claims Commission
shall not entertain, an interlocutory appeal of a legal issue.
(b)(1) The Director of the Arkansas State Claims Commission shall
reject an interlocutory motion.
(2) An interlocutory motion shall not be included in the record
of the case.
(c) All legal issues or factual issues in dispute that have been
raised and addressed by the commission may be included in a party's appeal of
the commission's final order.

25-44-219. Small claims adjudication.
816 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Claims Commission may establish a small
claims adjudication process for claims or actions seeking one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or less.
(2) The small claims adjudication process shall provide that
claims or actions be given docket priority, and the use of informal
discovery, hearings utilizing teleconferencing or other off-site
communications technology, and relaxed procedural rules are encouraged to
facilitate efficient and timely resolution.
(b)(1) A claim or action seeking one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less
may be:
(A) Assigned to be heard by one (1) commissioner of the
commission; and
(B) Decided by the commissioner on the basis of the
pleadings alone.
(2) If a claimant objects to having the claim or action heard as
a small claims adjudication under this section, the claimant may request that
the claim or action be heard in the usual manner for similar claims or
actions.
(c) Before a proposed written final order of a small claims
adjudication under this section is considered final for the purposes of award
or appeal, the proposed written final order shall be reviewed by a panel
consisting of:
(1) The commissioner of the commission assigned to the claim or
action; and
(2) Two (2) other commissioners of the commission.

25-44-220. Special masters authorized.
(a) The Arkansas State Claims Commission may appoint a special master
with specialized knowledge and skill to assist the commission in achieving a
more timely resolution of complex litigation arising from a claim or action.
(b)(1) All or part of a special master's findings may be included as
part of or in addition to a commission's final order.
(2) The special master's findings, if disputed by a party, may
be raised on appeal.

25-44-221. Abuse of process by litigants.
817 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
An inmate in the Division of Correction or the Division of Community
Correction who has filed more than three (3) unsuccessful claims or actions
under this subchapter within a period of two (2) years may have his or her
subsequent claims or motions dismissed by the Arkansas State Claims
Commission upon receipt as abuse of process, for one (1) year from the date
of dismissal of the inmate's third unsuccessful claim.

25-44-222. Corporate or business entity to be represented by attorney.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a corporate
or business entity created under the laws of this state or another state
shall be represented at all times in a claim or action under this subchapter
by an attorney licensed to practice law in this state.
(b) Representation by an attorney licensed to practice law in this
state is not required under this section if:
(1) The amount of money at issue is less than two thousand
dollars ($2,000); or
(2) The claim is:
(A) An uncontested claim for the reissuance of a warrant;
or
(B) For the refund of a liquor license permit application
fee.

25-44-223. Failure to exhaust available state or administrative
remedy.
The Arkansas State Claims Commission may dismiss a claim or action
without prejudice on the commission's own motion if the claimant has failed
to submit with the claimant's initial complaint or claim filing documentation
that the claimant has exhausted all available state or administrative
remedies.

Subchapter 3 — Effect of Insurance

25-44-301. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Insurer” means every person engaged as indemnitor, surety,
or contractor in the business of entering into contracts of insurance; and
818 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2) “Subrogation claim” means any claim filed with the Arkansas
State Claims Commission by an insurer or its insured, or both, to recover
money paid or owed by an insurer to any individual under a contract of
insurance.

25-44-302. Exhaustion of remedies against insurer.
(a) The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall not dismiss a claim
with prejudice on grounds that the claimant has received or is due benefits
under a policy of insurance. However, the commission shall hear no claim
until the claimant has exhausted all remedies against insurers, including the
claimant's insurer.
(b) Every claim filed with the commission shall be accompanied by a
sworn affidavit, on a form to be provided by the commission, signed by the
claimant and witnessed by the claimant's insurer and legal counsel, if any,
that the claimant has exhausted all remedies against insurers, including the
claimant's insurer. The affidavit shall further state the total amount of
insurance benefits paid to the claimant.

25-44-303. Reduction of award.
(a) If the Arkansas State Claims Commission awards damages to a
claimant who has received benefits under any policy of insurance, the premium
of which has not been paid by or on behalf of the claimant, the commission
shall reduce its award by the amount of insurance benefits received by the
claimant.
(b) The commission shall not reduce awards for damages to a claimant
who has received benefits under a policy of insurance, the premium of which
has been paid by or on behalf of the claimant.

25-44-304. Subrogation claims not heard.
The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall not hear subrogation claims.
This fact shall in no way alter or vary the operation or coverage of §§ 21-9-
201 — 21-9-205.

25-44-305. Immunity of state officers and employees — Status as
employee.
(a) Officers and employees of the State of Arkansas are immune from
819 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
liability and from suit, except to the extent that they may be covered by
liability insurance, for damages for acts or omissions, other than malicious
acts or omissions, occurring within the course and scope of their employment.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, agreements between the State of
Arkansas and a state of the United States or the District of Columbia entered
into pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, § 25-20-101 et seq., shall
confer status of an employee for purposes of this chapter on persons acting
pursuant to such agreement.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, persons acting individually or on
behalf of charitable organizations, other than motor carriers as defined by §
23-13-203(a)(13), shall have the status of an employee while transporting
persons as a service of the Transitional Employment Assistance Program.
(d) For purposes of this chapter, dental residents and faculty of a
pediatric dentistry program in an adjoining state shall have the status of an
employee while on duty and performing assigned responsibilities in a
pediatric dentistry program located within a hospital dental clinic in this
state.

25-44-306. Res judicata or collateral estoppel.
If an individual commences a civil action in any court of law within
this state which arises out of the same subject matter or occurrence that is
the subject matter of a complaint before the Arkansas State Claims
Commission, the commission shall recognize any final judgment or order
rendered in the civil action as a bar to further consideration of the claim
in accordance with principles of res judicata and collateral estoppel.

SECTION 306. Arkansas Code § 26-18-303(b)(25), concerning exceptions
to the requirement to keep tax records of the Department of Finance and
Administration confidential and privileged, is amended to read as follows:
(25) Disclosure of information related to a business closure
order under § 26-18-1001 et seq. to the Office of State Procurement for the
purpose of carrying out §§ 19-11-281 and 19-11-1015 19-61-410 and 19-67-208;

SECTION 307. Arkansas Code § 26-18-308 is amended to read as follows:
26-18-308. Disposition of revenues.
All taxes, interest, penalties, and court costs received by the
820 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under any state tax
law, unless otherwise specified in this chapter, shall be deposited in the
manner stated in the applicable state tax law. Where this chapter is the
governing authority for the collection of interest, penalties, and court
costs, the amounts collected are general revenues and shall be so deposited
to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund and allocated as provided by
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 308. Arkansas Code § 26-26-310(b)(2)(C)(ii), concerning the
certification of the amount of the property tax reduction for the homestead
property tax credit, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) Beginning December 31, 2005, and on December 31
of each subsequent year, the Treasurer of State shall:
(a) Calculate each county's proportionate
share of one million dollars ($1,000,000) based on the proportions used to
reimburse the county for property tax reductions under subsection (a) of this
section;
(b) Transfer the amount calculated under
subdivision (b)(2)(C)(ii)(a) of this section to the county treasurer for
allocation to the county assessor for use by the county assessor for the
costs of administering Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, including without
limitation costs for personnel, equipment, services, and postage used in the
administration of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79;
(c) Distribute two million dollars
($2,000,000) from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund to the counties in the
state using the formula stated in § 19-5-602(c)(1)(A) 19-25-102(c)(1)(A); and
(d) Distribute two million dollars
($2,000,000) from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund to the municipalities in
the state using the formula stated in § 19-5-601(c) 19-25-101(c).

SECTION 309. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1905(a)(3)(B), concerning the
powers of the Assessment Coordination Division with respect to rules relating
to reappraisal procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Section 19-11-101 19-60-101 et seq. shall not apply to
a contract made under this subchapter and to the expenditure of funds from
the Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund.
821 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 310. Arkansas Code § 26-51-205(c)(2)(B)(iii) and (iv),
concerning the income tax imposed on corporations and the Work Force 2000
Development Fund, are amended to read as follows:
(iii) After the deductions as set out in § 19-5-203
19-21-103 have been made, the remaining amount shall be credited to the Work
Force 2000 Development Fund.
(iv) The remaining corporate income tax collections
remaining in the Revenue Holding Fund Account shall be credited to the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund, there to be
distributed with the other gross general revenue collections for that month
in accordance with the provisions of § 19-5-201 19-21-101 et seq.

SECTION 311. Arkansas Code § 26-51-501(f)(2)(B), concerning conditions
on the increase of personal tax credits, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The net available general revenues for the fiscal year
ending in the calendar year for which a credit increase is contemplated
exceed the total distributions for that fiscal year under the provisions of
the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 312. Arkansas Code § 26-51-2603(c)(1), concerning the Arkansas
major historic rehabilitation income tax credit, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The Division of Arkansas Heritage shall not issue Arkansas
major historic rehabilitation income tax credits for more than the amount
certified under § 19-5-1150(c)(1)(A) 19-26-323(c)(1)(A).

SECTION 313. Arkansas Code § 26-52-107 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-107. Disposition of taxes, interest, and penalties.
All taxes, interest, penalties, and costs received by the Secretary of
the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this
chapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited into the State
Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of
State shall allocate and transfer the same to the various State Treasury
funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each
as provided by, and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in, the
822 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 314. Arkansas Code § 26-54-113(b)(2), concerning the
disposition of funds under the Arkansas Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) After the transfers required by subdivision (b)(1) of this
section have been made, the taxes and penalties collected under this chapter
during the remainder of the fiscal year shall be special revenues, and the
Treasurer of State shall transfer the taxes and penalties collected to the
Educational Adequacy Fund after making the deductions required by § 19-5-
203(b)(2) 19-21-103(b)(2).

SECTION 315. Arkansas Code § 26-55-1004(a)(2)(C), concerning the
disposition of revenues derived from the additional tax on motor fuel, is
amended to read as follows:
(C) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund.

SECTION 316. Arkansas Code § 26-55-1004(b)(1), concerning the
disposition of revenues derived from the additional tax on motor fuel, is
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) All such funds credited to the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund shall be used for
construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of the rural state highways of
the state and their extensions into municipalities and industrial access
roads.

SECTION 317. Arkansas Code § 26-55-1202(a), concerning additional
funds deposited into the State Treasury from taxes on motor fuels, distillate
special fuels, and liquefied gas special fuels, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) All of the additional taxes, fees, penalties, and interest
collected under the provisions of this subchapter and §§ 26-55-710, 26-56-
214, and 26-56-304 shall be classified as special revenues and shall be
deposited into the State Treasury. After deducting therefrom the amount to be
823 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
credited to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services
Fund as provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq., the Treasurer of State shall transfer on the last business day of each
month:
(1) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the County
Aid Fund;
(2) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the Municipal
Aid Fund; and
(3) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to a special
account in the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund to be designated the “1991 Highway
Construction and Maintenance Account”.

SECTION 318. Arkansas Code § 26-56-222(b), concerning the disposition
of funds collected under certain statutes related to special motor fuels, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) After deducting the amount to be credited to the Constitutional
Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund as provided under the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the Treasurer of
State shall transfer on the last business day of each month:
(1) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the County
Aid Fund;
(2) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the Municipal
Aid Fund; and
(3) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund.

SECTION 319. Arkansas Code § 26-56-504(a)(2)(C), concerning the
disposition of revenues derived from the additional tax on distillate special
fuel and liquefied gas special fuel, is amended to read as follows:
(C) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund.

SECTION 320. Arkansas Code § 26-56-504(b)(1), concerning the
824 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
disposition of revenues derived from the additional tax on distillate special
fuel and liquefied gas special fuel, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) All such funds credited to the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation shall be used for
construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of the rural state highways of
the state and their extensions into municipalities and industrial access
roads.

SECTION 321. Arkansas Code § 26-56-602(a), concerning additional funds
deposited into the State Treasury from taxes on motor fuels, distillate
special fuels, and liquefied gas special fuels, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) All of the additional taxes, fees, penalties, and interest
collected under the provisions of this subchapter and §§ 26-55-710, 26-56-
214, and 26-56-304 shall be classified as special revenues and shall be
deposited into the State Treasury. After deducting therefrom the amount to be
credited to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services
Fund as provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq., the Treasurer of State shall transfer on the last business day of each
month:
(1) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the County
Aid Fund;
(2) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the Municipal
Aid Fund; and
(3) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to a special
account in the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund to be designated the “1991 Highway
Construction and Maintenance Account”.

SECTION 322. Arkansas Code § 26-57-247(p)(3), concerning the seizure,
forfeiture, and disposition of tobacco products and other property, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) Moneys in the tobacco control fund shall be appropriated on
a continuing basis and are not subject to the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

825 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 323. Arkansas Code § 26-57-610(b)(3), concerning the
disposition of insurance premium taxes, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The taxes collected under §§ 26-57-604 and 26-57-605 shall
be classified as general revenues, and the net amount of taxes collected
under §§ 26-57-604 and 26-57-605 shall be credited to the various State
Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective
proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes
set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.; and

SECTION 324. Arkansas Code § 26-57-610(b)(5)(C), concerning the
disposition of insurance premium taxes collected under the Arkansas Medicaid
Program as administered by a risk-based provider organization, is amended to
read as follows:
(C) On and after the certification as described in
subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section and after the transfer under
subdivision (b)(5)(B)(i) of this section, transferred in the remainder to the
Arkansas Medicaid Program Trust Fund and used as provided by § 19-5-985 19-
26-269 as well as being used to provide funding for:
(i) The quality incentive pool under the Medicaid
Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq.;
(ii) Home and community-based services for
individuals with behavioral health needs and intellectual and developmental
disabilities; and
(iii) Other services covered by the Arkansas
Medicaid Program as determined by the Department of Human Services.

SECTION 325. Arkansas Code § 26-57-806(d), concerning the additional
tax of twenty-eight dollars on cigarettes, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The revenue derived from the additional tax imposed by this
section shall be credited to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State
Apportionment Fund, there to be distributed with the other gross general
revenue collections for that month in accordance with the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-201 19-21-101 et seq.

SECTION 326. Arkansas Code § 26-57-807(e), concerning the additional
tax of thirty-six percent on tobacco products other than cigarettes, is
826 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
amended to read as follows:
(e) The revenue derived from the additional tax imposed by this
section shall be credited to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State
Apportionment Fund, there to be distributed with the other gross general
revenue collections for that month in accordance with the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-201 19-21-101 et seq.

SECTION 327. Arkansas Code § 26-57-1108 is amended to read as follows:
26-57-1108. Appropriation from general revenues — Additional tax not
collected.
The taxes levied by this subchapter shall not be collected during any
fiscal year for which the General Assembly has appropriated at least eight
hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) from general revenues to the Breast
Cancer Research Fund and at least three million two hundred thousand dollars
($3,200,000) of general revenues to the Breast Cancer Control Fund and funded
those appropriations in Category A of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-
101 19-20-101 et seq., for that fiscal year.

SECTION 328. Arkansas Code § 26-57-1208(b)(1), concerning the
distribution of the vending device decal fees levied under the Vending
Devices Decal Act of 1997, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) of the fees collected under § 26-57-
1206(a)(1)(B)-(E) and sixty percent (60%) of the fees collected under § 26-
57-1206(a)(1)(A) shall be deposited to the credit of the General Revenue Fund
Account of the State Apportionment Fund provided by § 19-5-202 19-21-102;

SECTION 329. Arkansas Code § 26-57-1309(b)(2), concerning the
assignment of funds placed into escrow by a tobacco product manufacturer, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) Any funds withdrawn under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be deposited into the Tobacco Settlement Cash Holding Fund under § 19-
12-104 19-90-104 and shall be calculated on a dollar-for-dollar basis as a
credit against any judgment or settlement in favor of the state as part of
the Master Settlement Agreement under § 26-57-261 against the tobacco product
manufacturer that has assigned the funds in the subject escrow account.

827 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
SECTION 330. Arkansas Code § 26-58-124(b)(2)(C), concerning the
distribution of severance tax revenues, is amended to read as follows:
(C) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of the
severance taxes and penalties, except those on timber and timber products and
except those on diamonds, shall be general revenues and shall be allocated to
the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.; and

SECTION 331. Arkansas Code § 26-59-122(b), concerning the disposition
and allocation of funds generated by the estate tax, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the funds to
the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the
respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the
respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 332. Arkansas Code § 26-60-112(b)(2)(A), concerning the
disposition of funds collected from the real property transfer tax, is
amended to read as follows:
(A) The entire amount collected during each fiscal year
until there has been collected an amount of such tax equaling the amount of
tax collected under this chapter during fiscal year 1982-1983 shall be
credited as general revenues to be allocated to the various funds
participating in the distribution of general revenues in the amount of each
such fund as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth
in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.; and

SECTION 333. Arkansas Code § 26-62-109(a), concerning the disposition
of revenue generated from the alternative fuels tax, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) All of the taxes, fees, penalties, and interest collected under
the provisions of this chapter shall be classified as special revenues and
shall be deposited into the State Treasury. After deducting therefrom the
828 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
three percent (3%) for credit to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the
State Central Services Fund as provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §
19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq., the Treasurer of State shall transfer on the last
business day of each month:
(1) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the County
Aid Fund;
(2) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the Municipal
Aid Fund; and
(3) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund.

SECTION 334. Arkansas Code § 26-63-106(b), concerning the disposition
of taxes, interest, and penalties derived from special excise taxes, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the general
revenues described in subsection (a) of this section to the various State
Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective
proportions to those funds as provided by and to be used for the respective
purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et
seq.

SECTION 335. Arkansas Code § 26-75-609 is amended to read as follows:
26-75-609. Execution of bonds.
The bonds shall be executed in the manner provided by the Registered
Public Obligations Act of Arkansas, § 19-9-401 19-6-401 et seq., as that act
may be amended.

SECTION 336. Arkansas Code § 27-14-601(d)(1), concerning fees for the
registration and licensing of motor vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) All taxes, fees, penalties, interest, and other amounts
collected under the provisions of this section, except those set forth in
subdivision (d)(3) of this section, shall be classified as special revenues
and shall be deposited into the State Treasury. After deducting the amount to
be credited to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central
Services Fund as provided under the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-
829 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
20-101 et seq., the Treasurer of State shall transfer on the last business
day of each month:
(A) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the
County Aid Fund;
(B) Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the
Municipal Aid Fund; and
(C) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to the
State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund.

SECTION 337. Arkansas Code § 27-14-601(d)(4), concerning the
disposition of fees for the registration and licensing of motor vehicles, is
amended to read as follows:
(4) That portion of the annual license fee collected pursuant to
subdivision (a)(3)(H)(ii)(f) of this section declared to be a permit fee
shall be classified as special revenues and shall be deposited into the State
Treasury. The Treasurer of State shall transfer on the last business day of
each month all of the portions of the annual license fees to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund to be utilized for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of
highways and bridges in the state highway system.

SECTION 338. Arkansas Code § 27-14-601(e)(2), concerning the penalty
for owning or operating a motor vehicle without paying the required fee for
registration and licensing of the motor vehicle, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) If the arresting officer is:
(A) An officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police,
the fine collected shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by the
Administration of Justice Funds Section for deposit into the Division of
Arkansas State Police Fund, to be used for the purchase and maintenance of
state police vehicles;
(B) An officer of the Arkansas Highway Police Division of
the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the fine collected shall be
remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice
830 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Funds Section on a form provided by the Administration of Justice Funds
Section for deposit into the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, to be used for the purchase and
maintenance of highway police vehicles;
(C) A county law enforcement officer, the fine collected
shall be deposited into the county fund used for the purchase and maintenance
of rescue, emergency medical, and law enforcement vehicles, communications
equipment, animals owned or used by law enforcement agencies, lifesaving
medical apparatus, and law enforcement apparatus, to be used for those
purposes; and
(D) A municipal law enforcement officer, the fine
collected shall be deposited into that municipality's fund used for the
purchase and maintenance of rescue, emergency medical, and law enforcement
vehicles, communications equipment, animals owned or used by law enforcement
agencies, lifesaving medical apparatus, and law enforcement apparatus, to be
used for those purposes.

SECTION 339. Arkansas Code § 27-14-614(c), concerning the additional
fee for electric vehicles and hybrid vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The revenues collected under this section are highway revenues as
defined in § 27-70-202 and shall be distributed to the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, the
County Aid Fund, and the Municipal Aid Fund, as provided in § 27-70-206.

SECTION 340. Arkansas Code § 27-22-107(a)(2)(D), concerning motor
vehicle insurance reporting, is amended to read as follows:
(D) The department shall select a vendor under the
Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 19-61-101 et seq.

SECTION 341. Arkansas Code § 27-23-118(b)(2), concerning the
distribution of fees collected for driving record information furnished to an
employer or prospective employer under the Arkansas Uniform Commercial Driver
License Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The remaining six dollars ($6.00) of the fee shall be
deposited to the credit of the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund for distribution as provided in
831 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
the Arkansas Highway Revenue Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.

SECTION 342. Arkansas Code § 27-23-118(c)(2), concerning the
distribution of fees collected for driving record information furnished to
persons other than a driver license administrator, employer, or prospective
employer under the Arkansas Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) Six dollars ($6.00) of the fee shall be deposited to the
credit of the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department
of Transportation Fund for distribution as provided in the Arkansas Highway
Revenue Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.; and

SECTION 343. Arkansas Code § 27-35-210(g)(3), concerning the duties of
agencies with respect to permits for special cargoes, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) To transmit the fees to the Treasurer of State to be
credited to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund.

SECTION 344. Arkansas Code § 27-35-211 is amended to read as follows:
27-35-211. Disposition of fees and penalties.
All fees and penalties collected under the provisions of §§ 27-35-202
and 27-35-210 shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by that section
for deposit into the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund.

SECTION 345. Arkansas Code § 27-35-308(b), concerning the disposition
of fees related to manufactured homes and houses, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The net amount shall be credited to the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, there
to be used for the operation and maintenance of the Arkansas Highway Police
Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

SECTION 346. Arkansas Code § 27-50-912(f)(2), concerning fees for
832 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
insureds monitored under the driver monitoring program, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The Office of Driver Services shall authorize that one cent
(1¢) of the revenues from subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall be special
revenues and deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund for distribution as provided in the Arkansas Highway Revenue
Distribution Law, § 27-70-201 et seq.

SECTION 347. Arkansas Code § 27-64-203(5)(B), concerning the revenues
included in the definition of "designated revenues" used under the Arkansas
Highway Financing Act of 1999, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Revenues derived from the increase in taxes levied on
distillate special fuels pursuant to § 26-56-201 and transferred to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund pursuant to § 27-70-207(d) in accordance with §§ 26-56-201 and 26-55-
1006; and

SECTION 348. Arkansas Code § 27-64-206(b)(2)(B), concerning elections
on the approval of bonds under the Arkansas Highway Financing Act of 1999, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) The bonds shall be general obligations of the State of
Arkansas, payable from certain designated revenues and also secured by the
full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas, including its general
revenues. Pursuant to this subchapter, the “Bond Act”, the bonds will be
repaid first from revenues derived from federal highway assistance funding
allocated to the State of Arkansas designated as federal highway interstate
maintenance funds, and, if needed, that portion of national highway system
funds authorized by State Highway Commission Minute Order 98-214 adopted
September 22, 1998, and, second, from revenue derived from the increase in
the excise tax levied on distillate special fuels and diesel pursuant to §
26-56-201(e) and transferred to the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation pursuant to § 27-70-207(d)
in accordance with § 26-56-201(f) and § 26-55-1006(d). To the extent that
designated revenues are insufficient to make timely payment of debt service
on the bonds, such payment shall be made from the general revenues of the
833 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
State of Arkansas. The bonds shall be issued pursuant to the authority of and
the terms set forth in this subchapter.

SECTION 349. Arkansas Code § 27-64-206(b)(2)(D), concerning elections
on the approval of bonds under the Arkansas Highway Financing Act of 1999, is
amended to read as follows:
(D) Pursuant to this subchapter, “designated revenues” are
defined as that portion designated by the commission of all funds received or
to be received from the United States Government as federal highway
interstate maintenance funds, and, if needed, that portion of national
highway system funds authorized by State Highway Commission Minute Order 98-
214 adopted September 22, 1998, and revenues derived from the increase in
taxes levied on distillate special fuels pursuant to § 26-56-201(e) and
transferred to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund pursuant to § 27-70-207(d) in accordance
with § 26-56-201(f) and § 26-55-1006(d). Designated revenues shall not
include the revenues derived from the increase in tax on motor fuel,
gasoline, resulting from the Arkansas Distillate Special Fuel Excise Tax Act
of 1999 and the Motor Fuel Excise Tax Act of 1999, §§ 26-55-1005, 26-55-1006,
26-56-201, and 27-72-305. The bonds are further secured by the full faith and
credit of the State of Arkansas, and to the extent that designated revenues
are insufficient to make timely payment of debt service on the bonds, the
general revenues of the state shall be used to pay debt service on the bonds.
Pursuant to § 26-56-201, the excise tax on distillate special fuels, in
addition to the taxes levied pursuant to §§ 26-56-201, 26-56-502, and 26-56-
601, will increase by two cents (2¢) per gallon on April 1, 1999, and the
additional tax levied by § 26-56-201(e) shall increase to four cents (4¢) per
gallon on the first anniversary of such date.

SECTION 350. Arkansas Code § 27-64-211(a)(2)(B), concerning sources of
repayment for general obligation bonds issued under the Arkansas Highway
Financing Act of 1999, is amended to read as follows:
(B) Revenues derived from the increase in taxes levied on
distillate special fuels pursuant to § 26-56-201 and transferred to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund pursuant to § 27-70-207(d) in accordance with § 26-55-1006(d) and § 26-
834 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
56-201(f).

SECTION 351. Arkansas Code § 27-64-405(b), concerning elections on the
approval of bonds under the Arkansas Interstate Highway Financing Act of
2007, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The notice of election shall state that the election is to be held
for the purpose of submitting to the people the following proposition in
substantially the form set forth in this subsection:
“Authorizing the State Highway Commission to issue State of Arkansas
Federal Highway Grant Anticipation and Tax Revenue Bonds (the ‘Bonds’) from
time to time provided that the total principal amount outstanding from the
issuance of such bonds, together with the total principal amount outstanding
from the issuance of bonds pursuant to the Arkansas Highway Financing Act of
1999, § 27-64-201 et seq., shall not, at any time, exceed five hundred
seventy-five million dollars ($575,000,000). If approved, the bonds will be
issued in one (1) or more series of various principal amounts with the last
series being issued no later than December 31, 2015. The bonds shall be
issued for the purpose of paying the cost of constructing and renovating
improvements to interstate highways and related facilities in the State of
Arkansas.
“The bonds shall be general obligations of the State of Arkansas,
payable from certain designated revenues and also secured by the full faith
and credit of the State of Arkansas, including its general revenues. Pursuant
to the Arkansas Interstate Highway Financing Act of 2007 (the ‘Bond Act'), §
27-64-401 et seq., the bonds will be repaid first from: (1) revenues derived
from federal highway assistance funding allocated to the State of Arkansas
designated as federal highway interstate maintenance funds, and (2) revenue
derived from the increase in the excise tax levied on distillate special
fuels (diesel) pursuant to § 26-56-201(e) and transferred to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund pursuant to § 27-70-207(d) in accordance with § 26-55-1006(d). To the
extent that designated revenues are insufficient to make timely payment of
debt service on the bonds, such payment shall be made from the general
revenues of the State of Arkansas. The bonds shall be issued pursuant to the
authority of and the terms set forth in the Bond Act, § 27-64-401 et seq.
“Pursuant to the Bond Act, § 27-64-401 et seq., the highway
835 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
improvements to be financed are limited to the restoration and improvements
to all of the interstate highway system within the state, including roadways,
bridges, or rights-of-way under jurisdiction of the State Highway Commission,
which shall also include the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and
renovation of such interstate highway system and facilities appurtenant or
pertaining thereto.
“Pursuant to the Bond Act, § 27-64-401 et seq., ‘designated revenues’
are defined as: (1) that portion designated by the commission of all funds
received or to be received from the federal government as federal highway
interstate maintenance funds, and (2) revenues derived from the increase in
taxes levied on distillate special fuels pursuant to § 26-56-201(e) and
transferred to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund pursuant to Arkansas Code § 27-70-207(d) in
accordance with § 26-55-1006(d). Designated revenues shall not include the
revenues derived from the increase in tax on motor fuel (gasoline) resulting
from the ‘Arkansas Distillate Special Fuel Excise Tax Act of 1999’ and the
‘Motor Fuel Excise Tax Act of 1999’, §§ 26-55-1005, 26-55-1006, 26-56-201,
and 27-72-305. The bonds are further secured by the full faith and credit of
the State of Arkansas, and to the extent ‘designated revenues’ are
insufficient to make timely payment of debt service on the bonds, the general
revenues of the state shall be used to pay debt service on the bonds.”

SECTION 352. Arkansas Code § 27-64-410(b)(2), concerning the sources
of repayment for State of Arkansas Federal Grant Anticipation and Tax Revenue
Bonds or GARVEE bonds under the Arkansas Interstate Highway Financing Act of
2007, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Revenues derived from the increase in taxes levied on
distillate special fuels pursuant to § 2 of the Arkansas Distillate Special
Fuel Excise Tax Act of 1999 and the Motor Fuel Excise Tax Act of 1999, §§ 26-
55-1005, 26-55-1006, 26-56-201, and 27-72-305, and transferred to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund pursuant to § 27-70-207(d) in accordance with § 26-55-1006(d).

SECTION 353. Arkansas Code § 27-65-107(a)(18)(A)(i), concerning the
powers and duties of the State Highway Commission to propose and submit
certain rules, is amended to read as follows:
836 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(i) Criteria for distribution of funds and the
distribution of funds from the:
(a) State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund; and
(b) Road and Bridge Repair, Maintenance, and
Grants Fund;

SECTION 354. Arkansas Code § 27-65-112(e), concerning acceptance of
federal aid by the State Highway Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(e) Any and all moneys so received shall be credited to the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund.

SECTION 355. Arkansas Code § 27-65-131(c), concerning bonds furnished
by suppliers and employees of the State Highway Commission, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) All bonds required by this act of officials or employees of the
commission or required by the commission of its employees shall be executed
by a solvent surety company authorized to do business in the state and
approved by the commission and filed with the Secretary of State, and the
premium shall be paid out of the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund. The commission may itself take
surety bonds on any or all employees and pay the premium thereon.

SECTION 356. Arkansas Code § 27-66-601(d), concerning state inmates
working on roads, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The pay of the wardens or other officers and the cost of
maintenance, including clothing, food, and housing for the state inmates
while working on roads shall be paid out of the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.

SECTION 357. Arkansas Code § 27-67-206(i), concerning the construction
of roads of the state highway system, is amended to read as follows:
(i) The commission may let contracts for the construction of necessary
bridges on the state highways to be paid for out of the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.
837 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508

SECTION 358. Arkansas Code § 27-67-207(d), concerning maintenance of
state highways, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The commission may make all necessary contracts, purchase all
necessary equipment, supplies, and materials, and employ all necessary labor
and is given all other necessary powers to provide for maintenance and shall
pay for the same out of the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.

SECTION 359. Arkansas Code § 27-67-308(b), concerning the authority of
the State Highway Commission to pay compensation for real property and the
source of revenue for the payments, is amended to read as follows:
(b) With respect to the costs of acquiring lands and real property for
state highway purposes, the commission shall assess counties in which the
land or property is located no part of the cost with respect to highways in
the primary system and fifty percent (50%) of the cost with respect to
highways in the secondary system. The county portion shall be deducted from
the next payment due any county by reason of any appropriation out of the
State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund or state revenue from gasoline as motor vehicle fuel or
automobile license tax to the county or county highway fund of the county.

SECTION 360. Arkansas Code § 27-69-207(b), concerning funds for the
Mississippi River Parkway, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The authorizations made for expenditures from the State Highway
and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund in
subsection (a) of this section shall be made by the State Highway Commission
as it deems in the best interests of the State of Arkansas and shall be
limited to expenditures not exceeding seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500) for fees, dues, and other expenses during any one (1) fiscal year.

SECTION 361. Arkansas Code § 27-70-103(b), concerning the State
Highway Special Construction Account, is amended to read as follows:
(b) After deducting therefrom the three percent (3%) for credit to the
Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund as required
by § 27-70-206(1), the Treasurer of State shall transfer the net amount
838 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
remaining to the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund to be set aside in a special account
therein to be known as the State Highway Special Construction Account to be
used solely and exclusively by the State Highway Commission:
(1) For construction of roads and highways on the state highway
system; and
(2) To provide funds for transfer to the State Aid Road Fund as
may be provided by law.

SECTION 362. Arkansas Code §§ 27-70-204 and 27-20-205 are amended to
read as follows:
27-70-204. Interest on funds of Arkansas Department of Transportation.
(a) On the second business day that the State Treasury is open after
the twenty-fifth day of the month, the Treasurer of State shall compute the
balance of the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund, including all internal accounts and funds,
including, but not limited to, the State Highway Special Construction
Account, the State Aid Road Fund, the State Aid Street Fund, the State
Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation
Fund, and any other funds administered by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation during the preceding month and shall transfer on that day to
the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of
Transportation Fund interest on the balance to be computed as authorized
under § 19-3-518(d)(4) 19-3-318(d)(4), excluding the interest rate paid on
open account deposits, during the preceding month.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
interest earned on the accounts described in subsection (a) of this section
shall be classified as special revenues to be used as authorized under § 19-
6-405 19-43-204.
(2) Interest income generated from the Arkansas Four-Lane
Highway Construction and Improvement Bond Account shall be distributed as
required under § 27-70-206.

27-70-205. Federal Revenue Sharing State Highway Trust Fund Account.
Commencing with the federal funds received by the State of Arkansas
under the provisions of the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972,
839 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
Pub. L. No. 92-512, as amended, commonly and hereinafter referred to as
“federal revenue-sharing funds”, all federal revenue sharing funds received
each fiscal year by the State of Arkansas for the use and benefit of the
State of Arkansas shall be transferred to and allocated to a special trust
fund to be established in the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund, to be known as the Federal
Revenue Sharing State Highway Trust Fund Account, to be set aside and used by
the State Highway Commission solely and exclusively for construction of
highways on the state highway system and the state aid street system. All
funds shall be administered and the controls and accounting thereof shall be
in accordance with the provisions of the State and Local Fiscal Assistance
Act of 1972, Pub. L. No. 92-512, as amended, and all regulations promulgated
thereunder, and in accordance with the laws of this state governing the
advertising and awarding contracts for, and payment of, construction
contracts to be awarded by the commission.

SECTION 363. Arkansas Code § 27-70-206(1), concerning the distribution
of highway revenues to state funds, is amended to read as follows:
(1) First, except as provided by § 19-5-207 19-21-107, three
percent (3%) of the amount thereof to the Constitutional Officers Fund and
the State Central Services Fund, there to be used for the purposes specified
for each fund by the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.;

SECTION 364. Arkansas Code § 27-70-206(3), concerning the distribution
of highway revenues to state funds, is amended to read as follows:
(3) After meeting the requirements set out in subdivisions (1)
and (2) of this section, all remaining highway revenues which are available
for distribution during each fiscal year shall be transferred in the
following manner: Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the County
Aid Fund; fifteen percent (15%) of the amount thereof to the Municipal Aid
Fund; and seventy percent (70%) of the amount thereof to the State Highway
and Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund.

SECTION 365. Arkansas Code § 27-70-207(d)(1), concerning the
distribution of highway revenues to county and city funds, is amended to read
as follows:
840 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(d)(1) All highway revenues transferred to the State Highway and
Transportation Department Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund under
the provisions of this subchapter shall be used for the construction,
reconstruction, and maintenance of highways and bridges in the state highway
system.

SECTION 366. Arkansas Code § 27-70-207(d)(2)(A), concerning the
distribution of highway revenues to county and city funds, is amended to read
as follows:
(2)(A) However, the Arkansas Department of Transportation may
use highway revenues transferred to the State Highway and Transportation
Department Arkansas Department of Transportation for the installation,
upgrading, or improvement of any highway-railroad crossing safety device,
railroad crossing traffic control device, warning lights, crossing gates, or
other railroad crossing safety devices at public highway railroad crossings
and for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of any highway-
railroad crossing, including the construction or installation of any
underpasses or overpasses.

SECTION 367. Arkansas Code § 27-72-305(a)(1), concerning the State Aid
Road Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as
the State Aid Road Fund, to which the Treasurer of State shall transfer one
hundred percent (100%) of the revenues credited to the State Highway Special
Construction Account of the State Highway and Transportation Department
Arkansas Department of Transportation Fund each month until an aggregate
total of thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) each fiscal year is so
transferred, there to be used for construction, reconstruction, and
improvements of the state aid road system.

SECTION 368. Arkansas Code § 27-72-318(c), concerning county highway
revenue estimates, is amended to read as follows:
(c) In addition to the estimate of the total amounts of county road
funds by legislated source categories to be collected and apportioned, the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall incorporate in each official estimate
a listing of all counties and an estimate of the amount of county road funds
841 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
by legislated source category to be credited to each county under the current
provisions of the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 369. Arkansas Code § 27-72-319(a), concerning advance
transfers from the County Road Construction and Maintenance Revolving Fund,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) Moneys at any time in the County Road Construction and Maintenance
Revolving Fund shall be available to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
only for the purposes of making advance transfers to the several county
highway funds, state aid road funds, federal-aid secondary road funds, and
all other provisions of county road construction assistance which may be
enacted by the General Assembly and governed by the Revenue Stabilization
Law, § 19-5-101 19-20-101 et seq.

SECTION 370. Arkansas Code § 27-89-305 is amended to read as follows:
27-89-305. Use of state funds — Appropriation necessary for
construction funds.
The State Highway Commission is authorized to use moneys appropriated
for the operation of the Arkansas Department of Transportation for payment of
the State of Arkansas's pro rata share of the administrative costs of the
compact authority, but shall have no authority to authorize, or contract for,
the use of moneys in the State Highway and Transportation Department Arkansas
Department of Transportation Fund for the construction of the Arkansas-
Mississippi Great River Bridge, except upon specific authorization and
appropriation thereof by the General Assembly.

SECTION 371. Arkansas Code § 27-101-1004(d)(2)(A), concerning
application for a certificate of title, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) The Treasurer of State shall deduct a percentage of the
gross amount of the certificate of title application fee collected under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section for the benefit of the Constitutional
Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund as required in §§ 19-5-202
and 19-5-203 19-21-102 and 19-21-103.

SECTION 372. Arkansas Code § 27-101-1005(d)(2)(A), concerning lost or
damaged certificates of title, is amended to read as follows:
842 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(2)(A) A percentage of the gross amount thereof shall be
deducted by the Treasurer of State for the benefit of the Constitutional
Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund as required in §§ 19-5-202
and 19-5-203 19-21-102 and 19-21-103.

SECTION 373. DO NOT CODIFY. Construction.
(a) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly or
impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly.
(b) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the regular
session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(1) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General
Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General Assembly
for the purposes of:
(A) Giving the act of the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(B) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the
Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(2) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply.

SECTION 374. DO NOT CODIFY. Incorporation of legislation into
recodified Arkansas Code, Title 19 and related amendments.
(a) For purposes of incorporation into the recodified Arkansas Code,
Title 19, created by this act and related amendments to the Arkansas Code
made in connection with the recodification of Arkansas Code, Title 19, all
references in the acts passed at the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly to Arkansas Code, Title 19, or to provisions of the Arkansas
Code amended by this act in connection with the recodification of Arkansas
Code, Title 19, shall be deemed to refer to the applicable or corresponding
provisions contained in the recodified Arkansas Code, Title 19 and related
amendments to the Arkansas Code made in connection with the recodification of
Arkansas Code, Title 19.
(b) The Bureau of Legislative Research, while assisting the Arkansas
Code Revision Commission with the commission's powers and duties, shall:
(1) Incorporate acts passed in the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly amending Arkansas Code, Title 19, or to
843 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
provisions of the Arkansas Code amended by this act in connection with the
recodification of Arkansas Code, Title 19, into the appropriate provisions of
the Arkansas Code so long as those revisions do not result in a change in the
substance or meaning of a provision of the act; and
(2) Make technical changes to the Arkansas Code necessary to
implement this act, including without limitation changes to citations in the
Arkansas Code referencing provisions of Arkansas law amended by this act.

SECTION 375. DO NOT CODIFY. Technical revisions to Code of Arkansas
Rules.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) As a result of the recodification of Title 19 and other
amendments to the Arkansas Code under this act, multiple statutory references
to Title 19 or other provisions of Arkansas law in the Code of Arkansas Rules
will be incorrect and require revision to reflect the changes implemented by
this act; and
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that these
provisions of the Code of Arkansas Rules be updated by the Bureau of
Legislative Research as part of its maintenance of the Code of Arkansas
Rules.
(b) The bureau shall update statutory references to Title 19 or other
provisions of Arkansas law in the Code of Arkansas Rules to reflect the
proper citations under this act.
(c) Any person or state entity identifying one (1) or more citations
contained in the Code of Arkansas Rules that require revision to implement
this act may notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or his
or her designee of the citations at issue.

SECTION 376. DO NOT CODIFY. Correction of technical errors related to
implementation of recodification of Arkansas Code, Title 19.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(A) The implementation of this act involves a multitude of
changes to existing Arkansas law;
(B) Many of the changes implemented by this act are highly
technical and require careful study of the purpose and context of each
Arkansas Code section, with the need for some of the changes not becoming
844 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
apparent until after the implementation of this act;
(C) When implementing revisions as large and comprehensive
as the changes under this act, it is inevitable that certain sections of the
Arkansas Code requiring technical changes to follow the intent of this act
will be either omitted or amended in a manner that is later found to be
erroneous and unintentional;
(D) It is likewise inevitable that other acts enacted by
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly will not take into account the changes in
this act, resulting in technical inconsistencies between newly passed laws;
and
(E) If the correct statutory change to remedy an
unintentional error or an inconsistency between this act and another act of
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly is readily apparent and consistent with the
intent of this act, the unintentional error or inconsistency should be
corrected as part of the codification process due to the technical nature of
the unintentional error or inconsistency.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to empower the
Arkansas Code Revision Commission to correct technical errors identified in
the Arkansas Code during the implementation of this act to allow this act to
be fully implemented.
(b)(1)(A) Any person or state entity identifying one (1) or more
sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement the intent
of this act may notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or
his or her designee of the section or sections at issue.
(B) If the Bureau of Legislative Research, while assisting
the commission with the commission's powers and duties, becomes aware of one
(1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement
the intent of this act for which it appears that the bureau and the
commission do not have authority to make the necessary revision under § 1-2-
303(d), the bureau may notify the commission of the section or sections at
issue.
(2) If the commission determines that the revision necessary to
one (1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section is technical in nature, germane to the intent of this act, and
consistent with this act's policy and purposes, the commission may make the
revision to the Arkansas Code.
845 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S3/4/25 HB1508
(3) The commission shall notify the publisher of the Arkansas
Code of a revision to the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section as soon as possible so that the revision may be reflected in the
official hard copy version of the Arkansas Code and the official electronic
version of the Arkansas Code.
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(4)(B) of this
section, when the commission approves a revision to the Arkansas Code under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the commission shall notify the following
of the revision within thirty (30) days:
(i) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(ii) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
(iii) The Legislative Council.
(B) The commission is not required to make a notification
under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section if the revision is made under §
1-2-303(d).
(c) The authority granted to the commission under this section is
supplemental to the commission's authority under § 1-2-303.
(d) This section shall expire on December 31, 2026.

/s/M. Shepherd
















846 03-04-2025 10:49:39 JLL144